California, session 20252026, SB109.
do enact as follows: SECTION 1.00. This act shall be known and may be cited as the “Budget Act of 2026.” SEC. 1.50. (a) In accordance with Sections 12460, 13338, and 13344 of the Government Code, it is the intent of the Legislature that this act and other financial transactions authorized outside of this act utilize a coding scheme or structure compatible with the Governor’s Budget, the records of the Controller in legacy systems, and the Financial Information System for California (FI$Cal), and provide for the appropriation of federal funds received by the state and deposited in the State Treasury. (b) Essentially, the format and style are as follows: (1) Appropriation item numbers have a structure which is common to all the state’s fiscal systems. The meaning of this structure is as follows: 2720—​Business Unit (known as organization code in legacy systems, indicates the department or entity) (e.g., 2720 represents the Department of the California Highway Patrol) 001—​Reference Code (indicates whether the item is from the Budget Act or some other source and its character (e.g., 001–100 represents state operations in the Budget Act)) 0044—​Fund Code (e.g., 0044 represents the Motor Vehicle Account, State Transportation Fund) (2) Appropriation items are organized in Business Unit order. (3) All the appropriation items, reappropriation items, and reversion items, if any, for each Business Unit are adjacent to one another. (4) Federal funds received by the state and deposited in the State Treasury are appropriated in separate items. (c) The Department of Finance may authorize revisions to the codes or structures used in this act or used in other spending authority outside of this act to provide compatibility between the codes or structures used in this act or in other spending authority outside of this act and those used in the Governor’s Budget, in the records of the Controller in legacy systems, and in FI$Cal. (d) Notwithstanding any other law, the Department of Finance may revise the schedule of any appropriation made in this act or in other spending authority outside of this act where the revision is of a technical nature and is consistent with legislative intent. These revisions may include, but shall not be limited to, the distribution of any unallocated amounts within an appropriation and the adjustment of schedules to facilitate departmental accounting operations. These revisions shall include a certification that the revisions comply with the intent and limitation of expenditures as appropriated by the Legislature. (e) Notwithstanding any other law, and in accordance with legislative intent, the Department of Finance may authorize technical changes or corrections in FI$Cal or the Controller’s legacy systems resulting from or related to the conversion or implementation of FI$Cal for the current or past fiscal years, including, but not limited to, any of the following: (1) Corrections to errors inadvertently created during the data conversion process from legacy systems into FI$Cal. (2) Corrections or changes related to renumbering of programs and capital outlay projects. FI$Cal requires a different numbering scheme for the programs, elements, components, and tasks and projects. A new set of numbers is being utilized in FI$Cal different from what is reflected in prior budget acts and other authorizing sources. A comprehensive crosswalk facilitates the translation from programs, elements, components, and tasks to programs and subprograms and projects. (3) Corrections or changes necessary to ensure compatibility among the legacy systems of the Controller and departments, and with that of FI$Cal. Multiple coding systems and structures (or chart of accounts) are being utilized during the transition period and until all departments and the Controller’s control functions are fully implemented in FI$Cal. SEC. 1.51. For purposes of this act, a citation to a budget act includes all acts amending that budget act. SEC. 1.80. (a) The following sums of money and those appropriated by any other sections of this act, or so much thereof as may be necessary unless otherwise provided herein, are hereby appropriated and available for encumbrance or expenditure for the use and support of the State of California for the 2026–27 fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027. All of these appropriations, unless otherwise provided herein, shall be paid out of the General Fund in the State Treasury and shall be available for liquidation of encumbrances in accordance with Section 16304.1 of the Government Code. (b) All capital outlay appropriations and reappropriations, unless otherwise provided herein, are available as follows: (1) Studies, preliminary plans, working drawings, and performance criteria appropriations are available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2027. (2) All other capital outlay appropriations are available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2029. (c) Whenever by constitutional or statutory provision the revenues or receipts of any institution, department, board, bureau, commission, officer, employee, or other agency, or any moneys in any special fund created by law therefor, are to be used for any proper purpose, expenditures shall be made therefrom for any such purpose only to the extent of the amount therein appropriated, unless otherwise stated herein. (d) Appropriations for purposes not otherwise provided for herein that have been heretofore made by any existing constitutional or statutory provision shall continue to be governed thereby. SEC. 2.00. Items of appropriation. LEGISLATIVE/JUDICIAL/EXECUTIVE Legislative 0110-001-0001—For support of Senate ........................ 206,258,000 Schedule: (1) 0960-Support of the Senate ........................ 206,258,000 (a) 101001-Salaries of Senators ........................ (7,361,000) (b) 317295-Mileage ........................ (11,000) (c) 317292-Expenses ........................ (1,938,000) (d) 500004-Operating Expenses ........................ (196,948,000) Provisions: 1. The funds appropriated in Schedule (1)(d) are for operating expenses of the Senate, including personal services for officers, clerks, and all other employees, and legislative committees thereof composed in whole or in part of Members of the Senate, and for support of joint expenses of the Legislature, to be transferred by the Controller to the Senate Operating Fund. 2. The funds appropriated in Schedules (1)(a), (1)(b), and (1)(c) may be adjusted for transfers to or from the Senate Operating Fund. 0120-011-0001—For support of Assembly ........................ 271,769,000 Schedule: (1) 0970-Support of the Assembly ........................ 271,769,000 (a) 101001-Salaries of Assembly Members ........................ (15,935,000) (b) 317295-Mileage ........................ (8,000) (c) 317292-Expenses ........................ (4,115,000) (d) 500004-Operating Expenses ........................ (251,711,000) Provisions: 1. The funds appropriated in Schedule (1)(d) are for operating expenses of the Assembly, including personal services for officers, clerks, and all other employees, and legislative committees thereof composed in whole or in part of Members of the Assembly, and for support of joint expenses of the Legislature, to be transferred by the Controller to the Assembly Operating Fund. 2. The funds appropriated in Schedules (1)(a), (1)(b), and (1)(c) may be adjusted for transfers to or from the Assembly Operating Fund. 0130-021-0001—For support of Legislative Analyst’s Office ........................ 0 Schedule: (1) 0980-Support of the Legislative Analyst’s Office ........................ 13,964,000 (2) 0985-Transferred from Item 0110-001-0001 ........................ −6,982,000 (3) 0990-Transferred from Item 0120-011-0001 ........................ −6,982,000 Provisions: 1. The funds appropriated in Schedule (1) are for the expenses of the Legislative Analyst’s Office and of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee for any charges, expenses, or claims either may incur, available without regard to fiscal years, to be paid on certification of the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee or the chairperson’s designee. 2. Funds identified in Schedules (2) and (3) may be transferred from the Senate Operating Fund, by the Senate Committee on Rules, and the Assembly Operating Fund, by the Assembly Committee on Rules. 0160-001-0001—For support of Legislative Counsel Bureau ........................ 184,088,000185,033,000 Schedule: (1) 0120-Support ........................ 184,219,000185,164,000 (2) Reimbursements to 0120-Support ........................ −131,000 0160-001-9740—For support of Legislative Counsel Bureau, payable from the Central Service Cost Recovery Fund ........................ 37,169,000 Schedule: (1) 0120-Support ........................ 37,169,000 Judicial 0250-001-0001—For support of Judicial Branch ........................ 966,020,000866,020,000 Schedule: (1) 0130-Supreme Court ........................ 55,616,000 (2) 0135-Courts of Appeal ........................ 297,042,000 (3) 0140-Judicial Council ........................ 603,358,000503,358,000 (4) 0155-Habeas Corpus Resource Center ........................ 18,575,000 (5) Reimbursements to 0140-Judicial Council ........................ −8,371,000 (6) Reimbursements to 0135-Courts of Appeal ........................ −200,000 Provisions: 1. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $5,800,000 is available for the defense and indemnity of the Judicial Council, the appellate courts, the trial courts, and the officers, judicial officers, and employees of these entities, including government claims, litigation-related matters, labor- and employment-related matters, and matters requiring specialized legal advice. The funds may be used for prelitigation and litigation fees, and costs from the Attorney General or other outside legal counsel, fees for legal advice in specialized areas of law, and any judgment, stipulated judgment, offer of judgment, or settlement. This amount is for use in connection with the following matters: (a) matters arising from the actions of appellate courts, appellate court judicial officers, appellate court employees, or court contractors, (b) matters arising from the actions of the Judicial Council, council members, council employees or agents, or Judicial Council contractors, and (c) matters arising from the actions of trial courts, trial court judicial officers, trial court employees, or court contractors. The Judicial Council, an appellate court, or trial court, or an officer, judicial officer, or employee of these entities, must be named as a defendant or alleged to be the responsible party, or be the responsible party pursuant to a contractual provision, memorandum of understanding, or intrabranch agreement. Any funds not used for this purpose shall revert to the General Fund. The amount allocated shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2028. 2. Notwithstanding any other law, upon approval and order of the Department of Finance, the amount appropriated in this item shall be reduced by the amount transferred in Item 0250-011-0001 to provide adequate resources to the Judicial Branch Workers’ Compensation Fund to pay workers’ compensation claims for judicial branch employees and justices, and administrative costs pursuant to Section 68114.10 of the Government Code. 3. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (2), $82,486,000 is available for the Court-Appointed Counsel Program and shall be used solely for that program. Any funds for the program not expended by June 30, 2027, shall revert to the General Fund. 4. Of the amount appropriated in this item, up to $325,000 is available to reimburse the California State Auditor for the costs of audits incurred by the California State Auditor pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 19210 of the Public Contract Code. 5. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (3), $1,500,000 shall be available for administrative costs related to the management and claiming of federal reimbursements for court-appointed dependency counsel. To the extent these administrative costs are able to be reimbursed, any excess funding shall revert to the General Fund. 6. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (3), $1,050,000 shall be retained by the Judicial Council for costs associated with implementing, supporting, and evaluating pretrial programs in courts, including, but not limited to: (a) Providing technical assistance to courts on practices and programs related to pretrial decisionmaking. (b) Providing judicial education. (c) Evaluating pretrial programs and practices through this program. (d) Providing administrative services on programs related to pretrial decisionmaking. 7. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (3), $866,000 shall be distributed by the Judicial Council to the Legal Services Trust Fund Commission of the State Bar of California for administrative costs related to allocating resources for legal services to implement the Community Assistance, Recovery, and Empowerment Act (Part 8 (commencing with Section 5970) of Division 5 of the Welfare and Institutions Code). The commission shall coordinate with the Judicial Council to ensure that the commission collects and reports the data necessary for the Judicial Council to comply with all Community Assistance, Recovery, and Empowerment Act reporting requirements. (a) The Legal Services Trust Fund Commission shall be responsible for collecting outcome data from each county’s public defender office, qualified legal services projects, and support centers. The State Bar of California shall annually provide to the Judicial Council a report that includes funding allocations, annual expenditures, and program outcomes by service area and service provider. Data shall be reported using the reporting framework developed by the Legal Services Trust Fund Commission in consultation with the Judicial Council to ensure that data reporting is consistent and comparable across Judicial Council and Legal Services Trust Fund Commission data. The Judicial Council shall include this report in the annual report pursuant to Section 5985 of the Welfare and Institutions Code. 8. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (3), $250,000,000 $150,000,000 shall be expended to address deferred maintenance projects that represent critical infrastructure deficiencies. The amount allocated shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2029. 9. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (3), $80,000,000 shall be expended to address facility modifications to accommodate new superior court judgeships. The amount allocated shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2029. 0250-001-0044—For support of Judicial Branch, payable from the Motor Vehicle Account, State Transportation Fund ........................ 257,000 Schedule: (1) 0140-Judicial Council ........................ 257,000 0250-001-0159—For support of Judicial Branch, payable from the State Trial Court Improvement and Modernization Fund ........................ 8,834,000 Schedule: (1) 0140-Judicial Council ........................ 8,834,000 Provisions: 1. Notwithstanding any other law, upon approval by the Administrative Director of the Courts, the Controller shall increase this item up to $18,673,000 for recovery of costs for administrative services provided to the trial courts by the Judicial Council. 2. Notwithstanding any other law, the Department of Finance may authorize the transfer of expenditure authority between this item and Item 0250-102-0159 to effectively administer the programs funded in these items. Any transfer shall be authorized not sooner than 30 days after notification in writing to the chairpersons of the committees in each house of the Legislature that consider the State Budget, the chairpersons of the committees and appropriate subcommittees in each house of the Legislature that consider appropriations, and the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, or not sooner than whatever lesser time after that notification the chairperson of the joint committee, or the chairperson’s designee, may determine. 0250-001-0327—For support of Judicial Branch, payable from the Court Interpreters’ Fund ........................ 356,000 Schedule: (1) 0140-Judicial Council ........................ 356,000 Provisions: 1. Notwithstanding any other law, the Department of Finance may authorize expenditures in excess of this amount to address the shortage of qualified court interpreters. Any augmentation shall be authorized no sooner than 30 days after notification in writing to the chairpersons of the committees in each house of the Legislature that consider appropriations, the chairpersons of the committees and appropriate subcommittees that consider the State Budget, and the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, or not sooner than whatever lesser time the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, or the chairperson’s designee, may determine. 0250-001-0890—For support of Judicial Branch, payable from the Federal Trust Fund ........................ 4,548,000 Schedule: (1) 0140-Judicial Council ........................ 3,522,000 (2) 0155-Habeas Corpus Resource Center ........................ 1,026,000 0250-001-0932—For support of Judicial Branch, payable from the Trial Court Trust Fund ........................ 4,944,000 Schedule: (1) 0140-Judicial Council ........................ 4,944,000 Provisions: 1. Upon approval of the Administrative Director, the Controller shall increase this item by an amount sufficient to allow for the expenditure of any transfer to this item made pursuant to Provisions 6, 10, and 12, of Item 0250-101-0932. 0250-001-3037—For support of Judicial Branch, payable from the State Court Facilities Construction Fund ........................ 109,539,000 Schedule: (1) 0140-Judicial Council ........................ 140,839,000 (2) Reimbursements to 0140-Judicial Council ........................ −31,300,000 Provisions: 1. The Department of Finance may augment this item by an amount not to exceed available funding in the State Court Facilities Construction Fund, after review of a request submitted by the Judicial Council that demonstrates a need for additional resources associated with the rehabilitation of court facilities. Any augmentation shall be authorized not sooner than 30 days after notification in writing to the chairpersons of the committees in each house of the Legislature that consider appropriations, the chairpersons of the committees and appropriate subcommittees that consider the State Budget, and the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, or not sooner than whatever lesser time the chairperson of the joint committee, or the chairperson’s designee, may determine. 2. Notwithstanding any other law, upon approval and order of the Department of Finance, the amount appropriated in this item shall be reduced by the amount transferred in Item 0250-011-0001 to provide adequate resources to the Judicial Branch Workers’ Compensation Fund to pay workers’ compensation claims for judicial branch employees and administrative costs in accordance with Section 68114.10 of the Government Code. 0250-001-3060—For support of Judicial Branch, payable from the Appellate Court Trust Fund ........................ 13,137,000 Schedule: (1) 0130-Supreme Court ........................ 1,225,000 (2) 0135-Courts of Appeal ........................ 10,346,000 (3) 0140-Judicial Council ........................ 1,566,000 Provisions: 1. Upon approval of the Department of Finance, the amount available for expenditure in this item may be augmented by the amount of any additional resources available in the Appellate Court Trust Fund, which is in addition to the amount appropriated in this item. Any augmentation shall be authorized no sooner than 30 days after notification in writing to the chairpersons of the committees in each house of the Legislature that consider appropriations, the chairpersons of the committees and appropriate subcommittees that consider the State Budget, and the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, or not sooner than whatever lesser time the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, or the chairperson’s designee, may determine. 0250-001-3066—For support of Judicial Branch, payable from the Court Facilities Trust Fund ........................ 198,326,000 Schedule: (1) 0140-Judicial Council ........................ 214,826,000 (2) Reimbursements to 0140-Judicial Council ........................ −16,500,000 Provisions: 1. Notwithstanding any other law, the Department of Finance may authorize expenditures in excess of this item for the operation, repair, and maintenance of court facilities pursuant to Section 70352 of the Government Code. 2. Of the amount appropriated in this item, $6,000,000 is available to refresh, maintain, and replace trial court security equipment and systems. The security equipment and systems must be upgraded or maintained in a way that mitigates the need for additional security staffing. 0250-001-3085—For support of Judicial Branch, payable from the Behavioral Health Services Fund ........................ 1,464,000 Schedule: (1) 0140-Judicial Council ........................ 1,464,000 0250-002-3037—For support of Judicial Branch, payable from the State Court Facilities Construction Fund ........................ 61,999,000 Schedule: (1) 0140-Judicial Council ........................ 61,999,000 0250-011-0001—For transfer, upon order of the Department of Finance, to the Judicial Branch Workers’ Compensation Fund ........................ 1,000 Provisions: 1. Notwithstanding any other law, upon approval and order of the Department of Finance, the Administrative Director shall adjust the amount of this transfer to provide adequate resources to the Judicial Branch Workers’ Compensation Fund to pay workers’ compensation claims for Judicial Branch employees and justices, and administrative costs pursuant to Section 68114.10 of the Government Code. 0250-012-0001—For transfer by the Controller to the Court Facilities Trust Fund ........................ 94,296,000 0250-012-0932—For transfer by the Controller from the Trial Court Trust Fund to the General Fund ........................ 1,000 Provisions: 1. The Department of Finance may augment this item by the amount necessary to transfer any excess unrestricted fund balance to the General Fund, in consultation with the Judicial Council. 2. Any augmentation shall occur no sooner than 30 days after notification in writing to the chairpersons of the committees and appropriate subcommittees in each house of the Legislature that considers the State Budget, the chairpersons of the committees and appropriate subcommittees in each house of the Legislature that considers appropriations, and the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, or not sooner than whatever lesser time after that notification the chairperson of the joint committee, or the chairperson’s designee, may determine. The notification shall, at minimum, identify how the transfer amount was calculated, and the sources of the identified amount by original program or purpose. 0250-014-3066—For transfer by the Controller from the Court Facilities Trust Fund to the State Court Facilities Construction Fund ........................ (3,178,000) 0250-015-0001—For transfer, upon order of the Department of Finance, to the State Court Facilities Construction Fund ........................ 31,000,000 Provisions: 1. The amount appropriated in this item shall be allocated by the Department of Finance if, in consultation with the Judicial Council, a determination is made that revenues in the State Court Facilities Construction Fund are insufficient to support the rehabilitation of court facilities. In the event the amount appropriated in this item is determined not to be sufficient to address the revenue shortfall for the State Court Facilities Construction Fund, the Department of Finance may increase the amount available for transfer to this item to make sure there are resources to support building repairs for court facilities. 2. In the event a transfer of funds approved by the Department of Finance is in excess of the amount appropriated in this item, that transfer shall become effective no sooner than 30 days after notification in writing to the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, and the chairpersons of the fiscal committees in each house of the Legislature, or no sooner than any lesser time the chairperson, or the chairperson’s designee, may determine. When a request to transfer funds is submitted to the Department of Finance, a copy of that request shall be delivered to the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee and the chairpersons of the fiscal committees in each house of the Legislature. Delivery of a copy of that request shall not be deemed to be notification in writing for the purposes of the provision. 0250-093-0001—For support of Judicial Branch, for rental payments on lease-revenue bonds ........................ 122,758,000 Schedule: (1) 0135-Courts of Appeal ........................ 3,456,000 (2) 0140-Judicial Council ........................ 119,302,000 Provisions: 1. The Controller shall transfer funds appropriated in this item for base rental as and when provided for in the schedule submitted by the State Public Works Board or the Department of Finance. Notwithstanding the payment dates in any related Facility Lease or Indenture, the schedule may provide for an earlier transfer of funds to ensure debt requirements are met and pay base rental in full when due. 2. The Controller shall transfer for additional rental no later than 30 days after enactment of this budget, $550,000 of the amount appropriated in this item, to the Expense Account in the Public Buildings Construction Fund. 3. This item may be adjusted pursuant to Section 4.30. Any adjustments to this item shall be reported to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee pursuant to Section 4.30. 0250-093-3037—For support of Judicial Branch, for rental payments on lease-revenue bonds, payable from the State Court Facilities Construction Fund ........................ 157,179,000 Schedule: (1) 0140-Judicial Council ........................ 157,179,000 Provisions: 1. The Controller shall transfer funds appropriated in this item for base rental as and when provided for in the schedule submitted by the State Public Works Board. Notwithstanding the payment dates in any related Facility Lease or Indenture, the schedule may provide for an earlier transfer of funds to ensure debt requirements are met and pay base rental in full when due. 2. The Controller shall transfer for additional rental no later than 30 days after enactment of this budget, $677,000 of the amount appropriated in this item, to the Expense Account in the Public Buildings Construction Fund. 3. This item may be adjusted pursuant to Section 4.30. Any adjustments to this item shall be reported to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee pursuant to Section 4.30. 0250-101-0001—For local assistance, Judicial Branch ........................ 215,838,000195,838,000 Schedule: (1) 0150010-Support for Operation of Trial Courts ........................ 157,501,000107,501,000 (2) 0150051-Child Support Commissioner Program (AB 1058) ........................ 59,082,000 (3) 0150055-California Collaborative and Drug Court Projects ........................ 5,748,000 (4) 0150075-Grants—​Other ........................ 2,550,000 (5) 0150083-Equal Access Fund ........................ 57,177,00087,177,000 (6) Reimbursements to 0150051-Child Support Commissioner Program (AB 1058) ........................ −59,082,000 (7) Reimbursements to 0150055-California Collaborative and Drug Court Projects ........................ −4,588,000 (8) Reimbursements to 0150075-Grants—​Other ........................ −2,550,000 Provisions: 1. In order to improve equal access and the fair administration of justice, $35,392,000 $59,392,000 of the funds appropriated in Schedule (5) are to be distributed by the Judicial Council through the Legal Services Trust Fund Commission to qualified legal services projects and support centers as defined in Sections 6213 to 6215, inclusive, of the Business and Professions Code, to be used for legal services in civil matters for indigent persons. The Judicial Council shall approve awards made by the commission if the council determines that the awards comply with statutory and other relevant guidelines. Up to 10 percent of the funds appropriated for purposes of this provision shall be for joint projects of courts and legal services programs to make legal assistance available to pro per litigants and not less than 90 percent of the funds appropriated for purposes of this provision shall be distributed consistent with Sections 6216 to 6223, inclusive, of the Business and Professions Code. Any funding not allocated for joint projects shall be redistributed consistent with Sections 6216 to 6223, inclusive, of the Business and Professions Code. The Judicial Council may establish additional reporting or quality control requirements consistent with Sections 6213 to 6223, inclusive, of the Business and Professions Code. Of the amount appropriated for purposes of this provision, not more than 2.5 percent shall be available, upon order of the Department of Finance, for administrative costs of the Judicial Council and the State Bar. 1.5. Funds appropriated under Provision 1 shall not be used for legal services defending a person against removal from the United States consistent with the restrictions set forth in paragraph 3 of subdivision (b) of Section 13303 of the Welfare and Institutions Code. 2. In order to improve equal access and the fair administration of justice, $5,000,000 $10,250,000 shall be annually appropriated in Schedule (5) by the Judicial Council to the California Access to Justice Commission for grants to civil legal aid nonprofits, including qualified legal services projects and qualified support centers as defined in Sections 6213 to 6215, inclusive, of the Business and Professions Code, to be used to support the infrastructure and innovation needs of legal services in civil matters for indigent persons. Of this amount, not more than 3 percent shall be available for administrative costs of the California Access to Justice Commission associated with distributing and monitoring the grants. 3. The California Access to Justice Commission shall make award determinations for grants described in Provision 2. In awarding these grants, preference shall be given to qualified legal aid agencies’ proposals that focus on services to rural or underserved immigrant communities regardless of citizenship status and proposals that are innovative or that involve partnership with community-based nonprofits. Any funding not allocated in a given fiscal year shall be reallocated pursuant to Provision 1. 4. The grant process described in Provision 2 shall ensure that any qualified legal service project and qualified support center demonstrates a high need for infrastructure and innovation to ensure that funding is distributed equitably among qualified legal service projects and support centers. The qualified legal service project or support center shall demonstrate that funds received under this provision will not be used to supplant existing resources. 5. The funds described in Provisions 1 and 2 are available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2028. 6. The amount appropriated in Schedule (1) is available for reimbursement of court costs related to the following activities: (a) payment of service of process fees billed to the trial courts pursuant to Chapter 1009 of the Statutes of 2002, (b) payment of the court costs payable under Sections 4750 to 4755, inclusive, and Section 6005 of the Penal Code, and (c) payment of court costs of extraordinary homicide trials. 7. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (1), $48,950,000 shall be allocated to the Judicial Council to fund local assistance to each superior court based on each county’s relative proportion of the state population that is 18 through 25 years of age. These resources may be used for the following: (a) Costs associated with judicial officer pretrial release decisions prior to or at arraignment. (b) Costs for technology to facilitate information exchange and process automation between courts and county departments. (c) Costs for implementation and improvement of court date reminder programs. (d) Costs associated with assessments of defendants’ ability to pay a financial condition in cases where the court determines that such a condition is necessary to ensure public safety and return to court. (e) Costs associated with providing services to and monitoring of individuals released pretrial. The pretrial services agencies shall implement evidence-based monitoring practices of defendants released prearraignment and pretrial with the least restrictive interventions and practices necessary to enhance public safety and ensure the defendants’ return to court. Electronic monitoring that is funded under this program may only be used in limited cases after other less restrictive interventions are deemed insufficient to enhance public safety and to ensure the defendants return to court. (f) Other programs and practices related to pretrial decisionmaking that address public safety, appearance in court, and the efficient and fair administration of justice. 8. Courts shall contract with any county department, including county probation departments, to provide pretrial services, except those departments or agencies that have primary responsibility for making arrests or prosecuting criminal offenses. 9. The Superior Court of California, County of Santa Clara, may contract with the Office of Pretrial Services in that county. The Superior Court of California, County of San Francisco, may contract with the Sheriff’s Office and the existing not-for-profit entity that is performing pretrial services in the city and county for pretrial assessment and supervision services. 10. The county department with which the court has contracted is not precluded from contracting with community-based organizations to provide complementary or supportive services in furtherance of the county department’s pretrial release services if all of the following conditions have been satisfied: (a) The contractor adheres to the same transparency, accountability, and outcome measure standards that apply to county probation departments. (b) The contractor has a proven record of providing culturally competent and responsive rehabilitative services. (c) The contract will not result in the displacement of county employees or a reduction in the provision of services by county probation department employees. (d) The contractor pays wages and benefits to its nonsupervisory employees that are commensurate with or greater than the wages and benefits paid to public employees in similar job classifications. (e) The contractor does not pay wages and benefits to its most highly compensated executive and managerial employees that are significantly higher than the rates that would be paid to public employees performing similar job duties. (f) The county has consulted with the court prior to entering into a contract for the provision of these services. 11. Of the amount allocated in Provision 7, superior courts may retain up to 30 percent of the funding for costs associated with these programs and practices. The superior courts shall contract with a county department as described in Provision 8 and shall provide the county department with the remainder of the funds to be used for costs outlined in Provision 10, as appropriate. 12. To receive the funding allocated in Provision 7, courts and county departments and their contractors shall collaborate with local justice system partners in reporting to the Judicial Council on pretrial programs and practices, including information on expenditure of funds, as required by the Judicial Council, for evaluation of the programs and practices. 12.5. The Judicial Council may reallocate unspent funds from counties to other counties with demonstrated needs. 13. The Judicial Council shall provide an annual report to the Legislature providing an evaluation of pretrial programs and practices, and shall include any changes made to the pretrial allocation. 14. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $15,750,000 is available for legal services to implement the Community Assistance, Recovery, and Empowerment (CARE) Act (Part 8 (commencing with Section 5970) of Division 5 of the Welfare and Institutions Code), and shall be distributed by the Judicial Council through the Legal Services Trust Fund Commission of the State Bar of California as grants to qualified legal services projects, as defined in Sections 6213 to 6214.5, inclusive, of the Business and Professions Code, to provide legal counsel pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 5976 of the Welfare and Institutions Code for representation in CARE Act proceedings, matters related to CARE agreements, and CARE plans by July 1, 2026. Funds shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure by qualified legal services projects and public defender offices until January 1, 2028. As a condition of receiving these funds, recipients are required to comply with Judicial Council or Legal Services Trust Fund Commission directions on the collection and reporting of data necessary for the Judicial Council to comply with all CARE Act reporting requirements specified in Item 0250-001-0001. (a) Notwithstanding the competitive nature of these grants, the Legal Services Trust Fund Commission shall use a formula to determine the amount of funding to provide representation in CARE Act proceedings, matters related to CARE agreements, and CARE plans in each county. (b) These grants are to serve the counties described in subdivisions (a) and (b) of Section 5970.5 of the Welfare and Institutions Code. The Legal Services Trust Fund Commission shall provide any funds not awarded to qualified legal services projects for representation in CARE Act proceedings, matters related to CARE agreements, and CARE plans in each county to that county’s public defender office, public defender services shared with another county, or organization providing public defender services to the county to provide those services. (c) (1) The Legal Services Trust Fund Commission of the State Bar shall seek proposals from qualified legal services projects to provide legal counsel pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 5976 of the Welfare and Institutions Code for a three-year period. (2) If funds are provided to a county for public defender services pursuant to this item, an associated funding commitment shall also be provided for a three-year period. If a county receives funding for public defender services according to this item, the county’s proportional share of overall funding for legal counsel in the county pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 5976 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, shall not be reduced by more than 50 percent at the next three-year funding cycle. (3) In fiscal year 2026–27, neither a qualified legal services project nor a county for public defender services shall have their proportional share of overall funding for legal counsel in the county, pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 5976 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, be reduced by more than 25 percent compared to the 2025–26 fiscal year, unless the qualified legal services project does not apply. 15. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (5), up to $788,000 is available to provide legal training and technical assistance related to the implementation of the CARE Act. These funds shall be distributed by the Judicial Council through the Legal Services Trust Fund Commission of the State Bar of California by December 1, 2026, as grants to qualified support centers or other entities that have expertise in providing legal training and technical assistance to legal aid providers or public defenders. The Legal Services Trust Fund Commission shall provide any funds not awarded for legal training and technical assistance related to the implementation of the CARE Act to qualified legal services projects and public defender offices to provide legal counsel pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 5976 of the Welfare and Institutions Code for representation in CARE Act proceedings, matters related to CARE agreements, and CARE plans by December 1, 2026. Funds under this provision shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure by recipients until January 1, 2028. 16. If any funds in Provision 15 remain after grants are awarded, upon order of the Department of Finance, up to $275,000 shall be transferred to Item 8140-001-0001 for the State Public Defender to provide legal training and technical assistance to legal aid providers or public defenders. 17. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (1), $100,000,000 $50,000,000 is available for the continued implementation of Proposition 36 (2024), the Homelessness, Drug Addiction, and Theft Reduction Act. The allocation of this funding shall be determined in future legislation. 18. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule 5, $750,000 is available for assisting legal aid staff eligible for Public Service Loan Forgiveness as of January 1, 2026, but are no longer eligible due to their work representing immigrants or marginalized communities. The remainder is available for program administration, and if funding remains, for other purposes specified in Section 68655 of the Government Code, and shall be available until June 30, 2030. 0250-101-0890—For local assistance, Judicial Branch, payable from the Federal Trust Fund ........................ 2,275,000 Schedule: (1) 0150059-Federal Child Access and Visitation Grant Program ........................ 800,000 (2) 0150063-Federal Court Improvement Grant Program ........................ 700,000 (3) 0150079-Federal Grants—​Other ........................ 775,000 0250-101-0932—For local assistance, Judicial Branch, payable from the Trial Court Trust Fund ........................ 3,565,579,0003,585,579,000 Schedule: (1) 0150010-Support for Operation of Trial Courts ........................ 2,876,200,000 (2) 0150019-Compensation of Superior Court Judges ........................ 468,075,000 (3) 0150028-Assigned Judges ........................ 32,519,000 (4) 0150037-Court Interpreters ........................ 155,120,000 (5) 0150067-Court Appointed Special Advocate (CASA) program ........................ 2,713,00022,713,000 (6) 0150071-Model Self-Help Program ........................ 957,000 (7) 0150083-Equal Access Fund ........................ 5,482,000 (8) 0150087-Family Law Information Centers ........................ 345,000 (9) 0150091-Civil Case Coordination ........................ 832,000 (10) 0150095-Expenses on Behalf of the Trial Courts ........................ 23,337,000 (11) Reimbursements to 0150010-Support for Operation of Trial Courts ........................ −1,000 Provisions: 1. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (1), $25,300,000 shall be available for support of services for self-represented litigants, and any unexpended funds shall revert to the General Fund. 2. The funds appropriated in Schedule (2) shall be made available for costs of the workers’ compensation program for trial court judges. 3. The amount appropriated in Schedule (3) shall be made available for all judicial assignments. Schedule (3) expenditures for necessary support staff shall not exceed the staffing level that is necessary to support the equivalent of three judicial officers sitting on assignments. Prior to utilizing funds appropriated in Schedule (3), trial courts shall maximize the use of judicial officers who may be available due to reductions in court services or court closures. 4. Upon order of the Department of Finance, the amount available for expenditure in this item may be augmented by the amount of any additional resources available in the Trial Court Trust Fund, which is in addition to the amount appropriated in this item. Any augmentation shall be approved in joint determination with the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee and shall be authorized not sooner than 30 days after notification in writing to the chairpersons of the committees in each house of the Legislature that consider appropriations, the chairpersons of the committees and appropriate subcommittees that consider the State Budget, and the chairperson of the joint committee, or not sooner than whatever lesser time the chairperson of the joint committee, or the chairperson’s designee, may determine. When a request to augment this item is submitted to the Director of Finance, a copy of that request shall be delivered to the chairpersons of the committees and appropriate subcommittees that consider the State Budget. Delivery of a copy of that request shall not be deemed to be notification in writing for purposes of this provision. 5. Notwithstanding any other law, upon approval and order of the Department of Finance, the amount appropriated in this item shall be reduced by the amount transferred in Item 0250-115-0932 to provide adequate resources to the Judicial Branch Workers’ Compensation Fund to pay workers’ compensation claims for judicial branch employees and judges, and administrative costs pursuant to Section 68114.10 of the Government Code. 6. In order to improve equal access and the fair administration of justice, the funds appropriated in Schedule (7) are available for distribution by the Judicial Council through the Legal Services Trust Fund Commission in support of the Equal Access Fund program to qualified legal services projects and support centers as defined in Sections 6213 to 6215, inclusive, of the Business and Professions Code, to be used for legal services in civil matters for indigent persons. The Judicial Council shall approve awards made by the commission if the council determines that the awards comply with statutory and other relevant guidelines. Upon approval by the Administrative Director of the Courts, the Controller shall transfer up to 5 percent of the funding appropriated in Schedule (7) to Item 0250-001-0932 for administrative expenses. Ten percent of the funds remaining after administrative costs shall be for joint projects of courts and legal services programs to make legal assistance available to pro per litigants and 90 percent of the funds remaining after administrative costs shall be distributed, consistent with Sections 6216 to 6223, inclusive, of the Business and Professions Code. The Judicial Council may establish additional reporting or quality control requirements, consistent with Sections 6213 to 6223, inclusive, of the Business and Professions Code. 7. Funds available for expenditure in Schedule (7) may be augmented by order of the Department of Finance by the amount of any additional resources deposited for distribution to the Equal Access Fund program in accordance with Sections 68085.3 and 68085.4 of the Government Code. Any augmentation under this provision shall be authorized not sooner than 30 days after notification in writing to the chairpersons of the committees in each house of the Legislature that consider appropriations, the chairpersons of the committees and appropriate subcommittees that consider the State Budget, and the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, or not sooner than whatever lesser time the chairperson of the joint committee, or the chairperson’s designee, may determine. 7.5. Funds appropriated under Schedule (7) shall not be used for legal services defending a person against removal from the United States consistent with the restrictions set forth in paragraph 3 of subdivision (b) of Section 13303 of the Welfare and Institutions Code. 8. Sixteen (16.0) subordinate judicial officer positions are authorized to be converted to judgeships in the 2026–27 fiscal year in the manner and pursuant to the authority described in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) of Section 69615 of the Government Code, as described in the notice filed by the Judicial Council under subparagraph (B) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (c) of Section 69615 of the Government Code. 9. Notwithstanding any other law, and upon approval of the Department of Finance, the amount available for expenditure in Schedule (1) may be increased by the amount of any additional resources collected for the recovery of costs for court-appointed dependency counsel services. 10. Upon approval of the Administrative Director of the Courts, the Controller shall transfer up to $556,000 to Item 0250-001-0932 for administrative services provided to the trial courts in support of the court-appointed dependency counsel program. 11. Of the amounts appropriated in Schedule (1), $325,000 shall be allocated by the Judicial Council in order to reimburse the California State Auditor for the costs of trial court audits incurred by the California State Auditor pursuant to Section 19210 of the Public Contract Code. 12. Upon approval of the Administrative Director of the Courts, the Controller shall transfer up to $500,000 of the funding appropriated in Schedule (10) of this item to Schedule (1) of Item 0250-001-0932 for administrative services provided by the Judicial Council to implement and administer the civil representation pilot program. 13. Upon approval of the Administrative Director of the Courts, the amount available for expenditure in Schedule (10) may be augmented by the amount of resources collected to support the implementation and administration of the civil representation pilot program. 14. Of the amount appropriated in this item, up to $1,925,000 is available to reimburse the Controller for the costs of audits incurred by the Controller. 15. Upon order of the Department of Finance, the amount available for expenditure in Schedules (1) and (4) may be augmented by an amount sufficient to fund trial court employee benefit increases in the 2026–27 fiscal year. 16. Notwithstanding any other law, and upon approval of the Department of Finance, the amount available for expenditure in Schedule (10) may be increased by the amount of any additional resources collected to support programs pursuant to the Sargent Shriver Civil Counsel Act (Chapter 2.1 (commencing with Section 68650) of Title 8 of the Government Code). 17. The funds appropriated in Schedule (4) shall be for payments to contractual court interpreters and certified and registered court interpreters employed by the courts for services provided during court proceedings and other services related to pending court proceedings, including services provided outside a courtroom, and for court interpreter coordinator positions. For the purposes of this provision, “court interpreter coordinators” may be full- or part-time court employees. 18. The Judicial Council shall set statewide or regional rates and policies for payment of court interpreters, not to exceed the rate paid to certified interpreters in the federal court system. 19. The Judicial Council shall adopt appropriate rules and procedures for the administration of these funds. The Judicial Council shall report to the Legislature and the Department of Finance annually regarding expenditure of the funds appropriated in Schedule (4). 20. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (1), $7,000,000 shall be available for the Judicial Council to establish a methodology to allocate a share of resources to all courts to cover the costs associated with the increased transcript rates. 22. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (1), $30,000,000 shall be allocated by the Judicial Council in a manner that ensures all courts are allocated funds to be utilized to increase the number of official court reporters in family and civil law cases. This funding may be used for recruitment and retention purposes, filling existing vacancies, converting part-time positions to full-time positions, increasing salary schedules, and providing signing and retention bonuses to enable trial courts to compete with private employers in the labor market. This funding shall not supplant existing trial court expenditures on court reports in family law and civil law cases. Any unspent funds shall revert to the General Fund. 23. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (1), $32,884,000 is available for the implementation of the Community Assistance, Recovery, and Empowerment (CARE) Act. 24. Funds appropriated under Schedule (7) shall not be used for legal services defending an immigrant against removal from the United States or another immigration remedy based on a documented felony conviction. 25. The Judicial Council shall provide a report to the relevant budget subcommittees of the Legislature in each house, the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, and the Legislative Analyst’s Office by January 10, 2028, assessing strategies to reduce and contain court interpreter costs. In addition to any other cost containment and reduction strategies identified by Judicial Council, the council shall assess potential strategies to increase recruitment and retention of civil servant court interpreters, including, but not limited to, creating a pool of remote civil service interpreters, targeted recruitment of court interpreters from public and private college and university language programs, and the creation of court interpreter training programs at the California Community Colleges, the California State University, and/or the University of California. This information can be submitted as part of the annual report on expenditures on court interpreter services required by Provision 26 of Item 0250-101-0932 of the Budget Act of 2023 (Chs. 12, 38, and 189, Stats. 2023). 26. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (1), $20,000,000 shall be expended to accommodate new superior court judgeships, as authorized by Chapter 482, Statutes of 2023. 27. The Department of Finance may authorize transfer of expenditure authority for the funding referenced in Provision 26 between this item and any other item of appropriation to support facility modification projects to accommodate the new judgeships funded by this item. Any transfer shall authorized not sooner than 30 days after notification in writing to the chairpersons of the committees in each house of the Legislature that consider the State Budget, the chairpersons of the committees and appropriate subcommittees in each house of the Legislature that consider appropriations, and Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, or not sooner than whatever lesser time after that notification the chairperson of the joint committee, or the chairperson’s designee, may determine. 28. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (5), $16,000,000 shall be allocated to the California Court Appointed Special Advocate Association to provide funding to the local court-appointed special advocate (CASA) programs to expand capacity, recruitment, and training and to stabilize local budgets and staffing. 29. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (5), $4,000,000 shall be allocated to the California Court Appointed Special Advocate Association to be used statewide for volunteer recruitment initiatives, shared resources and infrastructure, development of statewide training curriculum, collection of data on program implementation and outcomes to support the report to the Legislature, and other uses to expand court-appointed special advocate (CASA) services in the state. 30. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (5), $20,000,000 shall be available for expenditure for an encumbrance period of two years, ending June 30, 2028. 31. The Judicial Council shall annually report to the Legislature on the court-appointed special advocate (CASA) program implementation and outcomes. The initial report shall be due on July 1, 2027, and shall describe funding allocations and program development. 32. Upon approval by the Administrative Director of the Judicial Council, the Controller shall transfer up to $100,000 appropriated in Schedule (5) to Item 0250-001-0001 for administrative costs of the Judicial Council for implementing development of the programs described in Provisions 28 and 29. 0250-102-0001—For local assistance, Judicial Branch, augmentation for Court Employee Retirement, Compensation, and Benefits ........................ 71,502,000 Schedule: (1) 0150010-Support for Operation of Trial Courts ........................ 71,501,000 (2) 0150037-Court Interpreters ........................ 1,000 Provisions: 1. Funding appropriated in this item shall be allocated, upon order of the Department of Finance, to trial courts to address cost increases related to court employee retirement, retiree health, and health benefits. 2. To the extent the funds appropriated in this item exceed the actual cost increases relative to the purposes for which the funds are appropriated, any excess funds shall revert to the General Fund on June 30, 2027. 0250-102-0159—For local assistance, Judicial Branch, payable from the State Trial Court Improvement and Modernization Fund ........................ 56,208,000 Schedule: (1) 0150010-Support for Operation of Trial Courts ........................ 56,208,000 Provisions: 1. Upon approval of the Department of Finance, the amount available for expenditure in this item may be augmented by the amount of any additional resources available in the State Trial Court Improvement and Modernization Fund, which is in addition to the amount appropriated in this item. Any augmentation shall be authorized not sooner than 30 days after notification in writing to the chairpersons of the committees in each house of the Legislature that consider the State Budget, the chairpersons of the committees and appropriate subcommittees in each house of the Legislature that consider appropriations, and the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, or not sooner than whatever lesser time after that notification the chairperson of the joint committee, or the chairperson’s designee, may determine. 2. The Department of Finance may authorize a loan from the General Fund to the State Trial Court Improvement and Modernization Fund for cashflow purposes in an amount not to exceed $35,000,000 subject to the following conditions: (a) the loan is to meet cash needs resulting from a delay in receipt of revenues, (b) the loan is short term, and shall be repaid by October 31 of the fiscal year following that in which the loan was authorized, (c) interest charges may be waived pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 16314 of the Government Code, and (d) the Department of Finance shall not approve the loan unless the approval is made in writing and filed with the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee and the chairpersons of the committees in each house of the Legislature that consider appropriations not later than 30 days prior to the effective date of the approval, or not sooner than whatever lesser time the chairperson of the joint committee, or the chairperson’s designee, may determine. 3. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $5,000,000 shall be available for support of services for self-represented litigants, and any unexpended funds shall revert to the General Fund. 4. Notwithstanding any other law, the Department of Finance may authorize the transfer of expenditure authority between this item and Item 0250-001-0159 to effectively administer the programs funded in these items. Any transfer shall be authorized not sooner than 30 days after notification in writing to the chairpersons of the committees in each house of the Legislature that consider the State Budget, the chairpersons of the committees and appropriate subcommittees in each house of the Legislature that consider appropriations, and the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, or not sooner than whatever lesser time after that notification the chairperson of the joint committee, or the chairperson’s designee, may determine. 0250-102-0932—For local assistance, Judicial Branch, payable from the Trial Court Trust Fund ........................ 186,700,000 Schedule: (1) 0150011-Court Appointed Dependency Counsel ........................ 252,700,000 (2) Reimbursements to 0150011-Court Appointed Dependency Counsel ........................ −66,000,000 Provisions: 1. The amount appropriated in Schedule (1) shall be allocated by the Judicial Council using the methodology customarily used to distribute statewide court-appointed dependency counsel funding, which shall reflect annual updates to relevant variables based on the most recently available data. 2. Upon order of the Department of Finance, the Controller shall increase Schedule (1) by up to $30,000,000 to address any shortfalls in federal reimbursements pursuant to Title IV-E of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 670 et seq.) that supplement funding for court-appointed counsel for children, nonminor dependents, and parents in juvenile court dependency proceedings pursuant to subdivisions (b) and (c) of Section 317 of the Welfare and Institutions Code and paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 77003 of the Government Code. 3. The Judicial Council shall work in collaboration with court-appointed dependency counsel providers to ensure timely submission, review, and payment of monthly invoices attributable to the 2026–27 fiscal year so that determination of the statewide total of federal reimbursements and any portion of the funding described in Provision 2 needed to address any remaining shortfall can be made no later than September 30, 2027. Distribution of funds to address any shortfall shall be made by the Judicial Council using the methodology customarily employed to distribute statewide court-appointed dependency counsel funding as described in Provision 1. The amounts allocated in Provision 2 shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until October 1, 2027. Any funds described in Provision 2 not encumbered by October 1, 2027, for eligible activities attributable to the 2026–27 fiscal year shall revert to the General Fund. 0250-103-0001—For local assistance, Judicial Branch ........................ 33,153,000 Schedule: (1) 0140-Judicial Council ........................ 33,153,000 Provisions: 1. Notwithstanding any other law, upon approval of the Department of Finance, up to $20,000,000 appropriated in this item may be transferred to the State Trial Court Improvement and Modernization Fund, Trial Court Trust Fund, State Court Facilities Construction Fund, and the Court Facilities Trust Fund, to backfill revenue reductions resulting from the expansion of ability to pay determinations. The amount transferred to each fund shall be determined by the Department of Finance using information provided by the trial courts and the Judicial Council. 2. The Controller shall transfer $12,779,000 appropriated in this item to the Trial Court Trust Fund to backfill trial courts for revenue loss resulting from Chapter 257 of the Statutes of 2021, raising the income threshold for automatic filing fee waivers, and the elimination of post-conviction fees related to a change of plea or set aside verdict, and record sealing. 3. The Controller shall transfer up to $374,000 appropriated in this item to counties for revenue loss resulting from elimination of post-conviction fees related to a change of plea or set aside verdict, and record sealing. 0250-111-0001—For transfer by the Controller to the Trial Court Trust Fund ........................ 2,098,435,0002,118,435,000 Provisions: 1. Upon order of the Department of Finance, the amount available for transfer in this item may be increased by an amount sufficient to fund trial court employee benefit increases in the 2026–27 fiscal year. 0250-111-0159—For transfer by the Controller from the State Trial Court Improvement and Modernization Fund to the Trial Court Trust Fund ........................ (594,000) 0250-112-0001—For transfer by the Controller to the State Trial Court Improvement and Modernization Fund ........................ 44,218,000 Provisions: 1. Upon order of the Department of Finance, the amount available for transfer in this item may be increased by an amount to augment the State Trial Court Improvement and Modernization Fund if revenues to support the fund are insufficient. In the event the amount appropriated in this item is determined not to be sufficient to address any revenue shortfalls in the State Trial Court Improvement and Modernization Fund, the Department of Finance may increase the amount available for transfer to this item. 2. In the event a transfer of funds approved by the Department of Finance is in excess of the amount appropriated in this item, that transfer shall become effective no sooner than 30 days after notification in writing to the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, and the chairpersons of the fiscal committees in each house of the Legislature, or no sooner than any lesser time the chairperson’s designee, may determine. When a request to transfer funds is submitted to the Department of Finance, a copy of that request shall be delivered to the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee and the chairpersons of the fiscal committees in each house of the Legislature. Delivery of a copy of that request shall not be deemed to be notification in writing for the purposes of the provision. 0250-113-0001—For transfer, upon order of the Department of Finance, to the Trial Court Trust Fund ........................ 1,000 Provisions: 1. The amount appropriated in this item shall be allocated by the Department of Finance if, in consultation with the Judicial Council, a determination is made that revenues in the Trial Court Trust Fund are insufficient to support trial court operations. In the event the amount appropriated in this item is determined not to be sufficient to address the revenue shortfall in the Trial Court Trust Fund, the Department of Finance may increase the amount available for transfer to this item to ensure trial court operations are funded. 2. In the event a transfer of funds approved by the Department of Finance is in excess of the amount appropriated in this item, that transfer shall become effective no sooner than 30 days after notification in writing to the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, and the chairpersons of the fiscal committees in each house of the Legislature, or no sooner than any lesser time the chairperson of the joint committee, or the chairperson’s designee, may determine. When a request to transfer funds is submitted to the Department of Finance, a copy of that request shall be delivered to the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee and the chairpersons of the fiscal committees in each house of the Legislature. Delivery of a copy of that request shall not be deemed to be notification in writing for purposes of this provision. 0250-114-0001—For transfer by the Controller to the Trial Court Trust Fund ........................ 216,700,000 0250-115-0001—For transfer by the Controller to the Trial Court Trust Fund ........................ 100,000,000 0250-115-0932—For transfer, upon order of the Department of Finance, to the Judicial Branch Workers’ Compensation Fund ........................ 1,000 Provisions: 1. Notwithstanding any other law, upon approval and order of the Department of Finance, the Administrative Director shall adjust the amount of this transfer to provide adequate resources to the Judicial Branch Workers’ Compensation Fund to pay workers’ compensation claims for judicial branch employees and judges, and administrative costs pursuant to Section 68114.10 of the Government Code. 0250-301-0001—For capital outlay, Judicial Branch ........................ 30,602,000 Schedule: (1) 0000096-Nevada County: New Nevada City Courthouse ........................ 1,491,000 (a) Performance criteria ........................ 1,491,000 (2) 0000099-Plumas County: New Quincy Courthouse ........................ 2,276,000 (a) Performance criteria ........................ 2,276,000 (3) 0010364-Kings County: One New Shelled Courtroom for One New Judgeship ........................ 7,618,000 (a) Construction ........................ 7,618,000 (4) 0010366-San Joaquin County: One New Shelled Courtroom for One New Judgeship ........................ 6,420,000 (a) Working drawings ........................ 395,000 (b) Construction ........................ 6,025,000 (5) 0010367-Sutter County: One New Shelled Courtroom for One New Judgeship ........................ 6,521,000 (a) Construction ........................ 6,521,000 (6) 0016278-Los Angeles County: Spring Street Courthouse—​Chatsworth Buildout ........................ 6,276,000 (a) Preliminary plans ........................ 2,052,000 (b) Working drawings ........................ 4,224,000 Provisions: 1. The Department of Finance may authorize the augmentation of this item up to $165,000,000 for courthouse construction projects, to be determined in future legislation for pursuant to the Reassessment of Trial Court Capital-Outlay Projects adopted by the Judicial Council on November 14, 2019, as updated in the Judicial Branch Five-Year Infrastructure Plan for fiscal year 2026–27 adopted by the Judicial Council on July 18, 2025, and may be available for encumbrance or expenditure without regard to fiscal years. The scope, cost, and schedule for by individual project, and may be available for encumbrance or expenditure without regard to fiscal year. projects shall be determined in future legislation. Notwithstanding any other law, the Department of Finance may authorize the augmentation of the amounts appropriated for the appropriate phases of study, preliminary plans, working drawings, construction, acquisition, performance criteria, design-build, pre-construction, and progressive design-build. 2. The Department of Finance may authorize the augmentation of this item up to $5,000,000 for project management and planning needs to accelerate new courthouse construction, including, but not limited to, contracting with external project management entities for this purpose. The department Department of Finance may authorize the transfer of this expenditure authority to any other item of appropriation for this purpose. Any transfer shall be authorized not sooner than 30 days after notification in writing to the chairpersons of the committees in each house of the Legislature that consider the State Budget, the chairpersons of the committees and appropriate subcommittees in each house of the Legislature that consider appropriations, and the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, or not sooner than whatever lesser time after that notification the chairperson of the joint committee, or the chairperson’s designee, may determine. 0250-301-0660—For capital outlay, Judicial Branch, payable from the Public Buildings Construction Fund ........................ 320,265,000 Schedule: (1) 0009732-San Luis Obispo County: New San Luis Obispo Courthouse ........................ 320,265,000 (a) Design-build ........................ 320,265,000 Provisions: 1. The Judicial Branch is authorized to execute and deliver any and all leases, contracts, agreements, or other documents necessary or advisable to consummate the sale and issuance of bonds by the State Public Works Board in accordance with the State Building Construction Act of 1955 (Part 10b (commencing with Section 15800) of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code) or otherwise to effectuate the financing of the scheduled project. 2. The Department of Finance may authorize the augmentation of this item up to $3,000,000,000 for courthouse construction projects to be determined in future legislation for pursuant to the Reassessment of Trial Court Capital Outlay Projects adopted by the Judicial Council on November 14, 2019, as updated in the Judicial Branch Five-Year Infrastructure Plan for Fiscal Year 2026–27, adopted by the Judicial Council on July 18, 2025, and may be available for encumbrance or expenditure without regard to fiscal years. The scope, cost, and schedule by individual project and may be available for encumbrance or expenditure without regard to fiscal years. shall be determined in future legislation. Notwithstanding any other law, the Department of Finance may authorize the augmentation of the amounts appropriated for the appropriate phases of preliminary plans, working drawings, construction, acquisition, performance criteria, design-build, pre-construction, and progressive design-build. 0250-490—Reappropriation, Judicial Branch. The amounts specified in the following citations are reappropriated for the purposes provided for in those appropriations and shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2027: 0001—​General Fund (.5) Up to $81,837,000 in Item 0250-301-0001, Budget Act of 2022 (Chs. 43, 45, and 249, Stats. 2022), as reappropriated in Item 0250-490, Budget Act of 2025 (Chs. 4 and, 5, Stats. 2025). Of that amount: (1) Up to $34,177,000 in Project 0000089-Los Angeles County: New Santa Clarita Courthouse—Acquisition (2) Up to $1,470,000 in Project 0000099- Plumas County: New Quincy Courthouse—Acquisition (5) Up to $12,127,000 in Project 0009728- Solano County: New Solano Hall of Justice (Fairfield)—Acquisition (6) Up to $11,194,000 in Project 0009729- Fresno County: New Fresno Courthouse— Acquisition (7) Up to $22,869,000 in Project 0009732-San Luis Obispo County: New San Luis Obispo Courthouse—Acquisition (.7) Up to $4,550,000 in Item 0250-301-0001, Budget Act of 2023 (Chs. 12, 38, and 189, Stats. 2023). Of that amount: (1) Up to $4,550,000 in Project 0000096-Nevada County: New Nevada City Courthouse—Acquisition (1) Up to $31,157,000 in Item 0250-301-0001, Budget Act of 2025 (Chs. 4 and 5, Stats. 2025). Of that amount: (2) Up to $5,159,000 in Project 0009728-Solano County: New Solano Hall of Justice (Fairfield)—​Performance criteria (3) Up to $18,145,000 in Project 0009729-Fresno County: New Fresno Courthouse—​Performance criteria (4) Up to $7,853,000 in Project 0009732-San Luis Obispo County: New San Luis Obispo Courthouse—Performance criteria Provisions: 1. On or before January 10, 2027, the Judicial Council and the Department of Finance shall report on a roadmap to accelerate and streamline courthouse construction projects. The report shall be provided to the relevant budget subcommittees of the Legislature in each house, the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, and the Legislative Analyst’s Office. The report shall identify common barriers and potential solutions; opportunities to leverage contract or outside project management expertise; changes in pre-planning and acquisition approaches; changes in the timeline and management of funding phases; the potential use of progressive-design build; and any other approaches as determined by the Judicial Council or the Department of Finance to help accelerate capital outlay projects. The report shall also evaluate the project management capacity and needs of the Judicial Branch to support additional construction projects. The report shall include recommendations to the Legislature including, but not limited to, potential statutory changes and resource needs. 0250-493—Reappropriation, Judicial Council. Notwithstanding any other law, the period to liquidate encumbrances of the following citations is extended as specified below: 0001—​General Fund (1) Up to $6,700,000 in Item 0250-001-0001, Budget Act of 2021 (Chs. 21, 69, and 240, Stats. 2021), extended to June 30, 2027, appropriated for deferred maintenance projects that represent critical infrastructure deficiencies. (2) Up to $6,500,000 in Item 0250-001-0001, Budget Act of 2022 (Chs. 43, 45, and 249, Stats. 2022), extended to June 30, 2027, appropriated for facility modifications to accommodate new superior court judgeships. 0250-494—Reappropriation, Judicial Branch. The amounts specified in the following citations are reappropriated for the purposes provided for in those appropriations and shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure as specified below: 0001—General Fund (1) Up to $2,120,000 of Provision 22 of Item 0250-001-0001, Budget Act of 2023 (Chs. 12, 38, and 189, Stats. 2023), shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2029, and shall be used as follows: (a) $750,000 shall be available for a contract with the California Appellate Project and shall supplement, but shall not supplant, existing funding. Funds shall be used to provide assistance in capital cases regarding potential or actual claims pursuant to Section 745 or subdivision (f) of Section 1473 of the Penal Code. Funds may be used for attorney’s fees and salaries, experts, investigators, paralegals, or other ancillary needs. In cases in which the California Appellate Project has declared a conflict, the court shall have discretion to allocate a pro rata share of the funds allocated to the California Appellate Project contract to the assisting entity. (b) The remainder shall be solely for legal representation in capital cases in which private counsel was appointed. Funds shall supplement, but shall not supplant, existing funding for court-appointed counsel. Funds may be used for attorney’s fees, experts, investigators, paralegals, or other ancillary needs related to potential or actual claims pursuant to Section 745 or subdivision (e) of Section 1473 of the Penal Code. (2) Up to $6,000,000 of Provision 11 of Item 0250-001-0001, Budget Act of 2022 (Chs. 43, 45, and 249, Stats. 2022), as reappropriated by Item 0250-493, Budget Act of 2024 (Chs. 22, 35, and 994, Stats. 2024) shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2028, for the support of a court-based firearm relinquishment program. 0280-001-0001—For support of Commission on Judicial Performance ........................ 7,387,000 Schedule: (1) 0180-Commission on Judicial Performance ........................ 7,387,000 Provisions: 1. Notwithstanding any other law, upon approval and order of the Department of Finance, the amount appropriated in this item shall be reduced by the amount transferred in Item 0280-011-0001 to provide adequate resources to the Judicial Branch Workers’ Compensation Fund to pay workers’ compensation claims for judicial branch employees and administrative costs pursuant to Section 68114.10 of the Government Code. 0280-011-0001—For transfer, upon order of the Director of Finance, to the Judicial Branch Workers’ Compensation Fund ........................ 1,000 Provisions: 1. Notwithstanding any other law, upon approval and order of the Department of Finance, the Commission on Judicial Performance shall adjust the amount of this transfer to provide adequate resources to the Judicial Branch Workers’ Compensation Fund to pay workers’ compensation claims for judicial branch employees and administrative costs pursuant to Section 68114.10 of the Government Code. 0390-001-0001—For transfer by the Controller to the Judges’ Retirement Fund, for Supreme Court and Appellate Court Justices ........................ 1,150,000 Provisions: 1. Upon order of the Department of Finance, the Controller shall transfer such funds as are necessary between this item and Item 0390-101-0001. 0390-101-0001—For transfer by the Controller to the Judges’ Retirement Fund for Superior Court and Municipal Court Judges ........................ 209,032,000207,005,000 Provisions: 1. Upon order of the Department of Finance, the Controller shall transfer such funds as are necessary between Item 0390-001-0001 and this item. 0390-490—Reappropriation, Judges’ Retirement System. The amounts specified in the following citations are reappropriated for the purposes provided for in those appropriations and shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure through June 30, 2028: 0001—​General Fund (1) Up to $65,000 in Provision 2 of Item 0390-001-0001, Budget Act of 2019 (Chs. 23 and 55, Stats. 2019). Executive 0500-001-0001—For support of Governor and of Governor’s Office ........................ 24,912,000 Schedule: (1) 0210-Governor’s Office ........................ 23,673,000 (a) Support ........................ (23,333,000) (b) Governor’s Residence (Support) ........................ (300,000) (c) Special Contingent Expenses ........................ (40,000) (2) 0215-Office of the First Partner ........................ 1,239,000 Provisions: 1. The funds appropriated in Schedules (1)(b) and (1)(c) are exempt from the provisions of Sections 925.6, 12410, and 13320 of the Government Code. 0500-001-0140—For support of the Governor’s Office, payable from the California Environmental License Plate Fund ........................ 115,000 Schedule: (1) 0210-Governor’s Office ........................ 115,000 0500-001-9740—For support of Governor’s Office, payable from the Central Service Cost Recovery Fund ........................ 5,126,000 Schedule: (1) 0210-Governor’s Office ........................ 5,126,000 0500-001-9750—For support of Governor’s Office, payable from the Immigrant Integration Fund ........................ 1,000 Schedule: (1) 0210-Governor’s Office ........................ 1,000 Provisions: 1. Upon receipt of donations in accordance with Sections 65050 and 65051 of the Government Code, the Department of Finance may authorize the augmentation of this item in excess of the amount appropriated consistent with the purposes of furthering immigrant integration. The Department of Finance shall not approve any expenditure unless the approval is made in writing and filed with the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee and the chairpersons of the committees in each house of the Legislature that consider appropriations no later than 30 days prior to the effective date of approval, or prior to whatever lesser time the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, or the chairperson’s designee, may determine. 0509-001-0001—For support of Governor’s Office of Business and Economic Development (GO-Biz) ........................ 48,148,000 Schedule: (1) 0220-GO-Biz ........................ 11,596,000 (2) 0225-California Business Investment Services ........................ 3,575,000 (3) 0230-Office of the Small Business Advocate ........................ 29,106,000 (4) 0235010-California Film Commission ........................ 3,763,000 (5) 0235019-Tourism ........................ 868,000 (6) 0235028-California Infrastructure and Economic Development Bank ........................ 212,000 (7) 0235037-Small Business Expansion ........................ 492,000 (8) Reimbursements to 0220-GO-Biz ........................ −19,000 (9) Reimbursements to 0225-California Business Investment Services ........................ −50,000 (10) Reimbursements to 0230-Office of the Small Business Advocate ........................ −26,000 (11) Reimbursements to 0235019-Tourism ........................ −670,000 (12) Reimbursements to 0235028-California Infrastructure and Economic Development Bank ........................ −212,000 (13) Reimbursements to 0235037-Small Business Expansion ........................ −487,000 Provisions: 1. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (3), $3,000,000 shall be used to draw down federal funds in the California Small Business Development Center Program. 2. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (3), $23,000,000 shall be used for the California Small Business Development Technical Assistance Expansion Program. Notwithstanding any other law, this funding shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2028. 0509-001-0649—For support of Governor’s Office of Business and Economic Development (GO-Biz), payable from the California Infrastructure and Economic Development Bank Fund ........................ 7,987,000 Schedule: (1) 0235028-California Infrastructure and Economic Development Bank ........................ 7,987,000 0509-001-0890—For support of Governor’s Office of Business and Economic Development (GO-Biz), payable, from the Federal Trust Fund ........................ 3,250,000 Schedule: (1) 0220-GO-Biz ........................ 900,000 (2) 0225-California Business Investment Services ........................ 2,350,000 0509-001-0918—For support of Governor’s Office of Business and Economic Development (GO-Biz), payable from the Small Business Expansion Fund ........................ 279,000 Schedule: (1) 0235037-Small Business Expansion ........................ 279,000 0509-001-3083—For support of Governor’s Office of Business and Economic Development (GO-Biz), payable from the Welcome Center Fund ........................ 102,000 Schedule: (1) 0235019-Tourism ........................ 1,000 (2) 0235046-Welcome Center Program ........................ 101,000 Provisions: 1. Consistent with Section 13995.151 of the Government Code, the Office of Tourism has the flexibility to limit the number of California Welcome Centers within a geographic area to prevent excessive density, but it also has the flexibility to locate them within 50 miles of each other regardless of whether they would be located in a rural or urban area. 0509-001-3095—For support of Governor’s Office of Business and Economic Development (GO-Biz), payable from the Film Promotion and Marketing Fund ........................ 10,000 Schedule: (1) 0235010-California Film Commission ........................ 10,000 0509-001-3237—For support of Governor’s Office of Business and Economic Development (GO-Biz), payable from the Cost of Implementation Account, Air Pollution Control Fund ........................ 1,782,000 Schedule: (1) 0220-GO-Biz ........................ 250,000 (2) 0225-California Business Investment Services ........................ 1,532,000 0509-001-9334—For support of Governor’s Office of Business and Economic Development (GO-Biz), payable from the Climate Catalyst Revolving Loan Fund ........................ 3,500,000 Schedule: (1) 0235028-California Infrastructure and Economic Development Bank ........................ 3,500,000 0509-011-0001—For transfer, upon order of the Director of Finance, to the Small Business Expansion Fund ........................ 861,000 Provisions: 1. If the Small Business Expansion Fund described in Section 63089.5 of the Government Code incurs losses due to loan defaults and this results in outstanding guarantee liability exceeding five times the portion of funds on deposit in the Small Business Expansion Fund, the Director of Finance may transfer an amount necessary from the General Fund to the Small Business Expansion Fund to maintain the minimum reserves required for the Small Business Expansion Fund. The Director of Finance shall notify the Joint Legislative Budget Committee within 30 days of making such a transfer. In no case shall a transfer or transfers made pursuant to this provision exceed the total amount of $20,000,000. Any amount transferred pursuant to this provision shall be repaid to the General Fund upon order of the Director of Finance when no longer needed to maintain a minimum required reserve. 0509-101-0001—For local assistance, Governor’s Office of Business and Economic Development (GO-Biz) ........................ 101,384,000112,884,000 Schedule: (1) 0220-GO-Biz ........................ 101,384,000104,384,000 (2) 0230-Office of the Small Business Advocate ........................ 8,500,000 Provisions: 1. Of the amount appropriated in this item, $100,000,000 shall be available to the City of Fresno to support the city’s Public Infrastructure Plan. 2. Of the amount appropriated in this item, $1,384,000 shall be available to support international trade and to provide export promotion services. Upon the order of the Department of Finance, five percent of the amount appropriated in this provision shall be available to be transferred to Schedule (1) of Item 0509-001-0001 for costs to administer the program. 3. Of the amount appropriated in Provision 2, $500,000 shall be available to the Governor’s Office of Business and Economic Development’s International Affairs and Trade Unit (IAT) for matching with federal State Trade Expansion Program (STEP) grant funding to support the California Export Promotion Program (CAL EXPORT), which shall provide export promotion and supply chain resiliency programming for small businesses as California’s flagship trade program. If GO-Biz receives confirmation that the federal STEP program will not award grant funding to California for expenditure during the 2026–27 fiscal year, then after 30 days’ notice to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee reporting that confirmation, the additional amount of $884,000 shall be available to GO-Biz for this same purpose. 4. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (2), $6,500,000 shall be used for the California Black Women’s Collective Empowerment Institute. 5. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (1), $2,000,000 shall be used for the Black Freedom Fund California Community Policy Fellowship. 6. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (1), $1,000,000 shall be used for the Black Freedom Fund Trust and Reconciliation. 7. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (2), $2,000,000 shall be used for the Urban Business Resource Center to support infrastructure and facility modernization. 0509-111-0001—For transfer by the Controller to the California Civic Media Fund ........................ 10,000,000 0509-490—Reappropriation, Governor’s Office of Business and Economic Development. The balances of the appropriations provided in the following citations are reappropriated for the purposes provided for in those appropriations and shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure as specified below: 0001—​General Fund (1) The administrative dollars transferred per Provision 2 of Item 7100-101-0001, Budget Act of 2024 (Chs. 22, 35, and 994, Stats. 2024) to the Governor’s Office of Business and Economic Development shall be extended to June 30, 2028. (2) The administrative dollars transferred per Provision 2 of Item 7100-101-0001, Budget Act of 2025 (Chs. 4 and 5, Stats. 2025) to the Governor’s Office of Business and Economic Development shall be extended to June 30, 2029. 0509-491—Reappropriation, Governor’s Office of Business and Economic Development. The amount specified in the following citations are reappropriated for the purposes provided in those appropriations and shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2027: 0001—General Fund (1) Up to $1,000,000 in Item 0509-102-0001, Budget Act of 2022 (Chs. 43, 45, and 249, Stats. 2022). 0509-495—Reversion, Governor’s Office of Business and Economic Development. As of June 30, 2026, the balances specified below, of the appropriations provided in the following citations, shall revert to the fund balances of the funds from which the appropriations were made. 0001—General Fund (1) $25,000,000 in Item 0509-001-0001, Budget Act of 2025 (Chs. 4 and 5, Stats. 2025). 0511-001-0001—For support of Secretary of Government Operations ........................ 29,001,000 Schedule: (1) 0250-Office of the Secretary of Government Operations ........................ 7,107,000 (2) 0253-California Education Learning Lab ........................ 4,000,000 (2.5) 0254-California Education Interagency Council ........................ 1,500,000 (3) 0257-Cradle to Career ........................ 16,588,000 (4) 0259-Office of Civil Rights ........................ 3,581,000 (5) Reimbursements to 0250-Office of the Secretary of Government Operations ........................ −3,775,000 Provisions: 1. Contracts entered into or amended pursuant to this provision shall be exempt from Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 14825) of Part 5.5 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, Section 19130 of the Government Code, Part 2 (commencing with Section 10100) of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code, and the State Administrative Manual, and shall be exempt from the review or approval of any division of the Department of General Services or the Department of Technology. 2. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $1,337,000 is available for the Cradle-to-Career Data System’s workload related to the federal Workforce Pell Grant Program. Disbursement of these funds are contingent on Department of Finance approval of an expenditure plan for the use of these funds submitted by the department. 3. Contingent upon the enactment of Senate Bill 998 of the 2025–26 Regular Session, and no later than January 10, 2027, the Director of Finance shall appropriate within Schedule (4) additional funds sufficient to implement the provisions of Senate Bill 998 of the 2025–26 Regular Session. 0515-001-0240—For support of Secretary of Business and Consumer Services Agency, payable from the Local Agency Deposit Security Fund ........................ 1,000 Schedule: (1) 0260-Support ........................ 1,000 0515-001-0299—For support of Secretary of Business and Consumer Services Agency, payable from the Credit Union Fund ........................ 32,000 Schedule: (1) 0260-Support ........................ 32,000 0515-001-0317—For support of Secretary of Business and Consumer Services Agency, payable from the Real Estate Fund ........................ 259,000 Schedule: (1) 0260-Support ........................ 259,000 0515-001-3036—For support of Secretary of Business and Consumer Services Agency, payable from the Alcohol Beverage Control Fund ........................ 287,000 Schedule: (1) 0260-Support ........................ 287,000 0515-001-3153—For support of Secretary of Business and Consumer Services Agency, payable from the Horse Racing Fund ........................ 45,000 Schedule: (1) 0260-Support ........................ 45,000 0515-001-3288—For support of Secretary of Business and Consumer Services Agency, payable from the Cannabis Control Fund ........................ 521,000 Schedule: (1) 0260-Support ........................ 2,574,000 (2) Reimbursements to 0260-Support ........................ −2,053,000 0515-001-3363—For support of Secretary of Business and Consumer Services Agency, payable from the Financial Protection Fund ........................ 363,000 Schedule: (1) 0260-Support ........................ 363,000 0515-495—Reversion, Secretary of Business and Consumer Services. As of June 30, 2026, the unencumbered balances of the appropriations provided in the following citations shall revert to the fund balances of the funds from which the appropriations were made. 0001—​General Fund (1) Item 0515-103-0001, Budget Act of 2021 (Chs. 21, 69, and 240, Stats. 2021). 0516-001-0001—For support of Secretary of California Housing and Homelessness Agency ........................ 4,431,000 Schedule: (1) 0266-Administration of California Housing and Homelessness Agency ........................ 5,717,000 (2) Reimbursements to 0266-Administration of California Housing and Homelessness Agency ........................ −1,286,000 0521-001-0042—For support of Secretary of Transportation, payable from the State Highway Account, State Transportation Fund ........................ 5,796,000 Schedule: (1) 0270-Administration of Transportation Agency ........................ 5,133,000 (2) 0275-California Traffic Safety Program ........................ 663,000 0521-001-0044—For support of Secretary of Transportation, payable from the Motor Vehicle Account, State Transportation Fund ........................ 1,853,000 Schedule: (1) 0270-Administration of Transportation Agency ........................ 1,638,000 (2) 0275-California Traffic Safety Program ........................ 215,000 0521-001-0046—For support of Secretary of Transportation, payable from the Public Transportation Account, State Transportation Fund ........................ 1,852,000 Schedule: (1) 0270-Administration of Transportation Agency ........................ 1,693,000 (2) 0275-California Traffic Safety Program ........................ 153,000 (3) 0276-Transit and Intercity Rail Capital Program ........................ 6,000 0521-001-0890—For support of Secretary of Transportation, payable from the Federal Trust Fund ........................ 12,905,000 Schedule: (1) 0275-California Traffic Safety Program ........................ 12,905,000 Provisions: 1. Notwithstanding any other law, funds appropriated in this item may be transferred to Item 0521-002-0890 or Item 0521-101-0890. These transfers shall require the prior approval of the Department of Finance. 0521-002-0890—For support of Secretary of Transportation, payable from the Federal Trust Fund ........................ 70,194,000 Schedule: (1) 0275-California Traffic Safety Program ........................ 70,194,000 Provisions: 1. Notwithstanding any other law, federal funds appropriated in this item but not encumbered or expended by June 30, 2027, may be expended in the 2027–28 fiscal year. 2. Notwithstanding any other law, funds appropriated in this item may be transferred to Item 0521-001-0890 or Item 0521-101-0890. These transfers shall require the prior approval of the Department of Finance. 0521-101-0890—For local assistance, Secretary of Transportation, payable from the Federal Trust Fund ........................ 87,435,000 Schedule: (1) 0275-California Traffic Safety Program ........................ 87,435,000 Provisions: 1. Notwithstanding any other law, federal funds appropriated in this item but not encumbered or expended by June 30, 2027, may be expended in the 2027–28 fiscal year. 2. Notwithstanding any other law, funds appropriated in this item may be transferred to Item 0521-001-0890 or Item 0521-002-0890. These transfers shall require the prior approval of the Department of Finance. 0521-131-0001—For local assistance, Secretary of Transportation ........................ 518,000,000 Schedule: (1) 0276-Transit and Intercity Rail Capital Program ........................ 418,000,000 (2) 0277-Statewide Transportation Priorities ........................ 100,000,000 Provisions: 1. Funds appropriated in this item shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure and liquidation until June 30, 2032. 2. The amount appropriated in Schedule (2) is for port-specific high-priority projects that increase goods movement capacity on rail and roadways serving ports and at port terminals and shall not be used for the purchase of fully automated cargo handling equipment or for infrastructure that is used to support fully automated cargo handling equipment. 3. The amount appropriated in Schedule (1) is for the Competitive Transit and Intercity Rail Capital Program. 0521-131-0042—For local assistance, Secretary of Transportation, payable from the State Highway Account, State Transportation Fund ........................ 75,000,000 Schedule: (1) 0277-Statewide Transportation Priorities ........................ 75,000,000 Provisions: 1. Funds appropriated in this item shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure, and liquidation until June 30, 2032. 2. Funds appropriated in this item are for high-priority grade crossing improvement and separation projects. 0521-490—Reappropriation, Secretary for Transportation Agency. The amounts specified in the following citations are reappropriated for the purposes provided for in those appropriations and shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2035: 0001—General Fund (1) Up to $300,000,000 of the amount specified in Schedule (1) of Item 0521-131-0001, Budget Act of 2021 (Chs. 21, 69, and 240, Stats. 2021). 0530-001-0001—For support of Secretary of California Health and Human Services ........................ 33,821,000 Schedule: (1) 0280-Secretary of California Health and Human Services ........................ 13,292,000 (2) 0286-Office of Youth and Community Restoration ........................ 18,951,000 (3) 0290-Office of Technology and Solutions Integration ........................ 2,763,000 (4) 0296-Center for Data Insights and Innovation ........................ 0 (5) 0297-Office of Surgeon General ........................ 1,428,000 (6) Reimbursements to 0280-Secretary of California Health and Human Services ........................ −2,613,000 (7) Reimbursements to 0286-Office of Youth and Community Restoration ........................ 0 (8) Reimbursements to 0297-Office of the Surgeon General ........................ 0 Provisions: 1. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (3), $2,763,000 shall be used for the Office of the Agency Information Officer and Office of Technology and Solutions Integration and Enterprise Capabilities. The California Health and Human Services Agency shall report to the Legislature at regular intervals and at least on an annual basis on the benefits to participants and beneficiaries of impacted government programs, and which specific programs in the agency improved. 2. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (2), $10,000,000 shall be available to the Office of Youth and Community Restoration for purposes including, but not limited to, providing technical assistance, disseminating best practices, and issuing grants to counties and probation departments for the purpose of transforming the juvenile justice system to improve outcomes for justice involved youth. 3. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (2), $2,000,000 shall be available to counties for county probation departments for the purposes specified in subdivision (g) of Section 2200 of the Welfare and Institutions Code. These funds shall be allocated to the counties by the Controller for county probation departments according to a schedule provided by the Department of Finance and developed in collaboration with the Office of Youth and Community Restoration and Chief Probation Officers of California. The Department of Finance shall provide the schedule to the Controller by September 1 of each year and the Controller shall allocate these funds no later than October 1 of each year, consistent with the schedule provided by the Department of Finance. 4. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (1), $730,000 shall be available to support the interagency agreement for administrative services provided to the State Council on Developmental Disabilities by the California Department of Social Services. 0530-001-0890—For support of Secretary of California Health and Human Services, payable from the Federal Trust Fund ........................ 790,000 Schedule: (1) 0280-Secretary of California Health and Human Services ........................ 0 (2) 0286-Office of Youth and Community Restoration ........................ 790,000 0530-001-3085—For support of Secretary of California Health and Human Services, payable from the Behavioral Health Services Fund ........................ 154,000 Schedule: (1) 0280-Secretary of California Health and Human Services ........................ 154,000 0530-001-3377—For support of Secretary of California Health and Human Services, payable from the Center for Data Insights and Innovation Fund ........................ 13,000 Schedule: (1) 0290-Office of Technology and Solutions Integration ........................ 13,000 0530-001-3414—For support of Secretary of California Health and Human Services, payable from the 988 State Suicide and Behavioral Health Crisis Services Fund ........................ 445,000 Schedule: (1) 0280-Secretary of California Health and Human Services ........................ 445,000 0530-001-9740—For support of Secretary of California Health and Human Services, payable from the Central Service Cost Recovery Fund ........................ 11,413,000 Schedule: (1) 0280-Secretary of California Health and Human Services ........................ 11,413,000 0530-001-9745—For support of Secretary of California Health and Human Services, payable from the California Health and Human Services Automation Fund ........................ 942,458,000 Schedule: (1) 0290-Office of Technology and Solutions Integration ........................ 943,882,000 (2) Reimbursements to 0290-Office of Technology and Solutions Integration ........................ −1,424,000 Provisions: 1. The Department of Finance may authorize expenditure authority increases for the Office of Technology and Solutions Integration (OTSI) in excess of the amount appropriated to address system changes to OTSI-managed information technology projects no sooner than either 30 days after notification in writing of the necessity therefor to the chairpersons of the fiscal committees of each house of the Legislature and the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, or whatever lesser time after notification that the chairperson of the joint committee, or the chairperson’s designee, may in each instance determine. 2. The Director of Finance may authorize the transfer of expenditure authority from the State Department of Health Care Services to the Office of Technology and Solutions Integration consistent with the plan for system changes to implement the federal Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act (Public Law 111-148). Any such increases shall occur no sooner than 30 days after notification in writing of the necessity therefor to the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, or whatever lesser time after notification the chairperson, or the chairperson’s designee, may in each instance determine. 3. Notwithstanding Provision 1, the Department of Finance is authorized to increase expenditure authority in this item to support project management activities associated with the Child Welfare Services-California Automated Response and Engagement System project. 0530-017-0001—For support of Secretary of California Health and Human Services ........................ 619,000 Schedule: (1) 0285-California Office of Health Information Integrity (CALOHII) ........................ 1,599,000 (2) 0296-Center for Data Insights and Innovation ........................ 0 (3) Reimbursements to 0285-California Office of Health Information Integrity (CALOHII) ........................ −980,000 (4) Reimbursements to 0296-Center for Data Insights and Innovation ........................ 0 0530-101-0890—For local assistance, Secretary of California Health and Human Services, payable from the Federal Trust Fund ........................ 12,228,000 Schedule: (1) 0286-Office of Youth and Community Restoration ........................ 12,228,000 0530-490—Reappropriation, Secretary of California Health and Human Services. The balances of the appropriations provided in the following citations are reappropriated for the purposes provided for in those appropriations and shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2028: 0001—​General Fund (1) Item 0530-001-0001, Budget Act of 2019 (Chs. 23 and 55, Stats. 2019), as reappropriated by Item 0530-492, Budget Act of 2022 (Chs. 43, 45, and 249, Stats. 2022) and Item 0530-490, Budget Act of 2025 (Chs. 4 and 5, Stats. 2025) for the Early Childhood Policy Council. (2) Up to $294,000 in Item 0530-001-0001, Budget Act of 2025 (Chs. 4 and 5, Stats. 2025) to address increases in legal workload associated with federal House Resolution 1 (Public Law 119-21). 0540-001-0001—For support of Secretary of the Natural Resources Agency ........................ 7,857,000 Schedule: (1) 0320-Administration of Natural Resources Agency ........................ 7,857,000 0540-001-0140—For support of Secretary of the Natural Resources Agency, payable from the California Environmental License Plate Fund ........................ 8,344,000 Schedule: (1) 0320-Administration of Natural Resources Agency ........................ 9,718,000 (2) Reimbursements to 0320-Administration of Natural Resources Agency ........................ −1,374,000 0540-001-0183—For support of Secretary of the Natural Resources Agency, payable from the Environmental Enhancement and Mitigation Program Fund ........................ 408,000 Schedule: (1) 0320-Administration of Natural Resources Agency ........................ 408,000 0540-001-0200—For support of Secretary of the Natural Resources Agency, payable from the Fish and Game Preservation Fund ........................ 68,000 Schedule: (1) 0320-Administration of Natural Resources Agency ........................ 68,000 0540-001-0263—For support of Secretary of the Natural Resources Agency, payable from the Off-Highway Vehicle Trust Fund ........................ 12,000 Schedule: (1) 0320-Administration of Natural Resources Agency ........................ 12,000 0540-001-0267—For support of Secretary of the Natural Resources Agency, payable from the Exposition Park Improvement Fund ........................ 387,000 Schedule: (1) 0320-Administration of Natural Resources Agency ........................ 387,000 0540-001-0392—For support of Secretary of the Natural Resources Agency, payable from the State Parks and Recreation Fund ........................ 48,000 Schedule: (1) 0320-Administration of Natural Resources Agency ........................ 48,000 0540-001-0516—For support of Secretary of the Natural Resources Agency, payable from the Harbors and Watercraft Revolving Fund ........................ 2,000 Schedule: (1) 0320-Administration of Natural Resources Agency ........................ 2,000 0540-001-1018—For support of Secretary of the Natural Resources Agency, payable from the Lake Tahoe Science and Lake Improvement Account ........................ 1,375,000 Schedule: (1) 0320-Administration of Natural Resources Agency ........................ 1,375,000 0540-001-3046—For support of Secretary of the Natural Resources Agency, payable from the Oil, Gas, and Geothermal Administrative Fund ........................ 69,000 Schedule: (1) 0320-Administration of Natural Resources Agency ........................ 69,000 0540-001-3117—For support of Secretary of the Natural Resources Agency, payable from the Alternative and Renewable Fuel and Vehicle Technology Fund ........................ 154,000 Schedule: (1) 0320-Administration of Natural Resources Agency ........................ 154,000 0540-001-3212—For support of Secretary of the Natural Resources Agency, payable from the Timber Regulation and Forest Restoration Fund ........................ 1,839,000 Schedule: (1) 0320-Administration of Natural Resources Agency ........................ 1,839,000 Provisions: 1. No later than January 10, 2027, the Natural Resources Agency—in consultation with the California Coastal Commission, Department of Conservation, Department of Fish and Wildlife, and State Water Resources Control Board—shall submit to the Legislature a report on the implementation, outcomes, and lessons learned from its expedited review and approval of vegetation management projects pursuant to the Governor’s March 1, 2025, Proclamation of a State of Emergency. The report shall include (a) a list of projects approved using the expedited process including their estimated cost and funding source(s), their expected completion date, and the estimated number of activity acres and footprint acres treated by each project as well as other relevant treatment data that is reported consistent with the most recent California Wildfire and Forest Resilience Action Plan; (b) the estimated reduction in project review and approval time at each department, to the extent feasible, as a result of the expedited process; (c) a description of the changes made to agency or department policies and procedures to facilitate the expedited process, including the expected outcomes from these changes; and (d) lessons learned from the expedited process and proposed next steps to ensure continued timely review, approval, and implementation of similar projects during and after the Proclamation of a State of Emergency. This report may be electronically submitted to the relevant legislative budget and policy committees and the Legislature Analyst’s Office. 0540-001-3237—For support of Secretary of the Natural Resources Agency, payable from the Cost of Implementation Account, Air Pollution Control Fund ........................ 334,000 Schedule: (1) 0320-Administration of Natural Resources Agency ........................ 334,000 0540-001-6051—For support of Secretary of the Natural Resources Agency, payable from the Safe Drinking Water, Water Quality and Supply, Flood Control, River and Coastal Protection Fund of 2006 ........................ 419,000 Schedule: (1) 0320-Administration of Natural Resources Agency ........................ 419,000 0540-001-6076—For support of Secretary of the Natural Resources Agency, payable from the California Ocean Protection Trust Fund ........................ 31,000,000 Schedule: (1) 0320-Administration of Natural Resources Agency ........................ 31,000,000 Provisions: 1. Any funds above $7,600,000 annually, of the Once-Through Cooling Interim Mitigation Fees deposited into the Ocean Protection Trust Fund, shall be transferred by the Controller to the Coastal Trust Fund. 2. Of the amount appropriated in this item, $7,600,000 is available for expenditure for support or local assistance for the Marine Protected Area Mitigation Program, and shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2028. 0540-001-6083—For support of Secretary of the Natural Resources Agency, payable from the Water Quality, Supply, and Infrastructure Improvement Fund of 2014 ........................ 1,225,000 Schedule: (1) 0320-Administration of Natural Resources Agency ........................ 1,225,000 0540-001-6088—For support of Secretary of the Natural Resources Agency, payable from the California Drought, Water, Parks, Climate, Coastal Protection, and Outdoor Access For All Fund ........................ 2,256,000 Schedule: (1) 0320-Administration of Natural Resources Agency ........................ 2,256,000 Provisions: 1. The amount appropriated in this item shall be available to support the following: (a) $80,000 shall be available for trails and greenway investments, consistent with subdivision (a) of Section 80080 of the Public Resources Code. (b) $164,000 shall be available for marine wildlife and healthy ocean and coastal ecosystems, consistent with subdivision (a) of Section 80120 of the Public Resources Code. (d) $111,000 shall be available for multibenefit green infrastructure investments, consistent with subdivision (b) of Section 80137 of the Public Resources Code. (e) $577,000 shall be available for multibenefit flood projects, consistent with paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 80145 of the Public Resources Code. (f) $1,324,000 shall be available for statewide bond costs. 0540-001-6093—For support of Secretary of the Natural Resources Agency, payable from the Safe Drinking Water, Wildfire Prevention, Drought Preparedness, and Clean Air Fund ........................ 1,618,000 Schedule: (1) 0320-Administration of Natural Resources Agency ........................ 1,618,000 0540-001-8058—For support of Secretary of the Natural Resources Agency, payable from the California Cultural and Historical Endowment Fund ........................ 123,000 Schedule: (1) 0320-Administration of Natural Resources Agency ........................ 123,000 0540-002-0042—For transfer by the Controller from the State Highway Account, State Transportation Fund, to the Environmental Enhancement and Mitigation Program Fund to be used as specified in Section 164.56 of the Streets and Highways Code ........................ (7,000,000) 0540-002-6093—For support of Secretary of the Natural Resources Agency, payable from the Safe Drinking Water, Wildfire Prevention, Drought Preparedness, and Clean Air Fund ........................ 700,000 Schedule: (1) 0320-Administration of Natural Resources Agency ........................ 700,000 Provisions: 1. The funds appropriated in this item are for Ocean Protection Council program delivery costs related to the funds appropriated in Item 0540-102-6093. 0540-003-6093—For support of Secretary of the Natural Resources Agency, payable from the Safe Drinking Water, Wildfire Prevention, Drought Preparedness, and Clean Air Fund ........................ 1,067,000 Schedule: (1) 0320-Administration of Natural Resources Agency ........................ 1,067,000 0540-101-0001—For local assistance, Secretary of the Natural Resources Agency ........................ 14,000,000 Schedule: (1) 0320-Administration of Natural Resources Agency ........................ 14,000,000 Provisions: 1. Of the amount appropriated in this item, $2,000,000 shall be available for the Marine Mammal Center. Up to 5 percent of this amount may be used for administrative costs. 2. Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code does not apply to the funds appropriated in this item for the development and adoption of program guidelines and selection criteria. 3. Of the amount appropriated in this item, $12,000,000 shall be available for the Museum of Tolerance and shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2028. 0540-101-0183—For local assistance, Secretary of the Natural Resources Agency, payable from the Environmental Enhancement and Mitigation Program Fund ........................ 15,535,000 Schedule: (1) 0320-Administration of Natural Resources Agency ........................ 15,535,000 Provisions: 1. Notwithstanding any other law, the funds appropriated in this item shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2029. 2. Notwithstanding Section 164.56 of the Streets and Highways Code, up to $13,835,000 of the amount appropriated in this item may be used to support the Wallis Annenberg Wildlife Crossing project. 0540-101-6088—For local assistance, Secretary of the Natural Resources Agency, payable from the California Drought, Water, Parks, Climate, Coastal Protection, and Outdoor Access For All Fund ........................ 600,000 Schedule: (1) 0320-Administration of Natural Resources Agency ........................ 600,000 Provisions: 1. Notwithstanding any other law, the funds appropriated in this item shall be available for liquidation until June 30, 2031. 0540-103-0001—For local assistance, Secretary of the Natural Resources Agency ........................ 10,000,000 Schedule: (1) 0320-Administration of Natural Resources Agency ........................ 10,000,000 Provisions: 1. Of the amount appropriated in this item, $10,000,000 shall be available for cultural, educational, and economic improvements. 0540-490—Reappropriation, Secretary of the Natural Resources Agency. Notwithstanding any other law, the period to liquidate encumbrances of the following citations is extended to June 30, 2029: 0001—​General Fund (1) Item 0540-101-0001, Budget Act of 2017 (Chs. 14, 22, and 54, Stats. 2017) as reappropriated by Item 0540-492, Budget Act of 2024 (Chs. 22, 35, and 994, Stats. 2024). 0540-491—Reappropriation, Secretary of the Natural Resources Agency. The balances of the appropriations provided in the following citations are reappropriated for the purposes provided for in those appropriations and shall be available for encumbrance, or expenditure until June 30, 2028: 0001—​General Fund (1) The amount transferred in Provision 2 of Item 0540-101-0001 of the Budget Act of 2018 (Chs. 29 and 30, Stats. 2018) to the San Gabriel and Lower Los Angeles Rivers and Mountains Conservancy, as reappropriated by Item 0540-491, Budget Act of 2023 (Chs. 12, 38, and 189, Stats. 2023). (2) The amount transferred in Provision 9 of Item 0540-101-0001 of the Budget Act of 2019 (Chs. 23 and 55, Stats. 2019) to the San Gabriel and Lower Los Angeles Rivers and Mountains Conservancy, as reappropriated by Item 0540-491, Budget Act of 2023 (Chs. 12, 38, and 189, Stats. 2023). (3) Item 0540-001-0001, Budget Act of 2023 (Chs. 12, 38, and 189, Stats. 2023). (4) Item 0540-001-0001, Budget Act of 2024 (Chs. 22, 35, and 994, Stats. 2024). 0183—Environmental Enhancement and Mitigation Program Fund (1) Item 0540-101-0183, Budget Act of 2014 (Chs. 25 and 663, Stats. 2014), as reappropriated by Item 0540-490, Budget Act of 2017 (Chs. 14, 22, and 54, Stats. 2017), and Item 0540-490, Budget Act of 2022 (Chs. 43, 45, and 249, Stats. 2022). (1.5) Item 0540-101-0183, Budget Act of 2019 (Chs. 23 and 55, Stats. 2019). (2) Item 0540-101-0183, Budget Act of 2020 (Chs. 6 and 7, Stats. 2020), as reappropriated by Item 0540-492, Budget Act of 2023 (Chs. 12, 38, and 189, Stats. 2023). (2.5) Item 0540-101-0183, Budget Act of 2021 (Chs. 21, 69, and 240, Stats. 2021). (3) Item 0540-101-0183, Budget Act of 2022 (Chs. 43, 45, and 249, Stats. 2022). (4) Item 0540-101-0183, Budget Act of 2023 (Chs. 12, 38, and 189, Stats. 2023). 0540-492—Reappropriation, Secretary of the Natural Resources Agency. The balances of the appropriations provided in the following citations are reappropriated for the purposes provided for in those appropriations and shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2027: 0001—General Fund (1) Provision 1 of Item 0540-001-0001, Budget Act of 2022 (Chs. 43, 45, and 249, Stats. 2022). 0540-493—Reappropriation, Secretary of the Natural Resources Agency. Notwithstanding any other law, the period to liquidate encumbrances of the following citations is extended to June 30, 2028. 0001—General Fund (1) Subschedule (e) of Schedule (1) of Item 0540-101-0001, Budget Act of 2018 (Chs. 29 and 30, Stats. 2018), as reappropriated by Item 0540-491, Budget Act of 2021 (Chs. 21, 69, and 240, Stats. 2021), as reappropriated by Item 0540-495, Budget Act of 2022 (Chs. 43, 45, and 249, Stats. 2022), as reappropriated by Item 0540-490, Budget Act of 2023 (Chs. 12, 38, and 189, Stats. 2023). (2) Control Section 19.56, Budget Act of 2022 (Chs. 43, 45, and 249, Stats. 2022), as allocated to Item 0540-102-0001, Budget Act of 2022 (Chs. 43, 45, and 249, Stats. 2022), including, but not limited to, the funding transferred for administrative costs per Provision 1 of Item 0540-102-0001 of the Budget Act of 2022 (Chs. 43, 45, and 249, Stats. 2022). 0552-001-0001—For support of Office of the Inspector General ........................ 51,941,00056,228,000 Schedule: (1) 0330-Office of the Inspector General ........................ 51,941,00056,228,000 0555-001-0014—For support of Secretary for Environmental Protection, payable from the Hazardous Waste Control Account ........................ 444,000 Schedule: (1) 0340-Support ........................ 444,000 0555-001-0028—For support of Secretary for Environmental Protection, payable from the Unified Program Account ........................ 16,692,000 Schedule: (1) 0340-Support ........................ 16,692,000 0555-001-0044—For support of Secretary for Environmental Protection, payable from the Motor Vehicle Account, State Transportation Fund ........................ 3,090,000 Schedule: (1) 0340-Support ........................ 9,626,000 (2) Reimbursements to 0340-Support ........................ −6,536,000 0555-001-0106—For support of Secretary for Environmental Protection, payable from the Department of Pesticide Regulation Fund ........................ 1,402,000 Schedule: (1) 0340-Support ........................ 1,402,000 0555-001-0115—For support of Secretary for Environmental Protection, payable from the Air Pollution Control Fund ........................ 2,413,000 Schedule: (1) 0340-Support ........................ 12,477,000 (2) Reimbursements to 0340-Support ........................ −10,064,000 0555-001-0133—For support of Secretary for Environmental Protection, payable from the California Beverage Container Recycling Fund ........................ 148,000 Schedule: (1) 0340-Support ........................ 148,000 0555-001-0193—For support of Secretary for Environmental Protection, payable from the Waste Discharge Permit Fund ........................ 929,000 Schedule: (1) 0340-Support ........................ 929,000 0555-001-0226—For support of Secretary for Environmental Protection, payable from the California Tire Recycling Management Fund ........................ 135,000 Schedule: (1) 0340-Support ........................ 135,000 0555-001-0387—For support of Secretary for Environmental Protection, payable from the Integrated Waste Management Account, Integrated Waste Management Fund ........................ 289,000 Schedule: (1) 0340-Support ........................ 289,000 0555-001-0439—For support of Secretary for Environmental Protection, payable from the Underground Storage Tank Cleanup Fund ........................ 1,958,000 Schedule: (1) 0340-Support ........................ 1,958,000 0555-001-0557—For support of Secretary for Environmental Protection, payable from the Toxic Substances Control Account ........................ 141,000 Schedule: (1) 0340-Support ........................ 141,000 0555-001-0679—For support of Secretary for Environmental Protection, payable from the State Water Quality Control Fund ........................ 220,000 Schedule: (1) 0340-Support ........................ 220,000 0555-001-0890—For support of Secretary for Environmental Protection, payable from the Federal Trust Fund ........................ 300,000 Schedule: (1) 0340-Support ........................ 300,000 0555-001-3058—For support of Secretary for Environmental Protection, payable from the Water Rights Fund ........................ 29,000 Schedule: (1) 0340-Support ........................ 29,000 0555-001-3065—For support of Secretary for Environmental Protection, payable from the Electronic Waste Recovery and Recycling Account ........................ 454,000 Schedule: (1) 0340-Support ........................ 454,000 0555-001-3237—For support of Secretary for Environmental Protection, payable from the Cost of Implementation Account, Air Pollution Control Fund ........................ 888,000 Schedule: (1) 0340-Support ........................ 888,000 0555-101-1006—For local assistance, Secretary for Environmental Protection, payable from the Rural CUPA Reimbursement Account ........................ 1,555,000 Schedule: (1) 0340-Support ........................ 1,555,000 0555-101-8013—For local assistance, Secretary for Environmental Protection, payable from the Environmental Enforcement and Training Account ........................ 2,132,000 Schedule: (1) 0340-Support ........................ 2,132,000 0555-111-0001—For transfer by the Controller to the Rural CUPA Reimbursement Account ........................ 835,000 0555-490—Reappropriation, Secretary for Environmental Protection. The amounts specified in the following citations are reappropriated for the purposes provided for in those appropriations and shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2027. 0115—Air Pollution Control Fund (1) Up to $300,000 in Item 0555-001-0115, Budget Act of 2023, (Chs. 12, 38, and 189, Stats. of 2023) for project portfolio management software tools. 0559-001-0001—For support of Secretary of Labor and Workforce Development ........................ 2,568,000 Schedule: (1) 0350-Office of the Secretary of Labor and Workforce Development ........................ 8,378,000 (2) Reimbursements to 0350-Office of the Secretary of Labor and Workforce Development ........................ −5,810,000 0559-001-3078—For support of Secretary of Labor and Workforce Development, payable from the Labor and Workforce Development Fund ........................ 8,040,000 Schedule: (1) 0350-Office of the Secretary of Labor and Workforce Development ........................ 8,040,000 Provisions: 1. The amount appropriated in this item includes revenues derived from the assessment of fines and penalties imposed as specified in Section 13332.18 of the Government Code. 0559-490—Reappropriation, Labor and Workforce Development Agency. The balances of the appropriations provided in the following citations are reappropriated for the purposes provided in those appropriations and shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure as specified below: 0001—​General Fund (1) The administrative dollars transferred per Provision 2 of Item 7100-101-0001, Budget Act of 2024 (Chs. 22, 35, and 994, Stats. 2024) to the Labor and Workforce Development Agency shall be extended to June 30, 2028. (2) The administrative dollars transferred per Provision 2 of Item 7100-101-0001, Budget Act of 2025 (Chs. 4 and 5, Stats. 2025) to the Labor and Workforce Development Agency shall be extended to June 30, 2029. 0650-001-0001—For support of Governor’s Office of Land Use and Climate Innovation ........................ 32,620,000 Schedule: (1) 0360-State Planning and Policy Development ........................ 35,310,000 (3) 0370-Strategic Growth Council ........................ 1,720,000 (5) Reimbursements to 0360-State Planning and Policy Development ........................ −4,410,000 0650-001-0890—For support of Governor’s Office of Land Use and Climate Innovation, payable from the Federal Trust Fund ........................ 1,195,000 Schedule: (1) 0360-State Planning and Policy Development ........................ 1,195,000 0650-001-6093—For support of Governor’s Office of Land Use and Climate Innovation, payable from the Safe Drinking Water, Wildfire Prevention, Drought Preparedness, and Clean Air Fund ........................ 284,000 Schedule: (1) 0370-Strategic Growth Council ........................ 284,000 0650-001-9740—For support of Governor’s Office of Land Use and Climate Innovation, payable from the Central Service Cost Recovery Fund ........................ 1,085,000 Schedule: (1) 0360-State Planning and Policy Development ........................ 1,085,000 0650-101-0890—For local assistance, Governor’s Office of Land Use and Climate Innovation, payable from the Federal Trust Fund ........................ 1,800,000 Schedule: (1) 0360-State Planning and Policy Development ........................ 1,800,000 0650-490—Reappropriation, Governor’s Office of Land Use and Climate Innovation. The balances of the appropriations provided in the following citations are reappropriated for the purposes provided for in those appropriations and shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2028: 0001—​General Fund (1) Provision 3 of Item 0650-001-0001, Budget Act of 2021 (Chs. 21, 69, and 240, Stats. 2021) for California’s Fifth Climate Change Assessment. (2) Provision 7 of Item 0650-001-0001, Budget Act of 2021 (Chs. 21, 69, and 240, Stats. 2021) for California’s Fifth Climate Change Assessment. (3) Item 0650-101-0001, Budget Act of 2021 (Chs. 21, 69, and 240, Stats. 2021) for the Regional Resilience Grant Program. 0650-491—Reappropriation, Governor’s Office of Land Use and Climate Innovation. The amounts specified in the following citations are reappropriated for the purposes provided for liquidation through June 30, 2030: 0001—​General Fund (1) Provision 5 of Item 0650-001-0001, Budget Act of 2021 (Chs. 21, 69, and 240, Stats. 2021) for the Transformative Climate Communities Program. 0680-001-0001—For support of Governor’s Office of Service and Community Engagement ........................ 104,451,000 Schedule: (1) 0372-California Volunteers ........................ 107,679,000 (2) Reimbursements to 0372-California Volunteers ........................ −3,228,000 Provisions: 1. The California Volunteers’ database shall be subject to all state privacy and use policies, as required by the Department of Technology. 2. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (1), $68,100,000 shall be available for the California Volunteers Youth Corps. (a) It is the intent of the Administration that the Youth Corps program, including its fellowship program, prioritize the recruitment of, and outreach to, students described in Chapter 513 of the Statutes of 2019 (AB 540), and immigrant youth with federal work authorization, including Deferred Action for Childhood Arrivals (DACA) beneficiaries, and this section is therefore enacted pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 1621 of Title 8 of the United States Code. For purposes of implementing this initiative, no entity or person shall seek information that is unnecessary to determine eligibility, including immigration or citizenship status. (b) Of the amount allocated in this provision, $2,000,000 shall be available for California’s tribal communities to apply through a competitive process. (c) Of the amount remaining after the allocation described in subprovision (b), a share proportional to funding provided in Provision 1 of Item 0650-163-8506, Budget Act of 2021 (Chs. 21, 69, and 240, Stats. 2021) shall be provided to the 13 largest cities in California. Funding shall be proportional to each city’s population as a percent of the total population of the 13 largest cities, as estimated by the Department of Finance. (d) Of the amount remaining after the allocation described in subprovision (b), a share proportional to funding provided in Provision 2 of Item 0650-163-8506, Budget Act of 2021 (Chs. 21, 69, and 240, Stats. 2021) shall be distributed, via a competitive grant process, to all cities and counties that are not funded pursuant to subprovision (c), without regard to total population size. 3. Of the funds available in Schedule (1), $9,383,000 shall be available for support or local assistance and shall be used for the purpose of implementing the California Climate Action Service Corps program to create service opportunities to take on climate action such as urban greening, food waste recovery, and wildfire prevention. 4. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (1), $14,689,000 shall be available for the California College Corps. 0680-001-0890—For support of Governor’s Office of Service and Community Engagement, payable from the Federal Trust Fund ........................ 2,091,000 Schedule: (1) 0372-California Volunteers ........................ 2,091,000 0680-101-0890—For local assistance, Governor’s Office of Service and Community Engagement, payable from the Federal Trust Fund ........................ 50,000,000 Schedule: (1) 0372-California Volunteers ........................ 50,000,000 0680-102-0001—For local assistance, Governor’s Office of Service and Community Engagement ........................ 84,062,000 Schedule: (1) 0372-California Volunteers ........................ 84,062,000 0690-001-0001—For support of Office of Emergency Services ........................ 287,425,000 Schedule: (1) 0380-Emergency Management Services ........................ 181,704,000 (2) 0385-Special Programs and Grant Management ........................ 115,823,000 (3) 0390-Alfred E. Alquist Seismic Safety Commission ........................ 351,000 (4) 0395-Public Safety Communications ........................ 325,000 (5) 9900100-Administration ........................ 61,200,000 (6) 9900200-Administration—​Distributed ........................ −61,200,000 (7) Reimbursements to 0380-Emergency Management Services ........................ −5,515,000 (8) Reimbursements to 0385-Special Programs and Grant Management ........................ −5,263,000 Provisions: 1. Funds appropriated in this item may be reduced by the Director of Finance, after giving notice to the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, by the amount of federal funds made available for the purposes of this item in excess of the federal funds scheduled in Item 0690-001-0890. 2. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (2), $6,700,000 shall be for the Office of Emergency Services to reimburse local law enforcement agencies to offset the cost to local law enforcement agencies of reimbursing qualified health care professionals, hospitals, or other emergency medical facilities for medical evidentiary examinations for all sexual assault victims in accordance with Section 13823.95 of the Penal Code. 3. The Department of Finance may augment the amount appropriated in Schedule (7) for the receipt of reimbursements provided to the Office of Emergency Services for participation in Emergency Management Assistance Compact activities in support of other states or territories. Within 10 days of approval, the Department of Finance shall provide written notification of any such augmentation to the chairpersons of the committees in each house of the Legislature that consider appropriations, the chairpersons of the committees and the appropriate subcommittees of each house of the Legislature that consider the State Budget, and the chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee. 0690-001-0022—For support of Office of Emergency Services, payable from the State Emergency Telephone Number Account ........................ 51,375,000 Schedule: (1) 0395-Public Safety Communications ........................ 51,375,000 Provisions: 1. Funds appropriated in this item shall not be used for the Next Generation 911 system until the enactment of future legislation that authorizes the use of these funds. 1.The amount appropriated in this item is available to stabilize and bolster the state 911 system, including support for the legacy 911 system, call handling equipment upgrades and maintenance, 911 support services, automatic location identification (ALI) databases, regional Next Generation 911 network providers, and the statewide bridge contract dated April 28, 2026. 2.This funding shall not be used to establish permanent Next Generation 911 system until an independent technical evaluation is completed and reviewed by the Legislature, pursuant to future legislation. 3.Up to $3,000,000 of the funding appropriated in this item shall be used for the independent technical evaluation described in Provision 2 and an audit of the state effort to establish a Next Generation 911 system, pursuant to future legislation. 4.The Office of Emergency Services shall enter into a contract or agreement with the Department of Technology or another qualified vendor, provided that the vendor has no other financial interest in the state Next Generation 911 project or system, for the Next Generation 911 project oversight and independent verification and validation services. Up to $8,400,000 of the amount provided in this item may be used for these services. 5.The Office of Emergency Services shall provide quarterly fiscal and project progress reports to the Legislature on the development and implementation of the Next Generation 911 system in California, pursuant to future legislation. 6.The Office of Emergency Services shall not take actions that would prevent the state from transitioning back to a regional network in the future. 7.Any funding in this item unencumbered by June 30, 2027, shall revert to the fund balance from which the appropriation was made. 0690-001-0028—For support of Office of Emergency Services, payable from the Unified Program Account ........................ 141,000 Schedule: (1) 0380-Emergency Management Services ........................ 141,000 0690-001-0029—For support of Office of Emergency Services, payable from the Nuclear Planning Assessment Special Account ........................ 1,519,000 Schedule: (1) 0380-Emergency Management Services ........................ 1,519,000 Provisions: 1. Pursuant to subdivision (f) of Section 8610.5 of the Government Code, any unexpended funds from the appropriation in the prior fiscal year are hereby appropriated in augmentation of this item. 0690-001-0217—For support of Office of Emergency Services, for the Alfred E. Alquist Seismic Safety Commission, payable from the Insurance Fund ........................ 1,465,000 Schedule: (1) 0390-Alfred E. Alquist Seismic Safety Commission ........................ 1,480,000 (2) Reimbursements to 0390-Alfred E. Alquist Seismic Safety Commission ........................ −15,000 Provisions: 1. The funds appropriated in this item shall be used for direct costs of the commission staff and appointed commissioners. 0690-001-0890—For support of Office of Emergency Services, payable from the Federal Trust Fund ........................ 122,799,000 Schedule: (1) 0380-Emergency Management Services ........................ 25,097,000 (2) 0385-Special Programs and Grant Management ........................ 97,702,000 (3) 9900100-Administration ........................ 1,398,000 (4) 9900200-Administration—​Distributed ........................ −1,398,000 Provisions: 1. Any funds that may become available, in addition to the funds appropriated in this item, for disaster response and recovery may be allocated by the Department of Finance subject to the conditions of Section 28.00, except that, notwithstanding subdivision (e) of that section, the allocations may be made sooner than 30 days after notification of the Legislature. 2. Notwithstanding any other law, the funds appropriated in this item may be expended without regard to the fiscal year in which the application for reimbursement was submitted to the Federal Emergency Management Agency. 3. The Office of Emergency Services shall provide a report to the relevant budget subcommittees of the Legislature in each house, the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, and Legislative Analyst’s Office on the State and Local Cybersecurity Grant Program. The Office of Emergency Services shall submit a copy of this report to the chairpersons of the budget committees of both houses of the Legislature and to the Legislative Analyst’s Office on or before March 1, 2027. The report shall include all of the following: (a) grant recipients and the amount awarded to each recipient; (b) how the funding will be used; (c) how it was determined which entities would receive an award; and (d) how the amount each recipient would receive was determined. 0690-001-0903—For support of Office of Emergency Services, payable from the State Penalty Fund ........................ 1,319,000 Schedule: (1) 0385-Special Programs and Grant Management ........................ 1,319,000 0690-001-3228—For support of Office of Emergency Services, payable from the Greenhouse Gas Reduction Fund ........................ 1,287,000 Schedule: (1) 0380-Emergency Management Services ........................ 1,287,000 Provisions: 1. The funds appropriated in this item shall be used for the maintenance of fire engines and support of the California Fire and Rescue Mutual Aid System. 2. The funds appropriated in this item shall not be subject to the provisions of subdivision (b) of Section 15.14. 0690-001-3414—For support of Office of Emergency Services, payable from the 988 State Suicide and Behavioral Health Crisis Services Fund ........................ 9,682,000 Schedule: (1) 0395-Public Safety Communications ........................ 9,682,000 (2) 9900100-Administration ........................ 379,000 (3) 9900200-Administration—​Distributed ........................ −379,000 0690-001-6061—For support of Office of Emergency Services, payable from the Transit System Safety, Security, and Disaster Response Account, Highway Safety, Traffic Reduction, Air Quality, and Port Security Fund of 2006 ........................ 3,061,000 Schedule: (1) 0385-Special Programs and Grant Management ........................ 3,061,000 Provisions: 1. Upon approval of the Director of Finance, expenditure authority for this item may be increased by up to $200,000 to reimburse the Department of Finance for bond audit costs related to the implementation of Proposition 1B. Any augmentation shall be authorized no sooner than 30 days after notification in writing to the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, or not sooner than whatever lesser time the chairperson of the joint committee, or the chairperson’s designee, may determine. 0690-001-8039—For support of Office of Emergency Services, payable from the Disaster Resistant Communities Fund ........................ 207,000 Schedule: (1) 0380-Emergency Management Services ........................ 207,000 Provisions: 1. The Department of Finance may authorize the augmentation of the total amount available for expenditure under this item in the amount of any donations from the private sector received by the Office of Emergency Services that are in excess of the amount appropriated in this item. Any augmentation shall be accompanied by a spending plan submitted by the Office of Emergency Services. The spending plan shall include, at a minimum, the source and level of donations received to date, a detailed description of activities already completed and those activities proposed, the source and amount of any additional donations expected to be received, and the identification of any impact of the spending plan on other state funds. An approval of an augmentation of this item shall be effective not sooner than 30 days after the transmittal of the approval and spending plan to the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, or not sooner than whatever lesser time the chairperson of the joint committee, or the chairperson’s designee, may determine. 0690-001-9751—For support of Office of Emergency Services, payable from the Public Safety Communications Revolving Fund ........................ 94,136,000 Schedule: (1) 0395-Public Safety Communications ........................ 94,136,000 Provisions: 1. Notwithstanding any other law, the Director of Finance may authorize a loan from the General Fund, in an amount not to exceed 35 percent of expenditures appropriated in this item to the Office of Emergency Services, provided that: (a) The loan is to meet cash needs resulting from the delay in receipt of payments for services provided. (b) The loan is for a short term and shall be repaid by October 31, 2027. (c) Interest charges may be waived pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 16314 of the Government Code. (d) The Director of Finance shall not approve the loan unless the approval is made in writing and filed with the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee and the chairpersons of the committees in each house of the Legislature that consider appropriations not later than 30 days prior to the effective date of the approval, or not later than whatever lesser time prior to that effective date that the chairperson of the joint committee, or the chairperson’s designee, may determine. 0690-002-0001—For support of Office of Emergency Services ........................ 17,112,000 Schedule: (1) 0385-Special Programs and Grant Management ........................ 17,112,000 (2) 9900100-Administration ........................ 113,000 (3) 9900200-Administration—​Distributed ........................ −113,000 Provisions: 1. The funds appropriated in this item shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2028. 0690-003-0001—For support of Office of Emergency Services ........................ 6,622,000 Schedule: (1) 0380-Emergency Management Services ........................ 6,622,000 Provisions: 1. The funds appropriated in this item are available to support fire fleet vehicle acquisition and shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2028. 0690-004-0001—For support of Office of Emergency Services ........................ 1,326,000 Schedule: (1) 0380-Emergency Management Services ........................ 1,326,000 0690-005-0001—For support of Office of Emergency Services ........................ 2,000,000 Schedule: (1) 0385-Special Programs and Grant Management ........................ 2,000,000 Provisions: 1. The amount appropriated in this item is for the support costs of administering grants to supplement funding under the federal Victims of Crime Act of 1984 (34 U.S.C. Sec. 20101 et seq.). 2. If the Office of Emergency Services determines any amount appropriated in this item is not necessary for the purposes identified in Provision 1, upon order of the Department of Finance, that amount may be transferred to Schedule (1) of Item 0690-105-0001 of the Budget Act of 2026 to support local assistance grants. 0690-006-0001—For support of Office of Emergency Services ........................ 1,000 Schedule: (1) 0385-Special Programs and Grant Management ........................ 1,000 Provisions: 1. This item shall be used to receive transfers from the Disaster Response-Emergency Operations Account for disaster-related costs incurred by the Office of Emergency Services. 2. The Department of Finance may augment this item in the amount of any invoice received by the Office of Emergency Services from a federal agency for direct federal assistance provided during disaster incidents pursuant to a Presidential Emergency Declaration or Presidential Major Disaster Declaration. Within 10 days of approval, the Department of Finance shall provide written notification of any such augmentation to the chairpersons of the committees in each house of the Legislature that consider appropriations, the chairpersons of the committees and the appropriate subcommittees of each house of the Legislature that consider the State Budget, and the chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee. 0690-006-0890—For support of Office of Emergency Services, payable from the Federal Trust Fund ........................ 339,001,000 Schedule: (1) 0385-Special Programs and Grant Management ........................ 339,001,000 Provisions: 1. This item shall be used for the receipt of funding related to disaster response and recovery from the Federal Emergency Management Agency or any other federal entity. 2. Notwithstanding any other law, funds appropriated in this item may be transferred to the General Fund to reimburse, provide funding for, or otherwise recover authorized expenditures related to disaster response and recovery. Transfers may be made without regard to the fiscal year in which the application for funding was submitted to the Federal Emergency Management Agency or any other federal entity. 3. The Department of Finance may augment this item for the purposes identified in Provisions 1 and 2, and any such augmentations to this item shall be exempt from Section 28.00. Within 10 days of approval, the Department of Finance shall provide written notification of any such augmentation to the chairpersons of the committees in each house of the Legislature that consider appropriations, the chairpersons of the committees and the appropriate subcommittees of each house of the Legislature that consider the State Budget, and the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee. Augmentations to this item for any other purpose shall remain subject to Section 28.00. 0690-007-0001—For support of Office of Emergency Services ........................ 2,000,0004,000,000 Schedule: (1) 0385-Special Programs and Grant Management ........................ 2,000,0004,000,000 Provisions: 1. The amount appropriated in this item is for administrative support costs of the California State Nonprofit Security Grant Program to help nonprofit organizations that are targets of hate-motivated violence and hate crimes and shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2028. (a)The Office of Emergency Services shall provide outreach to and encourage applications from a variety of organizations at risk of hate-motivated violence and hate crimes. 2. If the Office of Emergency Services determines any amount appropriated in this item is not necessary for the purposes identified in Provision l, upon order of the Department of Finance that amount may be transferred to Schedule (1) of Item 0690-103-0001 to support local assistance grants. 0690-008-6093—For support of Office of Emergency Services, payable from the Safe Drinking Water, Wildfire Prevention, Drought Preparedness, and Clean Air Fund ........................ 2,077,000 Schedule: (1) 0380-Emergency Management Services ........................ 1,050,000 (2) 0385-Special Programs and Grant Management ........................ 1,027,000 0690-010-3034—For support of Office of Emergency Services, payable from the Antiterrorism Fund ........................ 927,000 Schedule: (1) 0380-Emergency Management Services ........................ 809,000 (2) 0385-Special Programs and Grant Management ........................ 118,000 0690-093-0001—For support of Office of Emergency Services, for rental payments on lease-revenue bonds ........................ 5,484,000 Schedule: (1) 0385-Special Programs and Grant Management ........................ 5,484,000 Provisions: 1. The Controller shall transfer funds appropriated in this item for base rental as and when provided for in the schedule submitted by the State Public Works Board. Notwithstanding the payment dates in any related Facility Lease or Indenture, the schedule may provide for an earlier transfer of funds to ensure debt requirements are met and pay base rental in full when due. 2. The Controller shall transfer for additional rental no later than 30 days after enactment of this budget, $58,000 of the amount appropriated in this item, to the Expense Account in the Public Buildings Construction Fund. 3. This item may be adjusted pursuant to Section 4.30. Any adjustments to this item shall be reported to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee pursuant to Section 4.30. 0690-101-0001—For local assistance, Office of Emergency Services ........................ 61,296,00071,296,000 Schedule: (1) 0380-Emergency Management Services ........................ 12,500,000 (2) 0385-Special Programs and Grant Management ........................ 48,796,00058,796,000 Provisions: 1. Notwithstanding any other law, the Office of Emergency Services may provide advance payment of up to 25 percent of grant funds awarded to community-based, nonprofit organizations, cities, school districts, counties, and other units of local government that have demonstrated cashflow problems according to the criteria set forth by the Office of Emergency Services. 2. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (2), $10,000,000 $20,000,000 shall be used for grants related to services for victims of human trafficking. 3. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (2), $10,000,000 is available to support the Human Trafficking Prevention Vertical Prosecution Program established in Section 13849 of the Penal Code. 5. (a) Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (1), $12,500,000 shall be used for the Listos California Grant Program. The Listos California Grant program shall be managed by the Office of Diversity, Equity, and Inclusion within the Executive Office of the Office of Emergency Services. The grants shall be used to provide accessible and culturally competent outreach and resources with assessment and criteria for allocation of funds prioritized for, but not limited to, geographic areas of greatest all hazard risk and vulnerability as highlighted in and demonstrated by the California State Hazard Mitigation Plan; underresourced communities as described in Section 39711 of the Health and Safety Code, subdivision (d) of Section 39713 of the Health and Safety Code, or subdivision (g) of Section 75005 of the Public Resources Code. The grants shall be administered consistent with the emergency management system described in Section 8607 of the Government Code, including, but not limited to, being informed by community-based and nongovernmental organizations and local emergency service networks, including county emergency officials. The Office of Diversity, Equity, and Inclusion shall provide eligible organizations within the identified geographic areas an opportunity to apply to the Listos California Grant Program. The Office of Emergency Services shall report to the appropriate budget committees of the Legislature, the Senate Committee on Governmental Organization, the Assembly Committee on Emergency Management, and the Legislative Analyst’s Office on the expenditure of these funds on or before February 1 of each year, including the following: (1) How funds were allocated. (2) What methods of outreach the Office of Diversity, Equity, and Inclusion used to inform eligible entities of the funding. (3) The entity or community that received the funding. (4) A description of projects funded. (b) This provision does not diminish or otherwise impact any of the Office of Emergency Services’ responsibilities under the California Emergency Services Act (Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 8550) of Division 1 of Title 2 of the Government Code), including, but not limited to, Sections 8550, 8569, 8570, and 8570.3 of, and subdivision (e) of Section 8585 of, the Government Code. 6. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (2), $7,000,000 shall be used to fund Internet Crimes Against Children Task Forces. No more than $250,000 of this amount may be used for administrative support costs. This amount is available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2028. 0690-101-0022—For local assistance, Office of Emergency Services, payable from the State Emergency Telephone Number Account ........................ 272,000,000 Schedule: (1) 0395-Public Safety Communications ........................ 272,000,000 Provisions: 1. The funds appropriated in this item are for the reimbursement of local agencies, service suppliers, and communication equipment companies for costs incurred pursuant to Sections 41137, 41137.1, 41138, and 41140 of the Revenue and Taxation Code. 2. Funds appropriated in this item shall not be used for the Next Generation 911 system until the enactment of future legislation that authorizes the use of these funds for this purpose. 1.The amount appropriated in this item is available to stabilize and bolster the state 911 system, including support for the legacy 911 system, call handling equipment upgrades and maintenance, 911 support services, automatic location identification (ALI) databases, regional Next Generation 911 network providers, and the statewide bridge contract dated April 28, 2026. 2.This funding shall not be used to establish a permanent Next Generation 911 system until an independent technical evaluation is completed and reviewed by the Legislature, pursuant to future legislation. 3.The Office of Emergency Services shall provide quarterly fiscal and project progress reports to the Legislature on the development and implementation of the Next Generation 911 system in California, pursuant to future legislation. 4.The Office of Emergency Services shall not take actions that would prevent the state from transitioning back to a regional network in the future. 5. Any funding in this item unencumbered by June 30, 2027, shall revert to the fund balance from which the appropriation was made. 0690-101-0029—For local assistance, Office of Emergency Services, payable from the Nuclear Planning Assessment Special Account ........................ 2,758,000 Schedule: (1) 0385-Special Programs and Grant Management ........................ 2,758,000 Provisions: 1. Pursuant to subdivision (f) of Section 8610.5 of the Government Code, any unexpended funds from the appropriation in the prior fiscal year are hereby appropriated in augmentation of this item. 0690-101-0890—For local assistance, Office of Emergency Services, payable from the Federal Trust Fund ........................ 733,525,000 Schedule: (1) 0385-Special Programs and Grant Management ........................ 733,525,000 Provisions: 1. Any federal funds that may become available in addition to the funds appropriated in this item for Program 0385 for disaster assistance are exempt from Section 28.00. 2. No later than May 1 of each year, the Office of Emergency Services shall submit the federally required Biannual Strategy Implementation Report (BSIR) to the fiscal and relevant policy committees of the Legislature and the Legislative Analyst’s Office on the funded projects and their status related to the Homeland Security Grant Program. The report shall identify, for the most recently completed grant cycle, the methodology used to allocate grant funds and how grant funds have been allocated, including a description of each project and activity funded, the entity that received the funding, the amount of funding provided to the project or activity, and the core capabilities supported by each project. 0690-101-0903—For local assistance, Office of Emergency Services, payable from the State Penalty Fund ........................ 8,513,000 Schedule: (1) 0385-Special Programs and Grant Management ........................ 8,513,000 0690-101-3414—For local assistance, Office of Emergency Services, payable from the 988 State Suicide and Behavioral Health Crisis Services Fund ........................ 20,280,000 Schedule: (1) 0395-Public Safety Communications ........................ 20,280,000 0690-102-0001—For local assistance, Office of Emergency Services ........................ 25,000,000 Schedule: (1) 0380-Emergency Management Services ........................ 25,000,000 Provisions: 1. The funds appropriated in this item are available to support activities directly related to regional response and readiness. These activities include, but are not limited to, predeployment of the Office of Emergency Services’ fire and rescue and local government resources that are part of the California Fire and Rescue Mutual Aid System or additional resources upon the authority and approval of the Office of Emergency Services to meet the requirements for state resources called up for predisaster and disaster response. Prepositioning shall be based upon predesignated criteria and a predicted scale of the emergency event and shall be consistent with this state’s current procedures under the mutual aid system. This funding shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2028. 2. No later than February 1 of each year, the Office of Emergency Services shall report to the appropriate budget subcommittees of the Legislature, the Assembly Committee on Governmental Organization, and the Legislative Analyst’s Office on the requests approved for prepositioning resources made by local agencies in the previous fiscal year. The information provided shall be organized by mutual aid region and shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following for each request for prepositioning resources: (a) The entity or operational area that requested resources; type of prepositioning event; risk factors (criteria) prompting the request, including a summary of red flag events; description of the resources requested; location where resources were placed; the start date and time and the end date and time of prepositioned resources; and the reimbursement amount associated with the response. (b) An assessment, with input from local fire departments, of the effectiveness of the criteria the Office of Emergency Services uses to approve requests for prepositioning of mutual aid resources. (c) A summary of the extent to which the Office of Emergency Services initiated the prepositioning of resources due to forecasts of inclement weather. (d) If an emergency event happened, data describing the outcomes of the event. This could include, but is not limited to, the total number of acres affected, the number of structures affected, and the total number of deaths and injuries. Because California is subject to a variety of potential events, including, but not limited to, fires, floods, earthquakes, and tsunamis, the nature of this information may vary based on the type of the event. The information provided shall identify whether the event resulted in a federal- or state-declared disaster. 0690-102-0890—For local assistance, Office of Emergency Services, payable from the Federal Trust Fund ........................ 309,400,000 Schedule: (1) 0385-Special Programs and Grant Management ........................ 309,400,000 0690-103-0001—For local assistance, Office of Emergency Services ........................ 38,000,00076,000,000 Schedule: (1) 0385-Special Programs and Grant Management ........................ 38,000,00076,000,000 Provisions: 1. The amount appropriated in this item is for the California State Nonprofit Security Grant Program to help nonprofit organizations that are targets of hate-motivated violence and hate crimes and shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2028. 0690-105-0001—For local assistance, Office of Emergency Services ........................ 48,000,000 Schedule: (1) 0385-Special Programs and Grant Management ........................ 48,000,000 Provisions: 1. The funds appropriated in this item are to supplement funding under the federal Victims of Crime Act of 1984 (34 U.S.C. § 20101 et seq.). 0690-106-0890—For local assistance, Office of Emergency Services, payable from the Federal Trust Fund ........................ 662,516,000 Schedule: (1) 0385-Special Programs and Grant Management ........................ 662,516,000 Provisions: 1. This item shall be used for the receipt of funding related to disaster response and recovery from the Federal Emergency Management Agency or any other federal entity. 2. Notwithstanding any other law, funds appropriated in this item may be transferred to the General Fund to reimburse, provide funding for, or otherwise recover authorized expenditures related to disaster response and recovery. Transfers may be made without regard to the fiscal year in which the application for funding was submitted to the Federal Emergency Management Agency or any other federal entity. 3. The Department of Finance may augment this item for the purposes identified in Provisions 1 and 2, and any such augmentations to this item shall be exempt from Section 28.00. Within 10 days of approval, the Department of Finance shall provide written notification of any such augmentation to the chairpersons of the committees in each house of the Legislature that consider appropriations, the chairpersons of the committees and the appropriate subcommittees of each house of the Legislature that consider the State Budget, and the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee. Augmentations to this item for any other purpose shall remain subject to Section 28.00. 0690-112-0001—For local assistance, Office of Emergency Services, for disaster recovery costs ........................ 100,000,000 Schedule: (1) 0385-Special Programs and Grant Management ........................ 100,000,000 Provisions: 1. The funds appropriated in this item are for the state’s share of response and recovery costs for disasters. 2. Upon approval of the Director of Finance, authority may be established or increased to reimburse state and local agencies for out-of-state disaster response and recovery costs, subject to the conditions of Section 28.00, except that notwithstanding subdivision (e) of that section, the allocations may be made sooner than 30 days after notification of the Legislature. 3. No later than February 1 of each year, the Office of Emergency Services shall report on the allocation of funds related to the California Disaster Assistance Act (Chapter 7.5 (commencing with Section 8680) of Division 1 of Title 2 of the Government Code). The report shall identify, for the most recently completed fiscal year, the factors utilized in considering requests for funds and the entities that received funding, including the funding amount. The report shall also provide the same information regarding funding allocated in the current fiscal year to the extent it is available. 0690-115-0001—For local assistance, Office of Emergency Services, for volunteer disaster service workers’ compensation ........................ 2,187,000 Schedule: (1) 0385-Special Programs and Grant Management ........................ 2,187,000 Provisions: 1. The funds appropriated in this item shall be used to pay approved volunteer disaster service workers’ compensation claims and administrative expenditures related to the payment of those claims by the State Compensation Insurance Fund. 2. Notwithstanding any other law, the Director of Finance may authorize expenditures in this item in excess of the amount appropriated in this item for the purposes of paying unanticipated volunteer disaster service workers’ compensation claims and administrative expenditures related to the payment of those claims. The Director of Finance shall not approve any expenditure unless the approval is made in writing and filed with the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee and the chairpersons of the committees in each house of the Legislature that consider appropriations no later than 30 days prior to the effective date of approval, or prior to whatever lesser time the chairperson of the joint committee, or the chairperson’s designee, may determine. 0720-001-0001—For support of Governor’s Portrait, for expenditure by the Department of General Services ........................ 33,000 Schedule: (1) 0410-Governor’s Portrait ........................ 33,000 0730-001-0001—For support of Governor-elect and Outgoing Governor, for expenditure by the Department of Finance ........................ 1,307,000 Schedule: (1) 0420010-Governor-elect ........................ 1,131,000 (2) 0420019-Outgoing Governor ........................ 176,000 Provisions: 1. The amount provided in Schedule (1) shall be available from November 4, 2026, to January 15, 2027. Expenditure of funds shall be subject to approval by the Governor-elect. 0750-001-0001—For support of Office of the Lieutenant Governor ........................ 2,828,000 Schedule: (1) 0430-General Activities ........................ 2,828,000 0820-001-0001—For support of Department of Justice ........................ 470,163,000 Schedule: (1) 9900100-Administration ........................ 211,043,000 (2) 9900200-Administration—​Distributed ........................ −211,043,000 (3) 0435-Division of Legal Services ........................ 243,803,000 (4) 0440-Law Enforcement ........................ 136,758,000 (5) 0445-California Justice Information Services ........................ 118,040,000 (6) Reimbursements to 0435-Division of Legal Services ........................ −1,767,000 (7) Reimbursements to 0440-Law Enforcement ........................ −19,570,000 (8) Reimbursements to 0445-California Justice Information Services ........................ −7,101,000 Provisions: 1. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (4), $6,666,000 shall be used to support a statewide enforcement program to combat the manufacturing, distribution, and trafficking of fentanyl throughout and into the state by organized criminal enterprises, including organized cartels. The Department of Justice may coordinate with the State Department of Health Care Services and the Military Department to support the statewide enforcement program. 2. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (4), $500,000 shall be available to support investigations and prosecutions of organized retail crime, including those referred by other law enforcement or prosecutorial agencies. Any unspent funds shall revert to the General Fund and may not be redirected to any other purposes. 3. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (4), $7,206,000 shall be used to support statewide enforcement to combat violent career criminals, gangs, and organized crime groups, with priority for disrupting the production, supply, and distribution of illicit fentanyl, opioid, and narcotic operations by multijurisdictional and transnational trafficking organizations, and in seizing illegal, smuggled, and trafficked firearms, ammunition, and component parts used in furtherance of those operations. 4. Notwithstanding any other law, the Department of Justice may purchase or lease vehicles that, in the judgment of the Attorney General or the Attorney General’s designee, are necessary to the performance of the investigatory and enforcement responsibilities of the Department of Justice, from the funds appropriated for that purpose in this item. This exemption does not apply to vehicles that are classified as military equipment pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 7070 of the Government Code, except for paragraph 5 of subdivision (c) of Section 7070 of the Government Code. 5. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (5), $812,000 is allocated for the implementation of Chapter 811 of the Statutes of 2024. The expenditure of these funds is contingent upon the Department of Justice submitting the Stage 1 Business Analysis to the Department of Technology as part of the Project Approval Lifecycle process of the Department of Technology. 6. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (5), $1,096,000 shall be used to establish a new connection between the California Law Enforcement Telecommunications System (CLETS) and the new Department of Motor Vehicles Digital eXperience Platform (DXP). The Department of Justice, in consultation with the Department of Motor Vehicles, shall report to the Department of Finance and the Joint Legislative Budget Committee by January 10, 2026, if it does not appear that this new connection will be developed, tested, and fully functional by June 30, 2026. This report shall include, but is not limited to, all of the following: a status update on progress towards completion of the new connection, a mitigation strategy or work-around to ensure minimal impact on law enforcement or criminal justice agency activities requiring information typically obtained through CLETS, and the identification of any additional resources or statutory changes needed to ensure CLETS functionality and access. The Department of Motor Vehicles shall fully cooperate with the Department of Justice in the preparation of this report. 7. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (3), $11,722,000 is available to address legal workload related to various actions taken at the federal level or administrative action authorized under state law to mitigate impacts of federal actions taken by the federal government. The Department of Justice shall report to the Department of Finance and the Joint Legislative Budget Committee annually on the use of all funds provided for these purposes by the Department of Justice in the prior fiscal year on or before August 1 of each year. The report shall include, but is not limited to, both of the following: (1) whether the state is using any of the appropriated funds to contract with outside counsel, if any; and (2) each instance in which the Department of Justice is taking administrative action authorized under state law to mitigate the impacts of actions taken by the federal government. This reporting may be consolidated with the reporting required by Chapter 3 of the Statutes of 2025, First Extraordinary Session. The Department of Justice shall also post details of litigation against the federal government paid for by these funds on the website originally created and maintained pursuant to Chapter 3 of the Statutes of 2025, First Extraordinary Session. These details shall include, but are not limited to, descriptive narratives and supporting documents as needed. Such details shall be posted as soon as feasible each time a court filing is made using these funds, and no less frequently than monthly. 8. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (3), $3,915,000 shall be used for workload associated with Chapter 551 of the Statutes of 2021. Any unspent funds shall revert to the General Fund and may not be redirected to any other purposes. 9. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (3), $2,200,000 shall be available to complete existing investigations and prosecutions of organized retail crime and shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2028. Any unspent funds shall revert to the General Fund and may not be redirected to any other purposes. 10. No later than January 10, 2027, the department shall provide a framework for determining how firearm and ammunition workload should be funded. This framework shall include, but is not limited to, the following information: identification of all existing and forthcoming known firearm or ammunition workload or costs by program area, clear explanations for department recommendations on how, and from what fund source, each program area should be funded moving forward, the calculation of appropriate fees by fund source and how such calculations were reached, and department recommendations for how frequently the fees should be adjusted and the process by which they should be adjusted. This framework shall also include any recommendations for statutory changes to improve operational or process efficiencies, or in the number of firearm and ammunition special funds, or their specified allowable uses, the department deems necessary. In preparing this framework, the department shall evaluate its entire workload, known future costs, operational efficiencies, and existing federal and state statute and case law. This framework shall be provided to the appropriate budget, appropriations, and policy committees or subcommittees in each house. 0820-001-0012—For support of Department of Justice, payable from the Attorney General Antitrust Account ........................ 23,821,000 Schedule: (1) 0435-Division of Legal Services ........................ 23,773,000 (2) 0440-Law Enforcement ........................ 34,000 (3) 0445-California Justice Information Services ........................ 14,000 0820-001-0017—For support of Department of Justice, payable from the Fingerprint Fees Account, pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 11105 of the Penal Code ........................ 109,375,000 Schedule: (0.5) 0435-Division of Legal Services ........................ 361,000 (1) 0445-California Justice Information Services ........................ 109,014,000 Provisions: 1. The Attorney General may augment the amount appropriated in the Fingerprint Fees Account up to an aggregate of 10 percent above the amount approved in this act for the Division of California Justice Information Services for unanticipated workload associated with this fund. The Attorney General shall notify the chairpersons of the budget committees of both houses of the Legislature, the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, and the Department of Finance within 15 days after the augmentation is made as to the amount and justification of the augmentation. 0820-001-0032—For support of Department of Justice, payable from the Firearm Safety Account ........................ 480,000 Schedule: (1) 0440-Law Enforcement ........................ 480,000 0820-001-0044—For support of Department of Justice, payable from the Motor Vehicle Account, State Transportation Fund ........................ 33,286,000 Schedule: (2) 0445-California Justice Information Services ........................ 33,286,000 0820-001-0142—For support of Department of Justice, payable from the Department of Justice Sexual Habitual Offender Fund ........................ 2,879,000 Schedule: (1) 0440-Law Enforcement ........................ 1,100,000 (2) 0445-California Justice Information Services ........................ 1,779,000 Provisions: 1. The amount appropriated in this item includes revenues derived from the assessment of fines and penalties imposed as specified in Section 13332.18 of the Government Code. 0820-001-0158—For support of Department of Justice, payable from the Travel Seller Fund ........................ 1,499,000 Schedule: (1) 0435-Division of Legal Services ........................ 1,486,000 (2) 0445-California Justice Information Services ........................ 13,000 0820-001-0256—For support of Department of Justice, payable from the Sexual Predator Public Information Account ........................ 20,000 Schedule: (1) 0445-California Justice Information Services ........................ 20,000 0820-001-0367—For support of Department of Justice, payable from the Indian Gaming Special Distribution Fund ........................ 25,544,000 Schedule: (1) 0435-Division of Legal Services ........................ 2,863,000 (2) 0440-Law Enforcement ........................ 21,394,000 (3) 0445-California Justice Information Services ........................ 1,287,000 0820-001-0378—For support of Department of Justice, payable from the False Claims Act Fund ........................ 30,170,000 Schedule: (1) 0435-Division of Legal Services ........................ 29,496,000 (3) 0445-California Justice Information Services ........................ 674,000 0820-001-0460—For support of Department of Justice, payable from the Dealers’ Record of Sale Special Account ........................ 25,018,000 Schedule: (1) 0440-Law Enforcement ........................ 16,040,000 (2) 0445-California Justice Information Services ........................ 9,322,000 (3) Reimbursements to 0440-Law Enforcement ........................ −344,000 Provisions: 1. The Attorney General may augment the amount appropriated in the Dealers’ Record of Sale Special Account up to an aggregate of 10 percent above the amount approved in this act for the Division of Law Enforcement, Bureau of Firearms for unanticipated workload associated with this fund. The Attorney General shall notify the chairpersons of the budget committees of both houses of the Legislature, the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, and the Department of Finance within 15 days after the augmentation is made as to the amount and justification of the augmentation. 0820-001-0566—For support of Department of Justice, payable from the Department of Justice Child Abuse Fund ........................ 547,000 Schedule: (1) 0445-California Justice Information Services ........................ 547,000 0820-001-0567—For support of Department of Justice, payable from the Gambling Control Fund ........................ 19,798,000 Schedule: (1) 0435-Division of Legal Services ........................ 1,437,000 (2) 0440-Law Enforcement ........................ 17,644,000 (2.5) 0445-California Justice Information Services ........................ 817,000 (3) Reimbursements to 0440-Law Enforcement ........................ −100,000 Provisions: 1. The Department of Finance may augment this item in response to increased legal settlement costs not sooner than 10 days after notification of the necessity in writing to the chairpersons of the budget committees in both houses of the Legislature and the Joint Legislative Budget Committee. 0820-001-0569—For support of Department of Justice, payable from the Gambling Control Fines and Penalties Account ........................ 460,000 Schedule: (1) 0440-Law Enforcement ........................ 312,000 (2) 0445-California Justice Information Services ........................ 148,000 Provisions: 1. The Department of Finance may augment this item not sooner than 10 days after notification of the necessity in writing to the chairpersons of the budget committees in both houses of the Legislature and the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, in response to increased legal settlement costs. 0820-001-0890—For support of Department of Justice, payable from the Federal Trust Fund ........................ 89,538,000 Schedule: (1) 0435-Division of Legal Services ........................ 76,233,000 (2) 0440-Law Enforcement ........................ 6,182,000 (3) 0445-California Justice Information Services ........................ 7,123,000 0820-001-0903—For support of Department of Justice, payable from the State Penalty Fund ........................ 156,000 Schedule: (1) 0440-Law Enforcement ........................ 156,000 0820-001-0942—For support of Department of Justice, payable from the Federal Asset Forfeiture Account, Special Deposit Fund ........................ 1,446,000 Schedule: (1) 0440-Law Enforcement ........................ 1,446,000 0820-001-1008—For support of Department of Justice, payable from the Firearms Safety and Enforcement Special Fund ........................ 11,944,000 Schedule: (1) 0440-Law Enforcement ........................ 11,944,000 Provisions: 1. The Attorney General may augment the amount appropriated in the Firearms Safety and Enforcement Special Fund up to an aggregate of 10 percent above the amount approved in this act for the Division of Law Enforcement, Bureau of Firearms for unanticipated workload associated with this fund. The Attorney General shall notify the chairpersons of the budget committees of both houses of the Legislature, the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, and the Department of Finance within 15 days after the augmentation is made as to the amount and justification of the augmentation. 0820-001-1030—For support of Department of Justice, payable from the Consumer Privacy Fund ........................ 350,000 Schedule: (1) 0435-Division of Legal Services ........................ 350,000 0820-001-3016—For support of Department of Justice, payable from the Missing Persons DNA Data Base Fund ........................ 4,001,000 Schedule: (1) 0440-Law Enforcement ........................ 4,001,000 0820-001-3053—For support of Department of Justice, payable from the Public Rights Law Enforcement Special Fund ........................ 16,953,000 Schedule: (1) 0435-Division of Legal Services ........................ 16,953,000 0820-001-3086—For support of Department of Justice, payable from the DNA Identification Fund ........................ 71,827,000 Schedule: (1) 0440-Law Enforcement ........................ 75,775,000 (2) 0445-California Justice Information Services ........................ 616,000 (3) Reimbursements to 0440-Law Enforcement ........................ −4,564,000 Provisions: 1. Notwithstanding any other law, to the extent the Department of Justice determines by September 1 that additional revenue from penalty assessments is available for distribution, the Department of Finance may augment this item in Schedule (1) by an amount that is up to the difference between the actual revenue received for the 2025–26 fiscal year and the amount that was estimated. The Department of Finance shall notify the chairpersons of the budget committees of both houses of the Legislature, the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, and the Department of Justice within 15 days after the augmentation is made, as to the amount augmented. 0820-001-3087—For support of Department of Justice, payable from the Unfair Competition Law Fund ........................ 61,644,000 Schedule: (1) 0435-Division of Legal Services ........................ 61,644,000 Provisions: 1. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (1), $3,000,000 shall be used to add capacity in the Consumer Protection Section focused on tenant protection and enforcing the rights of tenants. This funding shall supplement and not supplant existing department work in this area, and may not be directed to other section work. 0820-001-3088—For support of Department of Justice, payable from the Registry of Charities and Fundraisers Fund ........................ 10,545,00010,805,000 Schedule: (1) 0435-Division of Legal Services ........................ 10,300,00010,560,000 (2) 0445-California Justice Information Services ........................ 245,000 0820-001-3240—For support of Department of Justice, payable from the Secondhand Dealer and Pawnbroker Fund ........................ 666,000 Schedule: (1) 0445-California Justice Information Services ........................ 666,000 0820-001-3297—For support of Department of Justice, payable from the Major League Sporting Event Raffle Fund ........................ 468,000 Schedule: (1) 0435-Division of Legal Services ........................ 209,000 (2) 0440-Law Enforcement ........................ 259,000 0820-001-9731—For support of Department of Justice, payable from the Legal Services Revolving Fund ........................ 265,885,000 Schedule: (1) 0435-Division of Legal Services ........................ 262,517,000 (2) 0440-Law Enforcement ........................ 3,368,000 Provisions: 1. Notwithstanding Section 28.00, the Attorney General may augment the amount appropriated in the Legal Services Revolving Fund up to an aggregate of 15 percent above the amount approved in this act for the Division of Legal Services in cases where the legal representation needs of client agencies are secured by an interagency agreement or letter of commitment and the corresponding expenditure authority has not been provided in this item. The augmentation may include a commensurate number of new positions. The Attorney General shall notify the chairpersons of the budget committees of both houses of the Legislature, the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, and the Department of Finance within 15 days after the augmentation is made as to the amount and justification of the augmentation, and the program that has been augmented. 0820-001-9740—For support of Department of Justice, payable from the Central Service Cost Recovery Fund ........................ 1,368,000 Schedule: (1) 0435-Division of Legal Services ........................ 1,368,000 0820-011-0942—For support of Department of Justice, payable from the State Asset Forfeiture Account, Special Deposit Fund ........................ 531,000 Schedule: (1) 0440-Law Enforcement ........................ 531,000 0820-013-0001—For transfer by the Controller to the DNA Identification Fund ........................ 37,000,000 Provisions: 1. Upon order of the Department of Finance, the amount available in this item may be augmented by an amount sufficient to backfill the DNA Identification Fund if a determination is made that revenues are insufficient to support the Bureau of Forensic Services. Any augmentation shall be transferred to the DNA Identification Fund. Any augmentation of funds approved by the director under this provision shall be authorized not sooner than 30 days after notification in writing to the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, or whatever lesser time the chairperson, or the chairperson’s designee, may determine. When a request to augment this item is submitted to the director, a copy of that request shall be delivered to the chairperson and the chairpersons of the fiscal committees in each house of the Legislature. Delivery of a copy of that request shall not be deemed to be notification in writing for purposes of this provision. 0820-015-0001—For transfer by the Controller to the Legal Services Revolving Fund for legal services provided to small clients of the Department of Justice ........................ 5,500,000 Provisions: 1. The Department of Justice shall provide a projection of 2026–27 legal services hours for small clients to the Department of Finance no later than April 15, 2027. This information shall include the total number of attorney and paralegal hours projected to be expended for each departmental client during the 2026–27 fiscal year. 2. There is hereby appropriated from each fund, other than the General Fund, an amount sufficient for payment of legal services provided by the Department of Justice during the 2026–27 fiscal year. Upon receipt of the report required by Provision 1, the Department of Finance shall determine which items of appropriation should be augmented to offset the General Fund appropriation provided in this item. 3. The Department of Finance shall augment these appropriations and order their transfer to the Legal Services Revolving Fund not sooner than 30 days after providing written notification to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee. Any excess expenditure authority in this item resulting from the transfers in this provision shall revert to the General Fund on June 30, 2027. 0820-093-0001—For support of Department of Justice for rental payments on lease-revenue bonds ........................ 1,581,000 Schedule: (1) 0440-Law Enforcement ........................ 1,581,000 Provisions: 1. The Controller shall transfer funds appropriated in this item for base rental as and when provided for in the schedule submitted by the State Public Works Board. Notwithstanding the payment dates in any related Facility Lease or Indenture, the schedule may provide for an earlier transfer of funds to ensure debt requirements are met and pay base rental in full when due. 2. The Controller shall transfer for additional rental no later than 30 days after enactment of this budget, $35,000 of the amount appropriated in this item, to the Expense Account in the Public Buildings Construction Fund. 3. This item may be adjusted pursuant to Section 4.30. Any adjustments to this item shall be reported to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee pursuant to Section 4.30. 0820-101-0460—For local assistance, Department of Justice, payable from the Dealers’ Record of Sale Special Account ........................ 28,000 Schedule: (1) 0440-Law Enforcement ........................ 28,000 0820-101-0641—For local assistance, Department of Justice, payable from the Domestic Violence Restraining Order Reimbursement Fund ........................ 1,018,000 Schedule: (1) 0445-California Justice Information Services ........................ 1,018,000 Provisions: 1. The funds appropriated in this item shall be expended to reimburse local law enforcement or other criminal justice agencies pursuant to Chapter 707 of the Statutes of 1998. 0820-101-0903—For local assistance, Department of Justice, payable from the State Penalty Fund ........................ 2,354,000 Schedule: (1) 0440-Law Enforcement ........................ 2,354,000 Provisions: 1. The funds appropriated in this item shall be allocated to support the California Witness Relocation and Assistance Program (CalWRAP). Any funds not expended for this specific purpose shall revert to the State Penalty Fund. 0820-492—Reappropriation, Department of Justice. The amounts specified in the appropriations in the following citations are reappropriated for the purposes provided for in those appropriations and shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2027: 0001—General Fund (1) Up to $434,000 of Item 0820-001-0001 of the Budget Act of 2025 (Chs. 4 and 5, Stats. 2025) to support the transition and onboarding to the Financial Information System for California (Fi$Cal) system. (2) Up to $954,000 of Item 0820-001-0001 of the Budget Act of 2025 (Chs. 4 and 5, Stats. 2025) to process a backlog of arrest disposition reports. 0012—Attorney General Antitrust Account (3) Up to $29,000 of Item 0820-001-0012 of the Budget Act of 2025 (Chs. 4 and 5, Stats. 2025) to support the transition and onboarding to the Financial Information System for California (Fi$Cal) system. 0017—Fingerprint Fees Account (4) Up to $80,000 of Item 0820-001-0017 of the Budget Act of 2025 (Chs. 4 and 5, Stats. 2025) to support the transition and onboarding to the Financial Information System for California (Fi$Cal) system. (5) Up to $1,138,000 of Item 0820-001-0017 of the Budget Act of 2025 (Chs. 4 and 5, Stats. 2025) to process a backlog of arrest disposition reports. 0044—Motor Vehicle Account, State Transportation Fund (6) Up to $25,000 of Item 0820-001-0044 of the Budget Act of 2025 (Chs. 4 and 5, Stats. 2025) to support the transition and onboarding to the Financial Information System for California (Fi$Cal) system. 0367—lndian Gaming Special Distribution Fund (7) Up to $15,000 of Item 0820-001-0367 of the Budget Act of 2025 (Chs. 4 and 5, Stats. 2025) to support the transition and onboarding to the Financial Information System for California (Fi$Cal) system. 0378—False Claims Act Fund (8) Up to $15,000 of Item 0820-001-0378 of the Budget Act of 2025 (Chs. 4 and 5, Stats. 2025) to support the transition and onboarding to the Financial Information System for California (Fi$Cal) system. 0460—Dealers’ Record of Sale Special Account (9) Up to $29,000 of Item 0820-001-0460 of the Budget Act of 2025 (Chs. 4 and 5, Stats. 2025) to support the transition and onboarding to the Financial Information System for California (Fi$Cal) system. 0567—Gambling Control Fund (10) Up to $12,000 of Item 0820-001-0567 of the Budget Act of 2025 (Chs. 4 and 5, Stats. 2025) to support the transition and onboarding to the Financial Information System for California (Fi$Cal) system. 0890—Federal Trust Fund (11) Up to $30,000 of Item 0820-001-0890 of the Budget Act of 2025 (Chs. 4 and 5, Stats. 2025) to support the transition and onboarding to the Financial Information System for California (Fi$Cal) system. 1008—Firearms Safety and Enforcement Special Fund (12) Up to $7,000 of Item 0820-001-1008 of the Budget Act of 2025 (Chs. 4 and 5, Stats. 2025) to support the transition and onboarding to the Financial Information System for California (Fi$Cal) system. 3016—Missing Persons DNA Data Base Fund (14) Up to $4,000 of Item 0820-001-3016 of the Budget Act of 2025 (Chs. 4 and 5, Stats. 2025) to support the transition and onboarding to the Financial Information System for California (Fi$Cal) system. 3053—Public Rights Law Enforcement Special Fund (15) Up to $27,000 of Item 0820-001-3053 of the Budget Act of 2025 (Chs. 4 and 5, Stats. 2025) to support the transition and onboarding to the Financial Information System for California (Fi$Cal) system. 3086—DNA Identification Fund (16) Up to $96,000 of Item 0820-001-3086 of the Budget Act of 2025 (Chs. 4 and 5, Stats. 2025) to support the transition and onboarding to the Financial Information System for California (Fi$Cal) system. 3087—Unfair Competition Law Fund (17) Up to $91,000 of Item 0820-001-3087 of the Budget Act of 2025 (Chs. 4 and 5, Stats. 2025) to support the transition and onboarding to the Financial Information System for California (Fi$Cal) system. 3088—Registry of Charities and Fundraisers Fund (18) Up to $17,000 of Item 0820-001-3088 of the Budget Act of 2025 (Chs. 4 and 5, Stats. 2025) to support the transition and onboarding to the Financial Information System for California (Fi$Cal) system. 9731—Legal Services Revolving Fund (19) Up to $413,000 of Item 0820-001-9731 of the Budget Act of 2025 (Chs. 4 and 5, Stats. 2025) to support the transition and onboarding to the Financial Information System for California (Fi$Cal) system. 9740—Central Service Cost Recovery Fund (20) Up to $1,000 of Item 0820-001-9740 of the Budget Act of 2025 (Chs. 4 and 5, Stats. 2025) to support the transition and onboarding to the Financial Information System for California (Fi$Cal) system. 0840-001-0001—For support of the Controller ........................ 168,871,000169,171,000 Schedule: (1) 0500-State Controller’s Office ........................ 233,833,000234,133,000 (2) Reimbursements to 0500-State Controller’s Office ........................ −64,962,000 Provisions: 1. The Controller may, with the concurrence of the Director of Finance and the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, bill affected state departments for activities required by Section 20030 of the State Administrative Manual, relating to the administration of federal pass-through funds. A billing shall not be sent to affected departments sooner than 30 days after the chairperson of the joint committee has been notified by the director that the director concurs with the amounts specified in the billings. 2. Of the moneys appropriated to the Controller in this act, the Controller shall not expend more than $500,000 to conduct posteligibility fraud audits of the Supplemental Security Income/State Supplementary Payment Program. 3. The Commission on State Mandates shall provide, in applicable parameters and guidelines, as follows: (a) If a local agency or school district contracts with an independent contractor for the preparation and submission of reimbursement claims, the costs reimbursable by the state for that purpose shall not exceed the lesser of (1) 10 percent of the amount of the claims prepared and submitted by the independent contractor or (2) the actual costs that would necessarily have been incurred for that purpose if performed by employees of the local agency or school district. (b) The maximum amount of reimbursement provided in subprovision (a) may be exceeded only if the local agency or school district establishes, by appropriate documentation, that the preparation and submission of these claims could not have been accomplished without incurring the additional costs claimed by the local agency or school district. 4. It is the intent of the Legislature that audits conducted by the Controller, or under the direction of the Controller, shall be fiscal audits that focus on claims and disbursements, as provided for in Section 12410 of the Government Code. Any report, audit, analysis, or evaluation issued by the Controller for the current fiscal year shall cite the specific statutory or constitutional provision authorizing the preparation and release of the report, audit, analysis, or evaluation. 5. The Controller shall publish and provide the Controller’s monthly report, the Statement of General Fund Cash Receipts and Disbursements, within 10 days after the close of each month to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, the fiscal committees of each house of the Legislature, the Department of Finance, the Treasurer, and the Legislative Analyst’s Office. 6. The Controller shall provide to the Department of Finance, the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, and the chairpersons of the fiscal committees of each house of the Legislature a report that provides the following details by mandate: the level of claims requested, the amount reduced by the initial desk audit, the amount paid, the amount recouped, and the results of a final audit and subsequent funding adjustments. The report is due on June 30 of the current fiscal year, and will cover the fourth quarter of the past fiscal year and the first three quarters of the current fiscal year. 7. The Controller shall obtain actuarial valuation services to comply with governmental accounting and reporting standards for other postemployment benefits (OPEB). In addition to all other items required under the accounting and reporting standards, the report shall include an identification and explanation of any significant differences in actuarial assumptions or methodology from any relevant similar types of assumptions or methodology used by the Public Employees’ Retirement System to estimate state pension obligations. To avoid duplication of effort and promote efficiency and cost-effectiveness, the Controller and the Department of Finance shall coordinate in obtaining additional actuarial valuation services related to OPEB plan liabilities and assets attributable to each of the state’s collective bargaining units or other state entities or groups. This provision does not obligate the state to change the practice of funding health and dental benefits for annuitants currently required under state law. 8. The funds appropriated to the Controller in this act shall not be expended on additional actuarial valuations, beyond the annual actuarial valuations, for other postemployment benefits, prior to obtaining concurrence in writing from the Department of Finance. The additional actuarial valuations shall only be performed to the extent resources exist, or if funds are provided by the requesting agency. 9. The Controller shall provide the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee and the chairpersons of the fiscal committees in each house of the Legislature a report on the California State Payroll System Project specifying the dollars expended on the program in the previous fiscal year and over the life of the program and any known savings that have occurred in the prior fiscal year by October 1 of each year. 10. The Controller shall provide yearend financial data as specified by the Department of Finance, for the immediately preceding fiscal year, in electronic format that is printable via application, including, but not limited to, Adobe PDF, Microsoft Excel, or Microsoft Word, by October 31 of each year and periodically as requested by the Department of Finance. This information is necessary for the Department of Finance to determine the proper beginning balance of the current fiscal year for budgetary purposes. 11. In the event new postage rates are adopted by the United States Postal Service, but not in time for inclusion in the May Revision prior to enactment of this Budget Act, and the Controller notifies the Department of Finance with its estimates of the increased postage costs within 15 calendar days of the adoption of new rates, the Director of Finance may authorize expenditures in excess of the amount appropriated to the Controller in this item by an amount necessary to fund the postage increase. This authorization shall occur not less than 15 days after the Department of Finance notifies the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee. 12. Of the amount appropriated in this item, $428,000 shall be used to reimburse the Department of Justice for legal services. In addition to the amount above, upon order of the Director of Finance, any non-General Fund Budget Act item for support of the Controller may be augmented to reimburse the Department of Justice for legal services. An augmentation shall not be made sooner than 30 days after the Joint Legislative Budget Committee has been notified in writing. 13. The Controller shall provide the Department of Finance and the Legislative Analyst’s Office a report on FI$Cal implementation by the State Controller’s Office verifying the progress or completion of predetermined FI$Cal milestones outlined in SPR7, 8, and 9, including future milestones necessary to complete the transition to FI$Cal as the Book of Record, the dollars expended on the program in the previous quarter and over the life of the program, and any known savings that have occurred in the prior fiscal year, to be submitted on a quarterly basis commencing September 1 of each year, until completion of the implementation to FI$Cal. The Department of Finance may augment this item if necessary to address unforeseen implementation issues relating to the transition of the state to the Book of Record. Any augmentation shall be authorized not sooner than 30 days after notification in writing to the chairpersons of the committees in each house of the Legislature that consider appropriations, the chairpersons of the committees and appropriate subcommittees that consider the state budget, and the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, or not sooner than whatever lesser time the chairperson of the joint committee, or the chairperson’s designee, may determine. 14. The Controller, in consultation with the Department of Finance, the Department of Human Resources, and the Department of Technology, shall provide the Legislature and the Legislative Analyst’s Office with briefings on the progress of the California State Payroll System Project, including newly executed contracts, and their purpose, and cost, on a quarterly basis. 16. Of the amount appropriated in this item, up to $7,082,000 shall be allocated upon order of the Director of Finance for consulting services to support the legacy Accounting and Reporting Management System decommissioning, The Department of Finance may adjust the amount allocated upon confirmation of the executed decommissioning contract. 17. Of the amount appropriated in this item, up to $8,693,000 is provided for Department/Agency Readiness Team (DART) resources. The Controller, in consultation with the Department of Human Resources, shall work with payroll processing departments through its DART program to complete the organizational change management activities associated with the California State Payroll System (CSPS) information technology project. The Controller, in consultation with the Department of Finance, shall identify amounts to be allocated to each department for the 2026–27 fiscal year. Prior to any allocations to departments, the Controller shall define specific criteria that departments must meet to receive this funding and outline the specific project activities that require DART team involvement. The Controller shall require departments to submit requests for their respective allocations including an agreement to use the funding to only support CSPS project-related activities. The Controller shall provide updates on DART funding allocations to the Legislature and the Legislative Analyst’s Office through existing bimonthly briefings on the progress of the project and report final annual allocation amounts to the Department of Finance. 18. Of the amount appropriated in this item. item, up to $153,000 $453,000 shall be used to implement an automated workspace that will be used to input and publish the Annual Comprehensive Financial Report. 19. The Department of Finance may augment this item if necessary to address unforeseen implementation issues relating to the California State Payroll System project. Any augmentation shall be authorized not sooner than 30 days after notification in writing to the chairpersons of the committees in each house of the Legislature that consider appropriations, the chairpersons of the committees and appropriate subcommittees that consider the state budget, and the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, or not sooner than whatever lesser time the chairperson of the joint committee, or the chairperson’s designee, may determine. 20. The Department of Finance may augment this item if necessary to improve the timelines, accuracy, and information display of the Annual Comprehensive Financial Report. Any augmentation shall be authorized not sooner than 30 days after notification in writing to the chairpersons of the committees in each house of the Legislature that consider appropriations, the chairpersons of the committees and appropriate subcommittees that consider the state budget, and the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, or not sooner than whatever lesser time the chairperson of the joint committee, or the chairperson’s designee, may determine. 0840-001-0061—For support of the Controller, payable from the Motor Vehicle Fuel Account, Transportation Tax Fund ........................ 5,785,000 Schedule: (1) 0500-State Controller’s Office ........................ 5,785,000 0840-001-0062—For support of the Controller, payable from the Highway Users Tax Account, Transportation Tax Fund ........................ 1,655,000 Schedule: (1) 0500-State Controller’s Office ........................ 1,655,000 0840-001-0330—For support of the Controller, payable from the Local Revenue Fund ........................ 815,000 Schedule: (1) 0500-State Controller’s Office ........................ 815,000 0840-001-0890—For support of the Controller, payable from the Federal Trust Fund ........................ 1,721,000 Schedule: (1) 0500-State Controller’s Office ........................ 1,721,000 0840-001-0903—For support of the Controller, payable from the State Penalty Fund ........................ 1,855,000 Schedule: (1) 0500-State Controller’s Office ........................ 1,855,000 0840-001-0970—For support of the Controller, payable from the Unclaimed Property Fund ........................ 59,838,000 Schedule: (1) 0500-State Controller’s Office ........................ 59,838,000 Provisions: 1. The funding provided in this item shall cover all Unclaimed Property Program support operations costs (personal services and operating expenses and equipment). Continuous appropriations from the Unclaimed Property Fund are allowed for costs related to enforcement of the unclaimed property law, and other program costs authorized under subdivision (b) of Section 1564 and Section 1325 of the Code of Civil Procedure. These continuous appropriations shall not be used to cover spending authorized under this item. 2. (a) Pursuant to Section 1531 of the Code of Civil Procedure, the Controller may publish notice of unclaimed property in any manner that the Controller determines reasonable. (b) No funds appropriated in this act may be expended by the Controller to provide general information to the public, other than holders, as defined in subdivision (g) of Section 1501 of the Code of Civil Procedure, of unclaimed property, concerning the Unclaimed Property Program or possible existence of unclaimed property held by the Controller, except for informational announcements to the news media, through the exchange of information on the internet, or no more than $3,000,000 per year to inform the public about this program. This annual cap may be increased up to $5,000,000, upon the order of the Department of Finance, if the Controller demonstrates that additional funds are needed. This restriction does not apply to sending individual notices to property owners, as required by the Code of Civil Procedure. 0840-001-0988—For support of the Controller, payable from various other unallocated nongovernmental cost funds (Retail Sales Tax Fund) ........................ 342,000 Schedule: (1) 0500-State Controller’s Office ........................ 342,000 0840-001-3268—For support of the Controller, payable from the Senior Citizens and Disabled Citizens Property Tax Postponement Fund ........................ 2,826,000 Schedule: (1) 0500-State Controller’s Office ........................ 2,826,000 Provisions: 1. The funding provided in this item shall cover costs for personal services and related operating expenses and equipment for administration of the Property Tax Postponement Program. The continuous appropriation pursuant to Section 16180 of the Government Code from the Senior Citizens and Disabled Citizens Property Tax Postponement Fund is allowed for property tax payments to counties and other direct program costs, such as the cost of title searches and appraisals incurred by the Controller covering real property held in the name of an account, or legal costs associated with the enforcement and administration of the Property Tax Postponement Program. No moneys from the fund, beyond those appropriated in this item, shall be used for personal services and related operating expenses and equipment. 0840-001-3290—For support of the Controller, payable from the Road Maintenance and Rehabilitation Account, State Transportation Fund ........................ 690,000 Schedule: (1) 0500-State Controller’s Office ........................ 690,000 0840-001-6094—For support of the Controller, payable from the 2024 State School Facilities Fund ........................ 304,000 Schedule: (1) 0500-State Controller’s Office ........................ 304,000 0840-001-9740—For support of the Controller, payable from the Central Service Cost Recovery Fund ........................ 107,368,000 Schedule: (1) 0500-State Controller’s Office ........................ 107,368,000 Provisions: 2. Of the amount appropriated in this item, up to $4,528,000 shall be allocated upon order of the Director of Finance for consulting services to support the legacy Accounting and Reporting Management System decommissioning. The Department of Finance may adjust the amount allocated upon confirmation of the executed decommissioning contract. 3. Of the amount appropriated in this item, up to $5,557,000 is provided for Department/Agency Readiness Team (DART) resources. The Controller, in consultation with the Department of Human Resources, shall work with payroll processing department through its DART program to complete the organizational change management activities associated with the California State Payroll System (CSPS) information technology project. The Controller, in consultation with the Department of Finance, shall identify amounts to be allocated to each department for the 2026–27 fiscal year. Prior to any allocations to departments, the Controller must define the specific criteria that departments must meet to receive this funding and outline the specific project activities that require DART team involvement. The Controller shall require departments to submit requests for their respective allocations, including an agreement to use the funding to only support CSPS project related activities. The Controller shall provide updates on DART funding allocations to the Legislature and the Legislative Analyst’s Office through existing bimonthly briefings on the progress of the project and must report final annual allocation amounts to the Department of Finance. 4. Of the amount appropriated in this item, up to $97,000 shall be used to implement an automated workspace that will be used to input and publish the Annual Comprehensive Financial Report. 0840-101-0979—For allocation by the Controller from the California Firefighters’ Memorial Fund ........................ 500,000 Schedule: (1) 0500-State Controller’s Office ........................ 500,000 Provisions: 1. The funds appropriated in this item are to be allocated as follows: (a) To the Franchise Tax Board and the Controller for reimbursement of costs incurred in connection with duties under Article 9 (commencing with Section 18801) of Chapter 3 of Part 10.2 of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code. (b) To the California Fire Foundation the balance in the fund for the construction of a memorial as authorized in that article. 0840-491—Reappropriation, Controller. The amount specified in the following citations are reappropriated for the purposes provided for in those appropriations and shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2027: 0001—General Fund (1) Up to $1,055,000 in Item 0840-001-0001, Budget Act of 2023 (Chs. 12, 38, and 189, Stats. 2023), for contract costs related to the State Controller’s Office Book of Record Functionality Migration to Fi$Cal and Annual Comprehensive Financial Report support. 0845-001-0001—For support of Department of Insurance ........................ 6,823,000 Schedule: (1) 0525-Consumer Protection ........................ 1,031,000 (2) 0530-Fraud Control ........................ 5,792,000 Provisions: 1. The Department of Finance may augment this item not sooner than 10 days after notification of the necessity in writing to the chairpersons of the budget committees of both houses of the Legislature and the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, in response to increased legal costs. 0845-001-0217—For support of Department of Insurance, payable from the Insurance Fund ........................ 267,875,000 Schedule: (1) 0520-Regulation of Insurance Companies and Insurance Producers ........................ 113,616,000 (2) 0525-Consumer Protection ........................ 75,788,000 (3) 0530-Fraud Control ........................ 77,554,000 (4) 0535-General Fund Tax Collection and Compliance ........................ 1,641,000 (5) 9900100-Administration ........................ 46,548,000 (6) 9900200-Administration—​Distributed ........................ −46,548,000 (7) Reimbursements to 0520-Regulation of Insurance Companies and Insurance Producers ........................ −250,000 (8) Reimbursements to 0530-Fraud Control ........................ −474,000 Provisions: 1. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (1) of this item, the Controller shall transfer one-half of $4,892,000 upon passage of the Budget Act and the remaining one-half on January 1, 2027, to the California Department of Aging for support of the Health Insurance Counseling and Advocacy Program. 2. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (2) of this item, the entire cost of all examinations, analyses, adoption of any regulations, implementation, and enforcement related to mental health parity laws shall be recovered through assessments or examination fees imposed on health insurers. 3. Notwithstanding any other law, to the extent that the Department of Insurance determines a need for consulting services related to the review of property and casualty insurance premium rate filings, the department may augment this item not sooner than 30 days after notification in writing is provided to the chairpersons of the fiscal committees in each house of the Legislature and the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee. 0845-001-0890—For support of Department of Insurance, payable from the Federal Trust Fund ........................ 25,000 Schedule: (1) 0530-Fraud Control ........................ 25,000 0845-101-0217—For local assistance, Department of Insurance, payable from the Insurance Fund ........................ 82,772,000 Schedule: (1) 0525-Consumer Protection ........................ 750,000 (2) 0530-Fraud Control ........................ 82,022,000 Provisions: 1. Notwithstanding any other law, to the extent that the Department of Insurance determines by November 1 that additional revenue from fraud assessments is available for distribution, the Department of Finance may augment this item in Schedule (2) 0530-Fraud Control by up to 10 percent not sooner than 30 days after notification in writing is provided to the chairpersons of the fiscal committees in each house of the Legislature and the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee. 0845-490—Reappropriation, Department of Insurance. The amounts specified in the following citations are reappropriated for the purposes provided for in those appropriations and shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2027: 0001—General Fund (1) Up to $11,500,000 of Item 0845-002-0001, Budget Act of 2025 (Chs. 4 and 5, Stats. 2025). 0855-001-0367—For support of California Gambling Control Commission, payable from the Indian Gaming Special Distribution Fund ........................ 4,290,000 Schedule: (1) 0560-California Gambling Control Commission ........................ 4,290,000 Provisions: 1. Upon order of the Department of Finance, the Controller shall transfer such funds as are necessary between Item 0855-001-0567 and this item to align with projected expenditures. The Department of Finance may not order a transfer unless the order is made in writing and filed with the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee and the chairpersons of the committees in each house of the Legislature that consider appropriations not later than 30 days prior to the effective date of approval, or prior to whatever lesser time the chairperson of the joint committee, or the chairperson’s designee, may determine. 0855-001-0567—For support of California Gambling Control Commission, payable from the Gambling Control Fund ........................ 5,035,000 Schedule: (1) 0560-California Gambling Control Commission ........................ 5,035,000 Provisions: 1. Upon order of the Department of Finance, the Controller shall transfer such funds as are necessary between Item 0855-001-0367 and this item to align with projected expenditures. The Department of Finance may not order a transfer unless the order is made in writing and filed with the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee and the chairpersons of the committees in each house of the Legislature that consider appropriations not later than 30 days prior to the effective date of the approval, or prior to whatever lesser time the Chairperson of the Joint Committee, or the Chairperson’s designee may determine. 0855-101-0366—For local assistance, California Gambling Control Commission, payable from the Indian Gaming Revenue Sharing Trust Fund ........................ 96,500,000 Schedule: (1) 0560-California Gambling Control Commission ........................ 96,500,000 Provisions: 1. The funds appropriated in this item are for distribution to eligible recipient Indian tribes pursuant to Section 12012.90 of the Government Code. 2. Notwithstanding any other law, the Department of Finance may authorize expenditures for purposes of this item in excess of the amount appropriated in this item. The Department of Finance may not approve any expenditure unless the approval is made in writing and filed with the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee and the chairpersons of the committees in each house of the Legislature that consider appropriations not later than 30 days prior to the effective date of approval, or prior to whatever lesser time the chairperson of the joint committee, or the chairperson’s designee, may determine. 3. As part of any request to augment this item, the California Gambling Control Commission shall provide the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee and the chairpersons of the committees in each house of the Legislature that consider appropriations a report identifying (a) the methodology for determining eligible recipient Indian tribes, (b) a list of the eligible recipient Indian tribes identified based on the commission’s methodology, (c) a trust fund condition report including the amount of revenue received from each compact tribe, and (d) the amount of funds to be distributed to each eligible recipient Indian tribe. Upon receiving additional expenditure authority for distributing funds under the trust fund, the commission shall submit that information to the chairpersons of the committees on a quarterly basis concurrent with the distribution of the funds to the eligible recipient Indian tribes. 0855-101-8089—For local assistance, California Gambling Control Commission, payable from the Tribal Nation Grant Fund ........................ 167,000,000 Schedule: (1) 0560-California Gambling Control Commission ........................ 167,000,000 Provisions: 1. Notwithstanding any other law, the Director of Finance may augment this item up to the total amount transferred from the Indian Gaming Revenue Sharing Trust Fund in the 2026–27 fiscal year. The Director of Finance shall notify the Joint Legislative Budget Committee in writing of any augmentations to this item pursuant to this provision. 0855-111-0366—For transfer by the Controller, upon order of the Department of Finance, from the Indian Gaming Revenue Sharing Trust Fund to the Tribal Nation Grant Fund ........................ (50,000,000) Provisions: 1. Notwithstanding any other law, and upon approval of the Department of Finance, the amount available for transfer may be increased to an amount sufficient to transfer excess Indian Gaming Revenue Sharing Trust Fund revenues to the Tribal Nation Grant Fund as determined by the California Gambling Control Commission, pursuant to Section 12019.35 of the Government Code. 0855-111-0367—For transfer by the Controller, upon order of the Department of Finance, from the Indian Gaming Special Distribution Fund, to the Indian Gaming Revenue Sharing Trust Fund ........................ (1,000) Provisions: 1. The amount of any transfer ordered by the Department of Finance pursuant to this item shall be the minimum amount necessary to allow the Indian Gaming Revenue Sharing Trust Fund to distribute the quarterly payments described in Section 12012.90 of the Government Code and meet its other expenditure requirements. Any remaining portion of the amount authorized to be transferred pursuant to this item shall remain in the Indian Gaming Special Distribution Fund. 2. Notwithstanding any other law, and upon approval of the Department of Finance, the amount available for transfer may be increased in an amount sufficient to allow the Indian Gaming Revenue Sharing Trust Fund to distribute the quarterly payments described in Section 12012.90 of the Government Code. 0860-002-0001—For support of State Board of Equalization ........................ 37,321,000 Schedule: (1) 0570-Administration of the Board of Equalization ........................ 37,778,000 (2) Reimbursements to 0570-Administration of the Board of Equalization ........................ −457,000 Provisions: 1. It is the intent of the Legislature that all funds appropriated to the State Board of Equalization for processing tax returns, auditing, and collecting owed tax amounts shall be used in a manner consistent with the board’s authorized budget and with the documents that were presented to the Legislature for its review in support of that budget. The board shall not reduce expenditures or redirect funding or personnel resources away from direct auditing or collection activities without prior approval of the Director of Finance. The Director of Finance shall not approve any such reduction or redirection sooner than 30 days after providing notification to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee. A position responsible for or engaged in direct auditing or collection activities shall not be transferred from the organization unit to which it was assigned in the 2026–27 Governor’s Budget and the Salaries and Wages Supplement, as revised by legislative actions, without the approval of the Director of Finance. The board shall expeditiously fill budgeted positions consistent with the funding provided in this act. 2. The funds appropriated in this item are for the support and operation of the State Board of Equalization. 3. All acquisitions or procurements made by or on behalf of State Board of Equalization Members or Board Members’ staff, including the renting or leasing of office space, shall be processed by the Executive Director through the Department of General Services. The Department of General Services shall have the final decisionmaking authority for all acquisition or procurements made by or on behalf of Board Members or Board Members’ staff. 0870-001-0001—For support of Office of Tax Appeals ........................ 28,267,000 Schedule: (1) 0610-Office of Tax Appeals ........................ 28,297,000 (2) Reimbursements to 0610-Office of Tax Appeals ........................ −30,000 0890-001-0001—For support of Secretary of State ........................ 87,083,00092,083,000 Schedule: (1) 0700-Filings and Registrations ........................ 3,998,000 (2) 0705-Elections ........................ 48,231,00053,231,000 (3) 0710-Archives ........................ 16,265,000 (3.5) 0711-Special Items of Expense ........................ 17,292,000 (4) 0715-Department of Justice Legal Services ........................ 1,352,000 (5) 9900100-Administration ........................ 73,564,000 (6) 9900200-Administration—​Distributed ........................ −73,564,000 (7) Reimbursements to 0700-Filings and Registration −5,000 (8) Reimbursements to 0705-Elections −36,000 (9) Reimbursements to 0710-Archives −14,000 Provisions: 1. The Secretary of State shall not expend any special handling fees authorized by Chapter 999 of the Statutes of 1999 that are collected in excess of the cost of administering those special handling fees unless specifically authorized by the Legislature. 2. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $17,292,000 is available for the following election-related activities: (a) Parallel Monitoring. (b) Printing and Mailing of Voter Information Guides. (c) Printing and Mailing of Voter Registration Cards. (d) Election Night Reporting. (e) Office of State Publishing Warehouse Lease. Any unexpended funds pursuant to this provision shall revert to the General Fund. Upon order of the Department of Finance, the amount available in Schedule (3.5) may be augmented by the amount necessary to cover costs associated with parallel monitoring, printing and mailing of Voter Information Guides and Voter Registration Cards, and election night reporting. Any augmentation shall be authorized not sooner than 30 days after notification in writing to the chairpersons of the committees in each house of the Legislature that consider appropriations, the chairpersons of the committees and appropriate subcommittees that consider the State Budget, and the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, or not sooner than whatever lesser time the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, or the Chairperson’s designee, may determine. 3. Of the amount appropriated in this item, $2,000,000 shall be used to establish and operate the Office of Elections Cybersecurity. Activities performed by the Office of Elections Cybersecurity are intended to be specific to elections and shall be designed so as to minimize overlap and in coordination with statewide cybersecurity efforts performed by the California Cybersecurity Integration Center. 4. Of the amount appropriated in this item, $150,000 shall be used for support of the State Government Oral History Program consistent with Section 12233 of the Government Code, and $75,000 shall be used for the costs of a digital preservation subscription service. Expenditure of this funding requires the collaboration between the Secretary of State and the California State Library on projects and activities related to the State Government Oral History Program. 5. Upon order of the Department of Finance, the amount available in Schedule (4) may be augmented by the amount necessary to cover costs associated with legal services provided by the Department of Justice. Any augmentation shall be authorized not sooner than 30 days after notification in writing to the chairpersons of the committees in each house of the Legislature that consider appropriations, the chairpersons of the committees and appropriate subcommittees that consider the State Budget, and the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, or not sooner than whatever lesser time the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, or the Chairperson’s designee, may determine. 6. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (2), $5,000,000 shall be available for the Secretary of State to complete voter outreach and education prior to the November 3, 2026, statewide general election. 0890-001-0228—For support of Secretary of State, payable from the Secretary of State’s Business Fees Fund ........................ 96,870,000 Schedule: (1) 0700-Filings and Registrations ........................ 96,966,000 (2) Reimbursements to 0700-Filings and Registrations ........................ −96,000 Provisions: 1. Up to $925,000 of the amount in this item for the System Integrator contract and implementation costs is contingent upon approval by the Department of Technology of Stage 4 of the Project Approval Lifecycle process. 0890-001-0890—For support of Secretary of State, payable from the Federal Trust Fund ........................ 15,536,000 Schedule: (1) 0705-Elections ........................ 15,536,000 Provisions: 1. Funds shall be expended for the purposes approved in the Help America Vote Act of 2002 (52 U.S.C. Sec. 20901 et seq.) spending plan. The amounts spent on each activity shall not exceed the maximum specified in the spending plan. 2. Notwithstanding any other law, any funds not needed for an activity authorized in the Help America Vote Act of 2002 (52 U.S.C. Sec. 20901 et seq.) spending plan shall not be redirected to other activities and are not authorized for expenditure. 3. The Department of Finance may authorize an increase in the appropriation of this item, up to the total amount of the program reserve. Any such approval shall be accompanied by the approval of an amended spending plan submitted by the Secretary of State providing detailed justification for the increased expenses. An approval of an augmentation or of spending plan amendments shall not be effective sooner than 30 days following the transmittal of the approval to the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, or not sooner than whatever lesser time the chairperson of the joint committee, or the chairperson’s designee, may determine. 4. Notwithstanding any other law, any primary vendor contract for the development of a new statewide voter registration database shall be subject to the notification and other requirements under Section 11.00. The validity of any such contract shall be contingent upon the appropriation of funds in future budget acts. 5. Upon notification and approval of a spending plan pursuant to Provision 4, the Department of Finance may authorize the transfer of amounts from this item to Item 0890-101-0890 in order to realign the budget in a manner that is consistent with the approved plan. 6. County contracts funded by Help America Vote Act of 2002 (52 U.S.C. Sec. 20901 et seq.) federal funds will be available pursuant to Section 16304.1 of the Government Code. 0890-001-0942—For support of Secretary of State, payable from the Voting Systems, Security Measures, and Election Administration Account, Special Deposit Fund ........................ 616,000 Schedule: (1) 0705-Elections ........................ 616,000 0890-001-3244—For support of Secretary of State, payable from the Political Disclosure, Accountability, Transparency, and Access Fund ........................ 597,000 Schedule: (1) 0705-Elections ........................ 597,000 0890-001-3254—For support of Secretary of State, payable from the Business Programs Modernization Fund ........................ 1,000,000 Schedule: (1) 0700-Filings and Registrations ........................ 1,000,000 0890-101-0890—For local assistance, Secretary of State, payable from the Federal Trust Fund ........................ 1,500,000 Schedule: (1) 0705-Elections ........................ 1,500,000 0911-001-0001—For support of Citizens Redistricting Initiative ........................ 186,000 Schedule: (1) 0730-Support ........................ 185,000 (2) 0731-Citizens Redistricting Commission ........................ 1,000 Provisions: 1. If the Citizens Redistricting Commission is required to convene during the 2026–27 fiscal year for the purpose of (a) defending any action regarding a certified final map pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 3 of Article XXI of the California Constitution, (b) responding to Chapter 271 of the Statutes of 2012 pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) of Section 8251 of the Government Code, (c) filling any vacancy, whether created by removal, resignation, or absence, in a commission position pursuant to Section 8252.5 of the Government Code, or (d) responding to any litigation involving issues unrelated to a certified final map, the commission shall submit a written request to the Director of Finance for an augmentation of the amount available for expenditure under this item to provide funding for the associated expenses of the commission’s meeting. The Director of Finance shall provide notification in writing of any augmentation granted under this provision to the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee and the chairpersons of the committees in each house of the Legislature that consider the State Budget not less than 30 days prior to the effective date of that approval, or not later than whatever lesser time prior to that effective date the chairperson of the joint committee, or the chairperson’s designee, may in each instance determine. 2. Upon order of the Department of Finance, the amount available in this item may be augmented by the amount necessary to cover cost increases for services provided by the Department of Technology and the Department of General Services. Within 15 days of authorizing the augmentation, the Department of Finance shall provide notification in writing to the chairpersons of the committees in each house of the Legislature that consider appropriations, the chairpersons of the committees and appropriate subcommittees that consider the State Budget, and the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee. 0950-001-0001—For support of Treasurer ........................ 15,236,000 Schedule: (1) 0740-State Treasurer’s Office ........................ 42,244,000 (2) Reimbursements to 0740-State Treasurer’s Office ........................ −27,008,000 Provisions: 1. The Director of Finance may authorize a loan from the General Fund, in an amount not to exceed the level of reimbursements appropriated in Schedule (2) to the Treasurer, provided that: (a) The loan is to meet cash needs resulting from a delay in receipt of reimbursements. (b) The loan is short term, and is repaid within six months. (c) Interest charges may be waived pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 16314 of the Government Code. (d) The Director of Finance shall not approve the loan unless the approval is made in writing and filed with the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee and the chairpersons of the committees in each house of the Legislature that consider appropriations not later than 30 days before the effective date of the approval, or not later than whatever lesser time the chairperson of the joint committee, or the chairperson’s designee, may determine. (e) At the end of the six-month term of the loan, the Treasurer shall notify the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee whether the Treasurer has repaid the loan pursuant to subprovision (b). 2. Notwithstanding any other law, upon certification by the Treasurer, the Department of Finance may authorize expenditures of up to $8,000,000 in excess of the amount appropriated in this item for the payment of expenses incurred on general obligation bond, lease-revenue bond, and revenue anticipation note sales that have been canceled. Prior to expenditure from the General Fund, the Treasurer shall determine if any bond funds are authorized and available for the payment of expenses, and then shall apply those funds to such payment. The Department of Finance shall provide notification in writing to the chairpersons of the fiscal committees of each house of the Legislature and the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee no more than 30 days after that authorization. 3. The Budget Act of 2026 hereby authorizes Upon order of the Director of Finance, a revenue transfer of $250,000 is hereby authorized in Item 0950-788-0467 0950-011-0467, from the State Notes Expense Account reserve to the General Fund due to a lack of previous activity and no anticipated need for the foreseeable future. This special fund will remain active and will be available to receive future appropriations in subsequent budgets to the extent they are determined necessary to carry out the purposes for which the fund was established. 0950-001-9740—For support of Treasurer, payable from the Central Service Cost Recovery Fund ........................ 7,140,000 Schedule: (1) 0740-State Treasurer’s Office ........................ 7,140,000 0950-490—Reappropriation, Treasurer. The amounts specified in the following citations are reappropriated for the purposes provided for in those appropriations and shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2027. 0001—General Fund (1) Up to $360,000 in Provision 5 of Item 0950-001-0001, Budget Act of 2025 (Chs. 4 and 5, Stats. 2025) for continuation of the CalAccount Blue Ribbon Commission to evaluate feasibility of CalAccounts. 0954-001-0001—For support of Scholarshare Investment Board ........................ 3,994,000 Schedule: (1) 0785-Governor’s Scholarship Program ........................ 94,000 (2) 0795-Statewide Child Savings Account Program ........................ 3,900,000 Provisions: 1. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (2), $158,000 is available on an ongoing basis to support administrative workload, including a financial literacy initiative, associated with the California Kids Investment and Development Savings Program. 0954-001-0564—For support of Scholarshare Investment Board, payable from the Scholarshare Administrative Fund ........................ 3,051,000 Schedule: (1) 0780-Golden State Scholarshare Trust Program ........................ 3,051,000 Provisions: 1. The Director of Finance may authorize an augmentation of this item not sooner than 30 days after notification is provided to the chairpersons of the fiscal committees in both houses of the Legislature. 0954-101-0001—For local assistance, Scholarshare Investment Board ........................ 185,258,000 Schedule: (1) 0795-Statewide Child Savings Account Program ........................ 185,258,000 Provisions: 1. Of the amount appropriated in this item, $45,300,000 is provided to support California Kids Investment and Development Savings Program seed deposits pursuant to Section 69996.3 of the Education Code. 2. Of the amount appropriated in this item, $139,958,000 is provided to support California Kids Investment and Development Savings Program enhanced deposits for eligible pupils entering first grade in the 2026–27 fiscal year, pursuant to Section 69996.9 of the Education Code. 0956-001-0171—For support of California Debt and Investment Advisory Commission, payable from the California Debt and Investment Advisory Commission Fund ........................ 4,345,000 Schedule: (1) 0800-California Debt and Investment Advisory Commission ........................ 4,525,000 (2) Reimbursements to 0800-California Debt and Investment Advisory Commission ........................ −180,000 Provisions: 1. Notwithstanding any other law, the Director of Finance may authorize expenditures for the California Debt and Investment Advisory Commission in excess of the amount appropriated not sooner than 30 days after notification in writing of the necessity therefor is provided to the chairpersons of the fiscal committees in each house of the Legislature and the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, or not sooner than whatever lesser time the chairperson of the joint committee, or the chairperson’s designee, may in each instance determine. 0957-113-0001—For transfer by the Controller, upon order of the Director of Finance, to the California Hope, Opportunity, Perseverance, and Empowerment (HOPE) for Children Trust Account Fund ........................ 15,000,000 Provisions: 1. The funds transferred in this item shall be used to create HOPE trust accounts for children who have lost a parent or primary caregiver to COVID-19 and for children in long-term foster care. 0959-001-0169—For support of California Debt Limit Allocation Committee, payable from the California Debt Limit Allocation Committee Fund ........................ 3,731,000 Schedule: (1) 0810-California Debt Limit Allocation Committee ........................ 3,731,000 Provisions: 1. Notwithstanding any other law, the Director of Finance may authorize expenditures for the California Debt Limit Allocation Committee in excess of the amount appropriated no sooner than 30 days after notification in writing of the necessity therefor is provided to the chairpersons of the fiscal committees in each house of the Legislature and the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, or no sooner than whatever lesser time the chairperson of the committee, or the chairperson’s designee, may in each instance determine. 0968-001-0448—For support of California Tax Credit Allocation Committee, payable from the Occupancy Compliance Monitoring Account, Tax Credit Allocation Fee Account ........................ 9,155,000 Schedule: (1) 0840-California Tax Credit Allocation Committee ........................ 9,295,000 (2) Reimbursements to 0840-California Tax Credit Allocation Committee ........................ −140,000 Provisions: 1. Notwithstanding any other law, the Director of Finance may authorize expenditures for the California Tax Credit Allocation Committee in excess of the amount appropriated not sooner than 30 days after notification in writing of the necessity therefor is provided to the chairpersons of the fiscal committees of each house of the Legislature and the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, or not sooner than whatever lesser time the chairperson of the joint committee, or the chairperson’s designee, may in each instance determine. 0968-001-0457—For support of California Tax Credit Allocation Committee, payable from the Tax Credit Allocation Fee Account ........................ 8,351,000 Schedule: (1) 0840-California Tax Credit Allocation Committee ........................ 8,366,000 (2) Reimbursements to 0840-California Tax Credit Allocation Committee ........................ −15,000 Provisions: 1. Notwithstanding any other law, the Director of Finance may authorize expenditures for the California Tax Credit Allocation Committee in excess of the amount appropriated not sooner than 30 days after notification in writing of the necessity therefor is provided to the chairpersons of the fiscal committees in each house of the Legislature and the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, or not sooner than whatever lesser time the chairperson of the joint committee, or the chairperson’s designee, may in each instance determine. 0968-401—Pursuant to Sections 12206, 17058, and 23610.5 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, the California Tax Credit Allocation Committee may allocate up to $500,000,000 for the 2027 calendar year in state low-income housing tax credits. 0971-001-0465—For support of California Alternative Energy and Advanced Transportation Financing Authority, payable from the Energy Resources Programs Account ........................ 557,000 Schedule: (1) 0850-California Alternative Energy and Advanced Transportation Financing Authority ........................ 557,000 0971-001-9332—For support of California Alternative Energy and Advanced Transportation Financing Authority, payable from the California Alternative Energy Authority Fund ........................ 3,027,000 Schedule: (1) 0850-California Alternative Energy and Advanced Transportation Financing Authority ........................ 8,265,000 (2) Reimbursements to 0850-California Alternative Energy and Advanced Transportation Financing Authority ........................ −5,238,000 Provisions: 1. Notwithstanding any other law, the Director of Finance may authorize expenditures for the California Alternative Energy and Advanced Transportation Financing Authority in excess of the amount appropriated not sooner than 30 days after notification in writing of the necessity therefor is provided to the chairpersons of the fiscal committees in each house of the Legislature and the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, or not sooner than whatever lesser time the chairperson of the joint committee, or the chairperson’s designee, may in each instance determine. 0977-001-6046—For support of California Health Facilities Financing Authority, payable from the Children’s Hospital Fund ........................ 362,000 Schedule: (1) 0880-Children’s Hospital Program ........................ 362,000 0977-101-3085—For local assistance, California Health Facilities Financing Authority, payable from the Behavioral Health Services Fund ........................ 4,000,000 Schedule: (1) 0890-Mental Health Wellness Grants ........................ 4,000,000 0977-401—(a) The repayment period as described in subdivision (b) shall be extended for Palomar Health or any other nondesignated public hospitals participating in the Nondesignated Public Hospital Loan Program authorized under Provision (1) of Item 0977-101-0001 of the Budget Act of 2022 (Chs. 43, 45, and 249, Stats. 2022) that had received a loan approval from, and entered into a loan and security agreement with, the California Health Facilities Financing Authority, and that the authority has determined were unable to repay their loan by the time required under the loan and security agreement. (b) Notwithstanding Provision (1)(e) of Item 0977-101-0001 of the Budget Act of 2022 (Chs. 43, 45, and 249, Stats. 2022), Palomar Health or any other nondesignated public hospital participating in the loan program described in subdivision (a) that had received a loan approval from, and entered into a loan and security agreement with, the California Health Facilities Financing Authority shall be required to begin monthly repayments on the loan 36 months after the date of that loan, and shall discharge the loan within 24 months after beginning the monthly repayments. The monthly payments shall be amortized over the term of the loan at zero percent interest and there shall be no prepayment penalty. (c) Upon request by the California Health Facilities Financing Authority, Palomar Health or any other nondesignated public hospital that receives an extension of its repayment period pursuant to subdivision (a) shall provide any financial documentation or records deemed necessary to monitor compliance with the terms of such loan. 0981-001-0001—For support of California ABLE Act Board ........................ 1,663,000 Schedule: (1) 0895-California ABLE Act Board ........................ 1,663,000 0984-011-0001—For transfer by the Controller, upon order of the Department of Finance, to the CalSavers Retirement Savings Trust Administration Fund as a loan ........................ (2,000,000) Provisions: 1. The Department of Finance may transfer up to $2,000,000 as a loan from the General Fund to support the full-scale implementation and administrative costs of the CalSavers Retirement Savings Program. 2. Final interest will be determined at the time of the repayment. This loan shall be repaid with interest calculated at the rate earned by the Pooled Money Investment Account at the time of the transfer. 0985-001-0001—For support of California School Finance Authority ........................ 1,151,000 Schedule: (1) 0930-Charter School Facility Grant Program ........................ 993,000 (2) 0935-Charter School Revolving Loan Program ........................ 158,000 0985-001-0890—For support of California School Finance Authority, payable from the Federal Trust Fund ........................ 534,000 Schedule: (1) 0925-State Charter School Facilities Incentive Grants Program ........................ 534,000 0985-001-9735—For support of California School Finance Authority, payable from the 2006 Charter School Facilities Account, 2006 State School Facilities Fund ........................ 1,749,000 Schedule: (1) 0920-Charter School Facilities Program ........................ 1,749,000 0985-101-0890—For local assistance, California School Finance Authority, payable from the Federal Trust Fund ........................ 20,000,000 Schedule: (1) 0925-State Charter School Facilities Incentive Grants Program ........................ 20,000,000 Provisions: 1. No charter school receiving funds under the program authorized under this provision shall receive funding in excess of 75 percent of annual lease costs through this program or in combination with any other source of funding provided in this or any other act. 0985-220-0001—For local assistance, California School Finance Authority (Proposition 98), as set forth in Section 47614.5 of the Education Code ........................ 187,088,000183,637,000 Schedule: (1) 0930-Charter School Facility Grant Program ........................ 187,088,000183,637,000 0989-001-3263—For support of California Educational Facilities Authority, payable from the College Access Tax Credit Fund ........................ 79,000 Schedule: (1) 0955-College Access Tax Credit Program ........................ 79,000 BUSINESS AND CONSUMER SERVICES AGENCY 1045-001-3288—For support of Cannabis Control Appeals Panel, payable from the Cannabis Control Fund ........................ 3,443,000 Schedule: (1) 1045-Cannabis Appeals Panel ........................ 3,500,000 (2) Reimbursements to 1045-Cannabis Appeals Panel ........................ −57,000 1111-001-0069—For support of State Board of Barbering and Cosmetology, payable from the Barbering and Cosmetology Contingent Fund ........................ 22,017,000 Schedule: (1) 1125-State Board of Barbering and Cosmetology ........................ 22,074,000 (2) Reimbursements to 1125-State Board of Barbering and Cosmetology ........................ −57,000 Provisions: 1. The amount appropriated in this item may include revenues derived from the assessment of fines and penalties imposed as specified in Section 13332.18 of the Government Code. 1111-001-0093—For support of Contractors State License Board, payable from the Construction Management Education Account ........................ 100,000 Schedule: (1) 1130050-CSLB—​Construction Management Education Account ........................ 100,000 Provisions: 1. The amount appropriated in this item may include revenues derived from the assessment of fines and penalties imposed as specified in Section 13332.18 of the Government Code. 2. The Department of Finance may augment this appropriation, based on revenues available in the Construction Management Education Account, for the purpose of increasing the number of grant disbursements to public postsecondary construction management education programs. Any augmentation shall be authorized not sooner than 30 days after notification in writing to the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, or whatever lesser time the chairperson, or the chairperson’s designee, may determine. 1111-001-0108—For support of Acupuncture Board, payable from the Acupuncture Fund ........................ 4,011,000 Schedule: (1) 1155-Acupuncture Board ........................ 4,034,000 (2) Reimbursements to 1155-Acupuncture Board ........................ −23,000 Provisions: 1. The amount appropriated in this item may include revenues derived from the assessment of fines and penalties imposed as specified in Section 13332.18 of the Government Code. 1111-001-0152—For support of State Board of Chiropractic Examiners, payable from the State Board of Chiropractic Examiner’s Fund ........................ 5,146,000 Schedule: (1) 1120-State Board of Chiropractic Examiners ........................ 5,190,000 (2) Reimbursements to 1120-State Board of Chiropractic Examiners ........................ −44,000 Provisions: 1. The amount appropriated in this item may include revenues derived from the assessment of fines and penalties imposed as specified in Section 13332.18 of the Government Code. 1111-001-0210—For support of Medical Board of California, Outpatient Setting, payable from the Outpatient Setting Fund of the Medical Board of California ........................ 24,000 Schedule: (1) 1150029-Outpatient Setting ........................ 24,000 Provisions: 1. The amount appropriated in this item may include revenues derived from the assessment of fines and penalties imposed as specified in Section 13332.18 of the Government Code. 1111-001-0264—For support of Osteopathic Medical Board of California, payable from the Osteopathic Medical Board of California Contingent Fund ........................ 4,556,000 Schedule: (1) 1200010-Osteopathic Medical Board of California ........................ 4,609,000 (2) Reimbursements to 1200010-Osteopathic Medical Board of California ........................ −53,000 Provisions: 1. The amount appropriated in this item may include revenues derived from the assessment of fines and penalties imposed as specified in Section 13332.18 of the Government Code. 1111-001-0280—For support of Physician Assistant Board, payable from the Physician Assistant Fund ........................ 4,028,000 Schedule: (1) 1165-Physician Assistant Board ........................ 4,078,000 (2) Reimbursements to 1165-Physician Assistant Board ........................ −50,000 Provisions: 1. The amount appropriated in this item may include revenues derived from the assessment of fines and penalties imposed as specified in Section 13332.18 of the Government Code. 1111-001-0295—For support of Podiatric Medical Board of California, payable from the Podiatric Medical Board Fund ........................ 1,650,000 Schedule: (1) 1170-Podiatric Medical Board of California ........................ 1,654,000 (2) Reimbursements to 1170-Podiatric Medical Board of California ........................ −4,000 Provisions: 1. The amount appropriated in this item may include revenues derived from the assessment of fines and penalties imposed as specified in Section 13332.18 of the Government Code. 1111-001-0310—For support of Board of Psychology, payable from the Psychology Fund ........................ 7,895,000 Schedule: (1) 1175-Board of Psychology ........................ 7,946,000 (2) Reimbursements to 1175-Board of Psychology ........................ −51,000 Provisions: 1. The amount appropriated in this item may include revenues derived from the assessment of fines and penalties imposed as specified in Section 13332.18 of the Government Code. 1111-001-0319—For support of Respiratory Care Board of California, payable from the Respiratory Care Fund ........................ 4,080,000 Schedule: (1) 1180-Respiratory Care Board of California ........................ 4,146,000 (2) Reimbursements to 1180-Respiratory Care Board of California ........................ −66,000 Provisions: 1. The amount appropriated in this item may include revenues derived from the assessment of fines and penalties imposed as specified in Section 13332.18 of the Government Code. 1111-001-0326—For support of State Athletic Commission, payable from the Athletic Commission Fund ........................ 2,142,000 Schedule: (1) 1110010-State Athletic Com­mission—​Support ........................ 2,142,000 Provisions: 1. The amount appropriated in this item may include revenues derived from the assessment of fines and penalties imposed as specified in Section 13332.18 of the Government Code. 2. Provided that sufficient funds are available and upon request by the Department of Consumer Affairs, the Department of Finance may augment this item by up to $300,000 not sooner than 30 days after notification in writing is provided to the chairpersons of the fiscal committees in each house of the Legislature and the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee. This augmentation shall only be provided for additional funding needed for Athletic Inspectors at sporting events or for Athletic Inspector training, or for Attorney General expenses. 1111-001-0376—For support of Speech-Language Pathology and Audiology and Hearing Aid Dispensers Board, payable from the Speech-Language Pathology and Audiology and Hearing Aid Dispensers Fund ........................ 3,122,000 Schedule: (1) 1185-Speech-Language Pathology and Audiology and Hearing Aid Dispensers Board ........................ 3,155,000 (2) Reimbursements to 1185-Speech-Language Pathology and Audiology and Hearing Aid Dispensers Board ........................ −33,000 Provisions: 1. The amount appropriated in this item may include revenues derived from the assessment of fines and penalties imposed as specified in Section 13332.18 of the Government Code. 1111-001-0399—For support of Structural Pest Control Board, payable from the Structural Pest Control Education and Enforcement Fund ........................ 314,000 Schedule: (1) 1230020-Structural Pest Control Board—​Education and Enforcement ........................ 314,000 Provisions: 1. The amount appropriated in this item may include revenues derived from the assessment of fines and penalties imposed as specified in Section 13332.18 of the Government Code. 1111-001-0492—For support of State Athletic Commission, payable from the State Athletic Commission Neurological Examination Account ........................ 55,000 Schedule: (1) 1110020-State Athletic Commission—​Neurological ........................ 55,000 Provisions: 1. The amount appropriated in this item may include revenues derived from the assessment of fines and penalties imposed as specified in Section 13332.18 of the Government Code. 2. Provided that sufficient funds are available and upon request by the Department of Consumer Affairs, the Department of Finance may augment this item by up to $50,000 not sooner than 30 days after notification in writing is provided to the chairpersons of the fiscal committees in each house of the Legislature and the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee. This augmentation shall only be provided for additional funding needed for Athletic Inspectors at sporting events to conduct neurological examinations or for Athletic Inspector training. 1111-001-0704—For support of California Board of Accountancy, payable from the Accountancy Fund ........................ 19,307,000 Schedule: (1) 1100-California Board of Accountancy ........................ 19,603,000 (2) Reimbursements to 1100-California Board of Accountancy ........................ −296,000 Provisions: 1. The amount appropriated in this item may include revenues derived from the assessment of fines and penalties imposed as specified in Section 13332.18 of the Government Code. 1111-001-0706—For support of California Architects Board, payable from the California Architects Board Fund ........................ 4,823,000 Schedule: (1) 1105013-California Architects Board—​Distributed ........................ −93,000 (2) 1105019-California Architects Board ........................ 4,921,000 (3) Reimbursements to 1105019-California Architects Board ........................ −5,000 Provisions: 1. The amount appropriated in this item may include revenues derived from the assessment of fines and penalties imposed as specified in Section 13332.18 of the Government Code. 1111-001-0735—For support of Contractors State License Board, payable from the Contractors License Fund ........................ 85,615,000 Schedule: (1) 1130010-Contractors State License Board ........................ 85,968,000 (2) Reimbursements to 1130010-Contractors State License Board ........................ −353,000 Provisions: 1. The amount appropriated in this item may include revenues derived from the assessment of fines and penalties imposed as specified in Section 13332.18 of the Government Code. 1111-001-0741—For support of Dental Board of California, payable from the State Dentistry Fund ........................ 20,270,000 Schedule: (1) 1135010-Dental Board of California ........................ 20,553,000 (2) Reimbursements to 1135010-Dental Board of California ........................ −283,000 Provisions: 1. The amount appropriated in this item may include revenues derived from the assessment of fines and penalties imposed as specified in Section 13332.18 of the Government Code. 1111-001-0755—For support of Medical Board of California, payable from the Licensed Midwifery Fund ........................ 120,000 Schedule: (1) 1150038-Licensed Midwifery Program ........................ 120,000 Provisions: 1. The amount appropriated in this item may include revenues derived from the assessment of fines and penalties imposed as specified in Section 13332.18 of the Government Code. 1111-001-0757—For support of California Architects Board, payable from the California Architects Board-Landscape Architects Fund ........................ 1,190,000 Schedule: (1) 1105020-Landscape Architects Technical Committee ........................ 1,191,000 (2) Reimbursements to 1105020-Landscape Architects Technical Committee ........................ −1,000 Provisions: 1. The amount appropriated in this item may include revenues derived from the assessment of fines and penalties imposed as specified in Section 13332.18 of the Government Code. 1111-001-0758—For support of Medical Board of California, payable from the Contingent Fund of the Medical Board of California ........................ 83,835,000 Schedule: (1) 1150019-Medical Board of California—​Support ........................ 85,993,000 (2) 1150013-Medical Board of California—​Distributed ........................ −1,774,000 (3) Reimbursements to 1150019-Medical Board of California—​Support ........................ −384,000 Provisions: 1. The amount appropriated in this item may include revenues derived from the assessment of fines and penalties imposed as specified in Section 13332.18 of the Government Code. 1111-001-0759—For support of Physical Therapy Board of California, payable from the Physical Therapy Fund ........................ 7,410,000 Schedule: (1) 1160-Physical Therapy Board of California ........................ 7,509,000 (2) Reimbursements to 1160-Physical Therapy Board of California ........................ −99,000 Provisions: 1. The amount appropriated in this item may include revenues derived from the assessment of fines and penalties imposed as specified in Section 13332.18 of the Government Code. 1111-001-0761—For support of Board of Registered Nursing, payable from the Board of Registered Nursing Fund ........................ 63,513,000 Schedule: (1) 1220-Board of Registered Nursing ........................ 64,527,000 (2) Reimbursements to 1220-Board of Registered Nursing ........................ −1,014,000 Provisions: 1. The amount appropriated in this item may include revenues derived from the assessment of fines and penalties imposed as specified in Section 13332.18 of the Government Code. 1111-001-0763—For support of State Board of Optometry, payable from the Optometry Fund ........................ 3,720,000 Schedule: (1) 1196010-State Board of Optom­etry—​Support ........................ 3,813,000 (2) Reimbursements to 1196010-State Board of Optometry—​Support ........................ −93,000 Provisions: 1. The amount appropriated in this item may include revenues derived from the assessment of fines and penalties imposed as specified in Section 13332.18 of the Government Code. 1111-001-0767—For support of California State Board of Pharmacy, payable from the Pharmacy Board Contingent Fund ........................ 37,922,000 Schedule: (1) 1210-California State Board of Pharmacy ........................ 38,173,000 (2) Reimbursements to 1210-California State Board of Pharmacy ........................ −251,000 Provisions: 1. The amount appropriated in this item may include revenues derived from the assessment of fines and penalties imposed as specified in Section 13332.18 of the Government Code. 2. Up to $1,732,000 of the amount in this item for the business modernization implementation costs is contingent upon approval by the California Department of Technology of Stage 4 of the Project Approval Lifecycle process. 1111-001-0770—For support of Board for Professional Engineers, Land Surveyors, and Geologists, payable from the Professional Engineer’s, Land Surveyor’s, and Geologist’s Fund ........................ 13,525,000 Schedule: (1) 1215014-Board for Professional Engineers, Land Surveyors, and Geologists ........................ 13,542,000 (2) Reimbursements to 1215014-Board for Professional Engineers, Land Surveyors, and Geologists ........................ −17,000 Provisions: 1. The amount appropriated in this item may include revenues derived from the assessment of fines and penalties imposed as specified in Section 13332.18 of the Government Code. 1111-001-0771—For support of Court Reporters Board of California, payable from the Court Reporters’ Fund ........................ 1,293,000 Schedule: (1) 1225010-Court Reporters Board of California—​Support ........................ 1,311,000 (2) Reimbursements to 1225010-Court Reporters Board of California—​Support ........................ −18,000 Provisions: 1. The amount appropriated in this item may include revenues derived from the assessment of fines and penalties imposed as specified in Section 13332.18 of the Government Code. 1111-001-0773—For support of Board of Behavioral Sciences, payable from the Behavioral Sciences Fund, Professions and Vocations Fund ........................ 14,684,000 Schedule: (1) 1115-Board of Behavioral Sciences ........................ 14,734,000 (2) Reimbursements to 1115-Board of Behavioral Sciences ........................ −50,000 Provisions: 1. The amount appropriated in this item may include revenues derived from the assessment of fines and penalties imposed as specified in Section 13332.18 of the Government Code. 1111-001-0775—For support of Structural Pest Control Board, payable from the Structural Pest Control Fund ........................ 6,583,000 Schedule: (1) 1230010-Structural Pest Control Board ........................ 6,584,000 (2) Reimbursements to 1230010-Structural Pest Control Board ........................ −1,000 Provisions: 1. The amount appropriated in this item may include revenues derived from the assessment of fines and penalties imposed as specified in Section 13332.18 of the Government Code. 1111-001-0777—For support of Veterinary Medical Board, payable from the Veterinary Medical Board Contingent Fund ........................ 8,828,000 Schedule: (1) 1235-California Veterinary Medical Board ........................ 8,854,000 (2) Reimbursements to 1235-California Veterinary Medical Board ........................ −26,000 Provisions: 1. The amount appropriated in this item may include revenues derived from the assessment of fines and penalties imposed as specified in Section 13332.18 of the Government Code. 1111-001-0779—For support of Board of Vocational Nursing and Psychiatric Technicians of the State of California, payable from the Vocational Nursing and Psychiatric Technicians Fund ........................ 20,036,000 Schedule: (1) 1240019-Board of Vocational Nursing and Psychiatric Technicians ........................ 20,410,000 (2) Reimbursements to 1240019-Board of Vocational Nursing and Psychiatric Technicians ........................ −374,000 Provisions: 1. The amount appropriated in this item may include revenues derived from the assessment of fines and penalties imposed as specified in Section 13332.18 of the Government Code. 1111-001-3017—For support of California Board of Occupational Therapy, payable from the Occupational Therapy Fund ........................ 3,219,000 Schedule: (1) 1190-California Board of Occupational Therapy ........................ 3,241,000 (2) Reimbursements to 1190-California Board of Occupational Therapy ........................ −22,000 Provisions: 1. The amount appropriated in this item may include revenues derived from the assessment of fines and penalties imposed as specified in Section 13332.18 of the Government Code. 1111-001-3069—For support of California Board of Naturopathic Medicine, payable from the Naturopathic Doctor’s Fund ........................ 678,000 Schedule: (1) 1205-California Board of Naturopathic Medicine ........................ 679,000 (2) Reimbursements to 1205-California Board of Naturopathic Medicine ........................ −1,000 Provisions: 1. The amount appropriated in this item may include revenues derived from the assessment of fines and penalties imposed as specified in Section 13332.18 of the Government Code. 1111-001-3140—For support of Dental Hygiene Board of California, payable from the State Dental Hygiene Fund ........................ 2,839,000 Schedule: (1) 1140-Dental Hygiene Board of California ........................ 2,845,000 (2) Reimbursements to 1140-Dental Hygiene Board of California ........................ −6,000 Provisions: 1. The amount appropriated in this item may include revenues derived from the assessment of fines and penalties imposed as specified in Section 13332.18 of the Government Code. 2. Of the amount appropriated in this item, $264,000 is in lieu of the appropriation provided for operating expenses necessary to manage the dental hygiene licensing examination pursuant to Section 109 of Chapter 307 of the Statutes of 2009. 1111-001-3252—For support of Department of Consumer Affairs, payable from the CURES Fund ........................ 3,978,000 Schedule: (1) 1132-Controlled Substance Utilization Review and Evaluation System ........................ 3,978,000 1111-001-3328—For support of California State Board of Pharmacy, payable from the Pharmaceutical and Sharps Stewardship Fund ........................ 277,000 Schedule: (1) 1210-California State Board of Pharmacy ........................ 277,000 1111-002-0166—For support of Arbitration Certification Program, Department of Consumer Affairs, payable from the Certification Account in the Consumer Affairs Fund ........................ 1,501,000 Schedule: (1) 1400-Arbitration Certification Program ........................ 1,501,000 Provisions: 1. The amount appropriated in this item may include revenues derived from the assessment of fines and penalties imposed as specified in Section 13332.18 of the Government Code. 1111-002-0239—For support of Bureau of Security and Investigative Services, Department of Consumer Affairs, payable from the Private Security Services Fund ........................ 18,783,000 Schedule: (1) 1405019-Bureau of Security and Investigative Services, Private Security Services Program—​Support ........................ 19,299,000 (2) Reimbursements to 1405019-Bureau of Security and Investigative Services, Private Security Services Program—​Support ........................ −516,000 Provisions: 1. The amount appropriated in this item may include revenues derived from the assessment of fines and penalties imposed as specified in Section 13332.18 of the Government Code. 1111-002-0305—For support of Bureau for Private Postsecondary Education, Department of Consumer Affairs, payable from the Private Postsecondary Education Administration Fund ........................ 17,626,000 Schedule: (1) 1410013-Bureau for Private Postsecondary Education ........................ 17,627,000 (2) Reimbursements to 1410013-Bureau for Private Postsecondary Education ........................ −1,000 Provisions: 1. The amount appropriated in this item may include revenues derived from the assessment of fines and penalties imposed as specified in Section 13332.18 of the Government Code. 2. Notwithstanding any other law, the Department of Finance may augment this item, not sooner than 10 days after notification of the necessity in writing to the chairpersons of the budget committees of both houses of the Legislature and the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, in response to increased legal costs and expenses. 1111-002-0400—For support of Bureau of Real Estate Appraisers, Department of Consumer Affairs, payable from the Real Estate Appraisers Regulation Fund ........................ 6,312,000 Schedule: (1) 1441010-Bureau of Real Estate Appraisers—​Support ........................ 6,392,000 (2) Reimbursements to 1441010-Bureau of Real Estate Appraisers—​Support ........................ −80,000 Provisions: 1. The amount appropriated in this item may include revenues derived from the assessment of fines and penalties imposed as specified in Section 13332.18 of the Government Code. 1111-002-0421—For support of Bureau of Automotive Repair, Department of Consumer Affairs, payable from the Vehicle Inspection and Repair Fund ........................ 133,223,000 Schedule: (1) 1420025-Automotive Repair and Smog Check Programs—​Support ........................ 133,412,000 (2) 1420013-Automotive Repair and Smog Check Programs—​Distributed ........................ −71,000 (3) Reimbursements to 1420025-Automotive Repair and Smog Check Programs—​Support ........................ −118,000 Provisions: 1. The amount appropriated in this item may include revenues derived from the assessment of fines and penalties imposed as specified in Section 13332.18 of the Government Code. 1111-002-0582—For support of Bureau of Automotive Repair, Department of Consumer Affairs, payable from the High Polluter Repair or Removal Account ........................ 51,505,000 Schedule: (1) 1420033-HPRRA—​Vehicle Repair Assistance ........................ 2,786,000 (2) 1420037-HPRRA—​Vehicle Retirement ........................ 38,723,000 (3) 1420041-HPRRA—​Program Administration ........................ 9,996,000 Provisions: 1. The amount appropriated in this item may include revenues derived from the assessment of fines and penalties imposed as specified in Section 13332.18 of the Government Code. 2. Notwithstanding Section 26.00, the Department of Finance may authorize transfers among and between Schedules (1) and (2). Any transfer made pursuant to this provision shall be reported in writing to the chairpersons of the fiscal committees of each house of the Legislature and the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee within 30 days of the date of the transfer. 1111-002-0702—For support of Department of Consumer Affairs, payable from the Consumer Affairs Fund ........................ 0 Schedule: (1) 1425041-Division of Investigation ........................ 47,266,000 (2) 1425045-DCA Workers Compensation ........................ 4,263,000 (3) 1425049-Consumer and Client Services Division ........................ 99,850,000 (4) 1426041-Distributed Division of Investigation ........................ −47,266,000 (5) 1426045-Distributed DCA Workers Compensation ........................ −4,263,000 (6) 1426049-Distributed Consumer and Client Services Division ........................ −98,169,000 (7) Reimbursements to 1425049-Consumer and Client Services Division ........................ −1,681,000 Provisions: 1. The amount appropriated in this item may include revenues derived from the assessment of fines and penalties imposed as specified in Section 13332.18 of the Government Code. 2. The Director of the Department of Consumer Affairs shall report progress on the Release 3 entities’ transition to a new licensing technology platform to the appropriate committees of the Legislature by December 31 of each year. Progress reports shall include updated plans and timelines for completing: (a) business process documentation; (b) cost-benefit analyses of IT options; (c) IT system development and implementation; (d) any other relevant steps needed to meet the IT needs of the Release 3 entities; and (e) other information as the Legislature may request. 1111-002-0717—For support of Cemetery and Funeral Bureau, Department of Consumer Affairs, payable from the Cemetery and Funeral Fund, Professions and Vocations Fund ........................ 6,959,000 Schedule: (1) 1435019-Cemetery and Funeral Bureau ........................ 7,090,000 (2) Reimbursements to 1435019-Cemetery and Funeral Bureau ........................ −131,000 Provisions: 1. The amount appropriated in this item may include revenues derived from the assessment of fines and penalties imposed as specified in Section 13332.18 of the Government Code. 1111-002-0890—For support of Bureau of Real Estate Appraisers, Department of Consumer Affairs, payable from the Federal Trust Fund ........................ 320,000 Schedule: (1) 1441010-Bureau of Real Estate Appraisers—​Support ........................ 320,000 1111-002-0960—For support of Bureau for Private Postsecondary Education, Department of Consumer Affairs, payable from the Student Tuition Recovery Fund ........................ 3,101,000 Schedule: (1) 1410014-Student Tuition Recovery Program ........................ 3,101,000 Provisions: 1. The amount appropriated in this item may include revenues derived from the assessment of fines and penalties imposed as specified in Section 13332.18 of the Government Code. 1111-002-3108—For support of Professional Fiduciaries Bureau, Department of Consumer Affairs, payable from the Professional Fiduciary Fund ........................ 1,025,000 Schedule: (1) 1450-Professional Fiduciaries Bureau ........................ 1,026,000 (2) Reimbursements to 1450-Professional Fiduciaries Bureau ........................ −1,000 Provisions: 1. The amount appropriated in this item may include revenues derived from the assessment of fines and penalties imposed as specified in Section 13332.18 of the Government Code. 1111-002-3122—For support of Bureau of Automotive Repair, Department of Consumer Affairs, payable from the Enhanced Fleet Modernization Subaccount in the High Polluter Repair or Removal Account ........................ 30,525,000 Schedule: (1) 1420049-EFMP—​Off-Cycle Vehicle Retirement ........................ 29,500,000 (2) 1420057-EFMP—​Program Administration ........................ 1,025,000 Provisions: 1. Notwithstanding any other law, upon request of the Department of Consumer Affairs, the Department of Finance may augment the amount available for expenditure to pay for additional off-cycle retirements. The augmentation may be made no sooner than 30 days after notification in writing to the chairpersons of the committees in each house of the Legislature that consider appropriations and the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, or no sooner than whatever lesser time the chairperson of the joint committee may in each instance determine. The amount of funds augmented shall be consistent with actual program participation and available revenues in the Enhanced Fleet Modernization Subaccount. 1111-002-3438—For support of Bureau of Household Goods and Services, payable from the Household Goods and Services Fund, Professions and Vocations Fund ........................ 13,136,000 Schedule: (1) 1415040-Bureau of Household Goods and Services—​Support ........................ 13,154,000 (2) Reimbursements to 1415040-Bureau of Household Goods and Services—​Support ........................ −18,000 Provisions: 1. The amount appropriated in this item may include revenues derived from the assessment of fines and penalties imposed as specified in Section 13332.18 of the Government Code. 1111-002-9250—For support of State Athletic Commission, payable from the Boxers’ Pension Fund ........................ 59,000 Schedule: (1) 1110040-State Athletic Com­mission—​Boxers’ Pension ........................ 59,000 Provisions: 1. The amount appropriated in this item may include revenues derived from the assessment of fines and penalties imposed as specified in Section 13332.18 of the Government Code. 1111-011-0001—For transfer by the Controller to the Private Postsecondary Education Administration Fund ........................ 10,000,000 Provisions: 1. Upon order of the Department of Finance, the Controller shall transfer up to $10,000,000 to backfill the Private Postsecondary Education Administration Fund. 2. The transfer amount shall be used to repay a 2025–26 loan of the same amount to the Private Postsecondary Education Administration Fund from the High Polluter Repair or Removal Account, that was made available pursuant to Provision 3 of Item 1111-002-0305, Budget Act of 2025 (Chs. 4 and 5, Stats. 2025) and used to pay for legal costs and expenses. 1111-401—It is recognized that the healing arts boards within the Department of Consumer Affairs are incurring enforcement costs for Attorney General and Office of Administrative Hearings services that could have a fiscal impact beyond the amounts appropriated in their respective Budget Act items. Therefore, notwithstanding any other law, upon the request of the Department of Consumer Affairs, the Department of Finance may augment the amount available for expenditure for each healing arts board’s appropriation by up to $200,000 to pay Attorney General enforcement costs, and by up to $40,000 to pay Office of Administrative Hearings enforcement costs. If the augmentation of the appropriation for a healing arts board exceeds $200,000 for Attorney General enforcement costs or $40,000 for Office of Administrative Hearings enforcement costs, the augmentation may be made no sooner than 30 days after notification in writing to the chairpersons of the committees in each house of the Legislature that consider appropriations and the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, or no sooner than whatever lesser time the chairperson of the joint committee may in each instance determine. The Director of Consumer Affairs shall provide a report on or before April 1, 2027, on actual Attorney General and Office of Administrative Hearings augmentations made during the 2026–27 fiscal year, as well as a projection of future funding needs for the remainder of the fiscal year. 1115-001-3288—For support of Department of Cannabis Control, payable from the Cannabis Control Fund ........................ 104,328,000 Schedule: (1) 1460010-Department of Cannabis Control—​Support ........................ 104,782,000 (2) Reimbursements to 1460010-Department of Cannabis Control—​Support ........................ −454,000 Provisions: 1. The amount appropriated in this item may include revenues derived from the assessment of fines and penalties imposed as specified in Section 13332.18 of the Government Code. 2. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (1), up to $4,100,000 is available for expenditure for Office of Administrative Hearings costs. 3. The Department of Finance may augment this item by an amount not to exceed available funding in the Cannabis Control Fund, after review of a request submitted by the Department of Cannabis Control that demonstrates a need for additional resources for litigation and administrative hearings associated with the implementation of the Medicinal and Adult-Use Cannabis Regulation and Safety Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 26000) of the Business and Professions Code). Any augmentation shall be authorized not sooner than 30 days after notification in writing to the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, or not sooner than whatever lesser time the chairperson, or their designee, may determine. The written notification to the chairperson for funds for litigation and administrative hearing costs shall include the total costs needed and a description of the impacts and factors creating the need for additional funds. 4. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (1) of this item, $568,000 is to reimburse the State Department of Public Health for lease-revenue bond base rental payments associated with the Department of Cannabis Control’s occupancy in the State Department of Public Health’s Richmond Laboratory. The Controller shall transfer funds appropriated in Schedule (1) of this item to the State Department of Public Health, in the amount shown in this provision as and when provided in the schedule submitted by the State Public Works Board. 5. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (1) of this item, $7,166,000 shall be made available for the implementation of the Cannabis Systems Integration project and is contingent upon approval by the Department of Technology Project Approval Lifecycle process. 6. The Department of Finance may authorize a short-term cash loan of up to $52,000,000 from the Cannabis Control Fund to the California Cannabis Tax Fund Cannabis Tax Fund - Department of Cannabis Control to provide cashflow needed to support the operational costs of the Department of Cannabis Control that will be covered by tax revenue received beginning in November of the 2026–27 fiscal year. The cash loan shall be repaid before the end of the 2026–27 fiscal year. Interest charges may be waived pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 16314 of the Government Code. For purposes of the budgetary and legal bases of accounting and budgeting, the principal amount of any loans made pursuant to this provision shall not be considered part of the balance of the fund that receives the loan, nor shall it be deducted from the balance of the fund from which the loan is made. These loans are considered cashflow loans for temporary cash shortages and shall not constitute budgetary loans, revenues, or expenditures. The Department of Finance shall make the final determination of the budgetary and accounting transactions and treatments to ensure proper implementation of this provision pursuant to Section 13344 of the Government Code. 1701-001-0240—For support of Department of Financial Protection and Innovation, payable from the Local Agency Deposit Security Fund ........................ 571,000 Schedule: (1) 1545-Administration of Local Agency Security ........................ 571,000 1701-001-0299—For support of Department of Financial Protection and Innovation, payable from the Credit Union Fund ........................ 14,607,000 Schedule: (1) 1550-Credit Unions ........................ 14,957,000 (2) Reimbursements to 1550-Credit Unions ........................ −350,000 1701-001-3363—For support of Department of Financial Protection and Innovation, payable from the Financial Protection Fund ........................ 165,441,000 Schedule: (1) 1510-Investment Program ........................ 44,441,000 (2) 1515-Lender-Fiduciary Program ........................ 36,379,000 (3) 1520-Licensing and Supervision of Banks and Trust Companies ........................ 36,713,000 (4) 1525-Money Transmitters ........................ 7,164,000 (5) 1556-California Consumer Financial Protection ........................ 15,569,000 (6) 1557-Debt Collectors ........................ 14,543,000 (7) 1558-Digital Financial Assets ........................ 11,532,000 (8) Reimbursements to 1520-Licensing and Supervision of Banks and Trust Companies ........................ −900,000 Provisions: 1. The amount appropriated in this item may include revenues derived from the assessment of fines and penalties imposed as specified in Section 13332.18 of the Government Code. 2. The Department of Financial Protection and Innovation shall submit an annual report to the Department of Finance and to the Legislature on January 10 with the new release of the Governor’s Budget each year beginning in 2016. This report shall include, as part of the Broker-Dealer and Investment Adviser Program, the number of positions authorized and filled, the number and share of licensees examined, results and outcomes of those examinations, and estimated staffing levels required to achieve targeted examination cycles for licensees under this program. 3. On or before March 1, 2027, 2026, and annually thereafter, the commissioner shall report to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, the Senate Banking and Financial Institutions Committee, and the Assembly Banking and Finance Committee the projected and actual revenues and expenditures, including the difference between revenues and expenditures for the immediately preceding fiscal year for each of the following subprograms administered by the Department of Financial Protection and Innovation: 1) Broker-Dealers and Investment Advisers, 2) Franchise Investments, 3) Mortgage Bankers, 4) California Finance Lenders, 5) Escrow, 6) Deferred Deposit Transactions, 7) Banks, 8) Money Transmitters, 9) New Covered Persons, 10) Debt Collectors, and 11) Digital Financial Assets programs. Where applicable, the projected and actual revenues reported shall be categorized and reported as exam or non-exam revenues. The first report required for the Digital Financial Assets Law subprogram shall be submitted on or before February 1, 2027, and subsequent reports shall will be provided by March 1 of that year. 1750-001-3153—For support of California Horse Racing Board, payable from the Horse Racing Fund ........................ 16,013,000 Schedule: (1) 1610-California Horse Racing Board ........................ 16,013,000 Provisions: 1. Pursuant to Section 19616.51 of the Business and Professions Code, all racing associations and fairs including all breeds of racing shall remit a license fee to the California Horse Racing Board to be deposited in the Horse Racing Fund. For the 2026–27 fiscal year, each racing association and fair shall pay a proportionate share of $17,157,000 including any current year adjustments, in the form of a license fee in accordance with a formula developed by the board. 1750-001-3380—For support of California Horse Racing Board, payable from the Horse and Jockey Safety and Welfare Account ........................ 971,000 Schedule: (1) 1610-California Horse Racing Board ........................ 971,000 1750-002-3153—For support of the California Horse Racing Board, payable from the Horse Racing Fund ........................ 2,904,000 Schedule: (1) 1610-California Horse Racing Board ........................ 2,904,000 Provisions: 1. Upon order of the Department of Finance, this item may be augmented by an amount necessary to cover increases in costs associated with the agreement with the Horseracing Integrity and Safety Authority that occur at the beginning of the calendar year. 2100-001-3036—For support of Department of Alcoholic Beverage Control, payable from the Alcohol Beverage Control Fund ........................ 105,786,000 Schedule: (1) 1640010-Licensing ........................ 39,761,000 (2) 1640019-Compliance ........................ 71,172,000 (3) Reimbursements to 1640010-Licensing ........................ −850,000 (4) Reimbursements to 1640019-Compliance ........................ −4,297,000 2100-101-3036—For local assistance, Department of Alcoholic Beverage Control, for grants to local law enforcement agencies, payable from the Alcohol Beverage Control Fund ........................ 3,000,000 Schedule: (1) 1640019-Compliance ........................ 3,000,000 Provisions: 1. Notwithstanding any other law, the Department of Alcoholic Beverage Control is authorized to grant funds to local law enforcement agencies for the purpose of enhancing enforcement of alcoholic beverage control laws in the local jurisdiction. 2. Notwithstanding any other law, at the discretion of the Director of Alcoholic Beverage Control, the Department of Alcoholic Beverage Control may advance grant funds to local law enforcement agencies. 3. Notwithstanding any other law, at the discretion of the Director of Alcoholic Beverage Control, title to any authorized equipment purchased by the local law enforcement agency pursuant to the grant may be vested in the local law enforcement agency at the conclusion of the grant period. 2120-001-0117—For support of Alcoholic Beverage Control Appeals Board, payable from the Alcoholic Beverage Control Appeals Fund ........................ 1,438,000 Schedule: (1) 1650-Administrative Review ........................ 1,438,000 2320-001-0317—For support of Department of Real Estate, payable from the Real Estate Fund ........................ 67,420,000 Schedule: (1) 1700010-Department of Real Estate—​Support ........................ 67,855,000 (2) Reimbursements to 1700010-Department of Real Estate—​Support ........................ −435,000 Provisions: 1. The amount appropriated in this item may include revenues derived from the assessment of fines and penalties imposed as specified in Section 13332.18 of the Government Code. 2320-001-3295—For support of Department of Real Estate, payable from the Education and Research Account ........................ 200,000 Schedule: (1) 1700030-Department of Real Estate—​Education and Research ........................ 200,000 Provisions: 1. The amount appropriated in this item shall be used for the advancement of education and research in real estate at the University of California, state colleges, and community colleges, or in contracting for a particular real estate research project for the state as specified in Section 10451.5 of the Business and Professions Code. HOUSING AND HOMELESSNESS AGENCY 1700-001-0001—For support of Civil Rights Department ........................ 63,364,000 Schedule: (1) 1490-Administration of Civil Rights Law ........................ 62,714,000 (2) 1495-Civil Rights Council ........................ 221,000 (3) 1500-Department of Justice Legal Services ........................ 429,000 1700-001-0890—For support of Civil Rights Department, payable from the Federal Trust Fund ........................ 5,756,000 Schedule: (1) 1490-Administration of Civil Rights Law ........................ 5,756,000 1700-001-3246—For support of Civil Rights Department, payable from the Civil Rights Enforcement and Litigation Fund ........................ 493,000 Schedule: (1) 1490-Administration of Civil Rights Law ........................ 493,000 2240-001-0001—For support of Department of Housing and Community Development ........................ 48,057,00048,557,000 Schedule: (1) 1660-Codes and Standards Program ........................ 2,640,000 (2) 1665-Financial Assistance Program ........................ 14,570,00015,070,000 (3) 1670-Housing Policy Development Program ........................ 30,847,000 Provisions: 1. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (2), $500,000 shall be available for a one-time regional pilot program for building more online awareness of affordable housing opportunities. 2240-001-0245—For support of Department of Housing and Community Development, payable from the Mobilehome Parks and Special Occupancy Parks Revolving Fund ........................ 10,986,000 Schedule: (1) 1660-Codes and Standards Program ........................ 10,986,000 2240-001-0530—For support of Department of Housing and Community Development, payable from the Mobilehome Park Rehabilitation and Purchase Fund ........................ 1,813,000 Schedule: (1) 1665-Financial Assistance Program ........................ 1,813,000 2240-001-0648—For support of Department of Housing and Community Development, payable from the Mobilehome-Manufactured Home Revolving Fund ........................ 27,002,000 Schedule: (1) 1660-Codes and Standards Program ........................ 27,002,000 (2) 1665-Financial Assistance Program ........................ 1,073,000 (3) Reimbursements to 1665-Financial Assistance Program ........................ −1,073,000 Provisions: 1. Notwithstanding Section 18077 of the Health and Safety Code or any other law, the first $1,888,000 in revenues collected by the Department of Housing and Community Development from manufactured home license fees shall be deposited in the Mobilehome-Manufactured Home Revolving Fund, and shall be available to the department for the support, collection, administration, and enforcement of manufactured home license fees. 2. For purposes of expenditures under this item, the Department of Housing and Community Development shall not be required to comply with the reporting requirement of Section 18077.5 of the Health and Safety Code. 2240-001-0813—For support of Department of Housing and Community Development, payable from the Self-Help Housing Fund ........................ 237,000 Schedule: (1) 1665-Financial Assistance Program ........................ 237,000 2240-001-0890—For support of Department of Housing and Community Development, payable from the Federal Trust Fund ........................ 29,040,000 Schedule: (1) 1660-Codes and Standards Program ........................ 344,000 (2) 1665-Financial Assistance Program ........................ 28,696,000 2240-001-0929—For support of Department of Housing and Community Development, payable from the Housing Rehabilitation Loan Fund ........................ 10,576,000 Schedule: (1) 1665-Financial Assistance Program ........................ 10,576,000 2240-001-0980—For support of Department of Housing and Community Development, payable from the Predevelopment Loan Fund ........................ 594,000 Schedule: (1) 1665-Financial Assistance Program ........................ 594,000 2240-001-3144—For support of Department of Housing and Community Development, payable from the Building Standards Administration Special Revolving Fund ........................ 1,479,000 Schedule: (1) 1660-Codes and Standards Program ........................ 1,479,000 2240-001-3237—For support of Department of Housing and Community Development, payable from the Cost of Implementation Account, Air Pollution Control Fund ........................ 286,000 Schedule: (1) 1670-Housing Policy Development Program ........................ 286,000 2240-001-3329—For support of Department of Housing and Community Development, payable from the Mobilehome Dispute Resolution Fund ........................ 4,012,000 Schedule: (1) 1660-Codes and Standards Program ........................ 4,012,000 2240-001-3419—For support of Department of Housing and Community Development, payable from the Mobilehome and Recreational Vehicle Park Training Fund ........................ 1,349,000 Schedule: (1) 1660-Codes and Standards Program ........................ 1,349,000 2240-001-3425—For support of Department of Housing and Community Development, payable from the Employee Housing Regulation Fund ........................ 1,814,000 Schedule: (1) 1660-Codes and Standards Program ........................ 1,814,000 2240-001-6069—For support of Department of Housing and Community Development, payable from the Regional Planning, Housing, and Infill Incentive Account, Housing and Emergency Shelter Trust Fund of 2006 ........................ 2,057,000 Schedule: (1) 1665-Financial Assistance Program ........................ 2,057,000 2240-001-9736—For support of Department of Housing and Community Development, payable from the Transit-Oriented Development Implementation Fund ........................ 1,005,000 Schedule: (1) 1665-Financial Assistance Program ........................ 1,005,000 2240-003-3317—For support of Department of Housing and Community Development, payable from the Building Homes and Jobs Trust Fund ........................ 9,353,000 Schedule: (1) 1665-Financial Assistance Program ........................ 9,353,000 2240-003-6068—For support of Department of Housing and Community Development, payable from the Affordable Housing Innovation Fund ........................ 1,517,000 Schedule: (1) 1665-Financial Assistance Program ........................ 1,517,000 2240-003-6069—For support of Department of Housing and Community Development, payable from the Regional Planning, Housing, and Infill Incentive Account, Housing and Emergency Shelter Trust Fund of 2006 ........................ 2,165,000 Schedule: (1) 1665-Financial Assistance Program ........................ 2,165,000 2240-003-9736—For support of Department of Housing and Community Development, payable from the Transit-Oriented Development Implementation Fund ........................ 1,100,000 Schedule: (1) 1665-Financial Assistance Program ........................ 1,100,000 2240-004-3317—For support of Department of Housing and Community Development, payable from the Building Homes and Jobs Trust Fund ........................ 824,000 Schedule: (1) 1670-Housing Policy Development Program ........................ 824,000 2240-005-3317—For support of Department of Housing and Community Development, payable from the Building Homes and Jobs Trust Fund ........................ 1,641,000 Schedule: (1) 1665-Financial Assistance Program ........................ 1,641,000 2240-011-3317—For transfer by the Controller, upon the order of the Department of Finance, from the Building Homes and Jobs Trust Fund to the Housing Rehabilitation Loan Fund ........................ (1,000) Provisions: 1. This transfer fulfills the requirements in Section 50470 of the Health and Safety Code to transfer any unused or returned funds in the Building Homes and Jobs Trust Fund to the Multifamily Housing Program. 2. Notwithstanding any other law, the Department of Finance may adjust the amount transferred by this item to align with the amount of unused or returned funds in the Building Homes and Jobs Trust Fund pursuant to Section 50470 of the Health and Safety Code. 2240-101-0001—For local assistance, Department of Housing and Community Development ........................ 5,629,000 Schedule: (1) 1665-Financial Assistance Program ........................ 5,629,000 2240-101-0890—For local assistance, Department of Housing and Community Development, payable from the Federal Trust Fund ........................ 225,000,000 Schedule: (1) 1665-Financial Assistance Program ........................ 225,000,000 2240-101-6069—For local assistance, Department of Housing and Community Development, payable from the Regional Planning, Housing, and Infill Incentive Account, Housing and Emergency Shelter Trust Fund of 2006 ........................ 1,000 Schedule: (1) 1665-Financial Assistance Program ........................ 1,000 Provisions: 1. The Department of Finance may authorize an increase in this appropriation, up to the total amount of proceeds available. Any approved increase shall correspond to the level of awards anticipated by the Department of Housing and Community Development. 2. The funds appropriated in this item shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2031. 3. The funds appropriated in this item shall be available for liquidation of encumbrances until June 30, 2031. The Department of Finance may authorize an extension of the liquidation period if it is determined that an extension is needed to facilitate a project’s completion. 2240-101-6082—For local assistance, Department of Housing and Community Development, payable from the Housing for Veterans Fund ........................ 1,000 Schedule: (1) 1665-Financial Assistance Program ........................ 1,000 Provisions: 1. The Department of Finance may authorize an increase in this appropriation, up to the total amount of proceeds available pursuant to the Veterans Housing and Homeless Prevention Bond Act of 2014. Any approved increase shall correspond to the level of awards anticipated by the Department of Housing and Community Development. 2. The funds appropriated in this item shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2031. 3. Notwithstanding Section 16304.1 of the Government Code, funds appropriated in this item shall be available for liquidation of encumbrances until June 30, 2031. The Department of Finance may authorize an extension of the liquidation period if it is determined that an extension is needed to facilitate a project’s completion. 2240-102-0001—For local assistance, Department of Housing and Community Development ........................ 42,300,000 Schedule: (1) 1665-Financial Assistance Program ........................ 42,300,000 Provisions: 1. Of the amount appropriated in this item, $33,300,000 shall be allocated for the Transitional Housing Program pursuant to Section 50807 of the Health and Safety Code. 2. Of the amount appropriated in this item, $9,000,000 shall be allocated for the THP-Plus Housing Supplement Program pursuant to Section 50820 of the Health and Safety Code. 2240-103-0001—For local assistance, Department of Housing and Community Development ........................ 13,700,000 Schedule: (1) 1665-Financial Assistance Program ........................ 13,700,000 Provisions: 1. The funds appropriated in this item shall be allocated to counties for the support of housing navigators to help young adults 18 through 24 years of age secure and maintain housing, with priority given to young adults in the foster care system. 2. The Department of Housing and Community Development may consult with the State Department of Social Services to develop an allocation schedule for the purpose of distributing these funds to counties. These funds shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until October 30, 2028, and for liquidation until October 30, 2030. 2240-103-3317—For local assistance, Department of Housing and Community Development, payable from the Building Homes and Jobs Trust Fund ........................ 192,502,000 Schedule: (1) 1665-Financial Assistance Program ........................ 192,502,000 Provisions: 1. The Department of Finance may authorize an increase in this appropriation, up to the total amount of proceeds available for this purpose pursuant to subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 50470 of the Health and Safety Code. 2. The funds appropriated in this item shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2029. 3. Notwithstanding Section 16304.1 of the Government Code, funds appropriated in this item shall be available for liquidation of encumbrances until June 30, 2032. The Department of Finance may authorize an extension of the liquidation period if it is determined that an extension is needed to facilitate a project’s completion. 2240-103-6068—For local assistance, Department of Housing and Community Development, payable from the Affordable Housing Innovation Fund ........................ 1,000 Schedule: (1) 1665-Financial Assistance Program ........................ 1,000 Provisions: 1. The Department of Finance may authorize an increase in this appropriation, up to the total amount of proceeds available. Any approved increase shall correspond to the level of awards anticipated by the Department of Housing and Community Development. 2. The funds appropriated in this item shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2031. 3. Notwithstanding Section 16304.1 of the Government Code, funds appropriated in this item shall be available for liquidation of encumbrances until June 30, 2031. The Department of Finance may authorize an extension of the liquidation period if it is determined that an extension is needed to facilitate a project’s completion. 2240-103-9736—For local assistance, Department of Housing and Community Development, payable from the Transit-Oriented Development Implementation Fund ........................ 1,000 Schedule: (1) 1665-Financial Assistance Program ........................ 1,000 Provisions: 1. The Department of Finance may authorize an increase in this appropriation, up to the total amount of proceeds available. Any approved increase shall correspond to the level of awards anticipated by the Department of Housing and Community Development. 2. The funds appropriated in this item shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2031. 3. The funds appropriated in this item shall be available for liquidation of encumbrances until June 30, 2031. The Department of Finance may authorize an extension of the liquidation period if it is determined that an extension is needed to facilitate a project’s completion. 2240-104-3317—For local assistance, Department of Housing and Community Development, payable from the Building Homes and Jobs Trust Fund ........................ 13,750,000 Schedule: (1) 1670-Housing Policy Development Program ........................ 13,750,000 Provisions: 1. The Department of Finance may authorize an increase in this appropriation, up to the total amount of proceeds available for this purpose pursuant to clause (i) of subparagraph (C) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 50470 of the Health and Safety Code. 2. The funds appropriated in this item shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2029. 3. Notwithstanding Section 16304.1 of the Government Code, funds appropriated in this item shall be available for liquidation of encumbrances until June 30, 2032. The Department of Finance may authorize an extension of the liquidation period if it is determined that an extension is needed to facilitate a project’s completion. 2240-105-3317—For local assistance, Department of Housing and Community Development, payable from the Building Homes and Jobs Trust Fund ........................ 27,500,000 Schedule: (1) 1665-Financial Assistance Program ........................ 27,500,000 Provisions: 1. The Department of Finance may authorize an increase in this appropriation, up to the total amount of proceeds available for this purpose pursuant to clause (ii) of subparagraph (C) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 50470 of the Health and Safety Code. 2. The funds appropriated in this item shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2029. 3. Notwithstanding Section 16304.1 of the Government Code, funds appropriated in this item shall be available for liquidation of encumbrances until June 30, 2032. The Department of Finance may authorize an extension of the liquidation period if it is determined that an extension is needed to facilitate a project’s completion. 2240-110-0001—For local assistance, Department of Housing and Community Development500,000,000Schedule:(1)1665-Financial Assistance Program500,000,000Provisions:1.The funds appropriated in this item shall be for the CalHome Program and shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2031.2.Upon order of the Department of Finance, up to 5 percent of the funds appropriated in Schedule (1) may be transferred to Schedule (2) of Item 2240-001-0001 for the costs to administer the CalHome Program and shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2031. 2240-121-0001—For local assistance, Department of Housing and Community Development ........................ 500,000,000400,000,000 Schedule: (1) 1670-Housing Policy Development Program ........................ 500,000,000400,000,000 Provisions: 1. The funds appropriated in this item shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2031. 2. Upon order of the Department of Finance, up to 5 percent of the funds appropriated in this item may be transferred to Item 2240-001-0001 for the costs to administer Round 7 of the Homeless Housing, Assistance, and Prevention Program, and shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2031. 3. Funds appropriated in this item shall be available subject to the adoption of accountability measures identified in Senate Bill 131 (Ch. 24, Stats. 2025). 4. This appropriation is in addition to the $500,000,000 appropriated for Round 7 of the Homeless Housing, Assistance, and Prevention Program in Section 50245 of the Health and Safety Code. 5.It is the intent of the Legislature to authorize Round 8 of the Homeless Housing, Assistance, and Prevention Program and to appropriate up to $1,000,000,000 for that purpose in the 2027–28 fiscal year. 2240-126-0001—For local assistance, Department of Housing and Community Development ........................ 500,000,000200,000,000 Schedule: (1) 1665-Financial Assistance Program ........................ 500,000,000200,000,000 Provisions: 1. The funds appropriated in this item shall be for the Multifamily Housing Program and shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2031. 2. Notwithstanding any other law, upon approval and order of the Department of Finance, 10 percent of the amount appropriated in this item shall be transferred to the Tribal Housing Grant Program Fund pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 50651.1 of the Health and Safety Code. 3. Upon order of the Department of Finance, up to 5 percent of the remaining funds appropriated in Schedule (1) after the transfer specified in Provision 2 may be transferred to Schedule (2) of Item 2240-001-0001 for the costs to administer the Multifamily Housing Program and shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2031. 2240-490—Reappropriation, Department of Housing and Community Development. The amounts specified in the following citations are reappropriated for the purposes provided for in those appropriations and shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2029: 0001—General Fund (1) $237,000,000 appropriated in Item 2240-105-0001, Budget Act of 2021 (Chs. 21, 69, and 240, Stats. 2021), as reappropriated by Item 2240-492, Budget Act of 2025 (Chs. 4 and 5, Stats. 2025). 2240-495—Reversion, Department of Housing and Community Development. Notwithstanding any other law, as of June 30, 2026, the balance specified below of the appropriations provided in the following citations shall revert to the balances in the fund from which the appropriations were made. 0001—General Fund (1) $603,000 of the amount appropriated for the Encampment Resolution Funding program in Item 0515-105-0001, Budget Act of 2022 (Chs. 43, 45, and 249, Stats. 2022), as transferred to technical Item 2240-504-0001 for fiscal year 2024–25, per subdivisions (e) and (f) of Section 50231 of the Health and Safety Code. 2245-111-0001—For transfer by the Controller, upon order of the Department of Finance, to the California Dream for All Fund500,000,000Schedule:(1)1691-California Housing Finance Agency500,000,000 2245-112-0001—For transfer by the Controller, upon order of the Department of Finance, to the Disaster Rebuilding Fund ........................ 56,000,000 Schedule: (1) 1691-California Housing Finance Agency ........................ 56,000,000 2250-001-0001—For support of Housing Development and Finance Committee ........................ 3,836,000 Schedule: (1) 1720-Housing Development and Finance Committee ........................ 3,836,000 2255-001-0001—For support of California Interagency Council on Homelessness ........................ 12,116,000 Schedule: (1) 1740-California Interagency Council on Homelessness ........................ 12,116,000 TRANSPORTATION 2600-001-0042—For support of California Transportation Commission, payable from the State Highway Account, State Transportation Fund ........................ 4,114,000 Schedule: (1) 1800-Administration of California Transportation Commission ........................ 4,114,000 2600-001-0046—For support of California Transportation Commission, payable from the Public Transportation Account, State Transportation Fund ........................ 4,692,000 Schedule: (1) 1800-Administration of California Transportation Commission ........................ 5,381,000 (2) Reimbursements to 1800-Administration of California Transportation Commission ........................ −689,000 2600-402—Before allocating projects in the 2026–27 fiscal year that would result in the issuance of notes pursuant to Section 14553 of the Government Code exceeding $300,000,000, the California Transportation Commission shall consult with the Transportation Agency, the Department of Transportation, and the Department of Finance pursuant to Section 14553.8 of the Government Code to consider and determine the appropriateness of the mechanism authorized by Section 14553 of the Government Code in comparison to other funding mechanisms, and to determine and report to the Governor and the Legislature the effect of issuance of the notes on future federal funding commitments. Allocations exceeding $300,000,000 shall not be made prior to providing 60 days’ notice to the chairpersons of the transportation committees of each house of the Legislature and the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee. 2660-001-0001—For support of Department of Transportation ........................ 6,268,000 Schedule: (1) 1835056-Maintenance ........................ 6,250,000 (2) 1850010-Equipment Service Program ........................ 18,000 2660-001-0041—For support of Department of Transportation, payable from the Aeronautics Account, State Transportation Fund ........................ 4,439,000 Schedule: (1) 1830019-Aeronautics ........................ 4,504,000 (2) Reimbursements to 1830019-Aeronautics ........................ −65,000 2660-001-0042—For support of Department of Transportation, payable from the State Highway Account, State Transportation Fund ........................ 3,514,236,0003,489,236,000 Schedule: (1) 1830019-Aeronautics ........................ 193,000 (2) 1835010-Capital Outlay Support ........................ 884,765,000 (3) 1835020-Local Assistance ........................ 67,113,000 (4) 1835029-Program Development ........................ 39,545,000 (5) 1835038-Legal ........................ 151,560,000 (6) 1835047-Operations ........................ 267,837,000 (7) 1835056-Maintenance ........................ 1,450,337,0001,425,337,000 (8) 1840019-State and Federal Mass Transit ........................ 2,342,000 (9) 1840028-Intercity Rail Passenger Program ........................ 1,418,000 (10) 1845013-Statewide Planning ........................ 83,892,000 (11) 1870-Office of Inspector General ........................ 17,890,000 (12) 9900100-Administration ........................ 466,115,000 (13) 1850010-Equipment Service Program ........................ 446,326,000 (14) Reimbursements to 1835010-Capital Outlay Support ........................ −257,907,000 (15) Reimbursements to 1835020-Local Assistance ........................ −1,526,000 (16) Reimbursements to 1835029-Program Development ........................ −860,000 (17) Reimbursements to 1835038-Legal ........................ −3,617,000 (18) Reimbursements to 1835047-Operations ........................ −7,633,000 (19) Reimbursements to 1835056-Maintenance ........................ −50,405,000 (20) Reimbursements to 1845013-Statewide Planning ........................ −5,542,000 (21) Reimbursements to 9900100-Administration ........................ −35,521,000 (22) Reimbursements to 1850010-Equipment Service Program ........................ −2,086,000 Provisions: 1. Notwithstanding any other law, funds appropriated in this item from the State Highway Account may be reduced and replaced by an equivalent amount of federal funds determined by the Department of Transportation to be available and necessary to comply with Section 8.50 and the most effective management of state transportation resources. Not more than 30 days after replacing the state funds with federal funds, the Director of Finance shall notify in writing the chairpersons of the committees in each house of the Legislature that consider appropriations and the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee of this action. 2. Notwithstanding any other law, funds appropriated in this item may be supplemented with federal funding appropriation authority and with prior fiscal year State Highway Account appropriation balances at a level determined by the Department of Transportation as required to process claims utilizing federal advance construction through the plan of financial adjustment process pursuant to Sections 11251 and 16365 of the Government Code. 3. Notwithstanding any other law, funds appropriated in Program 9900100-Administration may be reduced and replaced by an equivalent amount of reimbursements determined by the Department of Transportation to be available and necessary to comply with Section 28.50 and the most effective management of state transportation resources. The reimbursements may also be reduced and replaced by an equivalent amount of funds from the State Highway Account. Not more than 30 days after replacing the State Highway Account funds with reimbursements and vice versa, the Director of Finance shall notify in writing the chairpersons of the committees in each house of the Legislature that consider appropriations and the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee of this action. 4. Of the funds appropriated in Program 1835056-Maintenance, at least $234,000,000 is for major maintenance contracts for the preservation of highway pavement, and shall not be used to supplant any other funding that would have been used for major pavement maintenance. 5. Notwithstanding any other law, of the funds appropriated in Program 1835038-Legal, $75,556,000 is for the payment of tort lawsuit costs, claims, and awards and may be augmented by up to $20,000,000. Any funds for that purpose that are not needed as of April 1 in any given year, may revert to the originating fund source. The Department of Finance shall authorize the transfers not sooner than 30 days after notification of the necessity therefor in writing to the chairpersons of the committees in each house of the Legislature that consider appropriations and the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee. 6. The Department of Finance may augment the amount appropriated in Program 1835047-Operations, by up to $2,000,000 for the federal Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990 (42 U.S.C. Sec. 12101 et seq.) consultant contracts if the number of access requests and grievances exceeds the Department of Transportation’s projections. The Department of Finance shall authorize the augmentation not sooner than 30 days after notification of the necessity therefor in writing to the chairpersons of the committees in each house of the Legislature that consider appropriations and the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee. 7. Of the funds appropriated in Program 1845013-Statewide Planning, the Department of Transportation shall exempt project initiation document development and oversight services reimbursed from local government agencies from full cost recovery as outlined in its Indirect Cost Recovery Plan. 8. The Department of Transportation shall streamline the cooperative work agreement process related to project initiation document development and oversight to reduce costs to local agencies. 9. The Department of Finance may augment the amount appropriated in Schedule (16) by up to $900,000 for additional reimbursements from the High-Speed Rail Authority for the review and approval of environmental and engineering documents regarding circumstances in which the high-speed train system interfaces with the state highway system, as well as specific highway realignment projects related to the high-speed train system. 10. The Department of Transportation shall exempt the High-Speed Rail Authority from full cost recovery as outlined in its Indirect Cost Recovery Plan. The Department of Transportation shall charge the High-Speed Rail Authority for functional overhead. 11. The Department of Transportation shall provide data related to its 2027 –28 2027–28 fiscal year Capital Outlay Support budget request on or before May 1, 2027. 12. Of the funds appropriated in Program 1835010-Capital Outlay Support, $463,195,000 is for overhead and corporate resources in support of the Capital Outlay Support Program. This amount may be adjusted pursuant to the provisions of Section 3.60 or provisions of Items 9800-001-0001, 9800-001-0494, or 9800-001-0988 with the concurrence of the Department of Finance. The Department of Transportation shall provide quarterly reports, to the Department of Finance, of actual expenditures for overhead and corporate resources beginning October 1, 2015. In addition, the Department of Transportation, in conjunction with the Department of Finance, shall review the overhead and corporate components of the Capital Outlay Support Program. Results associated with this review shall be included in the 2026–27 fiscal year annual May Revision Finance Letter. 13. Of the funds appropriated in Program 1835010-Capital Outlay Support, the Department of Transportation shall exempt Local SB 45 STIP Projects deprogrammed from the 2016 STIP from the full cost recovery as outlined in its Indirect Cost Recovery Plan if local agencies continue those projects with other funds. The Department of Transportation shall not charge for administrative overhead for the portion of the project’s funding that was originally planned to come from the STIP before the project was deprogrammed. 14. Notwithstanding any other law, if the California Transportation Commission reprograms projects removed from the 2016 STIP, the Director of Finance may increase the expenditure authority for additional staffing for Program 1835010-Capital Outlay Support to support the reprogrammed projects not sooner than 30 days after notification in writing is made to the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee and the chairpersons of the committees in each house of the Legislature that consider appropriations and the State Budget. The notification shall include a list of the reprogrammed projects and the additional staffing required for each project. 15. Notwithstanding any other law, funds may be transferred intraschedule between Schedule (8) 1840019-State and Federal Mass Transit and Schedule (9) 1840028-Intercity Passenger Rail Program. Any transfer requires the prior approval of the Department of Finance. 16. For Program 1835010-Capital Outlay Support, appropriations include funding and expenditure authority for full-time equivalent staff at an average annual labor rate of $287,000, totaling $338,331,000 for project direct external consultant and professional services related to project delivery. 17. For Program 1835010-Capital Outlay Support, appropriations include funding and expenditure authority for state positions and personal services cash overtime totaling $1,977,642,000 in the program in the 2026 –27 2026–27 fiscal year. 18. Any funding from this item used to replace and modernize the Department of Transportation’s fleet shall prioritize spending on zero-emission vehicles whenever feasible, and when not feasible, prioritize vehicles with the lowest emissions. 19. The Department of Finance may augment the amount appropriated in Schedule (13) to align the department’s budget with actual vehicle insurance costs per the State Motor Vehicle Insurance Account Assessment Memo issued by the Department of General Services. 20. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (13) of this item, $218,061,000 shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2029, and liquidation until June 30, 2031. 21. Of the funds appropriated in Program 1835056-Maintenance, $25,000,000 is for the Clean California Program and shall be available for encumbrance and liquidation until June 30, 2028. 2660-001-0046—For support of Department of Transportation, payable from the Public Transportation Account, State Transportation Fund ........................ 295,809,000 Schedule: (1) 1835029-Program Development ........................ 2,000 (2) 1835047-Operations ........................ 207,000 (3) 1840019-State and Federal Mass Transit ........................ 18,425,000 (4) 1840028-Intercity Rail Passenger Program ........................ 257,857,000 (5) 1845013-Statewide Planning ........................ 20,158,000 (6) 1845022-Regional Planning ........................ 5,357,000 (7) Reimbursements to 1840019-State and Federal Mass Transit ........................ −5,487,000 (8) Reimbursements to 1840028-Intercity Rail Passenger Program ........................ −234,000 (9) Reimbursements to 1845013-Statewide Planning ........................ −476,000 Provisions: 1. For Program 1840028-Intercity Rail Passenger Program, $203,375,000 appropriated in this item is available for intercity rail contracts. 2. Notwithstanding any other law, funds appropriated in this item from the Public Transportation Account may be reduced and replaced by an equivalent amount of federal funds determined by the Department of Transportation to be available and necessary to comply with Section 8.50 and the most effective management of state transportation resources. Not more than 30 days after replacing the state funds with federal funds, the Director of Finance shall notify in writing the chairpersons of the committees in each house of the Legislature that consider appropriations and the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee of this action. 3. Of the funds appropriated in this item, the Department of Finance may transfer expenditure authority among schedules to accommodate increases in Amtrak contract costs related to fuel. 2660-001-0365—For support of Department of Transportation, payable from the Historic Property Maintenance Fund ........................ 1,137,000 Schedule: (1) 1835010-Capital Outlay Support ........................ 1,137,000 2660-001-0890—For support of Department of Transportation, payable from the Federal Trust Fund ........................ 1,210,351,000 Schedule: (1) 1830019-Aeronautics ........................ 470,000 (2) 1835010-Capital Outlay Support ........................ 1,041,831,000 (3) 1835020-Local Assistance ........................ 2,727,000 (4) 1835029-Program Development ........................ 38,961,000 (5) 1835047-Operations ........................ 10,536,000 (6) 1835056-Maintenance ........................ 38,103,000 (7) 1840019-State and Federal Mass Transit ........................ 6,187,000 (8) 1840028-Intercity Rail Passenger Program ........................ 17,529,000 (9) 1845013-Statewide Planning ........................ 48,363,000 (10) 1845022-Regional Planning ........................ 5,644,000 Provisions: 1. For Program 1835-Highway Transportation. For purposes of Section 163 of the Streets and Highways Code, all expenditures from this item shall be deemed to be expenditures from the State Highway Account, State Transportation Fund. 2. For Program 1835-Highway Transportation. Federal funds may be received from any federal source, and shall be deposited in the Federal Trust Fund. Any federal reimbursements shall be credited to the account from which the expenditures were originally made. 3. Notwithstanding any other law, the Director of Finance may augment this item with additional federal funds in conjunction with an equivalent offsetting reduction in State Highway Account funds in Item 2660-001-0042, pursuant to Provision 1 of that item, or Public Transportation Account funds in Item 2660-001-0046, pursuant to Provision 2 of that item. 4. Notwithstanding any other law, funds appropriated in this item may be transferred intraschedule or to Item 2660-102-0890 or 2660-302-0890. These transfers shall require the prior approval of the Department of Finance. 2660-001-3290—For support of Department of Transportation, payable from the Road Maintenance and Rehabilitation Account, State Transportation Fund ........................ 100,000,000 Schedule: (1) 1835056-Maintenance ........................ 100,000,000 Provisions: 1. The funds appropriated in this item shall be used for bridges and culvert maintenance and repair. 2660-001-3291—For support of Department of Transportation, payable from the Trade Corridor Enhancement Account, State Transportation Fund ........................ 20,881,000 Schedule: (1) 1835010-Capital Outlay Support ........................ 20,881,000 Provisions: 1. Notwithstanding any other law, funds appropriated in this item may be transferred to Items 2660-101-3291 or 2660-301-3291. These transfers shall require the prior approval of the Department of Finance. 2660-002-0042—For support of Department of Transportation, payable from the State Highway Account to fund ongoing administrative costs for federal Grant Anticipation Revenue Vehicles (GARVEE) ........................ 50,000 Schedule: (1) 9900100-Administration ........................ 50,000 2660-002-0890—For support of Department of Transportation, for debt service requirements and other financing-related costs for federal Grant Anticipation Revenue Vehicles (GARVEE) issued in the 2025–26 fiscal year, payable from the Federal Trust Fund ........................ 1,000 Schedule: (1) 9900100-Administration ........................ 1,000 Provisions: 1. Notwithstanding any other law, the funds appropriated in this item shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until expended. 2. If specific projects in the State Highway Operation and Protection Program or the State Transportation Improvement Program are identified as ready for construction funding in the 2026–27 fiscal year and cash balances are not sufficient to allocate funds to those projects, this item may be augmented by up to $300,000,000 after notifying the Joint Legislative Budget Committee no later than 30 days prior to the effective date of the approval. Any notice made pursuant to this provision shall include a description of the project or projects, the financing plans, and the cash balances of the State Highway Account. 3. The appropriation in this item reflects, in part, the pledge made by the California Transportation Commission in accordance with Section 14553.7 of the Government Code in connection with the GARVEE bonds issued in the 2025–26 fiscal year. 4. Funds appropriated in this item are in lieu of the amounts that have been appropriated pursuant to Section 14554.8 of the Government Code. 2660-002-3007—For support of Department of Transportation, payable from the Traffic Congestion Relief Fund ........................ 495,000 Schedule: (1) 1835010-Capital Outlay Support ........................ 59,000 (2) 1840019-State and Federal Mass Transit ........................ 436,000 Provisions: 1. Notwithstanding any other law, if the California Transportation Commission allocates funds to Traffic Congestion Relief Program projects in the 2026–27 fiscal year, the Director of Finance may increase expenditure authority in this item for additional capital outlay staffing directly related to new Traffic Congestion Relief Program allocations after notifying the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee and the chairpersons of the committees in each house of the Legislature that consider appropriations no later than 30 days prior to the effective date of the approval. 2660-004-6055—For support of Department of Transportation, payable from the Corridor Mobility Improvement Account, Highway Safety, Traffic Reduction, Air Quality, and Port Security Fund of 2006 ........................ 575,000 Schedule: (1) 1835029-Program Development ........................ 21,000 (2) 1870-Office of Inspector General ........................ 9,000 (3) 9900100-Administration ........................ 545,000 Provisions: 1. Notwithstanding any other law, funds appropriated in this item may be transferred to Item 2660-104-6055 or 2660-304-6055. These transfers shall require the prior approval of the Department of Finance. 2660-004-6056—For support of Department of Transportation, payable from the Trade Corridors Improvement Fund ........................ 444,000 Schedule: (1) 1835010-Capital Outlay Support ........................ 11,000 (2) 1835020-Local Assistance ........................ 174,000 (3) 1835029-Program Development ........................ 16,000 (4) 1840028-Intercity Rail Passenger Program ........................ 15,000 (5) 1845013-Statewide Planning ........................ 16,000 (6) 1870-Office of Inspector General ........................ 3,000 (7) 9900100-Administration ........................ 209,000 Provisions: 1. Notwithstanding any other law, funds appropriated in this item may be transferred to Item 2660-104-6056 or 2660-304-6056. These transfers shall require the prior approval of the Department of Finance. 2660-004-6058—For support of Department of Transportation, payable from the Transportation Facilities Account, Highway Safety, Traffic Reduction, Air Quality, and Port Security Fund of 2006 ........................ 431,000 Schedule: (1) 1835010-Capital Outlay Support ........................ 18,000 (2) 1835020-Local Assistance ........................ 121,000 (3) 1835029-Program Development ........................ 9,000 (4) 9900100-Administration ........................ 283,000 Provisions: 1. Notwithstanding any other law, funds appropriated in this item may be transferred to Item 2660-104-6058 or 2660-304-6058. These transfers shall require the prior approval of the Department of Finance. 2660-004-6059—For support of Department of Transportation, payable from the Public Transportation Modernization, Improvement, and Service Enhancement Account, Highway Safety, Traffic Reduction, Air Quality, and Port Security Fund of 2006 ........................ 381,000 Schedule: (1) 1840019-State and Federal Mass Transit ........................ 234,000 (2) 1840028-Intercity Rail Passenger Program ........................ 58,000 (3) 1870-Office of Inspector General ........................ 3,000 (4) 9900100-Administration ........................ 86,000 Provisions: 1. Notwithstanding any other law, funds appropriated in this item may be transferred to Item 2660-104-6059 or 2660-304-6059. These transfers shall require the prior approval of the Department of Finance. 2660-004-6060—For support of Department of Transportation, payable from the State-Local Partnership Program Account, Highway Safety, Traffic Reduction, Air Quality, and Port Security Fund of 2006 ........................ 373,000 Schedule: (1) 1835020-Local Assistance ........................ 292,000 (2) 1870-Office of Inspector General ........................ 14,000 (3) 9900100-Administration ........................ 67,000 2660-004-6062—For support of Department of Transportation, payable from the Local Bridge Seismic Retrofit Account, Highway Safety, Traffic Reduction, Air Quality, and Port Security Fund of 2006 ........................ 170,000 Schedule: (1) 1835020-Local Assistance ........................ 165,000 (2) 9900100-Administration ........................ 5,000 Provisions: 1. Notwithstanding any other law, funds appropriated in this item may be transferred to Item 2660-104-6062. This transfer shall require the prior approval of the Department of Finance. 2660-004-6063—For support of Department of Transportation, payable from the Highway-Railroad Crossing Safety Account, Highway Safety, Traffic Reduction, Air Quality, and Port Security Fund of 2006 ........................ 62,000 Schedule: (1) 1840028-Intercity Rail Passenger Program ........................ 44,000 (2) 1870-Office of Inspector General ........................ 2,000 (3) 9900100-Administration ........................ 16,000 Provisions: 1. Notwithstanding any other law, funds appropriated in this item may be transferred to Item 2660-104-6063. Any such transfer shall require the prior approval of the Department of Finance. 2660-004-6064—For support of Department of Transportation, payable from the Highway Safety, Rehabilitation, and Preservation Account, Highway Safety, Traffic Reduction, Air Quality, and Port Security Fund of 2006 ........................ 439,000 Schedule: (1) 1835020-Local Assistance ........................ 270,000 (2) 1835029-Program Development ........................ 4,000 (3) 1870-Office of Inspector General ........................ 3,000 (4) 9900100-Administration ........................ 162,000 Provisions: 1. Notwithstanding any other law, funds appropriated in this item may be transferred to Item 2660-104-6064 or 2660-304-6064. This transfer shall require the prior approval of the Department of Finance. 2660-004-6072—For support of Department of Transportation, payable from the State Route 99 Account, Highway Safety, Traffic Reduction, Air Quality, and Port Security Fund of 2006 ........................ 2,526,000 Schedule: (1) 1835010-Capital Outlay Support ........................ 2,370,000 (2) 1835029-Program Development ........................ 4,000 (3) 1870-Office of Inspector General ........................ 2,000 (4) 9900100-Administration ........................ 150,000 Provisions: 1. Notwithstanding any other law, funds appropriated in this item may be transferred to Item 2660-104-6072 or 2660-304-6072. This transfer shall require the prior approval of the Department of Finance. 2660-007-0042—For support of Department of Transportation, payable from the State Highway Account, State Transportation Fund ........................ 124,263,000 Schedule: (1) 1835010-Capital Outlay Support ........................ 56,689,000 (2) 1835038-Legal ........................ 976,000 (3) 1835047-Operations ........................ 2,479,000 (4) 1835056-Maintenance ........................ 64,119,000 Provisions: 1. The funds appropriated in this item may be expended only to attain compliance with (a) the stormwater discharge provisions of the National Pollutant Discharge Elimination System permits as promulgated by the State Water Resources Control Board or regional water quality control boards, (b) the Statewide Stormwater Management Plan, (c) a court order, or (d) any other nonproject water or air quality related environmental activity that protects air quality or the quality of receiving waters. 2. The funds appropriated in this item may be transferred between schedules. Any transfer requires the prior approval of the Department of Finance. 2660-008-0042—For support of Department of Transportation, Active Transportation Program, payable from the State Highway Account, State Transportation Fund ........................ 1,548,000 Schedule: (1) 1835020-Local Assistance ........................ 1,548,000 2660-009-0042—For support of Department of Transportation, Congested Corridors Program, payable from the State Highway Account, State Transportation Fund ........................ 24,743,000 Schedule: (1) 1835010-Capital Outlay Support ........................ 24,743,000 Provisions: 1. Notwithstanding any other law, funds appropriated in this item may be transferred to Item 2660-109-0042 and Item 2660-309-0042. These transfers shall require the prior approval of the Department of Finance. 2660-011-0041—For transfer by the Controller from the Aeronautics Account, State Transportation Fund, to the Public Transportation Account, State Transportation Fund, as prescribed by Section 21682.5 of the Public Utilities Code ........................ (30,000) 2660-012-0042—For augmentation for emergencies relating to a state of emergency declared by the Governor, payable from the State Highway Account ........................ (100,000,000) Provisions: 1. Required notification to the Legislature of appropriations pursuant to this item shall include, in addition to all other required information, (a) an estimate of federal funds or other funds that the department may receive for the same purposes as the proposed appropriation, and (b) explanation of the necessity of the proposed appropriation given anticipated federal funds or other funds. 2. Funds appropriated in this item may be used for support, local assistance, or capital outlay expenditures. 2660-021-0042—For transfer by the Controller from the State Highway Account, State Transportation Fund, to the Public Transportation Account, State Transportation Fund, as prescribed by Section 194 of the Streets and Highways Code ........................ (25,046,000) 2660-030-0001—For support of Department of Transportation ........................ 40,000,000 Schedule: (1) 1835056-Maintenance ........................ 40,000,000 Provisions: 1. Funds appropriated in this item shall be available for encumbrance and liquidation until June 30, 2028. 2660-101-0042—For local assistance, Department of Transportation, State Transportation Improvement Program (STIP), payable from the State Highway Account, State Transportation Fund ........................ 273,032,000 Schedule: (1) 1835020-Local Assistance ........................ 97,023,000 (a) Regional improvements ........................ (97,023,000) (b) Interregional improvements ........................ (0) (2) 1840019-State and Federal Mass Transit ........................ 176,009,000 Provisions: 1. Funds appropriated in this item shall be available for allocation by the California Transportation Commission until June 30, 2028, and available for encumbrance and liquidation until June 30, 2032. 2. Notwithstanding any other law, funds appropriated in this item may be transferred intraschedule or to Item 2660-102-0042, 2660-108-0042, 2660-301-0042, 2660-302-0042, or 2660-308-0042. These transfers shall require the prior approval of the Department of Finance. 3. Notwithstanding any other law, funds appropriated in this item may be supplemented with federal funding appropriation authority and with prior year State Highway Account appropriation balances at a level determined by the Department of Transportation as required to process claims utilizing federal advance construction through the plan of financial adjustment process under Sections 11251 and 16365 of the Government Code. 4. Notwithstanding any other law, funds appropriated in Schedule (2) may be transferred to Item 2660-101-0046. These transfers shall require the prior approval of the Department of Finance. 2660-101-0046—For local assistance, Department of Transportation, payable from the Public Transportation Account, State Transportation Fund ........................ 517,767,000 Schedule: (1) 1840019-State and Federal Mass Transit ........................ 517,767,000 Provisions: 1. Funds appropriated in this item shall be available for allocation by the California Transportation Commission until June 30, 2028, and available for encumbrance and liquidation until June 30, 2032. 2. Notwithstanding any other law, funds appropriated in this item may be transferred to Item 2660-301-0046. These transfers require the prior approval of the Department of Finance. 2660-101-0890—For local assistance, Department of Transportation, State Transportation Improvement Program (STIP), payable from the Federal Trust Fund ........................ 61,308,000 Schedule: (1) 1835020-Local Assistance ........................ 56,308,000 (a) Regional improvements ........................ (56,308,000) (b) Interregional improvements ........................ (0) (2) 1840019-State and Federal Mass Transit ........................ 5,000,000 Provisions: 1. For purposes of the Streets and Highways Code, all expenditures from this item shall be deemed to be expenditures from the State Highway Account, State Transportation Fund. 2. Federal funds may be received from any federal source and shall be deposited in the Federal Trust Fund. Any federal reimbursements shall be credited to the account from which the expenditures were originally made. 3. Notwithstanding any other law, funds appropriated in this item may be transferred intraschedule or to Item 2660-102-0890, 2660-108-0890, 2660-301-0890, 2660-302-0890, or 2660-308-0890. These transfers shall require the prior approval of the Department of Finance. 4. Funds appropriated in this item shall be available for allocation by the California Transportation Commission until June 30, 2028, and available for encumbrance and liquidation until June 30, 2032. 2660-101-3291—For local assistance, Department of Transportation, non-State Transportation Improvement Program (STIP), payable from the Trade Corridor Enhancement Account, State Transportation Fund ........................ 30,026,000 Schedule: (1) 1835020-Local Assistance ........................ 30,025,000 (2) 1840019-State and Federal Mass Transit ........................ 1,000 Provisions: 1. Funds appropriated in this item shall be available for allocation by the California Transportation Commission until June 30, 2029, and available for encumbrance and liquidation until June 30, 2032. 2. Notwithstanding any other law, funds appropriated in this item may be transferred intraschedule or to Item 2660-301-3291. These transfers shall require the prior approval of the Department of Finance. 3. Notwithstanding any other law, funds appropriated in Item 2660-001-3291 may be transferred to this item. These transfers shall require the prior approval of the Department of Finance. 2660-102-0042—For local assistance, Department of Transportation, non-State Transportation Improvement Program (STIP), payable from the State Highway Account, State Transportation Fund ........................ 233,823,000 Schedule: (1) 1835020-Local Assistance ........................ 585,163,000 (a) Regional Surface Transportation Program Exchange ........................ (78,709,000) (b) Local Assistance ........................ (481,454,000) (c) Freeway Service Patrol ........................ (25,000,000) (2) 1845022-Regional Planning ........................ 14,500,000 (3) Reimbursements to 1835020-Local Assistance ........................ −365,840,000 Provisions: 1. Funds appropriated in Schedule (1) shall be available for allocation by the California Transportation Commission until June 30, 2028, and available for encumbrance and liquidation until June 30, 2032. 2. Funds appropriated in Schedule (2) shall be available for allocation until June 30, 2028, and available for encumbrance and liquidation until June 30, 2032. 3. Notwithstanding any other law, funds appropriated in this item may be transferred intraschedule or to Item 2660-101-0042, 2660-102-0890, 2660-108-0042, 2660-301-0042, 2660-302-0042, or 2660-308-0042. These transfers shall require the prior approval of the Department of Finance. 4. Notwithstanding any other law, up to 15 percent of Schedule (1)(c) may be used to reimburse the Department of the California Highway Patrol for expenditures related to the Freeway Service Patrol Program subject to prior approval by the Department of Finance. 2660-102-0890—For local assistance, Department of Transportation, non-State Transportation Improvement Program (STIP), payable from the Federal Trust Fund ........................ 3,512,722,000 Schedule: (1) 1835020-Local Assistance ........................ 3,311,568,000 (2) 1840019-State and Federal Mass Transit ........................ 111,654,000 (3) 1845022-Regional Planning ........................ 89,500,000 Provisions: 1. Funds appropriated in Schedules (1) and (2) shall be available for allocation by the California Transportation Commission until June 30, 2028, and available for encumbrance and liquidation until June 30, 2032. 2. Funds appropriated in Schedule (3) shall be available for allocation until June 30, 2028, and available for encumbrance and liquidation until June 30, 2032. 3. Notwithstanding any other law, funds appropriated in this item may be transferred intraschedule or to Item 2660-001-0890, 2660-101-0890, 2660-102-0042, 2660-108-0890, 2660-301-0890, 2660-302-0890, or 2660-308-0890. These transfers shall require the prior approval of the Department of Finance. 4. For Program 1835020-Local Assistance. For purposes of the Streets and Highways Code, all expenditures from this item shall be deemed to be expenditures from the State Highway Account, State Transportation Fund. 5. For Program 1835020-Local Assistance. Federal funds may be received from any federal source and shall be deposited in the Federal Trust Fund. Any federal reimbursements shall be credited to the account from which the expenditures were originally made. 6. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (1), $228,501,000 shall be for the federally eligible electric vehicle infrastructure. Funds shall be available for allocation by the department in accordance with grants awarded by the California Energy Commission. 7. Upon approval of the Department of Finance, the amount appropriated in this item may be augmented to account for additional federal funds received through the annual August Redistribution process. Any augmentation shall be authorized no sooner than 30 days after notification in writing to the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, or not sooner than whatever lesser time the chairperson of the joint committee, or the chairperson’s designee, may determine. 2660-102-3290—For local assistance, Department of Transportation, payable from the Road Maintenance and Rehabilitation Account, State Transportation Fund ........................ 24,886,000 Schedule: (1) 1845022-Regional Planning ........................ 24,886,000 Provisions: 1. Funds appropriated in this item shall be used for local planning grant allocations until June 30, 2028, and available for encumbrance and liquidation until June 30, 2032. 2660-103-0042—For local assistance, Department of Transportation, payable from the State Highway Account, State Transportation Fund ........................ 15,000,000 Schedule: (1) 1835020-Local Assistance ........................ 15,000,000 Provisions: 1. Funds appropriated in this item shall be available for allocation by the California Transportation Commission until June 30, 2028, and available for encumbrance and liquidation until June 30, 2032. 2. Funds appropriated in this item shall be available for the Trade Corridor Enhancement Program for trade corridors connecting to ports. 3. Notwithstanding any other law, funds appropriated in this item may be transferred to Item 2660-302-0042. These transfers shall require the prior approval of the Department of Finance. 2660-104-6055—For local assistance, Department of Transportation, non-State Transportation Improvement Program (STIP), payable from the Corridor Mobility Improvement Account, Highway Safety, Traffic Reduction, Air Quality, and Port Security Fund of 2006 ........................ 1,000 Schedule: (1) 1835020-Local Assistance ........................ 1,000 Provisions: 1. Funds appropriated in this item shall be available for allocation by the California Transportation Commission until June 30, 2028, and available for encumbrance and liquidation until June 30, 2032. 2. Notwithstanding any other law, funds appropriated in this item may be transferred to Item 2660-304-6055. These transfers shall require the prior approval of the Department of Finance. 3. Notwithstanding any other law, funds appropriated in Item 2660-004-6055 may be transferred to this item. These transfers shall require the prior approval of the Department of Finance. 4. The amount appropriated in this item may be adjusted to an amount that would either (a) allow full utilization of the funds authorized under paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 8879.23 of the Government Code for this program, or (b) ensure that expenditures do not exceed the amount authorized under paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 8879.23 of the Government Code for this program. 5. Notwithstanding any other law, expenditures in the STIP (including the Transportation Facilities Account) in any prior year may be transferred to this item, upon the California Transportation Commission’s approved substitution of prior year STIP funds (including Transportation Facilities Account) with Corridor Mobility Improvement Account funds appropriated in this item. This will allow for the full utilization of Corridor Mobility Improvement Account funds by using project savings to fund Corridor Mobility Improvement Account eligible STIP projects in accordance with the California Transportation Commission’s adopted policy for the use of Proposition 1B savings. 2660-104-6056—For local assistance, Department of Transportation, non-State Transportation Improvement Program (STIP), payable from the Trade Corridors Improvement Fund ........................ 1,000 Schedule: (1) 1835020-Local Assistance ........................ 1,000 Provisions: 1. Funds appropriated in this item shall be available for allocation by the California Transportation Commission until June 30, 2028, and available for encumbrance and liquidation until June 30, 2032. 2. Notwithstanding any other law, funds appropriated in this item may be transferred to Item 2660-304-6056. These transfers shall require the prior approval of the Department of Finance. 3. The amount appropriated in this item may be adjusted to an amount that would either (a) allow full utilization of the funds authorized under subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) of Section 8879.23 of the Government Code for this program, or (b) ensure that expenditures do not exceed the amount authorized under subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) of Section 8879.23 of the Government Code for this program. 4. Notwithstanding any other law, funds appropriated in Item 2660-004-6056 may be transferred to this item. These transfers shall require the prior approval of the Department of Finance. 2660-104-6058—For local assistance, Department of Transportation, State Transportation Improvement Program (STIP), payable from the Transportation Facilities Account, Highway Safety, Traffic Reduction, Air Quality, and Port Security Fund of 2006 ........................ 2,000 Schedule: (1) 1835020-Local Assistance ........................ 1,000 (2) 1840019-State and Federal Mass Transit ........................ 1,000 Provisions: 1. Funds appropriated in this item shall be available for allocation by the California Transportation Commission until June 30, 2028, and available for encumbrance and liquidation until June 30, 2032. 2. Notwithstanding any other law, funds appropriated in this item may be transferred intraschedule or to Item 2660-304-6058. These transfers shall require the prior approval of the Department of Finance. 3. The amount appropriated in this item may be adjusted to an amount that would either (a) allow full utilization of the funds authorized under subdivision (e) of Section 8879.23 of the Government Code for this program, or (b) ensure that expenditures do not exceed the amount authorized under subdivision (e) of Section 8879.23 of the Government Code for this program. 4. Notwithstanding any other law, funds appropriated in Item 2660-004-6058 may be transferred to this item. These transfers shall require the prior approval of the Department of Finance. 2660-104-6059—For local assistance, Department of Transportation, non-State Transportation Improvement Program (STIP), payable from the Public Transportation Modernization, Improvement, and Service Enhancement Account, Highway Safety, Traffic Reduction, Air Quality, and Port Security Fund of 2006 ........................ 1,000 Schedule: (1) 1840019-State and Federal Mass Transit ........................ 1,000 Provisions: 1. Funds appropriated in this item shall be available for allocation by the California Transportation Commission until June 30, 2028, and available for encumbrance and liquidation until June 30, 2032. 2. Notwithstanding any other law, funds appropriated in this item may be transferred to Item 2660-304-6059. These transfers require the prior approval of the Department of Finance. 3. The amount appropriated in this item may be adjusted to an amount that would either (a) allow full utilization of the funds authorized under paragraph (2) of subdivision (f) of Section 8879.23 of the Government Code for this program, or (b) ensure that expenditures do not exceed the amount authorized under paragraph (2) of subdivision (f) of Section 8879.23 of the Government Code for this program. 4. Notwithstanding any other law, funds appropriated in Item 2660-004-6059 may be transferred to this item. These transfers shall require the prior approval of the Department of Finance. 2660-104-6062—For local assistance, Department of Transportation, non-State Transportation Improvement Program (STIP), payable from the Local Bridge Seismic Retrofit Account, Highway Safety, Traffic Reduction, Air Quality, and Port Security Fund of 2006 ........................ 1,000 Schedule: (1) 1835020-Local Assistance ........................ 1,000 Provisions: 1. Funds appropriated in this item shall be available for allocation by the California Transportation Commission until June 30, 2028, and available for encumbrance and liquidation until June 30, 2032. 2. Notwithstanding any other law, funds appropriated in Item 2660-004-6062 may be transferred to this item. These transfers shall require the prior approval of the Department of Finance. 3. The amount appropriated in this item may be adjusted to an amount that would either (a) allow full utilization of the funds authorized under subdivision (i) of Section 8879.23 of the Government Code for this program, or (b) ensure that expenditures do not exceed the amount authorized under subdivision (i) of Section 8879.23 of the Government Code for this program. 2660-104-6063—For local assistance, Department of Transportation, non-State Transportation Improvement Program (STIP), payable from the Highway-Railroad Crossing Safety Account, Highway Safety, Traffic Reduction, Air Quality, and Port Security Fund of 2006 ........................ 1,000 Schedule: (1) 1835020-Local Assistance ........................ 1,000 Provisions: 1. Funds appropriated in this item shall be available for allocation by the California Transportation Commission until June 30, 2028, and available for encumbrance and liquidation until June 30, 2032. 2. Notwithstanding any other law, funds appropriated in Item 2660-004-6063 may be transferred to this item. These transfers shall require the prior approval of the Department of Finance. 3. The amount appropriated in this item may be adjusted to an amount that would either (a) allow full utilization of the funds authorized under subdivision (j) of Section 8879.23 of the Government Code for this program, or (b) ensure that expenditures do not exceed the amount authorized under subdivision (j) of Section 8879.23 of the Government Code for this program. 2660-104-6064—For local assistance, Department of Transportation, non-State Transportation Improvement Program (STIP), payable from the Highway Safety, Rehabilitation, and Preservation Account, Highway Safety, Traffic Reduction, Air Quality, and Port Security Fund of 2006 ........................ 1,000 Schedule: (1) 1835020-Local Assistance ........................ 1,000 Provisions: 1. Funds appropriated in this item shall be available for allocation by the California Transportation Commission until June 30, 2028, and available for encumbrance and liquidation until June 30, 2032. 2. Notwithstanding any other law, funds appropriated in this item may be transferred to Item 2660-304-6064. These transfers shall require the prior approval of the Department of Finance. 3. The amount appropriated in this item may be adjusted to an amount that would either (a) allow full utilization of the funds authorized under paragraph (2) of subdivision (k) of Section 8879.23 of the Government Code for this program, or (b) ensure that expenditures do not exceed the amount authorized under paragraph (2) of subdivision (k) of Section 8879.23 of the Government Code for this program. 4. Notwithstanding any other law, funds appropriated in Item 2660-004-6064 may be transferred to this item. These transfers shall require the prior approval of the Department of Finance. 2660-104-6072—For local assistance, Department of Transportation, non-State Transportation Improvement Program (STIP), payable from the State Route 99 Account, Highway Safety, Traffic Reduction, Air Quality, and Port Security Fund of 2006 ........................ 1,000 Schedule: (1) 1835020-Local Assistance ........................ 1,000 Provisions: 1. Funds appropriated in this item shall be available for allocation by the California Transportation Commission until June 30, 2028, and available for encumbrance and liquidation until June 30, 2032. 2. Notwithstanding any other law, funds appropriated in this item may be transferred to Item 2660-304-6072. These transfers shall require the prior approval of the Department of Finance. 3. The amount appropriated in this item may be adjusted to an amount that would either (a) allow full utilization of the funds authorized under subdivision (b) of Section 8879.23 of the Government Code for this program, or (b) ensure that expenditures do not exceed the amount authorized under subdivision (b) of Section 8879.23 of the Government Code for this program. 4. Notwithstanding any other law, funds appropriated in Item 2660-004-6072 may be transferred to this item. These transfers shall require the prior approval of the Department of Finance. 2660-105-0046—For local assistance, Department of Transportation, payable from the Public Transportation Account, State Transportation Fund, for water transit operations managed through the Metropolitan Transportation Commission ........................ 3,583,000 Schedule: (1) 1840019-State and Federal Mass Transit ........................ 3,583,000 2660-108-0042—For local assistance, Department of Transportation, Active Transportation Program (ATP), payable from the State Highway Account, State Transportation Fund ........................ 98,873,000 Schedule: (1) 1835020-Local Assistance ........................ 98,873,000 Provisions: 1. Funds appropriated in this item shall be available for allocation by the California Transportation Commission until June 30, 2029, and available for encumbrance and liquidation until June 30, 2032. 2. Notwithstanding any other law, funds appropriated in this item may be transferred to Item 2660-101-0042, 2660-102-0042, 2660-301-0042, 2660-308-0042, or 2660-302-0042. These transfers shall require the prior approval of the Department of Finance. 3. Notwithstanding any other law, and as necessary to support the Active Transportation Program, funds appropriated in this item may be supplemented with federal funding appropriation authority and with prior year State Highway Account appropriation balances at a level determined by the Department of Transportation as required to process claims utilizing federal advance construction through the plan of financial adjustment process under Sections 11251 and 16365 of the Government Code. 2660-108-0890—For local assistance, Department of Transportation, Active Transportation Program (ATP), payable from the Federal Trust Fund ........................ 278,508,000 Schedule: (1) 1835020-Local Assistance ........................ 278,508,000 Provisions: 1. Funds appropriated in this item shall be available for allocation by the California Transportation Commission until June 30, 2029, and available for encumbrance and liquidation until June 30, 2032. 2. Notwithstanding any other law, and as necessary to support the Active Transportation Program, funds appropriated in this item may be transferred to Item 2660-001-0890, 2660-101-0890, 2660-102-0890, 2660-301-0890, or 2660-308-0890. These transfers shall require the prior approval of the Department of Finance. 3. For purposes of the Streets and Highways Code, all expenditures from this item shall be deemed to be expenditures from the State Highway Account, State Transportation Fund. 4. Federal funds may be received from any federal source and shall be deposited in the Federal Trust Fund. Any federal reimbursements shall be credited to the account from which the expenditures were originally made. 2660-108-3290—For local assistance, Department of Transportation, Active Transportation Program, payable from the Road Maintenance and Rehabilitation Account, State Transportation Fund ........................ 77,000,000 Schedule: (1) 1835020-Local Assistance ........................ 77,000,000 Provisions: 1. Funds appropriated in this item shall be available for allocation by the California Transportation Commission until June 30, 2029, and available for encumbrance and liquidation until June 30, 2032. 2. Notwithstanding any other law, the funds appropriated in this item may be transferred to Item 2660-308-3290. These transfers shall require the prior approval of the Department of Finance. 2660-109-0042—For local assistance, Department of Transportation, Congested Corridors Program, payable from the State Highway Account, State Transportation Fund ........................ 148,522,000 Schedule: (1) 1835020-Local Assistance ........................ 87,686,000 (2) 1840019-State and Federal Mass Transit ........................ 60,836,000 Provisions: 1. Funds appropriated in this item shall be available for allocation by the California Transportation Commission until June 30, 2028, and available for encumbrance and liquidation until June 30, 2032. 2. Notwithstanding any other law, funds appropriated in this item may be transferred intraschedule or to Item 2660-009-0042 or 2660-309-0042. These transfers shall require the prior approval of the Department of Finance. 2660-130-0001—For support, Department of Transportation25,000,000Schedule:(1)1835056-Maintenance25,000,000Provisions:1.Funds appropriated in this item shall be available for encumbrance and liquidation until June 30, 2028. 2660-301-0042—For capital outlay, Department of Transportation, State Transportation Improvement Program (STIP), payable from the State Highway Account, State Transportation Fund ........................ 115,100,000 Schedule: (1) 1835019-Capital Outlay Projects ........................ 83,814,000 (a) Regional improvements ........................ (62,861,000) (b) Interregional improvements ........................ (20,953,000) (2) 1840028-Intercity Rail Passenger Program ........................ 31,286,000 Provisions: 1. Funds appropriated in this item shall be available for allocation by the California Transportation Commission until June 30, 2028, and available for encumbrance and liquidation until June 30, 2032. 2. Notwithstanding any other law, funds appropriated in this item may be transferred intraschedule or to Item 2660-101-0042, 2660-102-0042, or 2660-302-0042. These transfers shall require the prior approval of the Department of Finance. 3. Notwithstanding any other law, funds appropriated in this item may be supplemented with federal funding appropriation authority and with prior year State Highway Account appropriation balances at a level determined by the department as required to process claims utilizing federal advance construction through the plan of financial adjustment process under Sections 11251 and 16365 of the Government Code. 4. Notwithstanding any other law, funds appropriated in Schedule (2) may be transferred to Item 2660-301-0046. These transfers shall require the prior approval of the Department of Finance. 2660-301-0046—For capital outlay, Department of Transportation, payable from the Public Transportation Account, State Transportation Fund ........................ 35,000,000 Schedule: (1) 1840028-Intercity Rail Passenger Program ........................ 2,511,427,000 (2) Reimbursements to 1840028-Intercity Rail Passenger Program ........................ −2,476,427,000 Provisions: 1. Funds appropriated in this item shall be available for allocation by the California Transportation Commission until June 30, 2028, and available for encumbrance and liquidation until June 30, 2032. 2. Notwithstanding any other law, funds appropriated in this item may be transferred intraschedule or to Item 2660-101-0046 with the prior approval of the Director of Finance. 2660-301-0890—For capital outlay, Department of Transportation, State Transportation Improvement Program (STIP), payable from the Federal Trust Fund ........................ 286,650,000 Schedule: (1) 1835019-Capital Outlay Projects ........................ 239,220,000 (a) Regional improvements ........................ (179,415,000) (b) Interregional improvements ........................ (59,805,000) (2) 1840028-Intercity Rail Passenger Program ........................ 47,430,000 Provisions: 1. Funds appropriated in this item shall be available for allocation by the California Transportation Commission until June 30, 2028, and available for encumbrance and liquidation until June 30, 2032. 2. Notwithstanding any other law, amounts scheduled in this item may be transferred intraschedule or to Item 2660-101-0890, 2660-102-0890, or 2660-302-0890, upon the prior approval of the Department of Finance. 3. For purposes of the Streets and Highways Code, all expenditures from this item shall be deemed to be expenditures from the State Highway Account, State Transportation Fund. 4. Federal funds may be received from any federal source and shall be deposited in the Federal Trust Fund. Any federal reimbursements shall be credited to the account from which the expenditures were originally made. 2660-301-3291—For capital outlay, Department of Transportation, payable from the Trade Corridor Enhancement Account, State Transportation Fund ........................ 269,974,000 Schedule: (1) 1835019-Capital Outlay Projects ........................ 237,502,000 (2) 1840028-Intercity Rail Passenger Program ........................ 32,472,000 Provisions: 1. Funds appropriated in this item shall be available for allocation by the California Transportation Commission until June 30, 2029, and available for encumbrance and liquidation until June 30, 2032. 2. Notwithstanding any other law, funds appropriated in this item may be transferred intraschedule or to Item 2660-101-3291. These transfers require the prior approval of the Department of Finance. 3. Funds appropriated in this item shall be used in the same manner as Proposition 1B bond funds consistent with the Trade Corridors Improvement Fund program as authorized by Section 2192 of the Streets and Highways Code. 4. Notwithstanding any other law, funds appropriated in Item 2660-001-3291 may be transferred to this item. These transfers shall require the prior approval of the Department of Finance. 2660-302-0042—For capital outlay, Department of Transportation, non-State Transportation Improvement Program (STIP), payable from the State Highway Account, State Transportation Fund ........................ 204,510,000 Schedule: (1) 1835019-Capital Outlay Projects ........................ 1,065,510,000 (2) Reimbursements to 1835019-Capital Outlay Projects ........................ −861,000,000 Provisions: 1. Funds appropriated in this item shall be available for allocation by the California Transportation Commission until June 30, 2028, and available for encumbrance and liquidation until June 30, 2032. 2. Notwithstanding any other law, funds appropriated in this item may be transferred intraschedule or to Item 2660-101-0042, 2660-102-0042, 2660-301-0042, or 2660-303-0042. These transfers shall require the prior approval of the Department of Finance. 3. Funds appropriated in this item are not available for expenditure on specialty building facilities. For the purpose of this item, specialty building facilities are equipment facilities, maintenance facilities, material laboratories, and traffic management centers. 4. Notwithstanding any other law, the California Transportation Commission may allocate up to $60,000,000 from this item to provide the required nonfederal match to any state-sponsored project receiving a federal grant. 2660-302-0890—For capital outlay, Department of Transportation, non-State Transportation Improvement Program (STIP), payable from the Federal Trust Fund ........................ 3,066,377,000 Schedule: (1) 1835019-Capital Outlay Projects ........................ 3,066,375,000 (a) State Highway Operation and Protection Program ........................ (2,938,376,000) (b) Trade Corridor Enhancement Program ........................ (127,998,000) (c) Other Federally Funded Programs ........................ (1,000) (2) 1840028-Intercity Rail Passenger Program ........................ 2,000 (a) Trade Corridor Enhancement Program ........................ (1,000) (b) Other Federally Funded Programs ........................ (1,000) Provisions: 1. Notwithstanding the allocation of funds per Provision 7, funds appropriated in this item shall be available for allocation by the California Transportation Commission until June 30, 2028, and available for encumbrance and liquidation until June 30, 2032. 2. Notwithstanding any other law, amounts scheduled in this item may be transferred intraschedule or to Item 2660-101-0890, 2660-102-0890, 2660-301-0890, or 2660-303-0890. These transfers shall require the prior approval of the Department of Finance. 3. For purposes of the Streets and Highways Code, all expenditures from this item shall be deemed to be expenditures from the State Highway Account, State Transportation Fund. 4. Federal funds may be received from any federal source and shall be deposited in the Federal Trust Fund. Any federal reimbursements shall be credited to the account from which the expenditures were originally made. 5. Funds appropriated in this item are not available for expenditure on specialty building facilities. For the purpose of this item, specialty building facilities are equipment facilities, maintenance facilities, material laboratories, and traffic management centers. 6. Notwithstanding any other law, the California Transportation Commission may allocate up to $60,000,000 from this item to provide the required match to any state-sponsored project receiving a federal grant under the Fostering Advancements in Shipping and Transportation for the Long-term Achievement of National Efficiencies (FASTLANE) grants program authorized by the federal Fixing America’s Surface Transportation Act (FAST Act, Public Law 114-94). 7. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (1), at least $1,000 shall be for federally eligible electric vehicle infrastructure. Funds shall be available for allocation by the Department of Transportation in accordance with grants awarded by the California Energy Commission. 8. Upon approval of the Department of Finance, the amount appropriated in this item may be augmented to account for additional federal funds received through the annual August Redistribution process. Any augmentation shall be authorized no sooner than 30 days after notification in writing to the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, or not sooner than whatever lesser time the chairperson of the joint committee, or the chairperson’s designee, may determine. 2660-302-3290—For capital outlay, Department of Transportation, non-State Transportation Improvement Program (STIP), payable from the Road Maintenance and Rehabilitation Account, State Transportation Fund ........................ 300,000,000 Schedule: (1) 1835019-Capital Outlay Projects ........................ 300,000,000 Provisions: 1. Funds appropriated in this item shall be available for allocation by the California Transportation Commission until June 30, 2028, and available for encumbrance and liquidation until June 30, 2032. 2. Notwithstanding any other law, funds appropriated in this item may be transferred to Item 2660-001-3290. These transfers shall require the prior approval of the Department of Finance. 2660-303-0042—For capital outlay, Department of Transportation, specialty building facilities, payable from the State Highway Account, State Transportation Fund ........................ 122,296,000 Schedule: (1) 1835019-Capital Outlay Projects ........................ 122,296,000 Provisions: 1. For the purpose of this item, specialty building facilities are equipment facilities, maintenance facilities, material laboratories, and traffic management centers. Ancillary equipment associated with the management of transportation systems such as loop detectors, closed-circuit television cameras, and transportation management systems field elements are not deemed specialty building facilities and are not funded from this item. 2. Funds appropriated in this item shall be available for allocation by the California Transportation Commission until June 30, 2028, and available for encumbrance and liquidation until June 30, 2032. 3. Notwithstanding any other law, funds appropriated in this item may be transferred to Item 2660-302-0042. These transfers shall require the prior approval of the Department of Finance. 2660-303-0890—For capital outlay, Department of Transportation, specialty building facilities, payable from the Federal Trust Fund ........................ 1,000 Schedule: (1) 1835019-Capital Outlay Projects ........................ 1,000 (a) State Highway Operation and Protection Program ........................ (1,000) Provisions: 1. For the purpose of this item, specialty building facilities are equipment facilities, maintenance facilities, material laboratories, and traffic management centers. Ancillary equipment associated with the management of transportation systems such as loop detectors, closed-circuit television cameras, and transportation management systems field elements are not deemed specialty building facilities and are not funded from this item. 2. Funds appropriated in this item shall be available for allocation by the California Transportation Commission until June 30, 2028, and available for encumbrance and liquidation until June 30, 2032. 3. Notwithstanding any other law, funds appropriated in this item may be transferred to Item 2660-302-0890. These transfers shall require the prior approval of the Department of Finance. 2660-304-6055—For capital outlay, Department of Transportation, non-State Transportation Improvement Program (STIP), payable from the Corridor Mobility Improvement Account, Highway Safety, Traffic Reduction, Air Quality, and Port Security Fund of 2006 ........................ 1,000 Schedule: (1) 1835019-Capital Outlay Projects ........................ 1,000 Provisions: 1. Funds appropriated in this item shall be available for allocation by the California Transportation Commission until June 30, 2028, and available for encumbrance and liquidation until June 30, 2032. 2. Notwithstanding any other law, funds appropriated in this item may be transferred to Item 2660-104-6055. These transfers shall require the prior approval of the Department of Finance. 3. Notwithstanding any other law, funds appropriated in Item 2660-004-6055 may be transferred to this item. These transfers shall require the prior approval of the Department of Finance. 4. The amount appropriated in this item may be adjusted to an amount that would either (a) allow full utilization of the funds authorized under paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 8879.23 of the Government Code for this program, or (b) ensure that expenditures do not exceed the amount authorized under paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 8879.23 of the Government Code for this program. 5. Notwithstanding any other law, expenditures in the STIP (including the Transportation Facilities Account) in any prior year may be transferred to this item upon California Transportation Commission approved substitution of prior year STIP funds (including Transportation Facilities Account) with Corridor Mobility Improvement Account funds appropriated in this item. This will allow for the full utilization of Corridor Mobility Improvement Account funds by using project savings to fund Corridor Mobility Improvement Account eligible STIP projects in accordance with the California Transportation Commission’s adopted policy for the use of Proposition 1B savings. 2660-304-6056—For capital outlay, Department of Transportation, non-State Transportation Improvement Program (STIP), payable from the Trade Corridors Improvement Fund ........................ 805,000 Schedule: (1) 1835019-Capital Outlay Projects ........................ 804,000 (2) 1840028-Intercity Rail Passenger Program ........................ 1,000 Provisions: 1. Funds appropriated in this item shall be available for allocation by the California Transportation Commission until June 30, 2028, and available for encumbrance and liquidation until June 30, 2032. 2. Notwithstanding any other law, funds appropriated in this item may be transferred intraschedule or to Item 2660-004-6056 or 2660-104-6056. These transfers shall require the prior approval of the Department of Finance. 3. The amount appropriated in this item may be adjusted to an amount that would either (a) allow full utilization of the funds authorized under subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) of Section 8879.23 of the Government Code for this program, or (b) ensure that expenditures do not exceed the amount authorized under subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) of Section 8879.23 of the Government Code for this program. 2660-304-6058—For capital outlay, Department of Transportation, State Transportation Improvement Program (STIP), payable from the Transportation Facilities Account, Highway Safety, Traffic Reduction, Air Quality, and Port Security Fund of 2006 ........................ 1,000 Schedule: (1) 1835019-Capital Outlay Projects ........................ 1,000 Provisions: 1. Funds appropriated in this item shall be available for allocation by the California Transportation Commission until June 30, 2028, and available for encumbrance and liquidation until June 30, 2032. 2. Notwithstanding any other law, funds appropriated in this item may be transferred to Item 2660-104-6058. These transfers shall require the prior approval of the Department of Finance. 3. The amount appropriated in this item may be adjusted to an amount that would either (a) allow full utilization of the funds authorized under subdivision (e) of Section 8879.23 of the Government Code for this program, or (b) ensure that expenditures do not exceed the amount authorized under subdivision (e) of Section 8879.23 of the Government Code for this program. 4. Notwithstanding any other law, funds appropriated in Item 2660-004-6058 may be transferred to this item. These transfers shall require the prior approval of the Department of Finance. 2660-304-6059—For capital outlay, Department of Transportation, payable from the Public Transportation Modernization, Improvement, and Service Enhancement Account, Highway Safety, Traffic Reduction, Air Quality, and Port Security Fund of 2006 ........................ 2,845,000 Schedule: (1) 1840028-Intercity Rail Passenger Program ........................ 2,845,000 Provisions: 1. Funds appropriated in this item shall be available for allocation by the California Transportation Commission until June 30, 2028, and available for encumbrance and liquidation until June 30, 2032. 2. Notwithstanding any other law, funds appropriated in this item may be transferred to Item 2660-104-6059. These transfers require the prior approval of the Department of Finance. 3. The amount appropriated in this item may be adjusted to an amount that would either (a) allow full utilization of the funds authorized under paragraph (2) of subdivision (f) of Section 8879.23 of the Government Code for this program, or (b) ensure that expenditures do not exceed the amount authorized under paragraph (2) of subdivision (f) of Section 8879.23 of the Government Code for this program. 4. Notwithstanding any other law, funds appropriated in Item 2660-004-6059 may be transferred to this item. These transfers shall require the prior approval of the Department of Finance. 2660-304-6064—For capital outlay, Department of Transportation, non-State Transportation Improvement Program (STIP), payable from the Highway Safety, Rehabilitation, and Preservation Account, Highway Safety, Traffic Reduction, Air Quality, and Port Security Fund of 2006 ........................ 1,000 Schedule: (1) 1835019-Capital Outlay Projects ........................ 1,000 Provisions: 1. Funds appropriated in this item shall be available for allocation by the California Transportation Commission until June 30, 2028, and available for encumbrance and liquidation until June 30, 2032. 2. Notwithstanding any other law, funds appropriated in this item may be transferred to Item 2660-104-6064. These transfers shall require the prior approval of the Department of Finance. 3. The amount appropriated in this item may be adjusted to an amount that would either (a) allow full utilization of the funds authorized under paragraph (1) of subdivision (k) of Section 8879.23 of the Government Code for this program, or (b) ensure that expenditures do not exceed the amount authorized under paragraph (1) of subdivision (k) of Section 8879.23 of the Government Code for this program. 4. Notwithstanding any other law, funds appropriated in Item 2660-004-6064 may be transferred to this item. These transfers shall require the prior approval of the Department of Finance. 2660-304-6072—For capital outlay, Department of Transportation, non-State Transportation Improvement Program (STIP), payable from the State Route 99 Account, Highway Safety, Traffic Reduction, Air Quality, and Port Security Fund of 2006 ........................ 1,000 Schedule: (1) 1835019-Capital Outlay Projects ........................ 1,000 Provisions: 1. Funds appropriated in this item shall be available for allocation by the California Transportation Commission until June 30, 2028, and available for encumbrance and liquidation until June 30, 2032. 2. Notwithstanding any other law, funds appropriated in this item may be transferred to Item 2660-104-6072. These transfers shall require the prior approval of the Department of Finance. 3. The amount appropriated in this item may be adjusted to an amount that would either (a) allow full utilization of the funds authorized under subdivision (b) of Section 8879.23 of the Government Code for this program, or (b) ensure that expenditures do not exceed the amount authorized under subdivision (b) of Section 8879.23 of the Government Code for this program. 4. Notwithstanding any other law, funds appropriated in Item 2660-004-6072 may be transferred to this item. These transfers shall require the prior approval of the Department of Finance. 2660-308-0042—For capital outlay, Department of Transportation, Active Transportation Program (ATP), payable from the State Highway Account, State Transportation Fund ........................ 12,017,000 Schedule: (1) 1835019-Capital Outlay Projects ........................ 12,017,000 Provisions: 1. Funds appropriated in this item shall be available for allocation by the California Transportation Commission until June 30, 2029, and available for encumbrance and liquidation until June 30, 2032. 2. Notwithstanding any other law, funds appropriated in this item may be transferred to Item 2660-101-0042, 2660-102-0042, 2660-108-0042, or 2660-301-0042. These transfers shall require the prior approval of the Department of Finance. 3. Notwithstanding any other law, and as necessary to support the Active Transportation Program, funds appropriated in this item may be supplemented with federal funding appropriation authority and with prior year State Highway Account appropriation balances at a level determined by the Department of Transportation as required to process claims utilizing federal advance construction through the plan of financial adjustment process under Sections 11251 and 16365 of the Government Code. 2660-308-0890—For capital outlay, Department of Transportation, Active Transportation Program (ATP), payable from the Federal Trust Fund ........................ 41,319,000 Schedule: (1) 1835019-Capital Outlay Projects ........................ 41,319,000 Provisions: 1. Funds appropriated in this item shall be available for allocation by the California Transportation Commission until June 30, 2029, and available for encumbrance and liquidation until June 30, 2032. 2. Notwithstanding any other law, and as necessary to support the Active Transportation Program, funds appropriated in this item may be transferred to Item 2660-101-0890, 2660-102-0890, 2660-108-0890, or 2660-301-0890. These transfers shall require the prior approval of the Department of Finance. 3. For purposes of the Streets and Highways Code, all expenditures from this item shall be deemed to be expenditures from the State Highway Account, State Transportation Fund. 4. Federal funds may be received from any federal source and shall be deposited in the Federal Trust Fund. Any federal reimbursements shall be credited to the account from which the expenditures were originally made. 2660-308-3290—For capital outlay, Department of Transportation, Active Transportation Program, payable from the Road Maintenance and Rehabilitation Account, State Transportation Fund ........................ 23,000,000 Schedule: (1) 1835019-Capital Outlay Projects ........................ 23,000,000 Provisions: 1. Funds appropriated in this item shall be available for allocation by the California Transportation Commission until June 30, 2029, and available for encumbrance and liquidation until June 30, 2032. 2. Notwithstanding any other law, funds appropriated in this item may be transferred to Item 2660-108-3290. These transfers shall require the prior approval of the Department of Finance. 2660-309-0042—For capital outlay, Department of Transportation, Congested Corridors Program, payable from the State Highway Account, State Transportation Fund ........................ 101,478,000 Schedule: (1) 1835019-Capital Outlay Projects ........................ 81,478,000 (2) 1840028-Intercity Rail Passenger Program ........................ 20,000,000 Provisions: 1. Funds appropriated in this item shall be available for allocation by the California Transportation Commission until June 30, 2028, and available for encumbrance and liquidation until June 30, 2032. 2. Notwithstanding any other law, funds appropriated in this item may be transferred intraschedule or to Items 2660-009-0042 and 2660-109-0042. These transfers shall require the prior approval of the Department of Finance. 2660-399-0042—For Department of Transportation, for final cost accounting of projects, for state operations, local assistance, or capital outlay, payable from the State Highway Account, State Transportation Fund ........................ 5,000,000 Schedule: (1) 1835019-Capital Outlay Projects ........................ 2,900,000 (2) 1835020-Local Assistance ........................ 100,000 (3) 1835010-Capital Outlay Support ........................ 2,000,000 Provisions: 1. Notwithstanding any other law, funds appropriated in this item may be transferred to Item 2660-001-0042, 2660-101-0042, 2660-102-0042, 2660-301-0042, or 2660-302-0042. These transfers shall require the prior approval of the Department of Finance. 2. Funds appropriated in this item shall be available for expenditure and liquidation until June 30, 2027. 2660-399-0890—For Department of Transportation, for final cost accounting of projects, for state operations, local assistance, or capital outlay, payable from the Federal Trust Fund ........................ 5,000,000 Schedule: (1) 1835019-Capital Outlay Projects ........................ 2,900,000 (2) 1835020-Local Assistance ........................ 100,000 (3) 1835010-Capital Outlay Support ........................ 2,000,000 Provisions: 1. Notwithstanding any other law, funds appropriated in this item may be transferred to Item 2660-001-0890, 2660-101-0890, 2660-102-0890, 2660-301-0890, or 2660-302-0890. These transfers shall require the prior approval of the Department of Finance. 2. Funds appropriated in this item shall be available for expenditure and liquidation until June 30, 2027. 2660-402—Before allocating projects in the 2026–27 fiscal year that would result in the issuance of notes pursuant to Section 14553 of the Government Code exceeding $300,000,000, the California Transportation Commission shall consult with the California State Transportation Agency, the Department of Transportation, and the Department of Finance pursuant to Section 14553.8 of the Government Code to consider and determine the appropriateness of the mechanism authorized by Section 14553 of the Government Code in comparison to other funding mechanisms, and to determine and report to the Governor and the Legislature the effect of issuance of the notes on future federal funding commitments. Allocations above $300,000,000 shall not be made prior to providing 60 days’ notice to the chairpersons of the transportation committees of each house of the Legislature and the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee. 2660-490—Reappropriation, Department of Transportation. The amounts specified in the following citations are reappropriated for the purposes provided for in those appropriations and shall be available until June 30, 2029: 0042—State Highway Account, State Transportation Fund (1) Up to $7,797,000 of the amount appropriated in Schedule (4) of item 2660-001-0042, Budget Act of 2025 (Chs. 4 and 5, Stats. 2025) (2) Up to $882,000 of the amount appropriated in Schedule (12) of item 2660-001-0042, Budget Act of 2025 (Chs. 4 and 5, Stats. 2025) 2660-491—Reappropriation, Department of Transportation. Notwithstanding any other law, the unliquidated encumbrances for the appropriations provided in the following citations are reappropriated until June 30, 2027. The unencumbered balance shall not be available for encumbrance: 0042—​State Highway Account, State Transportation Fund (1) Item 2660-301-0042, Budget Act of 2013 (Chs. 20 and 354, Stats. 2013) (2) Item 2660-302-0042, Budget Act of 2013 (Chs. 20 and 354, Stats. 2013) (3) Item 2660-301-0042, Budget Act of 2014 (Chs. 25 and 663, Stats. 2014) (4) Item 2660-302-0042, Budget Act of 2014 (Chs. 25 and 663, Stats. 2014) (5) Item 2660-301-0042, Budget Act of 2015 (Chs. 10 and 11, Stats. 2015) (6) Item 2660-302-0042, Budget Act of 2015 (Chs. 10 and 11, Stats. 2015) (7) Item 2660-303-0042, Budget Act of 2015 (Chs. 10 and 11, Stats. 2015) (8) Item 2660-301-0042, Budget Act of 2016 (Ch. 23, Stats. 2016) (9) Item 2660-302-0042, Budget Act of 2016 (Ch. 23, Stats. 2016) (10) Item 2660-308-0042, Budget Act of 2016 (Ch. 23, Stats. 2016) (11) Item 2660-301-0042, Budget Act of 2017 (Chs. 14, 22, and 54, Stats. 2017) (12) Item 2660-302-0042, Budget Act of 2017 (Chs. 14, 22, and 54, Stats. 2017) (13) Item 2660-303-0042, Budget Act of 2017 (Chs. 14, 22, and 54, Stats. 2017) (14) Item 2660-308-0042, Budget Act of 2017 (Chs. 14, 22, and 54, Stats. 2017) (15) Item 2660-301-0042, Budget Act of 2018 (Chs. 29 and 30, Stats. 2018) (16) Item 2660-302-0042, Budget Act of 2018 (Chs. 29 and 30, Stats. 2018) (17) Item 2660-308-0042, Budget Act of 2018 (Chs. 29 and 30, Stats. 2018) (18) Item 2660-309-0042, Budget Act of 2018 (Chs. 29 and 30, Stats. 2018) (19) Item 2660-301-0042, Budget Act of 2019 (Chs. 23 and 55, Stats. 2019) (20) Item 2660-302-0042, Budget Act of 2019 (Chs. 23 and 55, Stats. 2019) (21) Item 2660-309-0042, Budget Act of 2019 (Chs. 23 and 55, Stats. 2019) (22) Item 2660-301-0042, Budget Act of 2020 (Chs. 6 and 7, Stats. 2020) (23) Item 2660-302-0042, Budget Act of 2020 (Chs. 6 and 7, Stats. 2020) (24) Item 2660-309-0042, Budget Act of 2020 (Chs. 6 and 7, Stats. 2020) 0046—​Public Transportation Account, State Transportation Fund (1) Item 2660-301-0046, Budget Act of 2011 (Ch. 33, Stats. 2011) (2) Item 2660-301-0046, Budget Act of 2013 (Chs. 20 and 354, Stats. 2013) (3) Item 2660-301-0046, Budget Act of 2015 (Chs. 10 and 11, Stats. 2015) (4) Item 2660-101-0046, Budget Act of 2016 (Ch. 23, Stats. 2016) (5) Item 2660-301-0046, Budget Act of 2016 (Ch. 23, Stats. 2016) (6) Item 2660-101-0046, Budget Act of 2017 (Chs. 14, 22, and 54, Stats. 2017) (7) Item 2660-301-0046, Budget Act of 2017 (Chs. 14, 22, and 54, Stats. 2017) (8) Item 2660-101-0046, Budget Act of 2018 (Chs. 29 and 30, Stats. 2018) (9) Item 2660-301-0046, Budget Act of 2018 (Chs. 29 and 30, Stats. 2018) (10) Item 2660-101-0046, Budget Act of 2019 (Chs. 23 and 55, Stats. 2019) (11) Item 2660-301-0046, Budget Act of 2019 (Chs. 23 and 55, Stats. 2019) (12) Item 2660-101-0046, Budget Act of 2020 (Chs. 6 and 7, Stats. 2020) (13) Item 2660-301-0046, Budget Act of 2020 (Chs. 6 and 7, Stats. 2020) 0890—​Federal Trust Fund (1) Item 2660-301-0890, Budget Act of 2013 (Chs. 20 and 354, Stats. 2013) (2) Item 2660-302-0890, Budget Act of 2013 (Chs. 20 and 354, Stats. 2013) (3) Item 2660-301-0890, Budget Act of 2014 (Chs. 25 and 663, Stats. 2014) (4) Item 2660-302-0890, Budget Act of 2014 (Chs. 25 and 663, Stats. 2014) (5) Item 2660-301-0890, Budget Act of 2015 (Chs. 10 and 11, Stats. 2015) (6) Item 2660-302-0890, Budget Act of 2015 (Chs. 10 and 11, Stats. 2015) (7) Item 2660-301-0890, Budget Act of 2016 (Ch. 23, Stats. 2016) (8) Item 2660-302-0890, Budget Act of 2016 (Ch. 23, Stats. 2016) (9) Item 2660-308-0890, Budget Act of 2016 (Ch. 23, Stats. 2016) (10) Item 2660-301-0890, Budget Act of 2017 (Chs. 14, 22, and 54, Stats. 2017) (11) Item 2660-302-0890, Budget Act of 2017 (Chs. 14, 22, and 54, Stats. 2017) (12) Item 2660-308-0890, Budget Act of 2017 (Chs. 14, 22, and 54, Stats. 2017) (13) Item 2660-301-0890, Budget Act of 2018 (Chs. 29 and 30, Stats. 2018) (14) Item 2660-302-0890, Budget Act of 2018 (Chs. 29 and 30, Stats. 2018) (15) Item 2660-308-0890, Budget Act of 2018 (Chs. 29 and 30, Stats. 2018) (16) Item 2660-301-0890, Budget Act of 2019 (Chs. 23 and 55, Stats. 2019) (17) Item 2660-302-0890, Budget Act of 2019 (Chs. 23 and 55, Stats. 2019) (18) Item 2660-301-0890, Budget Act of 2020 (Chs. 6 and 7, Stats. 2020) (19) Item 2660-302-0890, Budget Act of 2020 (Chs. 6 and 7, Stats. 2020) 3290—​Road Maintenance and Rehabilitation Account, State Transportation Fund (1) Item 2660-302-3290, Budget Act of 2017 (Chs. 14, 22, and 54, Stats. 2017) (2) Item 2660-302-3290, Budget Act of 2018 (Chs. 29 and 30, Stats. 2018) (3) Item 2660-302-3290, Budget Act of 2019 (Chs. 23 and 55, Stats. 2019) (4) Item 2660-308-3290, Budget Act of 2019 (Chs. 23 and 55, Stats. 2019) (5) Item 2660-302-3290, Budget Act of 2020 (Chs. 6 and 7, Stats. 2020) 3291—​Trade Corridor Enhancement Account, State Transportation Fund (1) Item 2660-301-3291, Budget Act of 2017 (Chs. 14, 22, and 54, Stats. 2017) (2) Item 2660-301-3291, Budget Act of 2018 (Chs. 29 and 30, Stats. 2018) (3) Item 2660-301-3291, Budget Act of 2019 (Chs. 23 and 55, Stats. 2019) (4) Item 2660-301-3291, Budget Act of 2020 (Chs. 6 and 7, Stats. 2020) 2660-493—Reappropriation, Department of Transportation. Notwithstanding any other law, the appropriations in the following citations are reappropriated to enable the collection of outstanding federal reimbursements as of the end of June 30, 2025. These appropriations are not available for encumbrance or liquidation and shall revert on June 30, 2027. 0890—​Federal Trust Fund (1) Item 2660-102-0890, Budget Act of 2015 (Chs. 10 and 11, Stats. 2015) (2) Item 2660-101-0890, Budget Act of 2015 (Chs. 10 and 11, Stats. 2015) (3) Item 2660-108-0890, Budget Act of 2015 (Chs. 10 and 11, Stats. 2015) (4) Item 2660-102-0890, Budget Act of 2016 (Ch. 23, Stats. 2016) (5) Item 2660-101-0890, Budget Act of 2016 (Ch. 23, Stats. 2016) (6) Item 2660-108-0890, Budget Act of 2016 (Ch. 23, Stats. 2016) (7) Item 2660-101-0890, Budget Act of 2017 (Chs. 14, 22, and 54, Stats. 2017) (8) Item 2660-102-0890, Budget Act of 2017 (Chs. 14, 22, and 54, Stats. 2017) (9) Item 2660-108-0890, Budget Act of 2017 (Chs. 14, 22, and 54, Stats. 2017) (10) Item 2660-101-0890, Budget Act of 2018 (Chs. 29 and 30, Stats. 2018) (11) Item 2660-102-0890, Budget Act of 2018 (Chs. 29 and 30, Stats. 2018) (12) Item 2660-108-0890, Budget Act of 2018 (Chs. 29 and 30, Stats. 2018) (13) Item 2660-001-0890, Budget Act of 2019 (Chs. 23 and 55, Stats. 2019) (14) Item 2660-102-0890, Budget Act of 2019 (Chs. 23 and 55, Stats. 2019) (15) Item 2660-108-0890, Budget Act of 2019 (Chs. 23 and 55, Stats. 2019) (16) Item 2660-101-0890, Budget Act of 2020 (Chs. 6 and 7, Stats. 2020) (17) Item 2660-102-0890, Budget Act of 2020 (Chs. 6 and 7, Stats. 2020) (18) Item 2660-108-0890, Budget Act of 2020 (Chs. 6 and 7, Stats. 2020) (19) Item 2660-001-0890, Budget Act of 2021 (Chs. 21, 69, and 240, Stats. 2021) 2660-494—Reappropriation, Department of Transportation. Notwithstanding any other law, the period to encumber and liquidate for the appropriations provided in the following citations is extended until June 30, 2027. 6043—​High-Speed Passenger Train Bond Fund (3) Item 2660-104-6043, Budget Act of 2012 (Chs. 21 and 29, Stats. 2012) (4) Item 2660-304-6043, Budget Act of 2012 (Chs. 21 and 29, Stats. 2012) 6055—​Corridor Mobility Improvement Account (4) Item 2660-304-6055, Budget Act of 2010 (Ch. 712, Stats. 2010) (5) Item 2660-304-6055, Budget Act of 2011 (Ch. 33, Stats. 2011) (6) Item 2660-304-6055, Budget Act of 2012 (Chs. 21 and 29, Stats. 2012) (7) Item 2660-304-6055, Budget Act of 2014 (Chs. 25 and 663, Stats. 2014) (9) Item 2660-304-6055, Budget Act of 2016 (Ch. 23, Stats. 2016) 6056—​Trade Corridors Improvement Fund (2) Item 2660-104-6056, Budget Act of 2010 (Ch. 712, Stats. 2010) (3) Item 2660-104-6056, Budget Act of 2011 (Ch. 33, Stats. 2011) (4) Item 2660-304-6056, Budget Act of 2011 (Ch. 33, Stats. 2011) (7) Item 2660-104-6056, Budget Act of 2013 (Chs. 20 and 354, Stats. 2013) (8) Item 2660-304-6056, Budget Act of 2013 (Chs. 20 and 354, Stats. 2013) (10) Item 2660-104-6056, Budget Act of 2015 (Chs. 10 and 11, Stats. 2015) (11) Item 2660-104-6056, Budget Act of 2016 (Ch. 23, Stats. 2016) (12) Item 2660-304-6056, Budget Act of 2017 (Chs. 14, 22, and 54, Stats. 2017) (13) Item 2660-104-6056, Budget Act of 2019 (Chs. 23 and 55, Stats. 2019) (14) Item 2660-304-6056, Budget Act of 2019 (Ch. 23, Stats. 2019) 6058—​Transportation Facilities Account (1) Item 2660-304-6058, Budget Act of 2007 (Chs. 171 and 172, Stats. 2007) (2) Item 2660-104-6058, Budget Act of 2008 (Chs. 268 and 269, Stats. 2008) (3) Item 2660-304-6058, Budget Act of 2010 (Ch. 712, Stats. 2010) (6) Item 2660-304-6058, Budget Act of 2014 (Chs. 25 and 663, Stats. 2014) 6059—​Public Transportation Modernization, Improvement, and Service Enhancement Account (1) Item 2660-304-6059, Budget Act of 2011 (Ch. 33, Stats. 2011) (2) Item 2660-304-6059, Budget Act of 2014 (Chs. 25 and 663, Stats. 2014) (3) Item 2660-304-6059, Budget Act of 2016 (Ch. 23, Stats. 2016) (4) Item 2660-304-6059, Budget Act of 2017 (Chs. 14, 22, and 54, Stats. 2017) 6060—​State-Local Partnership Program Account (3) Item 2660-104-6060, Budget Act of 2011 (Ch. 33, Stats. 2011) (4) Item 2660-104-6060, Budget Act of 2012 (Chs. 21 and 29, Stats. 2012) (5) Item 2660-304-6060, Budget Act of 2012 (Chs. 21 and 29, Stats. 2012) 6062—​Local Bridge Seismic Retrofit Account (1) Item 2660-104-6062, Budget Act of 2012 (Chs. 21 and 29, Stats. 2012) (3) Item 2660-104-6062, Budget Act of 2016 (Ch. 23, Stats. 2016) (4) Item 2660-104-6062, Budget Act of 2015 (Chs. 10 and 11, Stats. 2015) (5) Item 2660-104-6062, Budget Act of 2017 (Chs. 14, 22, and 54, Stats. 2017) (6) Item 2660-104-6062, Budget Act of 2018 (Chs. 29 and 30, Stats. 2018) (7) Item 2660-104-6062, Budget Act of 2019 (Chs. 23 and 55, Stats. 2019) 6063—​Highway-Railroad Crossing Safety Account (1) Item 2660-104-6063, Budget Act of 2012 (Chs. 21 and 29, Stats. 2012) (2) Item 2660-104-6063, Budget Act of 2015 (Chs. 10 and 11, Stats. 2015) (3) Item 2660-104-6063, Budget Act of 2020 (Chs. 6 and 7, Stats. 2020) 6064—​Highway Safety, Rehabilitation, and Preservation Account (1) Item 2660-304-6064, Budget Act of 2007 (Chs. 171 and 172, Stats. 2007) (2) Item 2660-304-6064, Budget Act of 2009 (Ch. 1, 2009–10 3rd Ex. Sess., as revised by Ch. 1, 2009–10 4th Ex. Sess.) (3) Item 2660-104-6064, Budget Act of 2010 (Ch. 712, Stats. 2010) (4) Item 2660-304-6064, Budget Act of 2011 (Ch. 33, Stats. 2011) (8) Item 2660-304-6064, Budget Act of 2017 (Chs. 14, 22, and 54, Stats. 2017) (6) Item 2660-304-6064, Budget Act of 2018 (Chs. 29 and 30, Stats. 2018) (7) Item 2660-104-6064, Budget Act of 2020 (Chs. 6 and 7, Stats. 2020) 6072—​State Route 99 Account (3) Item 2660-304-6072, Budget Act of 2009 (Ch. 1, 2009–10 3rd Ex. Sess., as revised by Ch. 1, 2009–10 4th Ex. Sess.) (9) Item 2660-304-6072, Budget Act of 2017 (Chs. 14, 22, and 54, Stats. 2017) (10) Item 2660-304-6072, Budget Act of 2019 (Chs. 23 and 55, Stats. 2019) 2660-495—Reversion, Department of Transportation. As of June 30, 2026, the unallocated balances of the appropriations provided in the following citations shall revert to the funds from which the appropriations were made. 6055—​Corridor Mobility Improvement Account (1) Item 2660-304-6055, Budget Act of 2007 (Chs. 171 and 172, Stats. 2007) (2) Item 2660-104-6055, Budget Act of 2008 (Chs. 268 and 269, Stats. 2008) (3) Item 2660-304-6055, Budget Act of 2008 (Chs. 268 and 269, Stats. 2008) (6) Item 2660-304-6055, Budget Act of 2009 (Ch. 1, 2009–10 3rd Ex. Sess., as revised by Ch. 1, 2009–10 4th Ex. Sess.) (8) Item 2660-304-6055, Budget Act of 2010 (Ch. 712, Stats. 2010) (9) Item 2660-304-6055, Budget Act of 2011 (Ch. 33, Stats. 2011) (10) Item 2660-304-6055, Budget Act of 2012 (Chs. 21 and 29, Stats. 2012) (11) Item 2660-304-6055, Budget Act of 2014 (Chs. 25 and 663, Stats. 2014) (12) Item 2660-304-6055, Budget Act of 2016 (Ch. 23, Stats. 2016) (13) Item 2660-304-6055, Budget Act of 2017 (Chs. 14, 22, and 54, Stats. 2017) (14) Item 2660-104-6055, Budget Act of 2024 (Chs. 22, 35, and 994, Stats. 2024) (15) Item 2660-304-6055, Budget Act of 2024 (Chs. 22, 35, and 994, Stats. 2024) 6056—​Trade Corridors Improvement Fund (5) Item 2660-304-6056, Budget Act of 2010 (Ch. 712, Stats. 2010) (6) Item 2660-104-6056, Budget Act of 2011 (Ch. 33, Stats. 2011) (7) Item 2660-304-6056, Budget Act of 2011 (Ch. 33, Stats. 2011) (8) Item 2660-104-6056, Budget Act of 2012 (Chs. 21 and 29, Stats. 2012) (9) Item 2660-304-6056, Budget Act of 2012 (Chs. 21 and 29, Stats. 2012) (10) Item 2660-104-6056, Budget Act of 2013 (Chs. 20 and 354, Stats. 2013) (11) Item 2660-304-6056, Budget Act of 2013 (Chs. 20 and 354, Stats. 2013) (12) Item 2660-304-6056, Budget Act of 2014 (Chs. 25 and 663, Stats. 2014) (13) Item 2660-104-6056, Budget Act of 2015 (Chs. 10 and 11, Stats. 2015) (14) Item 2660-304-6056, Budget Act of 2015 (Chs. 10 and 11, Stats. 2015) (15) Item 2660-104-6056, Budget Act of 2016 (Ch. 23, Stats. 2016) (16) Item 2660-304-6056, Budget Act of 2016 (Ch. 23, Stats. 2016) (17) Item 2660-304-6056, Budget Act of 2017 (Chs. 14, 22, and 54, Stats. 2017) (18) Item 2660-304-6056, Budget Act of 2018 (Chs. 29 and 30, Stats. 2018) (19) Item 2660-104-6056, Budget Act of 2019 (Ch. 23, Stats. 2019) (21) Item 2660-304-6056, Budget Act of 2020 (Chs. 6 and 7, Stats. 2020) (22) Item 2660-304-6056, Budget Act of 2022 (Chs. 43, 45, and 249, Stats. 2022) (23) Item 2660-304-6056, Budget Act of 2023 (Chs. 12, 38, and 189, Stats. 2023) (24) Item 2660-104-6056, Budget Act of 2024 (Chs. 22, 35, and 994, Stats. 2024) (25) Item 2660-304-6056, Budget Act of 2024 (Chs. 22, 35, and 994, Stats. 2024) 6058—​Transportation Facilities Account (2) Item 2660-304-6058, Budget Act of 2007 (Chs. 171 and 172, Stats. 2007) (3) Item 2660-104-6058, Budget Act of 2008 (Chs. 268 and 269, Stats. 2008) (4) Item 2660-304-6058, Budget Act of 2008 (Chs. 268 and 269, Stats. 2008) (8) Item 2660-304-6058, Budget Act of 2012 (Chs. 21 and 29, Stats. 2012) (9) Item 2660-304-6058, Budget Act of 2014 (Chs. 25 and 663, Stats. 2014) (10) Item 2660-304-6058, Budget Act of 2017 (Chs. 14, 22, and 54, Stats. 2017) (11) Item 2660-304-6058, Budget Act of 2018 (Chs. 29 and 30, Stats. 2018) (12) Item 2660-304-6058, Budget Act of 2019 (Ch. 23, Stats. 2019) (13) Item 2660-304-6058, Budget Act of 2022 (Chs. 43, 45, and 249, Stats. 2022) (14) Item 2660-104-6058, Budget Act of 2024 (Chs. 22, 35, and 994, Stats. 2024) (15) Item 2660-304-6058, Budget Act of 2024 (Chs. 22, 35, and 994, Stats. 2024) 6059—​Public Transportation Modernization, Improvement, and Service Enhancement Account (1) Item 2660-304-6059, Budget Act of 2007 (Chs. 171 and 172, Stats. 2007) (2) Item 2660-304-6059, Budget Act of 2008 (Chs. 268 and 269, Stats. 2008) (3) Item 2660-304-6059, Budget Act of 2009 (Ch. 1, 2009–10 3rd Ex. Sess., as revised by Ch. 1, 2009–10 4th Ex. Sess.) (4) Item 2660-304-6059, Budget Act of 2011 (Ch. 33, Stats. 2011) (5) Item 2660-304-6059, Budget Act of 2013 (Chs. 20 and 354, Stats. 2013) (6) Item 2660-304-6059, Budget Act of 2014 (Chs. 25 and 663, Stats. 2014) (7) Item 2660-304-6059, Budget Act of 2016 (Ch. 23, Stats. 2016) (8) Item 2660-304-6059, Budget Act of 2017 (Chs. 14, 22, and 54, Stats. 2017) (9) Item 2660-304-6059, Budget Act of 2018 (Chs. 29 and 30, Stats. 2018) (12) Item 2660-304-6059, Budget Act of 2022 (Chs. 43, 45, and 249, Stats. 2022) (13) Item 2660-304-6059, Budget Act of 2023 (Chs. 12, 38, and 189, Stats. 2023) (14) Item 2660-104-6059, Budget Act of 2024 (Chs. 22, 35, and 994, Stats. 2024) (15) Item 2660-304-6059, Budget Act of 2024 (Chs. 22, 35, and 994, Stats. 2024) 6060—​State-Local Partnership Program Account (1) Item 2660-304-6060, Budget Act of 2008 (Chs. 268 and 269, Stats. 2008) (2) Item 2660-104-6060, Budget Act of 2009 (Ch. 1, 2009–10 3rd Ex. Sess., as revised by Ch. 1, 2009–10 4th Ex. Sess.) (3) Item 2660-304-6060, Budget Act of 2009 (Ch. 1, 2009–10 3rd Ex. Sess., as revised by Ch. 1, 2009–10 4th Ex. Sess.) (4) Item 2660-104-6060, Budget Act of 2010 (Ch. 712, Stats. 2010) (5) Item 2660-104-6060, Budget Act of 2011 (Ch. 33, Stats. 2011) (6) Item 2660-304-6060, Budget Act of 2011 (Ch. 33, Stats. 2011) (7) Item 2660-104-6060, Budget Act of 2012 (Chs. 21 and 29, Stats. 2012) (8) Item 2660-304-6060, Budget Act of 2012 (Chs. 21 and 29, Stats. 2012) 6062—​Local Bridge Seismic Retrofit Account (1) Item 2660-104-6062, Budget Act of 2007 (Chs. 171 and 172, Stats. 2007) (2) Item 2660-104-6062, Budget Act of 2008 (Chs. 268 and 269, Stats. 2008) (3) Item 2660-104-6062, Budget Act of 2011 (Ch. 33, Stats. 2011) (4) Item 2660-104-6062, Budget Act of 2012 (Chs. 21 and 29, Stats. 2012) (5) Item 2660-104-6062, Budget Act of 2013 (Chs. 20 and 354, Stats. 2013) (6) Item 2660-104-6062, Budget Act of 2014 (Chs. 25 and 663, Stats. 2014) (7) Item 2660-104-6062, Budget Act of 2015 (Chs. 10 and 11, Stats. 2015) (9) Item 2660-104-6062, Budget Act of 2017 (Chs. 14, 22, and 54, Stats. 2017) (10) Item 2660-104-6062, Budget Act of 2018 (Chs. 29 and 30, Stats. 2018) (11) Item 2660-104-6062, Budget Act of 2019 (Ch. 23, Stats. 2019) (12) Item 2660-104-6062, Budget Act of 2020 (Chs. 6 and 7, Stats. 2020) (13) Item 2660-104-6062, Budget Act of 2021 (Chs. 21, 69, and 240, Stats. 2021) (14) Item 2660-104-6062, Budget Act of 2022 (Chs. 43, 45, and 249, Stats. 2022) (15) Item 2660-104-6062, Budget Act of 2023 (Chs. 12, 38, and 189, Stats. 2023) (16) Item 2660-104-6062, Budget Act of 2024 (Chs. 22, 35, and 994, Stats. 2024) 6063—​Highway-Railroad Crossing Safety Account (4) Item 2660-104-6063, Budget Act of 2012 (Chs. 21 and 29, Stats. 2012) (5) Item 2660-104-6063, Budget Act of 2015 (Chs. 10 and 11, Stats. 2015) (9) Item 2660-104-6063, Budget Act of 2024 (Chs. 22, 35, and 994, Stats. 2024) 6064—​Highway Safety, Rehabilitation, and Preservation Account (Traffic Light Synchronization Program) (2) Item 2660-104-6064, Budget Act of 2008 (Chs. 268 and 269, Stats. 2008) (3) Item 2660-104-6064, Budget Act of 2010 (Ch. 712, Stats. 2010) (6) Item 2660-104-6064, Budget Act of 2020 (Chs. 6 and 7, Stats. 2020) (9) Item 2660-104-6064, Budget Act of 2024 (Chs. 22, 35, and 994, Stats. 2024) 6064—​Highway Safety, Rehabilitation, and Preservation Account (non-State Transportation Improvement Program) (1) Item 2660-304-6064, Budget Act of 2007 (Chs. 171 and 172, Stats. 2007) (3) Item 2660-304-6064, Budget Act of 2009 (Ch. 1, 2009–10 3rd Ex. Sess., as revised by Ch. 1, 2009–10 4th Ex. Sess.) (5) Item 2660-304-6064, Budget Act of 2011 (Ch. 33, Stats. 2011) (6) Item 2660-304-6064, Budget Act of 2012 (Chs. 21 and 29, Stats. 2012) (7) Item 2660-304-6064, Budget Act of 2017 (Chs. 14, 22, and 54, Stats. 2017) (8) Item 2660-304-6064, Budget Act of 2018 (Chs. 29 and 30, Stats. 2018) (11) Item 2660-304-6064, Budget Act of 2022 (Chs. 43, 45, and 249, Stats. 2022) (12) Item 2660-304-6064, Budget Act of 2024 (Chs. 22, 35, and 994, Stats. 2024) 6072—​State Route 99 Account (1) Item 2660-304-6072, Budget Act of 2009 (Ch. 1, 2009–10 3rd Ex. Sess., as revised by Ch. 1, 2009–10 4th Ex. Sess.) (7) Item 2660-304-6072, Budget Act of 2017 (Chs. 14, 22, and 54, Stats. 2017) (11) Item 2660-304-6072, Budget Act of 2018 (Chs. 29 and 30, Stats. 2018) (13) Item 2660-304-6072, Budget Act of 2019 (Ch. 23, Stats. 2019) (15) Item 2660-304-6072, Budget Act of 2021 (Chs. 21, 69, and 240, Stats. 2021) (16) Item 2660-304-6072, Budget Act of 2023 (Chs. 12, 38, and 189, Stats. 2023) (17) Item 2660-104-6072, Budget Act of 2024 (Chs. 22, 35, and 994, Stats. 2024) (18) Item 2660-304-6072, Budget Act of 2024 (Chs. 22, 35, and 994, Stats. 2024) 2665-001-9331—For support of High-Speed Rail Authority, payable from the High-Speed Rail Property Fund ........................ 2,500,000 Schedule: (1) 1960-High-Speed Rail Authority Operations ........................ 2,500,000 Provisions: 1. Funds appropriated in this item shall only be used for activities specified in Section 185045 of the Public Utilities Code. 2665-004-6043—For support of High-Speed Rail Authority, payable from the High-Speed Passenger Train Bond Fund ........................ 39,877,000 Schedule: (1) 1960-High-Speed Rail Authority Operations ........................ 42,534,000 (2) Reimbursements to 1960-High-Speed Rail Authority Operations ........................ −2,657,000 Provisions: 1. Of the funds provided in this item for contracts, the High-Speed Rail Authority shall ensure that all deliverables and services included in contracts between the authority and each of its contractors are completed to the level prescribed by the contract as a requirement for payment by the authority to the contractor. It is the intent of the Legislature that this provision not prohibit the High-Speed Rail Authority from working with contractors in the management of these contracts. 2. Of the amount provided in Schedule (1), up to $100,000 shall be made available to support the operation of the independent peer review group established pursuant to Section 185035 of the Public Utilities Code. 3. Expenditure authority in this item, or other department items of appropriation, may be augmented by a cumulative total not to exceed $10,000,000 to reflect reimbursements to the High-Speed Rail Authority from the Department of Transportation. This budget authority is intended to allow additional efficiencies and coordinated work between the Department of Transportation and the High-Speed Rail Authority, as those opportunities are identified. The Department of Finance shall authorize the reimbursement not sooner than 30 days after notification in writing to the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee. 4. Notwithstanding any other law, funds appropriated in this item from the High-Speed Passenger Train Bond Fund may be reduced and replaced by an equivalent amount of federal funds determined by the High-Speed Rail Authority to be available and necessary to comply with Section 8.50 and the most effective management of state resources. Not more than 30 days after replacing the state funds with federal funds, the Director of Finance shall notify in writing the chairpersons of the committees in each house of the Legislature that consider appropriations and the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee of this action. 5. The Department of Finance may augment the amount appropriated in Schedule (2) by up to $1,000,000 for additional reimbursements from local governments and passenger rail providers for work those entities request from the High-Speed Rail Authority for review and approval of environmental and engineering documents, including those related to the federal National Environmental Policy Act of 1969 under the authority provided to the Secretary of Transportation pursuant to Section 13979.2 of the Government Code, and for other reimbursable work requested by these entities. 2665-491—Reappropriation, High-Speed Rail Authority. The balances of the appropriations provided in the following citations are reappropriated for the purposes provided for in those appropriations and shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2028: 6043—​High-Speed Passenger Train Bond Fund (1) Item 2665-104-6043, Budget Act of 2012 (Chs. 21 and 29, Stats. 2012), as amended by Chapter 152, Statutes of 2012, as reappropriated by Item 2665-491, Budget Act of 2018 (Chs. 29 and 30, Stats. 2018). 2665-492—Reappropriation, High-Speed Rail Authority. The balances of the appropriations provided in the following citations are reappropriated for the purposes provided for in those appropriations and shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2034. 0890—​Federal Trust Fund (1) Item 2665-306-0890, Budget Act of 2012 (Chs. 21 and 29, Stats. 2012), as amended by Chapter 152 of the Statutes of 2012 and reappropriated by Item 2665-492, Budget Acts of 2018 (Chs. 29 and 30, Stats. 2018) and 2021 (Chs. 21, 69, and 240, Stats. 2021) (1) 20.01.010-Initial Operating Segment, Section 1—​Acquisition and Build 2667-001-0046—For support of High-Speed Rail Authority Office of the Inspector General, payable from the Public Transportation Account, State Transportation Fund ........................ 4,744,000 Schedule: (1) 2005-High-Speed Rail Authority Office of the Inspector General ........................ 4,744,000 Provisions: 1. The Department of Finance may augment the amount appropriated in Schedule (1) by up to $1,000,000 for unanticipated expenses associated with the duties described in Division 19.7 (commencing with Section 187000) of the Public Utilities Code. The Department of Finance shall authorize the augmentation not sooner than 30 days after notification of the necessity therefor in writing to the chairpersons of the committees in each house of the Legislature that consider appropriations and the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, or any lesser time as determined by the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee. 2. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (1), $654,000 shall be made available for implementation activities of the Audits and Reviews Software project upon project approval or project delegation approval by the California Department of Technology. 3. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (1), $652,000 shall be made available for implementation activities of the Whistleblower Complaint Receipt and Investigation System project upon project approval or project delegation approval by the California Department of Technology. 2670-001-0290—For support of Board of Pilot Commissioners for the Bays of San Francisco, San Pablo, and Suisun, payable from the Board of Pilot Commissioners’ Special Fund ........................ 6,722,000 Schedule: (1) 2030010-Board Operations ........................ 5,240,000 (2) 2030019-Trainee Training ........................ 1,065,000 (3) 2030020-Continuing Education ........................ 417,000 Provisions: 1. The amount appropriated in this item may include revenues derived from the assessment of fines and penalties imposed as specified in Section 13332.18 of the Government Code. 2. The Department of Finance may augment the amount appropriated in Schedule (2) by an amount not to exceed $400,000 for costs related to the administration of a Pilot Trainee Training Program Selection Examination. 3. Of the amount included in this item, $1,895,000 shall be allocated upon approval of the Department of Finance for the Board of Pilot Commissioners’ Business Modernization project. Stage 4 of the project development lifecycle process must be approved by the Department of Technology before the release of these funds. 4. Of the amount included in this item, up to $100,000 may be allocated for legal settlement costs. 2720-001-0001—For support of Department of the California Highway Patrol ........................ 15,937,000 Schedule: (1) 2050-Traffic Management ........................ 15,937,000 Provisions: 1. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (1), up to $849,000 shall be used for the California Cybersecurity Integration Center. 2. Information sharing by the California Cybersecurity Integration Center shall be conducted in a manner that protects the privacy and civil liberties of individuals, safeguards sensitive information, preserves business confidentiality, and enables public officials to detect, investigate, respond to, and prevent cyberattacks that threaten public health and safety, economic stability, and national security. 2720-001-0042—For support of Department of the California Highway Patrol, payable from the State Highway Account, State Transportation Fund ........................ 115,427,000 Schedule: (1) 2050-Traffic Management ........................ 33,863,000 (2) 2055-Regulation and Inspection ........................ 81,564,000 2720-001-0044—For support of Department of the California Highway Patrol, payable from the Motor Vehicle Account, State Transportation Fund ........................ 3,106,132,000 Schedule: (1) 2050-Traffic Management ........................ 3,012,869,000 (2) 2055-Regulation and Inspection ........................ 242,686,000 (3) 2060-Vehicle Ownership Security ........................ 75,588,000 (4) 9900100-Administration ........................ 304,266,000 (5) 9900200-Administration—​Distributed ........................ −304,266,000 (6) Reimbursements to 2050-Traffic Management ........................ −218,120,000 (7) Reimbursements to 2055-Regulation and Inspection ........................ −3,295,000 (8) Reimbursements to 2060-Vehicle Ownership Security ........................ −3,596,000 Provisions: 1. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $7,000,000 may be directed to increase the Department of the California Highway Patrol’s support for police and sheriffs engaged in antigang activities. 2. Of the amount appropriated in this item, $27,200,000 shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2029, to fund maintenance and parts for existing vehicles and purchases of replacement vehicles as described in the Department of the California Highway Patrol’s approved annual fleet acquisition plan. 3. Of the amount appropriated in this item, $8,000,000 shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2029, to fund maintenance and parts for existing aircraft and purchases of replacement aircraft. 2720-001-0293—For support of Department of the California Highway Patrol, payable from the Motor Carriers Safety Improvement Fund ........................ 2,362,000 Schedule: (1) 2055-Regulation and Inspection ........................ 2,362,000 2720-001-0840—For support of Department of the California Highway Patrol, payable from the California Motorcyclist Safety Fund ........................ 3,191,000 Schedule: (1) 2050-Traffic Management ........................ 3,191,000 2720-001-0890—For support of Department of the California Highway Patrol, payable from the Federal Trust Fund ........................ 52,832,000 Schedule: (1) 2050-Traffic Management ........................ 15,745,000 (2) 2055-Regulation and Inspection ........................ 37,087,000 2720-001-0942—For support of Department of the California Highway Patrol, payable from the Hazardous Substance Account, Special Deposit Fund ........................ 220,000 Schedule: (1) 2055-Regulation and Inspection ........................ 220,000 2720-002-0001—For support of Department of the California Highway Patrol ........................ 5,000,000 Schedule: (1) 2050-Traffic Management ........................ 5,000,000 Provisions: 1. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (1), up to $5,000,000 shall be for use by the California Highway Patrol Computer Crimes Investigation Unit for investigations related to child sexual abuse material and human trafficking. The Computer Crimes Investigation Unit may use these resources to join or otherwise collaborate with other entities investigating similar crimes, including, but not limited to, California Internet Crimes Against Children task forces. The unit shall coordinate its activities with other such entities for the purposes of deconflicting and minimizing unnecessary duplication of effort. 2720-002-0044—For support of Department of the California Highway Patrol, payable from the Motor Vehicle Account, State Transportation Fund ........................ 885,000 Schedule: (1) 2050-Traffic Management ........................ 885,000 2720-011-0044—For Department of the California Highway Patrol, for augmentation to fund tactical alerts for declared emergencies and immediate threats to public safety as determined by the Commissioner of the California Highway Patrol, payable from the Motor Vehicle Account, State Transportation Fund ........................ (10,000,000) Schedule: (1) 2050-Traffic Management ........................ (10,000,000) Provisions: 1. For the purpose of this item, a tactical alert occurs when officers are placed on 12-hour shifts to enhance emergency preparedness and emergency response. 2. This augmentation will take place upon approval of the Director of Finance. 3. Not later than December 31 of each year, the Department of the California Highway Patrol shall submit a report to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee and to the appropriate fiscal and policy committees of each house of the Legislature on the activities and the expenditures for the previous year for tactical alerts. 2720-011-0942—For support of Department of the California Highway Patrol, payable from the Asset Forfeiture (State/Local) Account, Special Deposit Fund ........................ 2,116,000 Schedule: (1) 2050-Traffic Management ........................ 1,058,000 (2) 2060-Vehicle Ownership Security ........................ 1,058,000 2720-093-0001—For support of Department of California Highway Patrol, for rental payments on lease-revenue bonds ........................ 7,423,000 Schedule: (1) 2050-Traffic Management ........................ 7,423,000 Provisions: 1. The Controller shall transfer funds appropriated in this item for base rental as and when provided for in the schedule submitted by the State Public Works Board. Notwithstanding the payment dates in any related facility lease or indenture, the schedule may provide for an earlier transfer of funds to ensure debt requirements are met and pay base rental in full when due. 2. The Controller shall transfer for additional rental, no later than 30 days after enactment of the act adding this item, $69,000 of the amount appropriated in this item to the Expense Account in the Public Buildings Construction Fund. 3. This item may be adjusted pursuant to Section 4.30. Any adjustments to this item shall be reported to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee pursuant to Section 4.30. 2720-101-0974—For local assistance, Department of the California Highway Patrol, payable from the Peace Officer Memorial Foundation Fund ........................ 300,000 Schedule: (1) 2050-Traffic Management ........................ 300,000 2720-301-0001—For capital outlay, Department of the California Highway Patrol ........................ 11,414,000 Schedule: (1) 0000144-CHPERS: Replace Tower and Vaults ........................ 10,414,000 (a) Preliminary plans ........................ 469,000 (b) Working drawings ........................ 813,000 (c) Construction ........................ 9,132,000 (2) 0000751-Statewide: Advanced Plans and Site Identification ........................ 1,000,000 (a) Study ........................ 700,000 (b) Acquisition ........................ 300,000 Provisions: 1. The Department of Finance may augment the funds in Schedule (2) by up to $4,000,000 for the purpose of securing option agreements to purchase critical parcels of real property. Any augmentation may be authorized not sooner than 30 days after notification is provided to the chairpersons of the committees in each house of the Legislature that consider appropriations, the chairpersons of the committees and the appropriate subcommittees in each house of the Legislature that consider the Department of the California Highway Patrol budget, and the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, or not sooner than whatever lesser time the chairperson of the joint committee, or the chairperson’s designee, may in each instance determine. Any such option agreement is subject to the Property Acquisition Law (Part 11 (commencing with Section 15850) of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code). 2740-001-0001—For support of Department of Motor Vehicles ........................ 11,390,000 Schedule: (1) 2130-Vehicle/Vessel Identification and Compliance ........................ 271,000 (2) 2135-Driver Licensing and Personal Identification ........................ 11,036,000 (3) 2140-Driver Safety ........................ 57,000 (4) 2145-Occupational Licensing and Investigative Services ........................ 26,000 2740-001-0042—For support of Department of Motor Vehicles, payable from the State Highway Account, State Transportation Fund ........................ 12,732,000 Schedule: (1) 2130-Vehicle/Vessel Identification and Compliance ........................ 12,732,000 2740-001-0044—For support of Department of Motor Vehicles, payable from the Motor Vehicle Account, State Transportation Fund ........................ 1,390,045,000 Schedule: (1) 2130-Vehicle/Vessel Identification and Compliance ........................ 737,763,000 (2) 2135-Driver Licensing and Personal Identification ........................ 418,630,000 (3) 2140-Driver Safety ........................ 177,766,000 (4) 2145-Occupational Licensing and Investigative Services ........................ 76,859,000 (5) 9900100-Administration ........................ 139,889,000 (6) 9900200-Administration—​Distributed ........................ −139,889,000 (7) Reimbursements to 2130-Vehicle/Vessel Identification and Compliance ........................ −17,623,000 (8) Reimbursements to 2135-Driver Licensing and Personal Identification ........................ −2,445,000 (9) Reimbursements to 2140-Driver Safety ........................ −640,000 (10) Reimbursements to 2145-Occupational Licensing and Investigative Services ........................ −265,000 Provisions: 1.If additional resources are needed to meet REAL ID workload demands beyond the level provided for in this appropriation, the Director of Finance may augment the amount appropriated in this item by submitting a request by the Director of Motor Vehicles for additional resources. The request must justify the additional resources requested and demonstrate how and by what amount of time the level of resources requested will reduce or prevent wait times or will increase the amount of REAL ID transactions that can be processed statewide. The request must also provide an update on the status of the resources provided pursuant to this appropriation and their impact on statewide field office wait times or REAL ID transactions. The requested augmentation is intended to reduce or prevent long wait times or increase REAL ID transactions at impacted field offices and shall be limited to that purpose, including, but not limited to, additional field office staff, business process redesign, and expanded service hours. The request will also provide an updated forecast of the Motor Vehicle Account fund condition that reflects the impact of this request. The Director of Finance shall not approve any augmentation unless the approval is made in writing and filed with the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee and the chairpersons of the committees in each house of the Legislature that consider appropriations not later than 30 days prior to the effective date of the approval, or prior to whatever lesser date of approval, or prior to whatever lesser time the chairperson of the joint committee, or the chairperson’s designee, may determine. 2. Of the amount appropriated in this item, $4,127,000 shall be available for encumberance or expenditure until June 30, 2030, to fund the San Clemente Field Office lease. 2740-001-0054—For support of Department of Motor Vehicles, payable from the New Motor Vehicle Board Account ........................ 2,218,000 Schedule: (1) 2150-New Motor Vehicle Board ........................ 2,218,000 2740-001-0064—For support of Department of Motor Vehicles, payable from the Motor Vehicle License Fee Account, Transportation Tax Fund ........................ 17,754,000 Schedule: (1) 2130-Vehicle/Vessel Identification and Compliance ........................ 17,754,000 2740-001-0516—For support of Department of Motor Vehicles, payable from the Harbors and Watercraft Revolving Fund ........................ 3,271,000 Schedule: (1) 2130-Vehicle/Vessel Identification and Compliance ........................ 3,271,000 Provisions: 1. The funds appropriated in this item are for vessel registration and fee collection. 2740-001-0890—For support of Department of Motor Vehicles, payable from the Federal Trust Fund ........................ 1,391,000 Schedule: (1) 2130-Vehicle/Vessel Identification and Compliance ........................ 600,000 (2) 2135-Driver Licensing and Personal Identification ........................ 751,000 (3) 2145-Occupational Licensing and Investigative Services ........................ 40,000 2740-001-3290—For support of Department of Motor Vehicles, payable from the Road Maintenance and Rehabilitation Account, State Transportation Fund ........................ 14,142,000 Schedule: (1) 2130-Vehicle/Vessel Identification and Compliance ........................ 14,142,000 2740-001-3358—For support of Department of Motor Vehicles, payable from the Truck Emission Check Fund ........................ 3,503,000 Schedule: (1) 2130-Vehicle/Vessel Identification and Compliance ........................ 3,503,000 2740-002-0044—For support of Department of Motor Vehicles, payable from the Motor Vehicle Account, State Transportation Fund ........................ 94,077,000 Schedule: (1) 2130-Vehicle/Vessel Identification and Compliance ........................ 22,115,000 (2) 2135-Driver Licensing and Personal Identification ........................ 71,962,000 (3) 9900100-Administration ........................ 8,843,000 (4) 9900200-Administration—​Distributed ........................ −8,843,000 Provisions: 1. Upon order of the Department of Finance, up to $94,077,000 may be allocated for the Digital eXperience Platform project. Expenditure of these funds is contingent upon an adequate fund balance in the Motor Vehicle Account, as determined by the Department of Finance, and approval of the appropriate project documents by the Department of Technology. 2740-003-0044—For support of Department of Motor Vehicles, payable from the Motor Vehicle Account, State Transportation Fund ........................ 9,777,000 Schedule: (1) 2130-Vehicle/Vessel Identification and Compliance ........................ 5,206,000 (2) 2135-Driver Licensing and Personal Identification ........................ 2,868,000 (3) 2140-Driver Safety ........................ 1,175,000 (4) 2145-Occupational Licensing and Personal Identification ........................ 528,000 (5) 9900100-Administration ........................ 909,000 (6) 9900200-Administration—​Distributed ........................ −909,000 Provisions: 1. The amount appropriated in this item shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2030. 2740-093-0001—For support of the Department of Motor Vehicles, for rental payments on lease-revenue bonds ........................ 1,454,000 Schedule: (1) 2130-Vehicle/Vessel Identification and Compliance ........................ 774,000 (2) 2135-Driver Licensing and Personal Identification ........................ 426,000 (3) 2140-Driver Safety ........................ 176,000 (4) 2145-Occupational Licensing and Investigative Services ........................ 78,000 Provisions: 1. The Controller shall transfer funds appropriated in this item for base rental as and when provided for in the schedule submitted by the State Public Works Board. Notwithstanding the payment dates in any related Facility Lease or Indenture, the schedule may provide for an earlier transfer of funds to ensure debt requirements are met and pay base rental in full when due. 2. The Controller shall transfer for additional rental no later than 30 days after enactment of this budget, $13,000 of the amount appropriated in this item, to the Expense Account in the Public Buildings Construction Fund. 3. This item may be adjusted pursuant to Section 4.30. Any adjustments to this item shall be reported to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee pursuant to Section 4.30. 2740-301-0660—For capital outlay, Department of Motor Vehicles, payable from the Public Buildings Construction Fund ........................ 25,070,000 Schedule: (1) 0001491-Oxnard: Field Office Reconfiguration ........................ 21,185,000 (a) Construction ........................ 21,185,000 (2) 0000707-Delano: Field Office Replacement ........................ 3,885,000 (a) Construction ........................ 3,885,000 Provisions: 1. The Department of Motor Vehicles and the Department of General Services are authorized to execute and deliver any and all leases, contracts, agreements, or other documents necessary or advisable to consummate the sale and issuance of bonds by the State Public Works Board in accordance with the State Building Construction Act of 1955 (Part 10b (commencing with Section 15800) of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code) or otherwise to effectuate the financing of the scheduled project. 2740-490—Reappropriation, Department of Motor Vehicles. The amounts specified in the following citations are reappropriated for the purposes provided for in those appropriations and shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2027. 0044—Motor Vehicle Account, State Transportation Fund (1) Up to $9,827,000 in Item 2740-001-0044, Budget Act of 2021 (Chs. 21, 69, and 240, Stats. 2021), as reappropriated by Item 2740-490, Budget Act of 2022 (Chs. 43, 45, and 249, Stats. 2022). (2) Up to $11,368,000 in Item 2740-001-0044, Budget Act of 2022 (Chs. 43, 45, and 249, Stats. 2022), as reappropriated by Item 2740-492, Budget Act of 2023 (Chs. 12, 38, and 189, Stats. 2023). (3) Up to $11,102,000 in Item 2740-001-0044, Budget Act of 2023 (Chs. 12, 38, and 189, Stats. 2023). 2740-496—Reversion, Department of Motor Vehicles. As of June 30, 2026, the unencumbered balances of the appropriations provided in the following citations shall revert to the balances of the funds from which the appropriations were made. 0660—​Public Buildings Construction Fund (1) Item 2740-301-0660, Budget Act of 2024 (Chs. 22, 35, and 994, Stats. 2024) (1) 0001491-Oxnard: Field Office Reconfiguration (a) Construction NATURAL RESOURCES 3100-001-0001—For support of Exposition Park ........................ 116,903,000121,903,000 Schedule: (1) 2300-California Science Center ........................ 35,569,000 (2) 2305-Exposition Park Management ........................ 78,491,000 (3) 2310-California African American Museum ........................ 3,975,0008,975,000 (4) 9900100-Administration ........................ 981,000 (5) 9900200-Administration—​Distributed ........................ −981,000 (6) Reimbursements to 2300-California Science Center ........................ −957,000 (7) Reimbursements to 2310-California African American Museum ........................ −175,000 Provisions: 1. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (2), $76,000,000 is available for a deferred maintenance project or projects for utility replacement and site improvements. Notwithstanding paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 10198.1 of the Public Contract Code, the Department of General Services, in undertaking any project or projects pursuant to this authorization on behalf of Exposition Park, may utilize progressive design-build. Notwithstanding the requirements of Government Code Section 13332.19, Section 13332.19 of the Government Code, any project undertaken pursuant to this provision shall not be subject to the approval or oversight of the State Public Works Board. 2. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (3), $5,000,000 is a one-time augmentation for priority operational needs of the California African American Museum. 3100-001-0267—For support of Exposition Park, payable from the Exposition Park Improvement Fund ........................ 34,782,000 Schedule: (1) 2300-California Science Center ........................ 4,016,000 (2) 2305-Exposition Park Management ........................ 32,420,000 (3) 2310-California African American Museum ........................ 348,000 (4) 9900100-Administration ........................ 3,000 (5) 9900200-Administration—​Distributed ........................ −3,000 (6) Reimbursements to 2305-Exposition Park Management ........................ −2,002,000 Provisions: 1. The amount appropriated in this item may include revenues derived from the assessment of fines and penalties imposed pursuant to Section 13332.18 of the Government Code. 2. Upon approval of the Director of Finance, the amount available for expenditure in this item may be augmented for park operational costs, including, but not limited to, increased security and parking associated with major events at Exposition Park. Any augmentation under this provision shall be authorized no sooner than 30 days after notification in writing of the necessity of the increase to the chairpersons of the committees in each house of the Legislature that consider appropriations, the chairpersons of the committees and the appropriate subcommittees that consider the State Budget, and the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, or not sooner than whatever lesser time the chairperson of the joint committee, or the chairperson’s designee, may determine. 3. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (2), $20,000,000 is available for a deferred maintenance project or projects for utility replacement and site improvements. Notwithstanding paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 10198.1 of the Public Contract Code, the Department of General Services, in undertaking any project or projects pursuant to this authorization on behalf of Exposition Park, may utilize progressive design-build. Notwithstanding the requirements of Government Code Section 13332.19, any project undertaken pursuant to this provision shall not be subject to the approval or oversight of the State Public Works Board. 3100-011-0001—For transfer by the Controller, to the Exposition Park Improvement Fund ........................ 724,000 3100-490—Reappropriation, Exposition Park. The balances of the appropriations provided in the following citations are reappropriated for the purposes provided for in those appropriations and shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2029: 0001—General Fund (1) Provision 3 of Item 3100-001-0001, Budget Act of 2021 (Chs. 21, 69, and 240, Stats. 2021) as reappropriated by Item 3100-490, Budget Act of 2024 (Chs. 22, 35, and 994, Stats. 2024). (2) Subparagraph (A) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (l) of Section 19.56, Budget Act of 2022 (Chs. 43, 45, and 249, Stats. 2022), as allocated to Item 3100-001-0001, Budget Act of 2022, as reappropriated by Item 3100-490, Budget Act of 2024 (Chs. 22, 35, and 994, Stats. 2024). (2) Schedule (3) of Item 3100-001-0001, Budget Act of 2022 (Chs. 43, 45, and 249, Stats. 2022), as reappropriated by Item 3100-490, Budget Act of 2024 (Chs. 22, 35, and 994, Stats. 2024). 3110-101-0071—For local assistance, Special Resources Program, payable from the Yosemite Foundation Account, California Environmental License Plate Fund ........................ 840,000 Schedule: (1) 2325-Yosemite Foundation ........................ 840,000 3110-101-0140—For local assistance, Special Resources Program, payable from the California Environmental License Plate Fund ........................ 4,813,000 Schedule: (1) 2320-Tahoe Regional Planning Agency ........................ 4,613,000 (2) 2330-Sea Grant Program ........................ 200,000 3110-101-0516—For local assistance, Special Resources Program, payable from the Harbors and Watercraft Revolving Fund ........................ 499,000 Schedule: (1) 2320-Tahoe Regional Planning Agency ........................ 499,000 Provisions: 1. Notwithstanding any other law, funds in this item shall be expended to enforce motorized watercraft regulations adopted by the Tahoe Regional Planning Agency. 3125-001-0001—For support of California Tahoe Conservancy ........................ 32,000 Schedule: (1) 2340-Tahoe Conservancy ........................ 32,000 3125-001-0140—For support of California Tahoe Conservancy, payable from the California Environmental License Plate Fund ........................ 4,617,000 Schedule: (1) 2340-Tahoe Conservancy ........................ 6,949,000 (2) Reimbursements to 2340-Tahoe Conservancy ........................ −2,332,000 3125-001-0286—For support of California Tahoe Conservancy, payable from the Lake Tahoe Conservancy Account ........................ 756,000 Schedule: (1) 2340-Tahoe Conservancy ........................ 756,000 3125-001-0568—For support of California Tahoe Conservancy, payable from the Tahoe Conservancy Fund ........................ 600,000 Schedule: (1) 2340-Tahoe Conservancy ........................ 700,000 (2) Reimbursements to 2340-Tahoe Conservancy ........................ −100,000 Provisions: 1. Of this amount, pursuant to Section 66908.3 of the Government Code, the California Tahoe Conservancy shall pay $34,328 to the County of Placer and $25 to the County of El Dorado. 2. Fifty percent of the amounts pursuant to Provision 1 shall be used by the Counties of Placer and El Dorado for soil erosion control projects in the Lake Tahoe region, as defined in Section 66905.5 of the Government Code. 3125-001-0890—For support of California Tahoe Conservancy, payable from the Federal Trust Fund ........................ 3,264,000 Schedule: (1) 2340-Tahoe Conservancy ........................ 3,264,000 Provisions: 1. The funds appropriated in this item may be available for support or local assistance. 3125-001-1018—For support of California Tahoe Conservancy, payable from the Lake Tahoe Science and Lake Improvement Account ........................ 1,196,000 Schedule: (1) 2340-Tahoe Conservancy ........................ 1,196,000 Provisions: 1. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $1,035,000 shall be used for lakefront improvement projects, including project management, construction management, inspection, and overhead costs. 3125-001-6031—For support of California Tahoe Conservancy, payable from the Water Security, Clean Drinking Water, Coastal and Beach Protection Fund of 2002 ........................ 21,000 Schedule: (1) 2340-Tahoe Conservancy ........................ 21,000 3125-001-6083—For support of California Tahoe Conservancy, payable from the Water Quality, Supply, and Infrastructure Improvement Fund ........................ 130,000 Schedule: (1) 2340-Tahoe Conservancy ........................ 130,000 3125-001-6088—For support of California Tahoe Conservancy, payable from the California Drought, Water, Parks, Climate, Coastal Protection, and Outdoor Access For All Fund ........................ 1,188,000 Schedule: (1) 2340-Tahoe Conservancy ........................ 1,188,000 Provisions: 1. The funds appropriated in this item shall be available for purposes consistent with paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 80110 of the Public Resources Code. 3125-001-6093—For support of California Tahoe Conservancy, payable from the Safe Drinking Water, Wildfire Prevention, Drought Preparedness, and Clean Air Fund ........................ 150,000 Schedule: (1) 2340-Tahoe Conservancy ........................ 150,000 Provisions: 1. The amount appropriated in this item shall be exempt from any applicable law requiring competitive bidding or the supervision or approval of another department or agency of state government, with the exception of the Department of General Services, for the procurement of or contracting with vendors for work authorized in subdivision (i) of Section 91520 of the Public Resources Code. 3125-002-6093—For support of California Tahoe Conservancy, payable from the Safe Drinking Water, Wildfire Prevention, Drought Preparedness, and Clean Air Fund ........................ 150,000 Schedule: (1) 2340-Tahoe Conservancy ........................ 150,000 3125-101-0286—For local assistance, California Tahoe Conservancy, payable from the Lake Tahoe Conservancy Account ........................ 100,000 Schedule: (1) 2340-Tahoe Conservancy ........................ 100,000 Provisions: 2. The amount appropriated in this item is available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2029. 3125-101-1018—For local assistance, California Tahoe Conservancy, payable from the Lake Tahoe Science and Lake Improvement Account, General Fund ........................ 350,000 Schedule: (1) 2340-Tahoe Conservancy ........................ 350,000 Provisions: 1. The acquisition of real property or an interest in real property with funds appropriated in this item is not subject to the Property Acquisition Law when the value is $550,000 or less and therefore is not subject to approval by the State Public Works Board. 2. The amount appropriated in this item is available for encumbrance or expenditure for capital outlay or local assistance until June 30, 2029. 3125-301-0140—For capital outlay, California Tahoe Conservancy, payable from the Environmental License Plate Fund ........................ 0 Schedule: (1) 0001388-Opportunity Acquisitions ........................ 4,500,000 (a) Acquisition ........................ 4,500,000 (1.5) 0015175-Upper Truckee Marsh South Project ........................ 500,000 (2) Reimbursements to 0001388-Opportunity Acquisitions ........................ −4,500,000 (a) Acquisition ........................ −4,500,000 (3) Reimbursements to 0015175-Upper Truckee Marsh South Project ........................ −500,000 3125-301-6051—For capital outlay, California Tahoe Conservancy, payable from the Safe Drinking Water, Water Quality and Supply, Flood Control, River and Coastal Protection Fund of 2006 ........................ 400,000 Schedule: (1) 0001390-Minor Capital Outlay ........................ 400,000 (a) Minor projects ........................ 400,000 3125-301-6088—For capital outlay, California Tahoe Conservancy, payable from the California Drought, Water, Parks, Climate, Coastal Protection, and Outdoor Access For All Fund ........................ 600,000 Schedule: (1) 0001390-Minor Capital Outlay ........................ 100,000 (a) Minor projects ........................ 100,000 (2) 0016786-Lake Tahoe Blvd: ADA Sidewalk Improvements ........................ 500,000 (a) Minor projects ........................ 500,000 3125-490—Reappropriation, California Tahoe Conservancy. The balances of the appropriations provided in the following citations are reappropriated for the purposes provided for in those appropriations and shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure as specified below: 0262—​Habitat Conservation Fund (1) Item 3125-301-0262, Budget Act of 2022 (Chs. 43, 45, and 249, Stats. 2022), until June 30, 2027 (1) 0008795-Sunset Stables Reach 6, Upper Truckee River Restoration Project (a) Study 3125-492—Reappropriation, California Tahoe Conservancy. Notwithstanding any other law, the period to liquidate encumbrances of the following citations is extended as specified below: 0001—General Fund (1) Up to $1,200,000 in Item 3125-002-0001, Budget Act of 2021 (Chs. 21, 69, and 240, Stats. 2021), until June 30, 2029. (2) Up to $1,509,000 in Item 3125-001-0001, Budget Act of 2022 (Chs. 43, 45, and 249, Stats. 2022), until June 30, 2028. 0140—Environmental License Plate Fund (1) 3125-001-0140, Budget Act of 2023 (Chs. 12, 38, and 189, Stats. 2023), until June 30, 2027. 1018—Lake Tahoe Science and Lake Improvement Account, General Fund (1) 3125-101-1018, Budget Act of 2021 (Chs. 21, 69, and 240, Stats. 2021). until June 30, 2027. 3125-496—Reversion, California Tahoe Conservancy. As of June 30, 2026, the balances specified below of the appropriations provided in the following citations shall revert to the balances in the funds from which the appropriations were made. 6051—​California Tahoe Conservancy, payable from the Safe Drinking Water, Water Quality and Supply, Flood Control, River and Coastal Protection Fund of 2006 (1) Item 3125-301-6051, Budget Act of 2022 (Chs. 43, 45, and 249, Stats. 2022) (1) 0001389-Conceptual Feasibility Planning (a) Study (2) Item 3125-301-6051 Budget Act of 2024 (Chs. 22, 35, and 994, Stats. 2024) (1) 0001389-Conceptual Feasibility Planning (a) Study 6088—California Drought, Water, Parks, Climate, Coastal Protection, and Outdoor Access For All Fund. (1) Item 3125-301-6088, Budget Act of 2025 (Chs. 4 and 5, Stats. 2025) (3) 0013507-Lake Tahoe Blvd Demolition and Site Stabilization (a) Construction 3340-001-0001—For support of California Conservation Corps ........................ 116,661,000 Schedule: (1) 2360-Training and Work Program ........................ 116,661,000 Provisions: 1. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $2,725,000 shall be available for use by the California Conservation Corps to respond to natural disasters and other emergencies, including the fighting of forest fires. 2. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $1,098,000 shall be available for grants to the Greater Valley Conservation Corps and shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2028. 3340-001-0140—For support of California Conservation Corps, payable from the California Environmental License Plate Fund ........................ 302,000 Schedule: (1) 2360-Training and Work Program ........................ 302,000 3340-001-0318—For support of California Conservation Corps, payable from the Collins-Dugan California Conservation Corps Reimbursement Account ........................ 59,407,00064,407,000 Schedule: (1) 2360-Training and Work Program ........................ 59,407,00064,407,000 Provisions: 1. Notwithstanding Section 14316 of the Public Resources Code, the Director of Finance may make a loan from the General Fund to the Collins-Dugan California Conservation Corps Reimbursement Account in the amount of 25 percent of the reimbursements anticipated in the Collins-Dugan California Conservation Corps Reimbursement Account, not to exceed an aggregate total of $7,300,000, to meet cashflow needs from delays in collecting reimbursements. Any loan made by the director pursuant to this provision shall only be made if the California Conservation Corps has a valid contract or certification signed by the client agency that demonstrates that sufficient funds will be available to repay the loan. All moneys so transferred shall be repaid to the General Fund as soon as possible, but not later than one year from the date of the loan. 2. Notwithstanding Section 28.50, the Director of Finance may augment this item to reflect increases in reimbursements to the Collins-Dugan California Conservation Corps Reimbursement Account received from another officer, department, division, bureau, or other agency of the state that has requested services from the California Conservation Corps. Any augmentation that is deemed to be necessary on a permanent basis for future budget acts shall be submitted for review as a part of the regular budget process. 3. Notwithstanding Section 28.00, the Director of Finance may augment this item to reflect increases in reimbursements to the Collins-Dugan California Conservation Corps Reimbursement Account received from a local government, the federal government, or nonprofit organizations requesting emergency services from the California Conservation Corps after it has notified the Legislature through a letter to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee. Any augmentation that is deemed to be necessary on a permanent basis shall be submitted for review as a part of the regular budget process. 4. Of the amount appropriated in this item, $5,000,000 shall be for deferred maintenance and shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2029. 5. Of the amount appropriated in this item, $8,700,000 shall be for vehicle replacement and shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2031. 6. Of the amount appropriated in this item, $5,000,000 is from the Department of Forestry and Fire Protection for forest health projects and shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2029. 3340-001-3228—For support of California Conservation Corps, payable from the Greenhouse Gas Reduction Fund ........................ 8,477,000 Schedule: (1) 2360-Training and Work Program ........................ 8,477,000 Provisions: 1. The funds appropriated in this item are not subject to subdivision (b) of Section 15.14. 3340-001-6093—For support of California Conservation Corps, payable from the Safe Drinking Water, Wildfire Prevention, Drought Preparedness, and Clean Air Fund ........................ 200,000 Schedule: (1) 2360-Training and Work Program ........................ 200,000 3340-002-3228—For support of California Conservation Corps, payable from the Greenhouse Gas Reduction Fund ........................ 3,465,000 Schedule: (1) 2360-Training and Work Program ........................ 3,465,000 Provisions: 1. The funds appropriated in this item are available pursuant to Section 4213.05 of the Public Resources Code. 2. The funds appropriated in this item shall not be subject to the provisions of subdivision (b) of Section 15.14. 3340-093-0001—For support of California Conservation Corps, for rental payments on lease-revenue bonds ........................ 8,966,000 Schedule: (1) 2360-Training and Work Program ........................ 8,966,000 Provisions: 1. The Controller shall transfer funds appropriated in this item for base rental as and when provided for in the schedule submitted by the State Public Works Board. Notwithstanding the payment dates in any related Facility Lease or Indenture, the schedule may provide for an earlier transfer of funds to ensure debt requirements are met and pay base rental in full when due. 2. The Controller shall transfer for additional rental no later than 30 days after enactment of this budget, $58,000 of the amount appropriated in this item, to the Expense Account in the Public Buildings Construction Fund. 3. This item may be adjusted pursuant to Section 4.30. Any adjustments to this item shall be reported to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee pursuant to Section 4.30. 3340-101-6088—For local assistance, California Conservation Corps, payable from the California Drought, Water, Parks, Climate, Coastal Protection, and Outdoor Access For All Fund ........................ 229,000 Schedule: (1) 2360-Training and Work Program ........................ 229,000 Provisions: 1. The funds appropriated in this item shall be available for grants to certified local community conservation corps, consistent with Section 80136 of the Public Resources Code. 3340-495—Reversion, California Conservation Corps. Notwithstanding any other law, as of June 30, 2026, the unencumbered balances of the appropriations provided in the following citations shall revert to the balances in the funds from which the appropriations were made: 0318—Collins-Dugan California Conservation Corps Reimbursement Account (1) Item 3340-301-0318, Budget Act of 2025 (Chs. 4 and 5, Stats. 2025) (1) 0015390-Auberry, New Residential Center: Demolition (a) Preliminary Plans (b) Working Drawings (c) Construction 6088—California Drought, Water, Parks, Climate, Coastal Protection, and Outdoor Access for All Fund (1) Item 3340-301-6088, Budget Act of 2022 (Chs, 43, 45, and 249, Stats. 2022) (1) 0003214-Nonresidential Center, Los Angeles: Acquire Existing Facility (a) Acquisition 3355-001-0462—For support of Office of Energy Infrastructure Safety, payable from the Public Utilities Commission Utilities Reimbursement Account ........................ 36,830,000 Schedule: (1) 2370-Regulation of Energy Infrastructure Safety ........................ 36,830,000 Provisions: 1. The Department of Finance may augment this item by up to $1,000,000 ongoing and approve the establishment of up to five permanent positions to support the workload of a second or third eligible large electrical corporation, pursuant to Chapter 819 of the Statutes of 2022, submitting a distribution infrastructure undergrounding plan. Within 10 days of approval, the department shall provide written notification of any such augmentation or newly established positions to the chairpersons of the committees in each house of the Legislature that consider appropriations, the chairpersons of the committees and appropriate subcommittees of each house of the Legislature that consider the State Budget, and the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee. 3355-001-3302—For support of Office of Energy Infrastructure Safety, payable from the Safe Energy Infrastructure and Excavation Fund ........................ 8,215,000 Schedule: (1) 2370-Regulation of Energy Infrastructure Safety ........................ 8,215,000 3360-001-0044—For support of State Energy Resources Conservation and Development Commission, payable from the Motor Vehicle Account, State Transportation Fund ........................ 243,000 Schedule: (1) 2390010-Transportation Technology and Fuels ........................ 243,000 3360-001-0381—For support of State Energy Resources Conservation and Development Commission, payable from the Public Interest Research, Development, and Demonstration Fund ........................ 874,000 Schedule: (1) 2380019-Electricity Analysis ........................ 874,000 3360-001-0382—For support of State Energy Resources Conservation and Development Commission, payable from the Renewable Resource Trust Fund ........................ 1,278,000 Schedule: (1) 2390028-Renewable Energy ........................ 1,278,000 3360-001-0462—For support of State Energy Resources Conservation and Development Commission, payable from the Public Utilities Commission Utilities Reimbursement Account ........................ 2,054,000 Schedule: (1) 2385010-Building and Appliances ........................ 617,000 (2) 2390028-Renewable Energy ........................ 1,437,000 3360-001-0465—For support of State Energy Resources Conservation and Development Commission, payable from the Energy Resources Programs Account ........................ 79,936,000 Schedule: (1) 2380010-Power Plant Site Certification and Transmission Line Corridor Designation Program ........................ 18,324,000 (2) 2380019-Electricity Analysis ........................ 6,458,000 (3) 2380037-Management and Support ........................ 3,812,000 (4) 2385010-Building and Appliances ........................ 8,401,000 (5) 2385019-Energy Projects Evaluation and Assistance ........................ 9,819,000 (6) 2385028-Demand Analysis ........................ 15,044,000 (7) 2385037-Management and Support ........................ 1,694,000 (8) 2390010-Transportation Technology and Fuels ........................ 6,782,000 (9) 2390019-Research and Development ........................ 6,918,000 (10) 2390028-Renewable Energy ........................ 1,848,000 (11) 2390037-Management and Support ........................ 1,286,000 (12) Reimbursements to 2380010-Power Plant Site Certification and Transmission Line Corridor Designation Program ........................ −100,000 (13) Reimbursements to 2385010-Building and Appliances ........................ −50,000 (14) Reimbursements to 2390010- Transportation Technology and Fuels ........................ −300,000 3360-001-0890—For support of State Energy Resources Conservation and Development Commission, payable from the Federal Trust Fund ........................ 3,981,000 Schedule: (1) 2385010-Building and Appliances ........................ 3,981,000 3360-001-3062—For support of State Energy Resources Conservation and Development Commission, payable from the Energy Facility License and Compliance Fund ........................ 8,746,000 Schedule: (1) 2380010-Power Plant Site Certification and Transmission Line Corridor Designation Program ........................ 8,599,000 (2) 2380037-Management and Support ........................ 147,000 Provisions: 1. The Department of Finance may increase this item by the amount of fee revenues collected during the 2025–26 and 2026–27 fiscal years to address increased permitting and licensing workload. 3360-001-3117—For support of State Energy Resources Conservation and Development Commission, payable from the Alternative and Renewable Fuel and Vehicle Technology Fund ........................ 15,684,000 Schedule: (1) 2390010-Transportation Technology and Fuels ........................ 15,684,000 Provisions: 1. Funds appropriated in this item shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2030. 2. Notwithstanding Section 16304.1 of the Government Code, funds appropriated in this item shall be available for liquidation until June 30, 2034. 3360-001-3205—For support of State Energy Resources Conservation and Development Commission, payable from the Appliance Efficiency Enforcement Subaccount, Energy Resources Programs Account ........................ 2,981,000 Schedule: (1) 2385010-Building and Appliances ........................ 2,981,000 Provisions: 1. The amount appropriated in this item includes revenues derived from the assessment of fines and penalties imposed as specified in Section 13332.18 of the Government Code. 3360-001-3211—For support of State Energy Resources Conservation and Development Commission, payable from the Electric Program Investment Charge Fund ........................ 22,200,000 Schedule: (1) 2390019-Research and Development ........................ 22,200,000 Provisions: 1. Funds appropriated in this item shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2028 and available for liquidation of encumbrances until June 30, 2032. 2. The Department of Finance may adjust this item of appropriation to reflect increases to the Electric Program Investment Charge program funding amounts approved by the Public Utilities Commission. 3360-001-3237—For support of State Energy Resources Conservation and Development Commission, payable from the Cost of Implementation Account, Air Pollution Control Fund ........................ 23,615,000 Schedule: (1) 2380019-Electricity Analysis ........................ 1,937,000 (2) 2385010-Building and Appliances ........................ 11,009,000 (3) 2385028-Demand Analysis ........................ 3,101,000 (4) 2390010-Transportation Technology and Fuels ........................ 1,515,000 (5) 2390028-Renewable Energy ........................ 6,053,000 3360-002-0890—For support of State Energy Resources Conservation and Development Commission, payable from the Federal Trust Fund ........................ 669,000 Schedule: (1) 2390028-Renewable Energy ........................ 669,000 (2) 2390019-Research and Development ........................ 0 Provisions: 1. The funds appropriated in this item shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure by the State Energy Resources Conservation and Development Commission until June 30, 2033, and shall be available for liquidation until June 30, 2037. 3360-002-6093—For support of State Energy Resources Conservation and Development Commission, payable from the Safe Drinking Water, Wildfire Prevention, Drought Preparedness, and Clean Air Fund ........................ 497,000 Schedule: (1) 2390028-Renewable Energy ........................ 497,000 Provisions: 1. Funds appropriated in this item shall be available for administrative costs to implement the Distributed Electricity Backup Assets Program, pursuant to Section 94530 of the Public Resources Code. 3360-003-6093—For support of State Energy Resources Conservation and Development Commission, payable from the Safe Drinking Water, Wildfire Prevention, Drought Preparedness, and Clean Air Fund ........................ 2,500,000 Schedule: (1) 2380010-Power Plant Site Certification and Transmission Line Corridor Designation Program ........................ 2,500,000 Provisions: 1. Funds appropriated in this item shall be available to the State Energy Resources Conservation and Development Commission for the administration of Section 94540 of the Public Resources Code, including for the Offshore Wind Waterfront Facility Improvement Program established pursuant to Section 25666 of the Public Resources Code. 3360-101-0001—For local assistance, State Energy Resources Conservation and Development Commission ........................ 2,000,000 Schedule: (1) 2385010-Building and Appliances ........................ 2,000,000 Provisions: 1. $2,000,000 shall be appropriated from the General Fund to fund matching incentive funding for heat pumps to support the use and development of high-road jobs in the heating ventilation and air conditioning, decarbonization, and electrification sectors, as long as the program meets the following requirements: (a) Administration by existing nonprofits or bona fide labor organizations with a demonstrated track record of successfully administering heat pump rebate programs. (b) Utilization of a high-road contractor network that participates in a joint labor-management apprenticeship program approved by the Division of Apprenticeship Standards and provides high-quality wages and portable benefits, including health care, training, and retirement. (c) Zero-percent administrative cost structure, with 100 percent of program funds passed directly to California consumers in the form of rebates. (d) A transparent invoicing model to ensure accountability and public trust. (e) A requirement that program administrators commit to providing 100 percent matching funds. (f) Limit funds to Californians making less than 400 percent of the Federal Poverty Level. This funding shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2031. 3360-101-3117—For local assistance, State Energy Resources Conservation and Development Commission, payable from the Alternative and Renewable Fuel and Vehicle Technology Fund ........................ 95,200,000 Schedule: (1) 2390010-Transportation Technology and Fuels ........................ 95,200,000 Provisions: 1. Funds appropriated in this item shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2030. 2. Notwithstanding Section 16304.1 of the Government Code, funds appropriated in this item shall be available for liquidation until June 30, 2034. 3360-101-3211—For local assistance, State Energy Resources Conservation and Development Commission, pursuant to Section 25710 of the Public Resources Code, payable from the Electric Program Investment Charge Fund ........................ 124,903,000 Schedule: (1) 2390019-Research and Development ........................ 124,903,000 Provisions: 1. Funds appropriated in this item shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2028, and liquidation until June 30, 2032. 2. The Department of Finance may adjust this item of appropriation to reflect increases to the Electric Program Investment Charge program funding amounts approved by the Public Utilities Commission. 3360-102-0890—For local assistance, State Energy Resources Conservation and Development Commission, payable from the Federal Trust Fund ........................ 6,020,000 Schedule: (1) 2390028-Renewable Energy ........................ 6,020,000 (2) 2390019-Research and Development ........................ 0 Provisions: 1. The funds appropriated in this item shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure by the State Energy Resources Conservation and Development Commission until June 30, 2033, and shall be available for liquidation until June 30, 2037. 3360-490—Reappropriation, State Energy Resources Conservation and Development Commission. Notwithstanding any other law, the period to liquidate encumbrances of the following citations is extended to June 30, 2030: 0001—​General Fund (2) Item 3360-007-0001, Budget Act of 2022 (Chs. 43, 45, and 249, Stats. 2022), as reappropriated by Item 3360-491, Budget Act of 2025 (Chs. 4 and 5, Stats. 2025). (3) Item 3360-102-0001, Budget Act of 2022 (Chs. 43, 45, and 249, Stats. 2022), as reappropriated by Item 3360-491, Budget Act of 2025 (Chs. 4 and 5, Stats. 2025). 3211—Electric Program Investment Charge Fund (1) Item 3360-101-3211, Budget Act of 2018 (Chs. 29 and 30, Stats. 2018), as reappropriated by Items 3360-490 and 3360-491, Budget Act of 2020 (Chs. 6 and 7, Stats. 2020), Item 3360-491, Budget Act of 2021 (Chs. 21, 69, and 240, Stats. 2021), Item 3360-491, Budget Act of 2022 (Chs. 43, 45, and 249, Stats. 2022), Item 3360-491, Budget Act of 2023 (Chs. 12, 38, and 189, Stats. 2023), Item 3360-491, Budget Act of 2024 (Chs. 22, 35, and 994, Stats. 2024), and Item 3360-491, Budget Act of 2025 (Chs. 4 and 5, Stats. 2025). (1) Item 3360-101-3211, Budget Act of 2019 (Chs. 23 and 55, Stats. 2019), as reappropriated by Item 3360-491, Budget Act of 2021 (Chs. 21, 69, and 240, Stats. 2021), Item 3360-491, Budget Act of 2022 (Chs. 43, 45, and 249, Stats. 2022), Item 3360-491, Budget Act of 2023 (Chs. 12, 38, and 189, Stats. 2023), Item 3360-491, Budget Act of 2024 (Chs. 22, 35, and 994, Stats. 2024), and Item 3360-491, Budget Act of 2025 (Chs. 4 and 5, Stats. 2025). 3360-491—Reappropriation, State Energy Resources Conservation and Development Commission. The balances of the appropriations provided in the following citations are reappropriated for the purposes provided for in those appropriations and shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2027, and liquidation until June 30, 2030: 0001—​General Fund (1) Item 3360-006-0001, Budget Act of 2021 (Chs. 21, 69, and 240, Stats. 2021), as reappropriated by Item 3360-491, Budget Act of 2023 (Chs. 12, 38, and 189, Stats. 2023), Item 3360-491, Budget Act of 2024 (Chs. 22, 35, and 994, Stats. 2024), and Item 3360-491 Budget Act of 2025 (Chs. 4 and 5, Stats. 2025). (2) Item 3360-101-0001, Budget Act of 2021 (Chs. 21, 69, and 240, Stats. 2021), as reappropriated by Item 3360-492, Budget Act of 2023 (Chs. 12, 38, and 189, Stats. 2023), Item 3360-492, Budget Act of 2024 (Chs. 22, 35, and 994, Stats. 2024), and Item 3360-491 Budget Act of 2025 (Chs. 4 and 5, Stats. 2025). (3) Subdivision (b) of Section 36 of Chapter 574 of the Statutes of 2022 (AB 211), as allocated to technical Item 3360-601-0001. (4) Item 3360-005-0001, Budget Act of 2022 (Chs. 43, 45, and 249, Stats. 2022), as reappropriated by Item 3360-491, Budget Act of 2025 (Chs. 4 and 5, Stats. 2025). 3360-492—Reappropriation, State Energy Resources Conservation and Development Commission. The balances of the appropriations provided in the following citations are reappropriated for the purposes provided for in those appropriations and shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2030: 0001—​General Fund (1) Item 3360-001-0001, Budget Act of 2022 (Chs. 43, 45, and 249, Stats. 2022), as reappropriated by Item 3360-491, Budget Act of 2025 (Chs. 4 and 5, Stats. 2025). (2) Item 3360-008-0001, Budget Act of 2021 (Chs. 21, 69, and 240, Stats. 2021). 3360-493—Reappropriation, State Energy Resources Conservation and Development Commission. The balances of the appropriations provided in the following citations are reappropriated for the purposes provided for in those appropriations and shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2028, and for liquidation until June 30, 2032: 0890—Federal Trust Fund (1) Item 3360-101-0890, Budget Act of 2016 (Ch. 23, Stats. 2016), as reappropriated by Item 3360- 492, Budget Act of 2021 (Chs. 21, 69, and 240, Stats. 2021), Item 3360-492, Budget Act of 2022 (Chs. 43, 45, and 249, Stats. 2022), Item 3360-491, Budget Act of 2023 (Chs. 12, 38, and 189, Stats. 2023), and Item 3360-491, Budget Act of 2025 (Chs. 4 and 5, Stats. 2025). (2) Item 3360-001-0890, Budget Act of 2018 (Chs. 29 and 30, Stats. 2018), as reappropriated by Item 3360-491, Budget Act of 2023 (Chs. 12, 38, and 189, Stats. 2023), and Item 3360-491, Budget Act of 2025 (Chs. 4 and 5, Stats. 2025). (3) Item 3360-101-0890, Budget Act of 2018 (Chs. 29 and 30, Stats. 2018), as reappropriated by Item 3360-491, Budget Act of 2023 (Chs. 12, 38, and 189, Stats. 2023), and Item 3360-491, Budget Act of 2025 (Chs. 4 and 5, Stats. 2025). 3360-494—Reappropriation, State Energy Resources Conservation and Development Commission. The balances of the appropriations provided in the following citations are reappropriated for the purposes provided for in those appropriations and shall be available for encumbrance, expenditure, or liquidation as specified: 0001—General Fund (1) Item 3360-002-0001, Budget Act of 2021 (Chs. 21, 69, and 240, Stats. 2021), as reappropriated by Item 3360-491, Budget Act of 2024 (Chs. 22, 35, and 994, Stats. 2024), shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2029. (2) Item 3360-108-0001, Budget Act of 2021 (Chs. 21, 69, and 240, Stats. 2021), shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2027, and for liquidation until June 30, 2030. (3) Item 3360-002-0001, Budget Act of 2022 (Chs. 43, 45, and 249, Stats. 2022), as reappropriated by Item 3360-491, Budget Act of 2025 (Chs. 4 and 5, Stats. 2025), shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2029. (4) Item 3360-002-0001, Budget Act of 2023 (Chs. 12, 38, and 189, Stats. 2023), as reappropriated by Item 3360-491, Budget Act of 2025 (Chs. 4 and 5, Stats. 2025), shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2031. 3211—Electric Program Investment Charge Fund (1) Item 3360-101-3211, Budget Act of 2015 (Chs. 10 and 11, Stats. 2015), as reappropriated by Item 3360-491, Budget Act of 2020 (Chs. 6 and 7, Stats. 2020), Item 3360-492, Budget Act of 2021 (Chs. 21, 69, and 240, Stats. 2021), Item 3360-492, Budget Act of 2022 (Chs. 43, 45, and 249, Stats. 2022), Item 3360-492, Budget Act of 2023 (Chs. 12, 38, and 189, Stats. 2023), and Item 360-492, Budget Act of 2024 (Chs. 22, 35, and 994, Stats. 2024), shall be available for liquidation until June 30, 2027. (2) Item 3360-101-3211, Budget Act of 2020 (Chs. 6 and 7, Stats. 2020), as reappropriated by Item 3360-492, Budget Act of 2021 (Chs. 21, 69, and 240, Stats. 2021), Item 3360-492, Budget Act of 2022 (Chs. 43, 45, and 249, Stats. 2022), Item 3360-492, Budget Act of 2023 (Chs. 12, 38, and 189, Stats. 2023), and Item 3360-491, Budget Act of 2024 (Chs. 22, 35, and 994, Stats. 2024), shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2027, and liquidation until June 30, 2031. (3) Item 3360-101-3211, Budget Act of 2021 (Chs. 21, 69, and 240, Stats. 2021), as reappropriated by Item 3360-492, Budget Act of 2022 (Chs. 43, 45, and 249, Stats. 2022), Item 3360-492, Budget Act of 2023 (Chs. 12, 38, and 189, Stats. 2023), and Item 3360-491, Budget Act of 2024 (Chs. 22, 35, and 994, Stats. 2024), shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2027, and liquidation until June 30, 2031. (4) Item 3360-101-3211, Budget Act of 2022 (Chs. 43, 45, and 249, Stats. 2022), as reappropriated by Item 3360-491, Budget Act of 2024 (Chs. 22, 35, and 994, Stats. 2024), shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2027, and shall be available for liquidation until June 30, 2031. (5) Item 3360-101-3211, Budget Act of 2023 (Chs. 12, 38, and 189, Stats. 2023), as reappropriated by Item 3360-491, Budget Act of 2024 (Chs. 22, 35, and 994, Stats. 2024), shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2027, and shall be available for liquidation until June 30, 2031. (6) Item 3360-101-3211, Budget Act of 2024 (Chs. 22, 35, and 994, Stats. 2024), shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2027, and liquidation until June 30, 2031. 3460-001-0001—For support of Colorado River Board of California ........................ 0 Schedule: (1) 2410-Protection of California’s Colorado River Rights and Interests ........................ 2,859,000 (2) Reimbursements to 2410-Protection of California’s Colorado River Rights and Interests ........................ −2,859,000 3480-001-0001—For support of Department of Conservation ........................ 9,219,000 Schedule: (1) 2420-Geologic Hazards and Mineral Resources Conservation ........................ 9,219,000 3480-001-0035—For support of Department of Conservation, payable from the Surface Mining and Reclamation Account ........................ 5,635,000 Schedule: (1) 2435-Division of Mine Reclamation ........................ 5,655,000 (2) Reimbursements to 2435-Division of Mine Reclamation ........................ −20,000 Provisions: 1. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (1), $869,000 shall be available for the support of the Surface Mining and Reclamation Act (SMARA-4) project. Of this amount, $703,000 for project implementation activities shall only be available upon the Department of Technology’s approval of the appropriate Project Approval Lifecycle documents. 3480-001-0042—For support of Department of Conservation, payable from the State Highway Account, State Transportation Fund ........................ 12,000 Schedule: (1) 2420-Geologic Hazards and Mineral Resources Conservation ........................ 12,000 Provisions: 1. The funds appropriated in this item are for the state’s share of costs of the California Institute of Technology seismograph network. 3480-001-0140—For support of Department of Conservation, payable from the California Environmental License Plate Fund ........................ 168,000 Schedule: (1) 2430-Land Resource Protection ........................ 168,000 3480-001-0141—For support of Department of Conservation, payable from the Soil Conservation Fund ........................ 3,731,000 Schedule: (1) 2430-Land Resource Protection ........................ 6,010,000 (2) Reimbursements to 2430-Land Resource Protection ........................ −2,279,000 3480-001-0336—For support of Department of Conservation, payable from the Mine Reclamation Account ........................ 5,062,000 Schedule: (1) 2420-Geologic Hazards and Mineral Resources Conservation ........................ 2,308,000 (2) 2435-Division of Mine Reclamation ........................ 2,146,000 (3) 2440-State Mining and Geology Board ........................ 608,000 3480-001-0338—For support of Department of Conservation, payable from the Strong-Motion Instrumentation and Seismic Hazards Mapping Fund ........................ 15,303,000 Schedule: (1) 2420-Geologic Hazards and Mineral Resources Conservation ........................ 24,353,000 (2) Reimbursements to 2420-Geologic Hazards and Mineral Resources Conservation ........................ −9,050,000 3480-001-0890—For support of Department of Conservation, payable from the Federal Trust Fund ........................ 5,518,000 Schedule: (1) 2420-Geologic Hazards and Mineral Resources Conservation ........................ 1,106,000 (2) 2425-Geologic Energy Management Division ........................ 3,410,000 (3) 2435-Division of Mine Reclamation ........................ 1,002,000 3480-001-0940—For support of Department of Conservation, payable from the Bosco-Keene Renewable Resources Investment Fund ........................ 1,125,000 Schedule: (1) 2435-Division of Mine Reclamation ........................ 525,000 (2) 2440-State Mining and Geology Board ........................ 700,000 (3) Reimbursements to 2440-State Mining and Geology Board ........................ −100,000 3480-001-3025—For support of Department of Conservation, payable from the Abandoned Mine Reclamation and Minerals Fund Subaccount, Mine Reclamation Account ........................ 1,396,000 Schedule: (1) 2435-Division of Mine Reclamation ........................ 1,396,000 3480-001-3046—For support of Department of Conservation, payable from the Oil, Gas, and Geothermal Administrative Fund ........................ 129,496,000136,996,000 Schedule: (1) 2425-Geologic Energy Management Division ........................ 129,690,000137,190,000 (2) 9900100-Administration ........................ 37,373,000 (3) 9900200-Administration—​Distributed ........................ −37,373,000 (4) Reimbursements to 2425-Geologic Energy Management Division ........................ −194,000 3480-001-3212—For support of Department of Conservation, payable from the Timber Regulation and Forest Restoration Fund ........................ 5,291,000 Schedule: (1) 2420-Geologic Hazards and Mineral Resources Conservation ........................ 5,291,000 3480-001-3237—For support of Department of Conservation, payable from the Cost of Implementation Account, Air Pollution Control Fund ........................ 742,000 Schedule: (1) 2420-Geologic Hazards and Mineral Resources Conservation ........................ 742,000 3480-001-3299—For support of Department of Conservation, payable from the Oil and Gas Environmental Remediation Account ........................ 1,000,000 Schedule: (1) 2425-Geologic Energy Management Division ........................ 1,000,000 Provisions: 1. The Department of Finance may augment this item if the Director of Finance concurs with a finding by the Geologic Energy Management Division within the Department of Conservation that expenditures above the amount appropriated are necessary to prevent or respond to a danger to life, health, water quality, wildlife, or natural resources. Any authorized augmentations shall occur no sooner than 10 days after providing notification to the chairperson of the committee in each house of the Legislature that considers appropriations, the chairpersons of the committees and the appropriate subcommittees in each house of the Legislature that consider the budget, and the chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, or prior to whatever lesser time the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, or the Chairperson’s designee, may determine. 3480-001-6031—For support of Department of Conservation, payable from the Water Security, Clean Drinking Water, Coastal and Beach Protection Fund of 2002 ........................ 11,000 Schedule: (1) 2430-Land Resource Protection ........................ 11,000 3480-001-6051—For support of Department of Conservation, payable from the Safe Drinking Water, Water Quality and Supply, Flood Control, River and Coastal Protection Fund of 2006 ........................ 42,000 Schedule: (1) 2430-Land Resource Protection ........................ 42,000 3480-001-6088—For support of Department of Conservation, payable from the California Drought, Water, Parks, Climate, Coastal Protection, and Outdoor Access For All Fund ........................ 89,000 Schedule: (1) 2430-Land Resource Protection ........................ 89,000 3480-001-6093—For support of Department of Conservation, payable from the Safe Drinking Water, Wildfire Prevention, Drought Preparedness, and Clean Air Fund ........................ 900,000 Schedule: (1) 2430-Land Resource Protection ........................ 900,000 3480-002-3046—For support of Department of Conservation, payable from the Oil, Gas, and Geothermal Administrative Fund ........................ 12,500,0005,000,000 Schedule: (1) 2425-Geologic Energy Management Division ........................ 12,500,0005,000,000 Provisions: 1. The amounts amount appropriated in this item shall be available for the purposes of plugging and abandoning wells, decommissioning facilities, and site remediation, pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 3258 of the Public Resources Code. 3480-002-6093—For support of Department of Conservation, payable from the Safe Drinking Water, Wildfire Prevention, Drought Preparedness, and Clean Air Fund ........................ 500,000 Schedule: (1) 2430-Land Resource Protection ........................ 500,000 3480-003-6093—For support of Department of Conservation, payable from the Safe Drinking Water, Wildfire Prevention, Drought Preparedness, and Clean Air Fund ........................ 407,000 Schedule: (1) 2430-Land Resource Protection ........................ 407,000 3480-004-6093—For support of Department of Conservation, payable from the Safe Drinking Water, Wildfire Prevention, Drought Preparedness, and Clean Air Fund ........................ 150,000 Schedule: (1) 2430-Land Resource Protection ........................ 150,000 3480-101-6031—For local assistance, Department of Conservation, payable from the Water Security, Clean Drinking Water, Coastal and Beach Protection Fund of 2002 ........................ 2,144,000 Schedule: (1) 2430-Land Resource Protection ........................ 2,144,000 Provisions: 1. The funds appropriated in this item shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2029. 3480-101-6088—For local assistance, Department of Conservation, payable from the California Drought, Water, Parks, Climate, Coastal Protection, and Outdoor Access For All Fund ........................ 1,517,000 Schedule: (1) 2430-Land Resource Protection ........................ 1,517,000 Provisions: 1. The funds appropriated in this item shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2029. 3480-491—Reappropriation, Department of Conservation. Notwithstanding any other law, the period to liquidate encumbrances of the following citations is extended as specified below: 0001—General Fund (1) Item 3480-001-0001, Budget Act of 2022 (Chs. 43, 45, and 249, Stats. 2022) shall be extended to June 30, 2027. (2) Item 3480-001-0001, Budget Act of 2023 (Chs. 12, 38, and 189, Stats. 2023) as reappropriated by Item 3480-492, Budget Act of 2024 (Chs. 22, 35, and 994, Stats. 2024) shall be extended to June 30, 2028. 3480-492—Reappropriation, Department of Conservation. The amounts specified in the following citations are reappropriated for the purposes provided for in those appropriations and shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure as follows: 0001—​General Fund (1) Item 3480-101-0001, Budget Act of 2020 (Chs. 6 and 7, Stats. 2020), as reappropriated by Item 3480-494, Budget Act of 2022 (Chs. 43, 45, and 249, Stats. 2022), Item 3480-491, Budget Act of 2023 (Chs. 12, 38, and 189, Stats. 2023), and Item 3480-491, Budget Act of 2024 (Chs. 22, 35, and 994, Stats. 2024), until June 30, 2027. (1.5) Up to $637,000 of the amount transferred pursuant to Provision 3 of Item 3480-101-0001, Budget Act of 2020 (Chs. 6 and 7, Stats. 2020), as reappropriated by Item 3480-494, Budget Act of 2022 (Chs. 43, 45, and 249, Stats. 2022), Item 3480-491, Budget Act of 2023 (Chs. 12, 38, and 189, Stats. 2023), and Item 3480-491, Budget Act of 2024 (Chs. 22, 35, and 994, Stats. 2024), until June 30, 2027. (2) Item 3480-001-0001, Budget Act of 2021 (Chs. 21, 69, and 240, Stats. 2021), until June 30, 2027. (3) Item 3480-102-0001, Budget Act of 2021 (Chs. 21, 69, and 240, Stats. 2021), as reappropriated by Item 3480-491, Budget Act of 2022 (Chs. 43, 45, and 249, Stats. 2022), and Item 3480-491, Budget Act of 2024 (Chs. 22, 35, and 994, Stats. 2024), until June 30, 2027. (3.5) Up to $1,667,000 of Item 3480-102-0001, Budget Act of 2021 (Chs. 21, 69, and 240, Stats. 2021), as reappropriated by and transferred pursuant to Item 3480-491, Budget Act of 2022 (Chs. 43, 45, and 249, Stats. 2022), and as reappropriated by Item 3480-491, Budget Act of 2024 (Chs. 22, 35, and 994, Stats. 2024), shall be extended to June 30, 2027. (4) Item 3480-101-0001, Budget Act of 2022 (Chs. 43, 45, and 249, Stats. 2022), until June 30, 2027. (5) Up to $997,000 of the amount transferred pursuant to Provision 3 of Item 3480-101-0001, Budget Act of 2022 (Chs. 43, 45, and 249, Stats. 2022), as reappropriated by Item 3480-492, Budget Act of 2025 (Chs. 4 and 5, Stats. 2025), until June 30, 2027. (6) The administrative costs transferred by paragraph (6) of subdivision (e) of Section 35 of Chapter 574, Statutes of 2022, as reappropriated by Item 3480-491, Budget Act of 2024 (Chs. 22, 35, and 994, Stats. 2024), until June 30, 2027. 6031—Water Security, Clean Drinking Water, Coastal and Beach Protection Fund of 2002 (1) Item 3480-001-6031, Budget Act of 2025 (Chs. 4 and 5, Stats. 2025), until June 30, 2030. 3480-495—Reversion, Department of Conservation. As of June 30, 2026, the balances specified below of the appropriations provided in the following citations shall revert to the balances in the funds from which the appropriations were made. 6031—Water Security, Clean Drinking Water, Coastal and Beach Protection Fund of 2002 (1) Up to $86,000 in Item 3480-101-6031, Budget Act of 2019 (Chs. 23 and 55, Stats. 2019) as reappropriated by Section 20.00, Budget Act of 2022 (Chs. 43, 45, and 249, Stats. 2022), as reappropriated by Section 20.00, Budget Act of 2023 (Chs. 12, 38, and 189, Stats. 2023). (2) Up to $702,000 in Item 3480-001-6031, Budget Act of 2023 (Chs. 12, 38, and 189, Stats. 2023) as reaappropriated by Section 20.00, Budget Act of 2025 (Chs. 4, and 5, Stats. 2025). (3) Up to $769,000 in Item 3480-001-6031, Budget Act of 2024 (Chs. 22, 35, and 994, Stats. 2024). 3540-001-0001—For support of Department of Forestry and Fire Protection ........................ 1,593,181,000 Schedule: (1) 2461-Office of the State Fire Marshal ........................ 35,839,000 (2) 2465-Fire Protection ........................ 2,387,914,000 (3) 2470-Resource Management ........................ 22,454,000 (4) 2475-Board of Forestry and Fire Protection ........................ 374,000 (5) 2480-Department of Justice Legal Services ........................ 6,828,000 (6) 9900100-Administration ........................ 233,203,000 (7) 9900200-Administration—​Distributed ........................ −232,826,000 (8) Reimbursements to 2461-Office of the State Fire Marshal ........................ −27,551,000 (9) Reimbursements to 2465-Fire Protection ........................ −831,098,000 (10) Reimbursements to 2470-Resource Management ........................ −1,579,000 (11) Reimbursements to 9900100-Administration ........................ −377,000 Provisions: 1. Notwithstanding any other law, the Director of Finance may authorize the temporary or permanent redirection of funds from this item for purposes of emergency fire suppression and detection costs and related emergency revegetation costs. 2. Notwithstanding any other law, the Director of Finance may authorize a loan from the General Fund, in an amount not to exceed 45 percent of reimbursements appropriated in Schedule (9) of this item, to the Department of Forestry and Fire Protection, provided that: (a) The loan is to meet cash needs resulting from the delay in receipt of reimbursements for services provided. (b) The loan is for a short term and shall be repaid by November 15 of the fiscal year following that in which the loan was authorized. (c) Interest charges may be waived pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 16314 of the Government Code. (d) Within 10 days after approval, the Director of Finance shall notify the Joint Legislative Budget Committee of the loan approved pursuant to this provision. 3. The Director of Finance may adjust amounts in Schedule (2) to provide equivalent fire protection base funding changes to contract counties in accordance with Section 4130 of the Public Resources Code. 4. Notwithstanding any other law, the funds appropriated in this item for purposes of Division 10.5 (commencing with Section 12200) of the Public Resources Code shall be available for purposes of support or capital outlay. 5. Notwithstanding any other law, the Director of Finance may adjust this item for the direct and indirect cost reimbursements received pursuant to Sections 4142 and 4144 of the Public Resources Code. Any increase shall occur no sooner than 30 days after notification in writing of the necessity of the increase to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, or not sooner than whatever lesser time after notification the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, or the Chairperson’s designee, may in each instance determine. 6. Notwithstanding any other law, the Department of Forestry and Fire Protection may provide contractual services pursuant to Sections 4142 and 4144 of the Public Resources Code without an executed agreement from July to September of each fiscal year to better align contract start times with the budget process and to finalize staff benefit rates that are dependent upon actions by the Public Employees’ Retirement System and passage of the annual Budget Act. 7. Notwithstanding any other law or administrative procedure, the Department of Forestry and Fire Protection may amend its pilot and mechanic contract, along with its parts contract, for both scope changes and contracted amounts to address unanticipated workload resulting from higher than anticipated demand for these contracted services. The Department of Finance may augment this item and authorize expenditures in excess of the amounts appropriated in this item no sooner than 30 days after providing notification in writing of the necessity therefor to the Chairperson of the committee in each house of the Legislature that considers appropriations, the Chairpersons of the committees and the appropriate subcommittees in each house of the Legislature that consider the budget, and the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, or not sooner than whatever lesser time after that notification the Chairperson of the joint committee, or the Chairperson’s designee, may in each instance determine. 8. Notwithstanding Section 28.00 of this act, upon request of the Department of Forestry and Fire Protection, the Department of Finance may adjust Schedules (2) and (9) of this item to reflect increases in reimbursements from non-state entities providing assistance-by-hire emergency fire suppression services. The Director of Finance may authorize expenditures in excess of the amount appropriated in this item after the receipt of the request from the Department of Forestry and Fire Protection. Within 10 days of approval, the Department of Finance shall provide written notification of any such augmentation to the Chairpersons of the committees in each house of the Legislature that consider appropriations, the Chairpersons of the committees and the appropriate subcommittees of each house of the Legislature that consider the State Budget, and the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee. 9. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (2), $2,150,000 shall be available for deferred maintenance and special repair projects at existing Department of Forestry and Fire Protection facilities to accommodate additional hand crews. These funds shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2031. 10. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (2), $6,680,000 shall be exempt from any applicable law requiring competitive bidding or the supervision or approval of another department or agency of state government for the procurement of or contracting with vendors for logistical support, including, but not limited to, feeding, lodging, training, and the purchase of personal protective equipment for additional fire suppression staff hired for the implementation of the 66-hour workweek. 3540-001-0022—For support of Department of Forestry and Fire Protection, payable from the State Emergency Telephone Number Account ........................ 11,776,000 Schedule: (1) 2465-Fire Protection ........................ 11,776,000 3540-001-0028—For support of Department of Forestry and Fire Protection, payable from the Unified Program Account ........................ 850,000 Schedule: (1) 2461-Office of the State Fire Marshal ........................ 850,000 3540-001-0102—For support of Department of Forestry and Fire Protection, payable from the State Fire Marshal Licensing and Certification Fund ........................ 6,507,000 Schedule: (1) 2461-Office of the State Fire Marshal ........................ 6,507,000 Provisions: 1. The amount appropriated in this item includes revenues derived from the assessment of fines and penalties imposed as specified in Section 13332.18 of the Government Code. 3540-001-0140—For support of Department of Forestry and Fire Protection, payable from the California Environmental License Plate Fund ........................ 745,000 Schedule: (1) 2470-Resource Management ........................ 745,000 3540-001-0198—For support of Department of Forestry and Fire Protection, payable from the California Fire and Arson Training Fund ........................ 5,108,000 Schedule: (1) 2461-Office of the State Fire Marshal ........................ 5,108,000 3540-001-0209—For support of Department of Forestry and Fire Protection, payable from the California Hazardous Liquid Pipeline Safety Fund ........................ 7,933,000 Schedule: (1) 2461-Office of the State Fire Marshal ........................ 7,933,000 Provisions: 1. The amount appropriated in this item includes revenues derived from the assessment of fines and penalties imposed as specified in Section 13332.18 of the Government Code. 2. Notwithstanding any other law, the Department of Finance may adjust the amount appropriated in this item to account for changes in the rate at which the federal government reimburses qualified expenditures within this program. 3540-001-0300—For support of Department of Forestry and Fire Protection, payable from the Professional Forester Registration Fund ........................ 245,000 Schedule: (1) 2470-Resource Management ........................ 245,000 Provisions: 1. The amount appropriated in this item includes revenues derived from the assessment of fines and penalties imposed as specified in Section 13332.18 of the Government Code. 3540-001-0890—For support of Department of Forestry and Fire Protection, payable from the Federal Trust Fund ........................ 22,883,000 Schedule: (1) 2461-Office of the State Fire Marshal ........................ 5,857,000 (2) 2465-Fire Protection ........................ 5,542,000 (3) 2470-Resource Management ........................ 11,484,000 Provisions: 1. Notwithstanding any other law, the funds appropriated in this item for purposes of Division 10.5 (commencing with Section 12200) of the Public Resources Code shall be available for purposes of support or capital outlay. 2. Notwithstanding Section 28.00, the Department of Finance may adjust the amount appropriated in Schedule (1) of this item to account for changes in the rate at which the federal government reimburses qualified expenditures within this program. 3540-001-0928—For support of Department of Forestry and Fire Protection, payable from the Forest Resources Improvement Fund ........................ 11,386,000 Schedule: (1) 2470-Resource Management ........................ 11,386,000 3540-001-3144—For support of Department of Forestry and Fire Protection, payable from the Building Standards Administration Special Revolving Fund ........................ 1,626,000 Schedule: (1) 2461-Office of the State Fire Marshal ........................ 1,626,000 3540-001-3212—For support of Department of Forestry and Fire Protection, payable from the Timber Regulation and Forest Restoration Fund ........................ 29,720,000 Schedule: (1) 2470-Resource Management ........................ 28,224,000 (2) 2475-Board of Forestry and Fire Protection ........................ 1,496,000 Provisions: 1. The amount appropriated in this item includes revenues derived from the assessment of fines and penalties imposed as specified in Section 13332.18 of the Government Code. 2. Notwithstanding any other law, $425,000 of the amount appropriated in Schedule (2) shall be available for the development and implementation of the Joint Institute for Wood Products Innovation, including, but not limited to, providing grants to promote wood product innovation consistent with the recommendations of the Forest Carbon Plan. 3. Notwithstanding any other law, $425,000 of the amount appropriated in Schedule (2) shall be available to provide grants to test the effectiveness of the California Forest Practice Rules and other natural resource protection statutes and regulations. 3540-001-3228—For support of Department of Forestry and Fire Protection, payable from the Greenhouse Gas Reduction Fund ........................ 1,250,000,000 Schedule: (1) 2465-Fire Protection ........................ 1,457,584,000 (2) Reimbursements to 2465-Fire Protection ........................ −207,584,000 Provisions: 1. The Department of Finance may reduce the amount of this appropriation by any amount necessary if the actual amount of Cap-and-Invest auction proceed receipts are lower than projected and it determines the Greenhouse Gas Reduction Fund balance is projected to be insufficient to support the full amount of this appropriation. The Department of Finance may also augment Item 3540-001-0001 by the same amount of any reduction to maintain full funding for the Department of Forestry and Fire Protection’s fire protection operations. The Department of Finance may also establish any schedules in Item 3540-001-0001 that are necessary to facilitate any such augmentation. Any provisions of this item that are necessary to effectuate the purposes of any funding shifted from this item to Item 3540-001-0001 pursuant to this provision shall also apply to Item 3540-001-0001. 2. Notwithstanding any other law, upon the order of the Department of Finance, one or more loans, not to exceed a cumulative total of 75 percent of the amount appropriated in this item, shall be made available from the General Fund to the Greenhouse Gas Reduction Fund, to be transferred as needed to meet cash needs resulting from the delay in receipt of Cap-and-Invest auction proceeds. All moneys so transferred shall be repaid as soon as sufficient Cap-and-Invest auction proceeds have been collected to meet immediate cash needs, but not later than June 30 of the fiscal year in which the loan was authorized. Interest charges may be waived pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 16314 of the Government Code. 3. Notwithstanding any other law, the Director of Finance may authorize a loan from the General Fund, in an amount not to exceed 45 percent of reimbursements appropriated in Schedule (2) of this item, to the Department of Forestry and Fire Protection, provided that: (a) The loan is to meet cash needs resulting from the delay in receipt of reimbursements for services provided. (b) The loan is for a short term and shall be repaid by November 15 of the fiscal year following that in which the loan was authorized. (c) Interest charges may be waived pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 16314 of the Government Code. (d) Within 10 days after approval, the Director of Finance shall notify the Joint Legislative Budget Committee of the loan approved pursuant to this provision. 4. Notwithstanding any other law or administrative procedure, the Department of Forestry and Fire Protection may amend its pilot and mechanic contract, along with its parts contract, for both scope changes and contracted amounts to address unanticipated workload resulting from higher than anticipated demand for these contracted services. The Department of Finance may augment this item and authorize expenditures in excess of the amounts appropriated in this item no sooner than 30 days after providing notification in writing of the necessity therefor to the chairperson of the committee in each house of the Legislature that considers appropriations, the chairpersons of the committees and the appropriate subcommittees in each house of the Legislature that consider the State Budget, and the chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, or not sooner than whatever lesser time after that notification the chairperson of the joint committee, or the chairperson’s designee, may in each instance determine. 5. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (1), $104,959,000 shall be exempt from any applicable law requiring competitive bidding or the supervision or approval of another department or agency of state government for the procurement of or contracting with vendors for logistical support, including, but not limited to, feeding, lodging, training, and the purchase of personal protective equipment for additional fire suppression staff hired for the implementation of the 66-hour workweek. 6. The funds appropriated in this item shall not be subject to the provisions of subdivision (b) of Section 15.14. The funds appropriated in this item are exempt from Sections 39712, 39715, and 39718 to 39721, inclusive, of the Health and Safety Code and Section 16428.9 of the Government Code. Additionally, the funds appropriated in this item shall not be included in the calculation of funding appropriated from the Greenhouse Gas Reduction Fund for the purposes of Section 39713 of the Health and Safety Code. The funds appropriated in this item shall not be included in the report produced pursuant to Section 39720 of the Health and Safety Code, and the Department of Forestry and Fire Protection shall not be required to submit information pursuant to Section 39721 of the Health and Safety Code for the funds appropriated in this item. 7. Notwithstanding Section 28.00 of this act, upon request of the Department of Forestry and Fire Protection, the Department of Finance may adjust Schedules (1) and (2) of this item to reflect increases in reimbursements from non-state entities providing assistance-by-hire emergency fire suppression services. The Director of Finance may authorize expenditures in excess of the amount appropriated in this item after the receipt of the request from the Department of Forestry and Fire Protection. Within 10 days of approval, the Department of Finance shall provide written notification of any such augmentation to the Chairpersons of the committees in each house of the Legislature that consider appropriations, the Chairpersons of the committees and the appropriate subcommittees of each house of the Legislature that consider the State Budget, and the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee. 3540-001-3237—For support of Department of Forestry and Fire Protection, payable from the Cost of Implementation Account, Air Pollution Control Fund ........................ 432,000 Schedule: (1) 2470-Resource Management ........................ 208,000 (2) 2475-Board of Forestry and Fire Protection ........................ 224,000 3540-001-6093—For support of Department of Forestry and Fire Protection, payable from the Safe Drinking Water, Wildfire Prevention, Drought Preparedness, and Clean Air Fund ........................ 904,000 Schedule: (1) 2470-Resource Management ........................ 904,000 Provisions: 1. The funds appropriated in this item shall be available for the administration of regional projects to improve local fire prevention capacity, improve forest health and resilience, and reduce the risk of wildfire spreading into populated areas from wildlands pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 91520 of the Public Resources Code. 3540-002-0001—For support of Department of Forestry and Fire Protection ........................ 0 Schedule: (1) 2465-Fire Protection ........................ 5,773,000 (2) Reimbursements to 2465-Fire Protection ........................ −5,773,000 3540-002-0890—For support of Department of Forestry and Fire Protection, payable from the Federal Trust Fund ........................ 2,624,000 Schedule: (1) 2470-Resource Management ........................ 2,624,000 3540-002-3228—For support of Department of Forestry and Fire Protection, payable from the Greenhouse Gas Reduction Fund ........................ 88,484,000 Schedule: (1) 2465-Fire Protection ........................ 73,153,000 (2) 2470-Resource Management ........................ 14,143,000 (3) 2475-Board of Forestry and Fire Protection ........................ 1,188,000 Provisions: 1. The funds appropriated in this item are available pursuant to Section 4213.05 of the Public Resources Code. 2. The Director of Finance may adjust amounts in Schedule (1) to provide equivalent fire protection base funding changes to contract counties in accordance with Section 4130 of the Public Resources Code. 3. The funds appropriated in this item shall not be subject to the provisions of subdivision (b) of Section 15.14. 3540-003-0001—For support of Department of Forestry and Fire Protection ........................ 5,000,000 Schedule: (1) 2461-Office of the State Fire Marshal ........................ 5,000,000 3540-003-6093—For support of Department of Forestry and Fire Protection, payable from the Safe Drinking Water, Wildfire Prevention, Drought Preparedness, and Clean Air Fund ........................ 2,319,000 Schedule: (1) 2465-Fire Protection ........................ 1,319,000 (2) 2470-Resource Management ........................ 1,000,000 Provisions: 1. The funds appropriated in this item shall be available for the administration of local fire prevention grants and workforce development for fire prevention and wildfire resiliency work. 3540-004-3228—For support of Department of Forestry and Fire Protection, payable from the Greenhouse Gas Reduction Fund ........................ 9,900,000 Schedule: (1) 2461-Office of the State Fire Marshall ........................ 1,577,000 (2) 2465-Fire Protection ........................ 1,638,000 (3) 2470-Resource Management ........................ 5,913,000 (4) 2475-Board of Forestry and Fire Protection ........................ 772,000 Provisions: 1. The funds appropriated in this item shall not be subject to subdivision (b) of Section 15.14. 3540-004-6093—For support of Department of Forestry and Fire Protection, payable from the Safe Drinking Water, Wildfire Prevention, Drought Preparedness, and Clean Air Fund ........................ 1,400,000 Schedule: (1) 2470-Resource Management ........................ 1,400,000 Provisions: 1. The funds appropriated in this item shall be available for administration of the Forest Health Program. 3540-006-0001—For support of Department of Forestry and Fire Protection ........................ 794,601,000 Schedule: (1) 2465-Fire Protection ........................ 794,601,000 Provisions: 1. The funds appropriated in this item shall be available for emergency fire suppression and detection costs and related emergency revegetation costs and may be used for these purposes to reimburse the main support appropriation for the Department of Forestry and Fire Protection in Item 3540-001-0001. The funds shall be used only for situations where budgeted Department of Forestry and Fire Protection initial attack forces are unable to cope with a wildland fire emergency, for additional fire detection capability and prepositioning of resources during periods of high fire risk, or to respond to valid requests for mutual aid by another government authority. The funds may also be used on a reimbursable basis for assistance-by-hire for fire emergencies. 2. The Director of Forestry and Fire Protection shall provide quarterly reports on expenditures for emergency fire suppression and detection and related emergency revegetation activities to the Director of Finance, the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, and the fiscal and appropriate policy committees of each house of the Legislature. The Director of Finance may authorize expenditures in excess of the amount appropriated in this item by an amount necessary to fund emergency fire suppression, detection, and prepositioning costs and related emergency revegetation costs. This authorization shall occur not sooner than 10 days after the receipt by the Legislature of the quarterly expenditure report from the Department of Forestry and Fire Protection, or not sooner than whatever lesser time the Chairperson of the joint committee, or the Chairperson’s designee, may in each instance determine. 3. The Department of Forestry and Fire Protection is exempted from any applicable law requiring competitive bidding or the supervision or approval of another department or agency of state government for the procurement of or contracting with vendors for exclusive use aviation aircraft, up to an aggregate annual contractual amount of $65,000,000, to meet emergency fire suppression operational needs as described in Provision 1 of this item. Notwithstanding the foregoing, the department shall include information regarding contracts executed under this authority within the quarterly reports specified in Provision 2 of this item. 3540-006-6093—For support of Department of Forestry and Fire Protection, payable from the Safe Drinking Water, Wildfire Prevention, Drought Preparedness, and Clean Air Fund ........................ 1,000,000 Schedule: (1) 2470-Resource Management ........................ 1,000,000 Provisions: 1. The funds appropriated in this item shall be available for administration of the urban forestry program. 3540-007-6093—For support of Department of Forestry and Fire Protection, payable from the Safe Drinking Water, Wildfire Prevention, Drought Preparedness, and Clean Air Fund ........................ 200,000 Schedule: (1) 2470-Resource Management ........................ 200,000 Provisions: 1. The funds appropriated in this item shall be available for the administration of funding to the Wildfire Conservancy to improve firefighter health and safety, advance fire attack effectiveness, and promote community resilience and awareness. 3540-008-6093—For support of Department of Forestry and Fire Protection, payable from the Safe Drinking Water, Wildfire Prevention, Drought Preparedness, and Clean Air Fund ........................ 200,000 Schedule: (1) 2470-Resource Management ........................ 200,000 Provisions: 1. The funds appropriated in this item shall be available for the administration of funding to the California Fire Foundation to support vegetation mitigation and fuels reduction projects, public education and outreach, personal protective equipment, specialized firefighting equipment, and firefighter health and safety. 3540-093-0001—For support of Department of Forestry and Fire Protection for rental payments on lease-revenue bonds ........................ 21,881,000 Schedule: (1) 2465-Fire Protection ........................ 21,881,000 Provisions: 1. The Controller shall transfer funds appropriated in this item for base rental as and when provided for in the schedule submitted by the State Public Works Board. Notwithstanding the payment dates in any related Facility Lease or Indenture, the schedule may provide for an earlier transfer of funds to ensure debt requirements are met and pay base rental in full when due. 2. The Controller shall transfer for additional rental no later than 30 days after enactment of this budget, $249,000 of the amount appropriated in this item, to the Expense Account in the Public Buildings Construction Fund. 3. This item may be adjusted pursuant to Section 4.30. Any adjustments to this item shall be reported to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee pursuant to Section 4.30. 3540-301-0001—For capital outlay, Department of Forestry and Fire Protection ........................ 82,203,000 Schedule: (1) 0005032-Hollister Air Attack Base/Bear Valley Helitack Base: Relocate Facility ........................ 5,521,000 (a) Working drawings ........................ 5,521,000 (2) 0008989-L.A. Moran Reforestation Center Improvements ........................ 1,213,000 (a) Preliminary plans ........................ 1,213,000 (3) 0008988-Riverside UH: Relocate Facility ........................ 10,000,000 (a) Acquisition ........................ 10,000,000 (4) 0016321-Witch Creek Fire Station: Relocate Facility ........................ 3,300,000 (a) Acquisition ........................ 3,300,000 (5) 0008424-Boggs Mountain Helitack Base: Relocate Facility ........................ 4,757,000 (a) Preliminary plans ........................ 4,757,000 (6) 0006681-Howard Forest Helitack Base: Relocate Facility ........................ 1,898,000 (a) Preliminary plans ........................ 1,898,000 (7) 0016322-Property Acquisition: Happy Valley Fire Center ........................ 6,000,000 (a) Acquisition ........................ 6,000,000 (8) 0005016-Humboldt-Del Norte Unit Headquarters: Relocate Facility ........................ 3,952,000 (a) Working drawings ........................ 3,952,000 (9) 0016323-Parlin Fork Conservation Camp: Repair Kitchen ........................ 4,108,000 (a) Preliminary plans ........................ 268,000 (b) Working drawings ........................ 298,000 (c) Construction ........................ 3,542,000 (10) 0009702-Tehama Glenn Unit Headquarters: Relocate Facilities ........................ 4,500,000 (a) Acquisition ........................ 4,500,000 (11) 0005020-Hemet-Ryan Air Attack Base: Replace Facility ........................ 1,810,000 (a) Working drawings ........................ 1,810,000 (12) 0005192-Fresno Air Attack Base: Infrastructure Improvements 3,554,000 (a) Construction 3,554,000 (13) 0005193-Ramona Air Attack Base: Infrastructure Improvements 1,197,000 (a) Construction 1,197,000 (14) 0011022-Rohnerville Air Attack Base: Replace Facility 475,000 (a) Working drawings 475,000 (15) 0000920-Statewide: Replace Communications Facilities, Phase V 28,918,000 (a) Construction 28,918,000 (16) 0000190-Santa Clara Headquarters: Replace Facility 1,000,000 (a) Acquisition 1,000,000 3540-301-0660—For capital outlay, Department of Forestry and Fire Protection, payable from the Public Buildings Construction Fund ........................ 277,787,000 Schedule: (1) 0001378-Shasta Trinity Unit Headquarters/Northern Operations: Relocate Facility ........................ 247,502,000 (a) Construction ........................ 247,502,000 (2) 0000186-Potrero Forest Fire Station: Replace Facility ........................ 30,285,000 (a) Construction ........................ 30,285,000 Provisions: 1. The Department of Forestry and Fire Protection and the Department of General Services are authorized to execute and deliver any and all leases, contracts, agreements, or other documents necessary or advisable to consummate the sale and issuance of bonds by the State Public Works Board in accordance with the State Building Construction Act of 1955 (Part 10b (commencing with Section 15800) of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code) or otherwise to effectuate the financing of the scheduled project. 3540-490—Reappropriation, Department of Forestry and Fire Protection. The balances of the appropriations provided in the following citations are reappropriated for the purposes provided for in those appropriations and shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure as specified below: 0001—General Fund (1) Item 3540-301-0001, Budget Act of 2019 (Chs. 23 and 55, Stats. 2019), as reappropriated by Item 3540-490, Budget Act of 2020 (Chs. 6 and 7, Stats. 2020), Budget Act 2022 (Chs. 43, 45, and 249, Stats. 2024), and partially reverted by Item 3540-495, Budget Act of 2020 (Chs. 6 and 7, Stats. 2020), shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2027. (1) 0005192-Fresno Air Attack Base: Infrastructure Improvements (a) Preliminary plans (b) Working drawings (2) 0005193-Ramona Air Attack Base: Infrastructure Improvements (a) Preliminary plans (b) Working drawings (3) 0005212-Paso Robles Air Attack Base: Infrastructure Improvements (a) Preliminary plans (2) Item 3540-301-0001. Budget Act of 2020 (Chs. 6 and 7, Stats. 2020), as reappropriated by Item 3540-490, Budget Act of 2021 (Chs. 21. 69, and 240, Stats. 2021), Item 3540-490, Budget Act of 2022 (Chs. 43, 45, and 249, Stats. 2022), Item 3540-490, Budget Act of 2023 (Chs. 12, 38, and 189, Stats. 2023), and Item 3540-490, Budget Act of 2024 (Chs. 22, 35, and 994, Stats. 2024) shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2027. (1) 0005212-Paso Robles Air Attack Base: Infrastructure Improvements (a) Working drawings (3) Up to $463,000 of the amount appropriated in Item 3540-301-0001, Budget Act of 2020 (Chs. 6 and 7, Stats. 2020), as reappropriated by Item 3540-490, Budget Act of 2021 (Chs. 21, 69, and 240, Stats. 2021), Item 3540-490, Budget Act of 2022 (Chs. 43, 45, and 249, Stats. 2022), Item 3540-490, Budget Act of 2023 (Chs. 12, 38, and 189, Stats. 2023), and Item 3540-490, Budget Act of 2024 (Chs. 22, 35, and 994, Stats. 2024) shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2027. (1) 0006678-Chico Air Attack Base: Infrastructure Improvements (a) Working drawings (4) Up to $842,000 of the amount appropriated in Item 3540-301-0001, Budget Act of 2021 (Chs. 21, 69, and 240, Stats. 2021), as reappropriated by Item 3540-490, Budget Act of 2024 (Chs. 22, 35, and 994, Stats. 2024) shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2027. (1) 0003213-Alhambra Valley Fire Station: Relocate Facility (a) Acquisition (5) Item 3540-301-0001, Budget Act of 2021 (Chs. 21, 69, and 240, Stats. 2021), as reappropriated by Item 3540-490, Budget Act of 2024 (Chs. 22, 35, and 994, Stats. 2024) shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2027. (1) 0005014-Elsinore Fire Station: Relocate Facility (a) Acquisition (2) 0006679-Intermountain Conservation Camp: Replace Facility (a) Acquisition (3) 0006682-Kneeland Helitack Base: Replace Facility (a) Acquisition (6) Up to $1,000,000 of the amount appropriated in Item 3540-301-0001, Budget Act of 2021 (Chs. 21, 69, and 240, Stats. 2021), as reappropriated by Item 3540-490, Budget Act of 2024 (Chs. 22, 35, and 994, Stats. 2024) shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2027. (1) 0008988-Riverside Unit Headquarters: Relocate Facility (a) Acquisition (7) Up to $246,000 of the amount appropriated in Item 3540-301-0001, Budget Act of 2021 (Chs. 21, 69, and 240, Stats. 2021), as reappropriated by Item 3540-490, Budget Act of 2022 (Chs. 43, 45, and 249, Stats. 2022), Item 3540-490, Budget Act of 2023 (Chs. 12 38, and 189, Stats. 2023), and Item 3540-490, Budget Act of 2024 (Chs. 22, 35, and 994, Stats. 2024) shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2028. (1) 0000176-Higgins Corner Fire Station: Replace Facility (a) Preliminary plans (2) 0001378-Butte Fire Center: Replace Facility (a) Working drawings (8) Item 3540-301-0001, Budget Act of 2021 (Chs. 21, 69, and 240, Stats. 2021), as reappropriated by Item 3540-490, Budget Act of 2022 (Chs. 43, 45, and 249, Stats. 2022), Item 3540-490, Budget Act of 2023 (Chs. 12, 38, and 189, Stats. 2023), and Item 3540-490, Budget Act of 2024 (Chs. 22, 35, and 994, Stats. 2024) shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2027. (1) 0001380-Macdoel Fire Station: Relocate Facility (a) Preliminary plans (2) 0005020-Hemet Ryan Air Attack Base: Replace Facility (a) Working drawings (3) 0005192-Fresno Air Attack Base: Infrastructure Improvements (a) Construction (4) 0005193-Ramona Air Attack Base: Infrastructure Improvements (a) Construction (5) 0006681-Howard Forest Helitack Base: Replace Facility (a) Preliminary plans (9) Item 3540-301-0001, Budget Act of 2022 (Chs. 43, 45, and 249, Stats. 2022), and as reappropriated by Item 3540-490, Budget Act of 2023 (Chs. 12, 38, and 189, Stats. 2023), and Item 3540-490, Budget Act of 2024 (Chs. 22, 35, and 994, Stats. 2024) shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2027. (1) 0000176-Higgins Corner Fire Station: Replace Facility (a) Working drawings (2) 0001380-Macdoel Fire Station: Relocate Facility (a) Working drawings (3) 0009701-Self-Generating Power Projects in Tehama-Glenn and Fresno-Kings Units (a) Preliminary plans (10) Item 3540-301-0001, Budget Act of 2022 (Chs. 43, 45, and 249, Stats. 2022) shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2028. (1) 0006678-Chico Air Attack Base: Infrastructure Improvements (a) Construction (2) 0009704-Bear Valley Fire Station: Relocate Facility (a) Acquisition (3) 0000920-Statewide: Communications Phase V: Various Counties (a) Construction (11) Item 3540-301-0001, Budget Act of 2023 (Chs. 12, 38, and 249, Stats. 2023), as reappropriated by Item 3540-490, Budget Act of 2024 (Chs. 22, 35, and 994, Stats. 2024) shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2027. (1) 0011022-Rohnerville Air Attack Base: Replace Fuel System (a) Preliminary plans (b) Working drawings (12) Item 3540-301-0001, Budget Act of 2023 (Chs. 12, 38, and 249, Stats. 2023) shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2027. (1) 0011024-Hayfork Fire Station: Relocate Facility (a) Acquisition (2) 0011027-Property Acquisition: Camp Fox, Boys Ranch, and Sierra Elementary (a) Acquisition (3) 0000185-Pine Mountain Fire Station: Relocate Facility (a) Acquisition (13) Item 3540-301-0001, Budget Act of 2024 (Chs. 22, 35, and 994, Stats. 2024), shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2027. (1) 0005032-Hollister Air Attack Base/ Bear Valley Helitrack Base: Replace Facilities (a) Preliminary plans (b) Working drawings (14) Item 3540-301-0001, Budget Act of 2025 (Chs. 4 and 5, Stats. 2025), shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2027. (1) 0006682-Kneeland Helitack Base: Replace Facility (a) Acquisition (2) 0015388-Penon Blanco & Deadwood Peak Lookout: Repair Facilities (a) Preliminary plans (3) 0015387-Columbia Air Attack Base/Helitack Base: Replace Facility (a) Study 0660—Public Buildings Construction Fund (1) Item 3540-301-0660, Budget Act of 2019 (Chs. 23 and 55, Stats. 2019), as reappropriated by Item 3540-490, Budget Act of 2020 (Chs. 6 and 7, Stats. 2020), as reverted by Item 3540-495, Budget Act of 2020 (Chs. 6 and 7, Stats. 2020), and reappropriated by Item 3540-490, Budget Act of 2021 (Chs. 21, 43, and 69, Stats. 2021), shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2028. (1) 0000166-Baker Forest Fire Station: Relocate Facility (a) Working drawings (b) Construction (2) 0000170-Cayucos Forest Fire Station: Replace Facility (a) Construction (3) 0000182-Parkfield Fire Station: Relocate Facility (a) Working drawings (b) Construction (4) 0000188-Rincon Forest Fire Station: Relocate Facility (a) Construction (2) Item 3540-301-0660, Budget Act of 2019 (Chs. 23 and 55, Stats. 2019), as reappropriated by Item 3540-490, Budget Act of 2020 (Chs. 6 and 7, Stats. 2020), shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2028. (1) 0000192-Soquel Fire Station: Replace Facility (a) Construction (3) Item 3540-301-0660, Budget Act of 2019 (Chs. 23 and 55, Stats. 2019), shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2028. (1) 0000192-Soquel Fire Station: Replace Facility (a) Working drawings (4) Item 3540-301-0660, Budget Act of 2022 (Chs. 14, 22, and 54, Stats. 2017), as reappropriated by Item 3540-490, Budget Act of 2025 (Chs. 4 and 5, Stats. 2025) shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2028. (1) 0003211-Prado Helitack Base: Replace Facility (a) Construction (5) Item 3540-301-0660, Budget Act of 2024 (Chs. 22, 35, and 994, Stats. 2024), as reappropriated by Item 3540-490, Budget Act of 2025 (Chs. 4 and 5, Stats. 2025) shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2028. (1) 0014062-Sonoma Lake Napa Unit Headquarters and Glen Ellen Fire Station: Relocate Facility (a) Performance criteria (6) Item 3540-301-0660, Budget Act of 2025 (Chs. 4, and 5, Stats. 2025), shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2028. (1) 0000166-Baker Forest Fire Station: Relocate Facility (a) Construction (2) 0001378-Butte Fire Center: Relocate Facility (a) Construction (3) 0000188-Rincon Forest Fire Station: Replace Facility (a) Construction (4) 0003211-Prado Helitack Base: Relocate Facility (a) Construction 0668—Public Buildings Construction Fund Subaccount (1) Item 3540-301-0668, Budget Act of 2020 (Chs. 6 and 7, Stats. 2020), as reappropriated by Item 3540-490, Budget Act of 2021 (Chs. 21, 43, and 69, Stats. 2021), shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2028. (1) 0000712-San Luis Obispo Unit Headquarters Replacement (a) Working drawings 3540-491—Reappropriation, Department of Forestry and Fire Protection. The amounts specified in the following citations are reappropriated for the purposes provided for in those appropriations and shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure, as specified below: 0001—General Fund (1) Up to $10,155,000 of the amount appropriated in Schedule (2), pursuant to Provision 13 of Item 3540-001-0001, Budget Act of 2021 (Chs. 21, 69, and 240, Stats. 2021), as reappropriated by Item 3540-491, Budget Act of 2024 (Chs. 22, 35, and 994, Stats. 2024) and Item 3540-491, Budget Act of 2025 (Chs. 4 and 5, Stats. 2025), until June 30, 2028. (2) Up to $47,979,000 of the amount appropriated in Schedule (2), pursuant to Provision 12 of Item 3540-001-0001, Budget Act of 2022 (Chs. 43, 45, and 249, Stats. 2022), as reappropriated by Item 3540-491, Budget Act of 2025 (Chs. 4 and 5, Stats. 2025), until June 30, 2028. (3) Up to $29,600,000 of the amount appropriated in Schedule (2) of Item 3540-001-0001, Budget Act of 2023 (Chs. 12, 38, and 189, Stats. 2023), until June 30, 2028. (4) Up to $2,500,000 of the amount appropriated in Schedule (6) of Item 3540-001-0001, Budget Act of 2023 (Chs. 12, 38, and 189, Stats. 2023), until June 30, 2028. (5) Up to $2,997,000 of the amount appropriated in Schedule (2), pursuant to Provision 11 of Item 3540-001-0001, Budget Act of 2024 (Chs. 22, 35, and 994, Stats. 2024), until June 30, 2028. 3228—Greenhouse Gas Reduction Fund (1) Up to $1,650,000 of the amount appropriated in Schedule (1) of Item 3540-101-3228, Budget Act of 2023 (Chs. 12, 38, and 189, Stats. 2023), until June 30, 2028. 3237—Cost of Implementation Account, Air Pollution Control Fund (1) Up to $42,000 of the amount appropriated in Schedule (2) of Item 3540-001-3237, Budget Act of 2023 (Chs. 12, 38, and 189, Stats. 2023), until June 30, 2027. 6093—Safe Drinking Water, Wildfire Prevention, Drought Preparedness, and Clean Air Fund (1) Up to $13,837,000 of the amount appropriated in Schedule (1) of Item 3540-107-6093, Budget Act of 2025 (Chs. 4 and 5, Stats. 2025), until June 30, 2027. (2) Up to $13,837,000 of the amount appropriated in Schedule (1) of Item 3540-108-6093, Budget Act of 2025 (Chs. 4 and 5, Stats. 2025), until June 30, 2027. 3540-492—Reappropriation, Department of Forestry and Fire Protection. Notwithstanding any other law, the period to liquidate encumbrances of the following citations is extended as specified below: 0001—General Fund (1) Up to $493,000 of the amount appropriated in Schedule (2) per Provision 2 of Item 3540-101-0001, Budget Act of 2021 (Chs. 21, 69, and 240, Stats. 2021), until June 30, 2028. (2) Up to $1,250,000 of the amount appropriated in paragraph (1) of subdivision (i) of Control Section 19.561, Budget Act of 2023 (Chs. 12, 38, and 189, Stats. 2023), until June 30, 2028. (3) Up to $5,000,000 of the funding transferred to the Department of Forestry and Fire Protection per paragraph (55) of subdivision (g) of Control Section 19.561, Budget Act of 2023 (Chs. 12, 38, and 189, Stats. 2023), until June 30, 2028. (4) Up to $30,000,000 of the amount appropriated in subdivision (a) of Section 37 of Chapter 574, Statutes of 2022, until June 30, 2029. 3540-495—Reversion, Department of Forestry and Fire Protection. As of June 30, 2026, the unencumbered balances of the appropriations provided in the following citations shall revert to the balances of the funds from which the appropriations were made: 0001—General Fund (1) Up to $200,000 of the amount appropriated in Item 3540-301-0001, Budget Act of 2022 (Chs. 43, 45, and 249, Stats. 2022) (1) 0009699-South Lake Tahoe Fire Station: New Facility (a) Acquisition (2) Item 3540-301-0001, Budget Act of 2022 (Chs. 43, 45, and 249, Stats. 2022), as reappropriated by Item 3540-490, Budget Act of 2025 (Chs. 4 and 5, Stats. 2025) (1) 0000186-Potrero Forest Fire Station: Replace Facility (a) Construction (2) 005212-Paso Robles Air Attack Base: Infrastructure Improvements (a) Construction (3) Item 3540-301-0001, Budget Act of 2022 (Chs. 43, 45, and 249, Stats. 2022), as reappropriated by Item 3540-490, Budget Act of 2023 (Chs. 12, 38, and 189, Stats. 2023) and reappropriated by Item 3540-490, Budget Act of 2024 (Chs. 22, 35, and 994, Stats. 2024) (1) 003210-Perris Emergency Command Center: Remodel Facility (a) Working drawings (4) Up to $2,000,000 of the amount appropriated in Item 3540-301-0001, Budget Act of 2023 (Chs. 12, 38, and 189, Stats. 2023) (1) 0000185-Pine Mountain Forest Fire Station: Relocate Facility (a) Construction (5) Item 3540-301-0001, Budget Act of 2024 (Chs. 22, 35, and 994, Stats. 2024) (1) 0011022-Rohnerville Air Attack Base: Replace Facility (a) Construction (6) Item 3540-301-0001, Budget Act of 2025 (Chs. 4 and 5, Stats. 2025) (1) 0000176-Higgins Corner Fire Station: Replace Facility (a) Construction (2) 0008423-Alma Helitack Base: Replace Facility (a) Preliminary Plans 0660—Public Buildings Construction Fund (1) Up to $3,000,000 of the amount appropriated in Item 3540-301-0660, Budget Act of 2019 (Chs. 23 and 55, Stats. 2019), as reappropriated by Item 3540-490, Budget Act of 2020 (Chs. 6 and 7, Stats. 2020), and reappropriated by Item 3540-490, Budget Act of 2021 (Chs. 21, 69, and 240, Stats. 2021) (1) 0000170-Cayucos Forest Fire Station: Relocate Facility (a) Construction (2) Up to $1,300,000 of the amount appropriated in Item 3540-301-0660, Budget Act of 2020 (Chs. 6 and 7, Stats. 2020) (1) 0003212-Ishi Conservation Camp: Replace Kitchen (a) Construction (3) Item 3540-301-0660, Budget Act of 2020 (Chs. 6 and 7, Stats. 2020), as reappropriated by Item 3540-490, Budget Act of 2021 (Chs. 21, 69, and 240, Stats. 2021) (1) 0000167-Bieber Forest Fire Station/Helitack Base Relocate Facility (a) Construction (4) Item 3540-301-0660, Budget Act of 2025 (Chs. 4 and 5, Stats. 2025) (1) 0001380-Macdoel Fire Station: Relocate Facility (a) Construction 0668—Public Buildings Construction Fund Subaccount (1) Item 3540-301-0668, Budget Act of 2020 (Chs. 6 and 7, Stats. 2020), as reappropriated by Item 3540-490, Budget Act of 2021 (Chs. 21, 69, and 240, Stats. 2021) (1) 0000712-San Luis Obispo Unit Headquarters Replacement (a) Construction 3560-001-0001—For support of State Lands Commission ........................ 19,750,000 Schedule: (1) 2560-Mineral Resources Management ........................ 8,192,000 (2) 2565-Land Management ........................ 16,830,000 (3) Reimbursements to 2560-Mineral Resources Management ........................ −2,685,000 (4) Reimbursements to 2565-Land Management ........................ −2,587,000 Provisions: 1. Notwithstanding subdivision (d) of Section 4 of Chapter 138 of the Statutes of 1964, First Extraordinary Session, all commission costs for administering the Long Beach Tidelands, exclusive of any Attorney General charges, shall be funded from revenues deposited into the General Fund pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 6217 of the Public Resources Code. 2. All costs incurred to manage state school lands shall be deducted from the revenues produced by those lands and deposited into the General Fund. 3560-001-0140—For support of State Lands Commission, payable from the California Environmental License Plate Fund ........................ 181,000 Schedule: (1) 2565-Land Management ........................ 181,000 3560-001-0212—For support of State Lands Commission, payable from the Marine Invasive Species Control Fund ........................ 4,687,000 Schedule: (1) 2570-Marine Environmental Protection Division ........................ 4,687,000 3560-001-0320—For support of State Lands Commission, payable from the Oil Spill Prevention and Administration Fund ........................ 18,081,000 Schedule: (1) 2560-Mineral Resources Management ........................ 5,967,000 (2) 2570-Marine Environmental Protection Division ........................ 12,114,000 3560-001-0347—For support of State Lands Commission, payable from the School Land Bank Fund ........................ 2,219,000 Schedule: (1) 2560-Mineral Resources Management ........................ 979,000 (2) 2565-Land Management ........................ 1,240,000 3560-001-0943—For support of State Lands Commission, payable from the Land Bank Fund ........................ 2,434,000 Schedule: (1) 2560-Mineral Resources Management ........................ 2,000,000 (2) 2565-Land Management ........................ 434,000 3560-011-0001—For transfer by the Controller, upon order of the Department of Finance, to the Land Bank Fund ........................ 2,000,000 Provisions: 1. The amount transferred pursuant to this item shall remain consistent with Section 6217 of the Public Resources Code. 3600-001-0001—For support of Department of Fish and Wildlife ........................ 180,595,000 Schedule: (1) 2590-Biodiversity Conservation Program ........................ 182,638,000 (2) 2595-Hunting, Fishing, and Public Use Program ........................ 15,659,000 (3) 2600-Management of Department Lands and Facilities ........................ 19,902,000 (4) 2605-Enforcement ........................ 46,765,000 (5) 2610-Communications, Education and Outreach ........................ 418,000 (6) 2615-Spill Prevention and Response ........................ 3,807,000 (7) 2620-Fish and Game Commission ........................ 908,000 (8) 9900100-Administration ........................ 74,779,000 (9) 9900200-Administration—​Distributed ........................ −74,779,000 (10) Reimbursements to 2590-Biodiversity Conservation Program ........................ −67,761,000 (11) Reimbursements to 2595-Hunting, Fishing, and Public Use Program ........................ −3,016,000 (12) Reimbursements to 2600-Management of Department Lands and Facilities ........................ −10,744,000 (13) Reimbursements to 2605-Enforcement ........................ −4,396,000 (14) Reimbursements to 2610-Communications, Education and Outreach ........................ −121,000 (15) Reimbursements to 2615-Spill Prevention and Response ........................ −3,464,000 Provisions: 1. Notwithstanding Section 26.00, upon approval of the Director of Finance, funds appropriated in this item may be transferred between schedules. 2. By October 1 of each year, beginning in 2021 and ending in 2026, the Department of Fish and Wildlife shall submit to the fiscal committees of the Legislature and the Legislative Analyst’s Office a report summarizing outcomes of its Cutting the Green Tape initiative. The report shall include information related to the results of this initiative, beginning with the baseline year of 2020–21 and for each fiscal year thereafter, including: (a) a list and description of the projects initiated, (b) average permit processing times, (c) the number of permits granted, (d) specific strategies and changes implemented as part of the initiative, (e) lessons learned to improve ongoing permitting processes and restoration work, and (f) counties and watersheds in which the department has focused related efforts. 3600-001-0140—For support of Department of Fish and Wildlife, payable from the California Environmental License Plate Fund ........................ 21,934,000 Schedule: (1) 2590-Biodiversity Conservation Program ........................ 13,294,000 (2) 2595-Hunting, Fishing, and Public Use Program ........................ 3,000 (3) 2600-Management of Department Lands and Facilities ........................ 3,906,000 (4) 2605-Enforcement ........................ 3,428,000 (5) 2610-Communications, Education and Outreach ........................ 1,098,000 (6) 2620-Fish and Game Commission ........................ 205,000 3600-001-0193—For support of Department of Fish and Wildlife, payable from the Waste Discharge Permit Fund ........................ 542,000 Schedule: (1) 2605-Enforcement ........................ 542,000 Provisions: 1. Of the amount appropriated in this item, and not-withstanding subdivision (c) of Section 13264, subdivision (f) of Section 13268, subdivision (k) of Section 13350, and paragraph (2) of subdivision (n) of Section 13385 of the Water Code, up to $542,000 shall be from the moneys deposited into, and separately accounted for, the Waste Discharge Permit Fund pursuant to the balance of penalty revenues generated by the imposition of liabilities pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 13264, subdivision (f) of Section 13268, subdivision (k) of Section 13350, and paragraph (2) of subdivision (n) of Section 13385 of the Water Code. The funds specified in this provision are hereby appropriated to support a program to address the environmental issues and natural resource damages associated with the cultivation of marijuana. 3600-001-0200—For support of Department of Fish and Wildlife, payable from the Fish and Game Preservation Fund ........................ 152,678,000 Schedule: (1) 2590-Biodiversity Conservation Program ........................ 23,702,000 (2) 2595-Hunting, Fishing, and Public Use Program ........................ 54,795,000 (3) 2600-Management of Department Lands and Facilities ........................ 20,060,000 (4) 2605-Enforcement ........................ 50,948,000 (5) 2610-Communications, Education and Outreach ........................ 137,000 (6) 2615-Spill Prevention and Response ........................ 2,077,000 (7) 2620-Fish and Game Commission ........................ 959,000 3600-001-0207—For support of Department of Fish and Wildlife, payable from the Fish and Wildlife Pollution Account ........................ 321,000 Schedule: (1) 2615-Spill Prevention and Response ........................ 321,000 3600-001-0212—For support of Department of Fish and Wildlife, payable from the Marine Invasive Species Control Fund ........................ 1,590,000 Schedule: (1) 2615-Spill Prevention and Response ........................ 1,590,000 3600-001-0213—For support of Department of Fish and Wildlife, payable from the Native Species Conservation and Enhancement Account, Fish and Game Preservation Fund ........................ 149,000 Schedule: (1) 2600-Management of Department Lands and Facilities ........................ 149,000 3600-001-0235—For support of Department of Fish and Wildlife, payable from the Public Resources Account, Cigarette and Tobacco Products Surtax Fund ........................ 1,169,000 Schedule: (1) 2600-Management of Department Lands and Facilities ........................ 1,169,000 3600-001-0320—For support of Department of Fish and Wildlife, payable from the Oil Spill Prevention and Administration Fund ........................ 47,819,000 Schedule: (1) 2615-Spill Prevention and Response ........................ 47,819,000 3600-001-0322—For support of Department of Fish and Wildlife, payable from the Environmental Enhancement Fund ........................ 280,000 Schedule: (1) 2615-Spill Prevention and Response ........................ 280,000 3600-001-0516—For support of Department of Fish and Wildlife, payable from the Harbors and Watercraft Revolving Fund ........................ 3,109,000 Schedule: (1) 2590-Biodiversity Conservation Program ........................ 2,574,000 (2) 2605-Enforcement ........................ 535,000 3600-001-0890—For support of Department of Fish and Wildlife, payable from the Federal Trust Fund ........................ 92,361,000 Schedule: (1) 2590-Biodiversity Conservation Program ........................ 23,646,000 (2) 2595-Hunting, Fishing, and Public Use Program ........................ 31,823,000 (3) 2600-Management of Department Lands and Facilities ........................ 27,978,000 (4) 2605-Enforcement ........................ 5,221,000 (5) 2610-Communications, Education and Outreach ........................ 3,543,000 (6) 2615-Spill Prevention and Response ........................ 150,000 3600-001-0942—For support of Department of Fish and Wildlife, payable from the Special Deposit Fund ........................ 3,650,000 Schedule: (1) 2590-Biodiversity Conservation Program ........................ 3,650,000 3600-001-3103—For support of Department of Fish and Wildlife, payable from the Hatchery and Inland Fisheries Fund ........................ 30,359,000 Schedule: (1) 2595-Hunting, Fishing, and Public Use Program ........................ 3,837,000 (2) 2600-Management of Department Lands and Facilities ........................ 26,522,000 3600-001-3212—For support of Department of Fish and Wildlife, payable from the Timber Regulation and Forest Restoration Fund ........................ 10,897,000 Schedule: (1) 2590-Biodiversity Conservation Program ........................ 10,897,000 3600-001-3364—For support of Department of Fish and Wildlife, payable from the Department of Fish and Wildlife—​California Environmental Quality Act Fund ........................ 5,154,000 Schedule: (1) 2590-Biodiversity Conservation Program ........................ 5,154,000 3600-001-3392—For support of Department of Fish and Wildlife, payable from the Nesting Bird Habitat Incentive Program Account, Fish and Game Preservation Fund ........................ 1,703,000 Schedule: (1) 2600-Management of Department Lands and Facilities ........................ 1,703,000 3600-001-6031—For support of Department of Fish and Wildlife, payable from the Water Security, Clean Drinking Water, Coastal and Beach Protection Fund of 2002 ........................ 2,000,000 Schedule: (1) 2590-Biodiversity Conservation Program ........................ 2,000,000 3600-001-6051—For support of Department of Fish and Wildlife, payable from the Safe Drinking Water, Water Quality and Supply, Flood Control, River and Coastal Protection Fund of 2006 ........................ 725,000 Schedule: (1) 2590-Biodiversity Conservation Program ........................ 501,000 (2) 2595-Hunting, Fishing, and Public Use Program ........................ 224,000 3600-001-6088—For support of Department of Fish and Wildlife, payable from the California Drought, Water, Parks, Climate, Coastal Protection, and Outdoor Access For All Fund ........................ 1,165,000 Schedule: (1) 2590-Biodiversity Conservation Program ........................ 187,000 (2) 2600-Management of Department Lands and Facilities ........................ 978,000 3600-001-6093—For support of Department of Fish and Wildlife, payable from the Safe Drinking Water, Wildfire Prevention, Drought Preparedness, and Clean Air Fund ........................ 886,000 Schedule: (1) 2590-Biodiversity Conservation Program ........................ 886,000 3600-001-8018—For support of Department of Fish and Wildlife, payable from the Salton Sea Restoration Fund ........................ 2,928,000 Schedule: (1) 2590-Biodiversity Conservation Program ........................ 2,928,000 3600-001-8047—For support of Department of Fish and Wildlife, payable from the California Sea Otter Fund ........................ 212,000 Schedule: (1) 2610-Communications, Education and Outreach ........................ 26,000 (2) 2615-Spill Prevention and Response ........................ 186,000 3600-002-6051—For transfer by the Controller upon notification by the Department of Fish and Wildlife from the Safe Drinking Water, Water Quality and Supply, Flood Control, River and Coastal Protection Fund of 2006 to the Salton Sea Restoration Fund ........................ 296,000 3600-003-6093—For support of Department of Fish and Wildlife, payable from the Safe Drinking Water, Wildfire Prevention, Drought Preparedness, and Clean Air Fund ........................ 1,308,000 Schedule: (1) 2600-Management of Department Lands and Facilities ........................ 1,308,000 3600-006-6093—For support of Department of Fish and Wildlife, payable from the Safe Drinking Water, Wildfire Prevention, Drought Preparedness, and Clean Air Fund ........................ 1,750,000 Schedule: (1) 2590-Biodiversity Conservation Program ........................ 1,750,000 3600-007-6093—For support of Department of Fish and Wildlife, payable from the Safe Drinking Water, Wildfire Prevention, Drought Preparedness, and Clean Air Fund ........................ 1,674,000 Schedule: (1) 2590-Biodiversity Conservation Program ........................ 1,674,000 Provisions: 1. The amount appropriated in this item shall be available to implement the Salton Sea Management Program. 3600-011-0001—For support of Department of Fish and Wildlife, for transfer to the Fish and Game Preservation Fund ........................ 18,000 3600-011-0903—For transfer by the Controller, from the State Penalty Fund to the Fish and Game Preservation Fund ........................ (450,000) 3600-101-0001—For local assistance, Department of Fish and Wildlife ........................ 576,000 Schedule: (1) 2590-Biodiversity Conservation Program ........................ 576,000 3600-101-0200—For local assistance, Department of Fish and Wildlife, payable from the Fish and Game Preservation Fund ........................ 500,000 Schedule: (1) 2595-Hunting, Fishing, and Public Use Program ........................ 500,000 3600-101-0320—For local assistance, Department of Fish and Wildlife, payable from the Oil Spill Prevention and Administration Fund ........................ 1,341,000 Schedule: (1) 2615-Spill Prevention and Response ........................ 1,341,000 Provisions: 1. The funds appropriated in this item are for grants to local governments and other entities to write or update local governments’ oil spill response plans, participate in oil spill drills and exercises, attend oil spill training, and to conduct other planning activities related to oil spill prevention and response. 3600-101-0890—For local assistance, Department of Fish and Wildlife, payable from the Federal Trust Fund ........................ 20,000,000 Schedule: (1) 2595-Hunting, Fishing, and Public Use Program ........................ 20,000,000 Provisions: 1. The funds appropriated in this item are available for grants to nonprofit organizations, government agencies, and Indian tribes. 2. Of the funds appropriated in this item, the Department of Fish and Wildlife may allocate, to the maximum extent allowable under federal law, the amount necessary to provide for the department’s costs to administer the grants. 3. The funds appropriated in Schedule (1) are available for expenditure for local assistance or state operations projects. 3600-101-3392—For local assistance, Department of Fish and Wildlife, payable from the Nesting Bird Habitat Incentive Program Account, Fish and Game Preservation Fund ........................ 1,000,000 Schedule: (1) 2600-Management of Department Lands and Facilities ........................ 1,000,000 3600-101-6083—For local assistance, Department of Fish and Wildlife, payable from the Water Quality, Supply, and Infrastructure Improvement Fund of 2014 ........................ 7,450,000 Schedule: (1) 2590-Biodiversity Conservation Program ........................ 7,450,000 3600-490—Reappropriation, Department of Fish and Wildlife. Notwithstanding any other law, the period to liquidate encumbrances of the following citations is extended to June 30, 2028: 0001—General Fund (1) Up to $2,000,000 in Schedule (1) of Item 3600-102-0001, Budget Act of 2022 (Chs. 43, 45, and 249, Stats. 2022) as reappropriated by Item 3600-492, Budget Act of 2023 (Chs. 12, 38, and 189, Stats. 2023) to pay for nonlethal deterrents to beaver damage to promote coexistence with beavers. 3640-001-0140—For support of Wildlife Conservation Board, payable from the California Environmental License Plate Fund ........................ 352,000 Schedule: (1) 2710-Wildlife Conservation Board ........................ 352,000 3640-001-0447—For support of Wildlife Conservation Board, payable from the Wildlife Restoration Fund ........................ 399,000 Schedule: (1) 2710-Wildlife Conservation Board ........................ 936,000 (2) Reimbursements to 2710-Wildlife Conservation Board ........................ −537,000 Provisions: 1. The Director of Finance may authorize a short-term cash loan of up to $600,000 from the General Fund to support the payment of payroll and operational costs from the clearing account. The cash loan shall be subject to the terms and conditions for repayment as may be prescribed by the Department of Finance. Interest charges may be waived pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 16314 of the Government Code. For purposes of the budgetary and legal bases of accounting and budgeting, the principal amount of any loans made pursuant to this provision shall not be considered part of the balance of the fund that receives the loan, nor shall it be deducted from the balance of the fund from which the loan is made. These loans are considered cashflow loans for temporary cash shortages and shall not constitute budgetary loans, revenues, or expenditures. The Department of Finance shall make the final determination of the budgetary and accounting transactions and treatments to ensure proper implementation of this provision pursuant to Section 13344 of the Government Code. 3640-001-6031—For support of Wildlife Conservation Board, payable from the Water Security, Clean Drinking Water, Coastal and Beach Protection Fund of 2002 ........................ 138,000 Schedule: (1) 2710-Wildlife Conservation Board ........................ 138,000 3640-001-6051—For support of Wildlife Conservation Board, payable from the Safe Drinking Water, Water Quality and Supply, Flood Control, River and Coastal Protection Fund of 2006 ........................ 643,000 Schedule: (1) 2710-Wildlife Conservation Board ........................ 643,000 3640-001-6083—For support of Wildlife Conservation Board, payable from the Water Quality, Supply, and Infrastructure Improvement Fund of 2014 ........................ 649,000 Schedule: (1) 2710-Wildlife Conservation Board ........................ 649,000 3640-001-6088—For support of Wildlife Conservation Board, payable from the California Drought, Water, Parks, Climate, Coastal Protection, and Outdoor Access For All Fund ........................ 1,125,000 Schedule: (1) 2710-Wildlife Conservation Board ........................ 1,125,000 3640-001-6093—For support of Wildlife Conservation Board, payable from the Safe Drinking Water, Wildfire Prevention, Drought Preparedness, and Clean Air Fund ........................ 1,500,000 Schedule: (1) 2710-Wildlife Conservation Board ........................ 1,500,000 3640-002-6093—For support of Wildlife Conservation Board, payable from the Safe Drinking Water, Wildfire Prevention, Drought Preparedness, and Clean Air Fund ........................ 1,000,000 Schedule: (1) 2710-Wildlife Conservation Board ........................ 1,000,000 3640-101-6083—For local assistance, Wildlife Conservation Board, payable from the Water Quality, Supply, and Infrastructure Improvement Fund of 2014 ........................ 4,000,000 Schedule: (1) 2710-Wildlife Conservation Board ........................ 4,000,000 3640-311-0001—For transfer by the Controller to the Habitat Conservation Fund ........................ 21,403,000 Provisions: 1. The funds transferred in this item shall be used for purposes consistent with the requirements of the Habitat Conservation Fund. 2. Upon approval by the Department of Finance, the amount transferred by this item may be adjusted to reflect the requirements of subdivision (a) of Section 2796 of the Fish and Game Code. 3640-311-0235—For transfer by the Controller from the Public Resources Account, Cigarette and Tobacco Products Surtax Fund to the Habitat Conservation Fund ........................ (5,114,000) Provisions: 1. The funds transferred in this item shall be used for purposes consistent with the requirements of the Habitat Conservation Fund. 2. Upon approval by the Department of Finance, the amount transferred by this item may be adjusted to reflect the requirements of subdivision (a) of Section 2796 of the Fish and Game Code. 3640-490—Reappropriation, Wildlife Conservation Board. The balances of the appropriations provided in the following citations are reappropriated for the purposes provided for in those appropriations and shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2029. 0001—​General Fund (1) Item 3640-101-0001, Budget Act of 2023 (Chs. 12, 38, and 189, Stats. 2023), funding for administrative costs transferred pursuant to Provision 3. (2) Provision 5 of Item 3640-101-0001, Budget Act of 2023 (Chs. 12, 38, and 189, Stats. 2023). (3) Item 3640-103-0001, Budget Act of 2023 (Chs. 12, 38, and 189, Stats. 2023), funding for administrative costs transferred pursuant to Provision 2. 3640-491—Reappropriation, Wildlife Conservation Board. Notwithstanding any other law, the period to liquidate encumbrances of the following citations is extended to June 30, 2028. 0001—General Fund (1) Item 3640-101-0001, Budget Act of 2021 (Chs. 21, 69, and 240, Stats. 2021). (2) Item 3640-102-0001, Budget Act of 2021 (Chs. 21, 69, and 240, Stats. 2021). 3640-492—Reappropriation, Wildlife Conservation Board. Notwithstanding any other law, the period to liquidate encumbrances of the following citations is extended to June 30, 2027: 0001—General Fund (1) Item 3640-104-0001, Budget Act of 2022 (Chs. 43, 45, and 249, Stats. 2022). 3720-001-0001—For support of California Coastal Commission ........................ 28,569,000 Schedule: (1) 2730-Coastal Management Program ........................ 35,414,000 (2) Reimbursements to 2730-Coastal Management Program ........................ −6,845,000 Provisions: 1. Notwithstanding any other law, the Director of Finance, in accordance with Section 13344 of the Government Code, may authorize a short-term cash loan from the General Fund, in an amount not to exceed 20 percent of reimbursements appropriated in Schedule (2), to the California Coastal Commission, provided that: (a) The loan is to meet cash needs resulting from the delay in receipt of reimbursements for the services provided. (b) The loan is for a short term and shall be repaid by September 30 of the fiscal year following that in which the loan was authorized. (c) Interest charges may be waived pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 16314 of the Government Code. 3720-001-0140—For support of California Coastal Commission, payable from the California Environmental License Plate Fund ........................ 457,000 Schedule: (1) 2730-Coastal Management Program ........................ 457,000 3720-001-0371—For support of California Coastal Commission, payable from the California Beach and Coastal Enhancement Account, California Environmental License Plate Fund ........................ 1,030,000 Schedule: (1) 2730-Coastal Management Program ........................ 1,030,000 3720-001-0565—For support of California Coastal Commission, payable from the State Coastal Conservancy Fund ........................ 525,000 Schedule: (1) 2730-Coastal Management Program ........................ 525,000 3720-001-0890—For support of California Coastal Commission, payable from the Federal Trust Fund ........................ 3,591,000 Schedule: (1) 2730-Coastal Management Program ........................ 3,591,000 3720-001-3123—For support of California Coastal Commission, payable from the Coastal Act Services Fund ........................ 1,674,000 Schedule: (1) 2730-Coastal Management Program ........................ 1,674,000 3720-001-3212—For support of California Coastal Commission, payable from the Timber Regulation and Forest Restoration Fund ........................ 253,000 Schedule: (1) 2730-Coastal Management Program ........................ 253,000 3720-101-0371—For local assistance, California Coastal Commission, payable from the California Beach and Coastal Enhancement Account, California Environmental License Plate Fund ........................ 380,000 Schedule: (1) 2730-Coastal Management Program ........................ 380,000 3720-490—Reappropriation, California Coastal Commission. The balances of the appropriations provided in the following citations are reappropriated for the purposes provided for in those appropriations and shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2028: 0001—​General Fund (1) Item 3720-101-0001, Budget Act of 2021 (Chs. 21, 69, and 240, Stats. 2021) 3760-001-0140—For support of State Coastal Conservancy, payable from the California Environmental License Plate Fund ........................ 3,943,000 Schedule: (1) 2790-Coastal Conservancy Programs ........................ 4,410,000 (2) Reimbursements to 2790-Coastal Conservancy Programs ........................ −467,000 3760-001-0565—For support of State Coastal Conservancy, payable from the State Coastal Conservancy Fund ........................ 1,094,000 Schedule: (1) 2790-Coastal Conservancy Programs ........................ 1,756,000 (2) Reimbursements to 2790-Coastal Conservancy Programs ........................ −662,000 3760-001-0593—For support of State Coastal Conservancy, payable from the Coastal Access Account, State Coastal Conservancy Fund ........................ 50,000 Schedule: (1) 2790-Coastal Conservancy Programs ........................ 50,000 3760-001-0890—For support of State Coastal Conservancy, payable from the Federal Trust Fund ........................ 563,000 Schedule: (1) 2790-Coastal Conservancy Programs ........................ 563,000 3760-001-6031—For support of State Coastal Conservancy, payable from the Water Security, Clean Drinking Water, Coastal and Beach Protection Fund of 2002 ........................ 1,893,000 Schedule: (1) 2790-Coastal Conservancy Programs ........................ 1,893,000 3760-001-6083—For support of State Coastal Conservancy, payable from the Water Quality, Supply, and Infrastructure Improvement Fund of 2014 ........................ 33,000 Schedule: (1) 2790-Coastal Conservancy Programs ........................ 33,000 3760-001-6088—For support of State Coastal Conservancy, payable from the California Drought, Water, Parks, Climate, Coastal Protection, and Outdoor Access For All Fund ........................ 4,145,000 Schedule: (1) 2790-Coastal Conservancy Programs ........................ 4,145,000 3760-001-6093—For state operations, State Coastal Conservancy, payable from the Safe Drinking Water, Wildfire Prevention, Drought Preparedness, and Clean Air Fund ........................ 7,039,000 Schedule: (1) 2790-Coastal Conservancy Programs ........................ 7,039,000 3760-001-8047—For support of State Coastal Conservancy, payable from the California Sea Otter Fund ........................ 18,000 Schedule: (1) 2790-Coastal Conservancy Programs ........................ 18,000 Provisions: 1. The funds appropriated in this item are for the conservancy’s costs to administer the funds appropriated in Item 3760-101-8047. 3760-101-0140—For local assistance, State Coastal Conservancy, payable from the California Environmental License Plate Fund ........................ 225,000 Schedule: (1) 2805032-Conservancy Programs ........................ 225,000 Provisions: 1. The amount appropriated in this item shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure for local assistance or capital outlay until June 30, 2028. 3760-101-0565—For local assistance, State Coastal Conservancy, payable from the State Coastal Conservancy Fund ........................ 7,000,000 Schedule: (1) 2805032-Conservancy Programs ........................ 14,000,000 (2) Reimbursements to 2805032-Conservancy Programs ........................ −7,000,000 Provisions: 1. The amount appropriated in this item shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure for local assistance or capital outlay until June 30, 2029. 3760-101-0593—For local assistance, State Coastal Conservancy, payable from the Coastal Access Account, State Coastal Conservancy Fund ........................ 600,000 Schedule: (1) 2805032-Conservancy Programs ........................ 600,000 Provisions: 1. The funds appropriated in this item are available for either local assistance or capital outlay until June 30, 2028. 3760-101-0890—For local assistance, State Coastal Conservancy, payable from the Federal Trust Fund ........................ 10,000,000 Schedule: (1) 2805032-Conservancy Programs ........................ 10,000,000 Provisions: 1. The funds appropriated in this item are available for encumbrance or expenditure for either local assistance or capital outlay until June 30, 2028. 3760-101-8047—For local assistance, State Coastal Conservancy, payable from the California Sea Otter Fund ........................ 165,000 Schedule: (1) 2805032-Conservancy Programs ........................ 165,000 Provisions: 1. The amount appropriated in this item shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2029. 3760-490—Reappropriation, State Coastal Conservancy. The balances of the appropriations provided in the following citations are reappropriated for the purposes provided for in those appropriations and shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2029: 0001—​General Fund (1) Item 3760-101-0001, Budget Act of 2021 (Chs. 21, 69, and 240, Stats. 2021) 6051—​The Safe Drinking Water, Water Quality and Supply, Flood Control, River and Coastal Protection Fund of 2006 (1) Item 3760-101-6051, Budget Act of 2016 (Ch. 23, Stats. 2016) as reappropriated by Item 3760-492, Budget Act of 2021 (Chs. 21, 69, and 240, Stats. 2021) (2) Item 3760-101-6051, Budget Act of 2018 (Chs. 29 and 30, Stats. 2018) as reappropriated by Item 3760-492, Budget Act of 2021 (Chs. 21, 69, and 240, Stats. 2021) (3) Item 3760-101-6051, Budget Act of 2020 (Chs. 6 and 7, Stats. 2020) as reappropriated by Control Section 20.00, Budget Act of 2022 (Chs. 43, 45, and 249, Stats. 2022) 6088—​California Drought, Water, Parks, Climate, Coastal Protection, and Outdoor Access For All Fund (1) Item 3760-101-6088, Budget Act of 2023 (Chs. 12, 38, and 189, Stats. 2023) 3780-001-0001—For support of Native American Heritage Commission ........................ 3,813,000 Schedule: (1) 2830-Native American Heritage ........................ 3,819,000 (2) Reimbursements to 2830-Native American Heritage ........................ −6,000 3790-001-0001—For support of Department of Parks and Recreation ........................ 204,158,000 Schedule: (1) 2840-Support of the Department of Parks and Recreation ........................ 208,158,000 (2) Reimbursements to 2840-Support of the Department of Parks and Recreation ........................ −4,000,000 3790-001-0140—For support of Department of Parks and Recreation, payable from the California Environmental License Plate Fund ........................ 2,518,000 Schedule: (1) 2840-Support of the Department of Parks and Recreation ........................ 2,518,000 3790-001-0235—For support of Department of Parks and Recreation, payable from the Public Resources Account, Cigarette and Tobacco Products Surtax Fund ........................ 2,493,000 Schedule: (1) 2840-Support of the Department of Parks and Recreation ........................ 2,493,000 3790-001-0263—For support of Department of Parks and Recreation, payable from the Off-Highway Vehicle Trust Fund ........................ 75,504,000 Schedule: (1) 2840-Support of the Department of Parks and Recreation ........................ 75,604,000 (2) Reimbursements to 2840-Support of the Department of Parks and Recreation ........................ −100,000 3790-001-0286—For support of Department of Parks and Recreation, from the Lake Tahoe Conservancy Account ........................ 118,000 Schedule: (1) 2840-Support of the Department of Parks and Recreation ........................ 118,000 3790-001-0392—For support of Department of Parks and Recreation, payable from the State Parks and Recreation Fund ........................ 295,474,000 Schedule: (1) 2840-Support of the Department of Parks and Recreation ........................ 417,514,000 (2) Reimbursements to 2840-Support of the Department of Parks and Recreation ........................ −122,040,000 Provisions: 1. Notwithstanding any other law, the Director of Finance may authorize a loan from the General Fund, in an amount not to exceed 35 percent of reimbursements appropriated in this item to the Department of Parks and Recreation, provided that: (a) The loan is to meet cash needs resulting from the delay in receipt of reimbursements for services provided. (b) The loan is for a short term and shall be repaid by September 30, 2027. (c) Interest charges may be waived pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 16314 of the Government Code. (d) The Director of Finance shall not approve the loan unless notification of the approval is made in writing and filed with the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee and the chairpersons of the committees in each house of the Legislature that consider appropriations not later than 30 days prior to the effective date of the approval, or not later than whatever lesser time prior to that effective date that the chairperson of the joint committee, or the chairperson’s designee, may determine. 2. The Department of Parks and Recreation is authorized to enter into contracts for fee collection and other services required by the department with cooperative associations that have and will continue to fund state employees on an ongoing basis. 3790-001-0449—For support of Department of Parks and Recreation, payable from the Winter Recreation Fund ........................ 800,000 Schedule: (1) 2840-Support of the Department of Parks and Recreation ........................ 800,000 3790-001-0516—For support of Department of Parks and Recreation, payable from the Harbors and Watercraft Revolving Fund ........................ 19,910,000 Schedule: (1) 2840-Support of the Department of Parks and Recreation ........................ 5,386,000 (2) 2850-Division of Boating and Waterways ........................ 21,224,000 (3) Reimbursements to 2850-Division of Boating and Waterways ........................ −6,700,000 3790-001-0858—For support of Department of Parks and Recreation, payable from the Recreational Trails Fund ........................ 250,000 Schedule: (1) 2840-Support of the Department of Parks and Recreation ........................ 250,000 3790-001-0890—For support of Department of Parks and Recreation, payable from the Federal Trust Fund ........................ 16,645,000 Schedule: (1) 2840-Support of the Department of Parks and Recreation ........................ 8,818,000 (2) 2850-Division of Boating and Waterways ........................ 7,827,000 3790-001-3261—For support of Department of Parks and Recreation, payable from the Vessel Operator Certification Account, Harbors and Watercraft Revolving Fund ........................ 963,000 Schedule: (1) 2850-Division of Boating and Waterways ........................ 963,000 3790-001-6031—For support of Department of Parks and Recreation, payable from the Water Security, Clean Drinking Water, Coastal and Beach Protection Fund of 2002 ........................ 1,680,000 Schedule: (1) 2840-Support of the Department of Parks and Recreation ........................ 1,680,000 Provisions: 1. The amount appropriated in this item shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2030. 3790-001-6051—For support of Department of Parks and Recreation, payable from the Safe Drinking Water, Water Quality and Supply, Flood Control, River and Coastal Protection Fund of 2006 ........................ 1,960,000 Schedule: (1) 2840-Support of the Department of Parks and Recreation ........................ 1,960,000 3790-001-6083—For support of Department of Parks and Recreation, payable from the Water Quality, Supply, and Infrastructure Improvement Fund of 2014 ........................ 157,000 Schedule: (1) 2840-Support of the Department of Parks and Recreation ........................ 157,000 3790-001-6088—For support of Department of Parks and Recreation, payable from the California Drought, Water, Parks, Climate, Coastal Protection, and Outdoor Access For All Fund ........................ 7,196,000 Schedule: (1) 2840-Support of the Department of Parks and Recreation ........................ 7,196,000 3790-001-6093—For support of Department of Parks and Recreation, payable from the Safe Drinking Water, Wildfire Prevention, Drought Preparedness, and Clean Air Fund ........................ 3,950,000 Schedule: (1) 2840-Support of the Department of Parks and Recreation ........................ 3,950,000 3790-002-0001—For support of Department of Parks and Recreation ........................ 14,021,000 Schedule: (1) 2840-Support of the Department of Parks and Recreation ........................ 14,021,000 Provisions: 1. The amount appropriated in this item shall be available for support or capital outlay and shall be available for expenditure or encumbrance until June 30, 2029. 3790-002-0392—For support of Department of Parks and Recreation, payable from the State Parks and Recreation Fund ........................ 6,000,000 Schedule: (1) 2840-Support of the Department of Parks and Recreation ........................ 6,000,000 Provisions: 1. The amount appropriated in this item shall be available for support or capital outlay, and available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2028, for water, wastewater, and sewer system projects. 3790-002-6051—For support of Department of Parks and Recreation, payable from the Safe Drinking Water, Water Quality and Supply, Flood Control, River and Coastal Protection Fund of 2006 ........................ 3,000,000 Schedule: (1) 2840-Support of the Department of Parks and Recreation ........................ 3,000,000 3790-002-6088—For support of Department of Parks and Recreation, payable from the California Drought, Water, Parks, Climate, Coastal Protection, and Outdoor Access for All Fund ........................ 10,677,000 Schedule: (1) 2840-Support of the Department of Parks and Recreation ........................ 10,677,000 Provisions: 1. The amount appropriated in this item shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2031. 3790-003-0001—For support of Department of Parks and Recreation ........................ 19,209,000 Schedule: (1) 2840-Support of the Department of Parks and Recreation ........................ 19,209,000 Provisions: 1. The amount appropriated in this item shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2029. 3790-003-0392—For support of Department of Parks and Recreation, payable from the State Parks and Recreation Fund ........................ 6,750,000 Schedule: (1) 2840-Support of the Department of Parks and Recreation ........................ 6,750,000 3790-004-0001—For support of Department of Parks and Recreation ........................ 1,500,000 Schedule: (1) 2840-Support of the Department of Parks and Recreation ........................ 1,500,000 Provisions: 1. The funds appropriated in this item shall be available for the Malakoff Diggins State Historic Park Mine Remediation. 2. Notwithstanding any other law, the amount appropriated in this item shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2028. 3790-004-0392—For support of the Department of Parks and Recreation, payable from the State Parks and Recreation Fund ........................ 7,500,000 Schedule: (1) 2840-Support of the Department of Parks and Recreation ........................ 7,500,000 Provisions: 1. The amount appropriated in this item shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2031. 3790-004-8076—For support of Department of Parks and Recreation, payable from the State Parks Protection Fund ........................ 3,000,000 Schedule: (1) 2840-Support of the Department of Parks and Recreation ........................ 3,000,000 Provisions: 1. The amount appropriated in this item shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2031. 3790-009-6093—For support of Department of Parks and Recreation, payable from the Safe Drinking Water, Wildfire Prevention, Drought Preparedness, and Clean Air Fund ........................ 1,415,000 Schedule: (1) 2840-Support of the Department of Parks and Recreation ........................ 1,415,000 3790-011-0062—For transfer by the Controller to the State Parks and Recreation Fund, as prescribed by subdivision (a) of Section 2107.7 of the Streets and Highways Code, for expenditure by the Department of Parks and Recreation for maintenance and repair of highways in units of the state park system, payable from the Highway Users Tax Account, Transportation Tax Fund ........................ (12,000,000) 3790-012-0001—For transfer by the Controller, to the State Parks and Recreation Fund ........................ 6,750,000 3790-012-0061—For transfer by the Controller from the Motor Vehicle Fuel Account, Transportation Tax Fund to the State Parks and Recreation Fund ........................ (26,649,000) Provisions: 1. Notwithstanding any other law, the amount appropriated in this item normally transferred to the Harbors and Watercraft Revolving Fund from the Motor Vehicle Fuel Account, Transportation Tax Fund pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 8352.4 of the Revenue and Taxation Code shall be available for transfer to the State Parks and Recreation Fund. 3790-014-0392—For transfer by the Controller from the State Parks and Recreation Fund to the Off-Highway Vehicle Trust Fund ........................ (1,000,000) Provisions: 1. The funds transferred by this item shall be used for grants to cities, counties, federal agencies, or special districts, as specified in Section 5090.50 of the Public Resources Code. 3790-015-0392—For transfer by the Controller from the State Parks and Recreation Fund to the Abandoned Watercraft Abatement Fund ........................ (1,000,000) Provisions: 1. The funds transferred by this item shall be used for grants to local agencies for the abatement, removal, storage, and disposal of abandoned, wrecked, or dismantled vessels. 3790-101-0001—For local assistance, Department of Parks and Recreation ........................ 3,000,000 Schedule: (1) 2855047-Local Grants ........................ 3,000,000 Provisions: 1. The funds appropriated in Schedule (1) shall be available for the following: (a) $3,000,000 shall be available for a grant to the California Museum. 3790-101-0263—For local assistance, Department of Parks and Recreation, payable from the Off-Highway Vehicle Trust Fund ........................ 30,000,000 Schedule: (1) 2855-Local Assistance Grants ........................ 30,000,000 Provisions: 1. The funds appropriated in this item shall be available for grants to cities, counties, federal agencies, or special districts, as specified in Section 5090.50 of the Public Resources Code, to be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2029. 3790-101-0516—For local assistance, Department of Parks and Recreation, payable from the Harbors and Watercraft Revolving Fund ........................ 10,400,000 Schedule: (1) 2855019-Boating Facilities ........................ 2,300,000 (a) Quagga and Zebra Mussel Infestation Prevention Grants ........................ (2,000,000) (b) Statewide Floating Restrooms ........................ (300,000) (2) 2855023-Boating Operations ........................ 8,100,000 (a) Boating Safety and Enforcement ........................ (8,100,000) Provisions: 1. The amounts appropriated in this item are available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2028. 3790-101-0577—For local assistance, Department of Parks and Recreation, payable from the Abandoned Watercraft Abatement Fund ........................ 1,000,000 Schedule: (1) 2855023-Boating Operations ........................ 1,000,000 Provisions: 1. Of the funds appropriated in this item, the Department of Parks and Recreation may allocate an amount not to exceed 3.7 percent of each project’s allocation, except to the extent otherwise restricted by law, to allow the department to administer its grants. Those funds shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2032. 2. The amount appropriated in this item is available for encumbrance or expenditure for local assistance until June 30, 2028, except as otherwise specified. 3790-101-0858—For local assistance, Department of Parks and Recreation, payable from the Recreational Trails Fund ........................ 34,000,000 Schedule: (1) 2855010-Off-Highway Vehicle Grants ........................ 9,000,000 (2) 2855036-Recreational Grants ........................ 25,000,000 Provisions: 1. The funds appropriated in this item are available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2028, for local assistance or capital outlay. 2. Of the funds appropriated in this item, the Department of Parks and Recreation may allocate, to the maximum extent allowable under federal law, the amount necessary to provide for the department’s costs to administer these grants. 3. Grants may be made to nonprofit organizations and governmental entities. 3790-101-0890—For local assistance, Department of Parks and Recreation, payable from the Federal Trust Fund ........................ 53,700,000 Schedule: (1) 2855015-Boating and Waterways Grants and Loans ........................ 12,000,000 (2) 2855036-Recreational Grants ........................ 40,000,000 (3) 2855056-Historic Preservation Grants ........................ 1,700,000 Provisions: 1. The amounts appropriated in this item shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2028. 2. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (1), $2,500,000 shall be for grants to local governments for boating safety and law enforcement, 15 percent of which shall be allocated according to the Department of Parks and Recreation, Division of Boating and Waterways’ discretion, and 85 percent of which shall be allocated by the division in accordance with the following priorities: First—​To local governments that are eligible for state aid because they are spending all their local boating revenue on boating enforcement and safety, but are not receiving sufficient state funds to meet their need as calculated pursuant to Section 663.7 of the Harbors and Navigation Code. Second—​To local governments that are not spending all local boating revenue on boating enforcement and safety, and whose boating revenue does not equal their calculated need. Local assistance shall not exceed the difference between the calculated need and local boating revenue. Third—​To local governments whose boating revenue exceeds their need, but who are not spending sufficient local revenue to meet their calculated need. 3. The funds appropriated in this item shall be available for expenditure for local assistance or capital outlay. The term capital outlay as used in conjunction with this appropriation means the acquisition, design, or construction of improvements on land owned, or leased, by the state. 4. Of the funds appropriated in this item, the department may allocate an amount not to exceed 3.7 percent of each project’s allocation, except to the extent otherwise restricted by law, to allow the department to administer its grants. 3790-101-6088—For local assistance, Department of Parks and Recreation, payable from the California Drought, Water, Parks, Climate, Coastal Protection, and Outdoor Access For All Fund ........................ 12,375,000 Schedule: (1) 2855036-Recreational Grants ........................ 12,017,000 (2) 2855039-Recreational Grants – Per Capita ........................ 271,000 (3) 2855047-Local Grants ........................ 87,000 Provisions: 1. The amount appropriated in this item shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2029. 3790-111-0577—For transfer by the Controller from the Abandoned Watercraft Abatement Fund to the Harbors and Watercraft Revolving Fund ........................ 900,000 3790-301-0263—For capital outlay, Department of Parks and Recreation, payable from the Off-Highway Vehicle Trust Fund ........................ 5,758,000 Schedule: (1) 0000243-Statewide: OHV Opportunity Purchase ........................ 5,000,000 (a) Acquisition ........................ 5,000,000 (1.25) 0001453-Pismo SB: Entrance Kiosk Replacement ........................ 400,000 (a) Construction ........................ 400,000 (1.5) 0003194-Oceano Dunes SVRA: Le Sage Bridge Replacement ........................ 225,000 (a) Working drawings ........................ 225,000 (2) 0014631-Hollister Hills SVRA: Entrance Kiosk ........................ 133,000 (a) Working drawings ........................ 133,000 Provisions: 1. Notwithstanding any other law, the funds appropriated in Schedule 2 of this item shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2028. 3790-301-0392—For capital outlay, Department of Parks and Recreation, payable from the State Parks and Recreation Fund ........................ 0 Schedule: (1) 0007312-Silver Strand State Beach: Low-Cost Accommodations ........................ 750,000 (a) Working drawings ........................ 750,000 (1.5) 0016268-Rio de Los Angeles State Park: Public Use Facilities at Bowtie ........................ 10,800,000 (a) Construction ........................ 10,800,000 (2) 0016310-Angel Island SP: Low-Cost Coastal Accommodations ........................ 450,000 (a) Preliminary plans ........................ 450,000 (3) Reimbursements to 0007312-Silver Strand State Beach: Low-Cost Accommodations ........................ −750,000 (a) Working drawings ........................ −750,000 (3.5) Reimbursements to 0016268-Rio de Los Angeles State Park: Public Use Facilities at Bowtie ........................ −10,800,000 (a) Construction ........................ −10,800,000 (4) Reimbursements to 0016310-Angel Island SP: Low-Cost Coastal Accommodations ........................ −450,000 (a) Preliminary plans ........................ −450,000 Provisions: 1. Notwithstanding any other law, the funds appropriated in Schedules (1), (2), (3), and (4) of this item shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2028. 3790-301-0952—For capital outlay, Department of Parks and Recreation, payable from the State Park Contingent Fund ........................ 600,000 Schedule: (1) 0016311-Emma Wood State Beach: Low-Cost Accommodations ........................ 600,000 (a) Preliminary plans ........................ 600,000 Provisions: 1. Notwithstanding any other law, the funds appropriated in Schedule 1 of this item shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2028. 3790-301-3312—For capital outlay, Department of Parks and Recreation, payable from the Natural Resources and Parks Preservation Fund ........................ 2,100,000 Schedule: (1) 0004006-California Indian Heritage Center ........................ 2,100,000 (a) Construction ........................ 2,100,000 3790-301-6088—For capital outlay, Department of Parks and Recreation, payable from the California Drought, Water, Parks, Climate, Coastal Protection, and Outdoor Access For All Fund ........................ 2,000,000 Schedule: (1) 0000220-Fort Ord Dunes SP: New Campground ........................ 1,000,000 (a) Construction ........................ 1,000,000 (2) 0002696-Pfeiffer Big Sur: Low-Cost Alternative Coastal Lodging ........................ 1,000,000 (a) Construction ........................ 1,000,000 3790-311-0001—For transfer by the Controller, upon order of the Department of Finance, to the Natural Resources and Parks Preservation Fund ........................ 2,100,000 3790-491—Reappropriation, Department of Parks and Recreation. The balances of the appropriations provided in the following citations are reappropriated for the purposes provided for in those appropriations and shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure as specified below: 0001—General Fund (1) Item 3790-003-0001, Budget Act of 2021 (Chs. 21, 69, and 240, Stats. 2021) until June 30, 2031. This item shall be available for state operations or capital outlay to support the 2020 Fire Event: Statewide Repairs. (2) Up to $150,000 of the amount appropriated in Item 3790-001-0001, Budget Act of 2025 (Chs. 4 and 5, Stats. 2025) shall be available until June 30, 2027 to support costs associated with finalization of the California Truth and Healing Council report. 3790-492—Reappropriation, Department of Parks and Recreation. Notwithstanding any other law, the period to liquidate encumbrances of the following citations is extended as specified below: 0001—General Fund (1) Subdivision (b) of Provision 1 of Item 3790-101-0001, Budget Act of 2020 (Chs. 6 and 7, Stats. 2020), as reappropriated by Item 3790-493, Budget Act of 2021 (Chs. 21, 69, and 240, Stats. 2021), and Items 3790-492 and 3790-493, Budget Act of 2022 (Chs. 43, 45, and 249, Stats. 2022), until June 30, 2029. (2) Provision 1(b) of Item 3790-004-0001, Budget Act of 2021 (Chs. 21, 69, and 240, Stats. 2021), until June 30, 2027. (3) Provision 1(a) of Item 3790-101-0001, Budget Act of 2023 (Chs. 12, 38, and 189, Stats. 2023), until June 30, 2027. (4) Paragraphs (1), (2), (3), (4), (5), (6), (8), (9), (12), (13), (14), (16), (18), (19), (20), (21), (22), (23), (24), (25), (26), (27), (28), (29), (30), (31), (32), (33), (34), (35), (36), (37), (38), (39), (40), (41), (42), (43), (44), (45), (46), (47), (51), (52), (53), (54), (55), (56), (57), (58), (59), (60), (61), (62), (63), (64), (65), (66), (67), (68)(a), (68)(b), (71), (73), (74), (75), (76), (77), and (78) of subdivision (b) of Section 19.561, Budget Act of 2023 (Chs. 12, 38, and 189, Stats. 2023), as allocated to technical Item 3790-601-0001, until June 30, 2029. 3790-493—Reappropriation, Department of Parks and Recreation. The balances of the appropriations provided in the following citations are reappropriated for the purposes provided for in those appropriations and shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure as specified below: 0001—General Fund (1) Item 3790-301-0001, Budget Act of 2020 (Chs. 6 and 7, Stats. 2020) as reappropriated by Item 3790-490, Budget Act of 2022 (Chs. 43, 45, and 249, Stats. 2022) and Item 3790-494, Budget Act of 2025 (Chs. 4 and 5, Stats. 2025) until June 30, 2028. (1) 0006914-Equitable Access Program: New State Park (a) Acquisition (2) Reimbursements to 0006914-Equitable Access Program: New State Park (a) Acquisition (2) Item 3790-301-0001, Budget Act of 2022 (Chs. 43, 45, and 249, Stats. 2022) as reappropriated by Item 3790-491, Budget Act of 2023 (Chs. 12, 38, and 189, Stats. 2023) until June 30, 2027. (3) 0001453-Pismo SB: Entrance Kiosk Replacement (a) Construction (3) Item 3790-301-0001, Budget Act of 2022 (Chs. 43, 45, and 249, Stats. 2022), as reappropriated by Item 3790-491, Budget Act of 2023 (Chs. 12, 38, and 189, Stats. 2023), until June 30, 2028. (1) 0003194-Oceano Dunes SVRA: Le Sage Bridge Replacement (a) Construction (4) Item 3790-301-0001, Budget Act of 2022 (Chs. 43, 45, and 249, Stats. 2022), as reappropriated by Item 3790-491, Budget Act of 2023 (Chs. 12, 38, and 189, Stats. 2023), until June 30, 2029. (4) 0006867-Colonel Allensworth SHP: Visitor Center (a) Construction 0263—Off-Highway Vehicle Trust Fund (1) Item 3790-301-0001, Budget Act of 2016 (Ch. 23, Stats. 2016) as reappropriated by Item 3790-491, Budget Act of 2018 (Chs. 29 and 30, Stats. 2018), Item 3790-491, Budget Act of 2019 (Chs. 23 and 55, Stats. 2019), Item 3790-491, Budget Act of 2020 (Chs. 6 and 7, Stats. 2020), Item 3790-491, Budget Act of 2021 (Chs. 21, 69, and 240, Stats. 2021), Item 3790-491, Budget Act of 2022 (Chs. 43, 45, and 249, Stats. 2022), and Item 3790-491, Budget Act of 2023 (Chs. 12, 38, and 189, Stats. 2023) until June 30, 2027. (1) 0000695-Herber Dunes SVRA: Water System Upgrades - Working Drawings (2) Item 3790-301-0001, Budget Act of 2016 (Ch. 23, Stats. 2016) as reappropriated by Item 3790-491, Budget Act of 2018 (Chs. 29 and 30, Stats. 2018), Item 3790-491, Budget Act of 2019 (Chs. 23 and 55, Stats. 2019), Item 3790-491, Budget Act of 2020 (Chs. 6 and 7, Stats. 2020), Item 3790-491, Budget Act of 2021 (Chs. 21, 69, and 240, Stats. 2021), Item 3790-491, Budget Act of 2022 (Chs. 43, 45, and 249, Stats. 2022), and Item 3790-491, Budget Act of 2023 (Chs. 12, 38, and 189, Stats. 2023) until June 30, 2028. (1) 0000695-Herber Dunes SVRA: Water System Upgrades - Construction (3) Item 3790-301-0263, Budget Act of 2018 (Chs. 29 and 30, Stats. 2018), as reappropriated by Item 3790-491, Budget Act of 2020 (Chs. 6 and 7, Stats. 2020), Item 3790-491, Budget Act of 2021 (Chs. 21, 69, and 240, Stats. 2021), Item 3790-491, Budget Act of 2022 (Chs. 43, 45, and 249, Stats. 2022), Item 3790-491, Budget Act of 2023 (Chs. 12, 38, and 189, Stats. 2023), Item 3790-491, Budget Act of 2024 (Chs. 22, 35, and 994, Stats. 2024), and Item 3790-494, Budget Act of 2025 (Chs. 4 and 5, Stats. 2025) until June 30, 2027. (2) 00001452-Oceano Dunes SVRA: Grand Avenue Lifeguard Tower (a) Working drawings (3) 00001453-Pismo SB: Entrance Kiosk Replacement (a) Working drawings (6) 00003192-Ocotillo Wells SVRA: Auto Shop Addition (a) Working drawings (4) Item 3790-301-0263, Budget Act of 2019 (Chs. 23 and 55, Stats. 2019), as reappropriated by Item 3790-491, Budget Act of 2020 (Chs. 6 and 7, Stats. 2020), Item 3790-491, Budget Act of 2021 (Chs. 21, 69, and 240, Stats. 2021), Item 3790-491, Budget Act of 2022 (Chs. 43, 45, and 249, Stats. 2022), Item 3790-491, Budget Act of 2023 (Chs. 12, 38, and 189, Stats. 2023), Item 3790-491, Budget Act of 2024 (Chs. 22, 35, and 994, Stats. 2024), and Item 3790-494, Budget Act of 2025 (Chs. 4 and 5, Stats. 2025) until June 30, 2027. (8) 0000754-Hollister Hills SVRA: Waterline Expansion (b) Construction (5) Item 3790-301-0263, Budget Act of 2019 (Chs. 23 and 55, Stats. 2019), as reappropriated by Item 3790-491, Budget Act of 2020 (Chs. 6 and 7, Stats. 2020), Item 3790-491, Budget Act of 2021 (Chs. 21, 69, and 240, Stats. 2021), and Item 3790-491, Budget Act of 2022 (Chs. 43, 45, and 249, Stats. 2022), and Item 3790-491, Budget Act of 2023 (Chs. 12, 38, and 189, Stats. 2023) until June 30, 2027. (2) 0001454-Ocotillo Wells SVRA: Holmes Camp Water System Upgrade (a) Construction (5) 0003194-Oceano Dunes SVRA: Le Sage Bridge Replacement (a) Working drawings (6) 0000213-Carnegie SVRA: Road Reconstruction (a) Construction (6) Item 3790-301-0263, Budget Act of 2019 (Chs. 23 and 55, Stats. 2019), as reappropriated by Item 3790-491, Budget Act of 2020 (Chs. 6 and 7, Stats. 2020), Item 3790-491, Budget Act of 2021 (Chs. 21, 69, and 240, Stats. 2021), Item 3790-491, Budget Act of 2022 (Chs. 43, 45, and 249, Stats. 2022), and Item 3790-491, Budget Act of 2023 (Chs. 12, 38, and 189, Stats. 2023) until June 30, 2028. (7) 0000241-Southern California Opportunity Purchase (a) Acquisition (7) Item 3790-301-0263, Budget Act of 2020 (Chs. 6 and 7, Stats. 2020), as reappropriated by Item 3790-491, Budget Act of 2022 (Chs. 43, 45, and 249, Stats. 2022), and Item 3790-491, Budget Act of 2023 (Chs. 12, 38, and 189, Stats. 2023) until June 30, 2027. (1) 0000234-Oceano Dunes SVRA: Pismo SB Sediment Track-out Prevention (a) Construction (8) Item 3790-301-0263, Budget Act of 2021 (Chs. 21, 69, and 240, Stats. 2021), as reappropriated by Item 3790-491, Budget Act of 2022 (Chs. 43, 45, and 249, Stats. 2022) and Item 3790-491, Budget Act of 2023 (Chs. 12, 38, and 189, Stats. 2023) until June 30, 2027. (2) 0001452-Oceano Dunes SVRA: Grand Avenue Lifeguard Tower (a) Construction (b) Equipment (4) 0003194-Oceano Dunes SVRA: Le Sage Bridge Replacement (a) Working drawings (9) Item 3790-301-0263, Budget Act of 2021 (Chs. 21, 69, and 240, Stats. 2021), as reappropriated by Item 3790-491, Budget Act of 2022 (Chs. 43, 45, and 249, Stats. 2022) and Item 3790-491, Budget Act of 2023 (Chs. 12, 38, and 189, Stats. 2023) until June 30, 2028. (3) 0003192-Ocotillo Wells SVRA: Auto Shop Addition (a) Construction (10) Item 3790-301-0263, Budget Act of 2022 (Chs. 43, 45, and 249, Stats. 2022), as reappropriated by Item 3790-491, Budget Act of 2023 (Chs. 12, 38, and 189, Stats. 2023) until June 30, 2027. (2) 0000213-Carnegie SVRA: Road Reconstruction (a) Construction (6) 0001454-Ocotillo Wells SVRA: Holmes Camp Water System Upgrades (a) Construction (11) Item 3790-301-0263, Budget Act of 2022 (Chs. 43, 45, and 249, Stats. 2022), as reappropriated by Item 3790-491, Budget Act of 2023 (Chs. 12, 38, and 189, Stats. 2023) until June 30, 2028. (3) 0000695-Herber Dunes SVRA: Water System Upgrades (a) Construction (7) 0003192-Ocotillo Wells SVRA: Auto Shop Addition (a) Construction 0392—State Parks and Recreation Fund (1) Item 3790-301-0392, Budget Act of 2019 (Chs. 23 and 55, Stats. 2019), as reappropriated by Item 3790-491, Budget Act of 2020 (Chs. 6 and 7, Stats. 2020), Item 3790-491, Budget Act of 2021 (Chs. 21, 69, and 240, Stats. 2021), Item 3790-491, Budget Act of 2022 (Chs. 43, 45, and 249, Stats. 2022), and Item 3790-491, Budget Act of 2023 (Chs. 12, 38, and 189, Stats. 2023) until June 30, 2027. (2) 0001450-Calaveras Big Trees SP: Mitigation Campsite Relocation (a) Construction (4) Reimbursements to 0001450-Calaveras Big Trees SP: Mitigation Campsite Relocation (a) Construction (2) Item 3790-301-0392, Budget Act of 2020 (Chs. 6 and 7, Stats. 2020), as reappropriated by Item 3790-491, Budget Act of 2023 (Chs. 12, 38, and 189, Stats. 2023) until June 30, 2028. (1) 0000633-Statewide: SP System Acquisition Program (a) Acquisition (1) Reimbursements to 0000633-Statewide: SP System Acquisition Program (a) Acquisition (3) Item 3790-301-0392, Budget Act of 2021 (Chs. 6 and 7, Stats. 2020) as reappropriated by Item 3790-491, Budget Act of 2023 (Chs. 12, 38, and 189, Stats. 2023) until June 30, 2027. (3) 0000912-El Capitan SB: Entrance Improvements (a) Construction (4) Reimbursements to 0000912-El Capitan SB: Entrance Improvements (a) Construction (4) Item 3790-301-0392, Budget Act of 2022 (Chs. 43, 45, and 249, Stats. 2022), as reappropriated by Item 3790-494, Budget Act of 2024 (Chs. 22, 35, and 994, Stats. 2024) and Item 3790-494, Budget Act of 2025 (Chs. 4 and 5, Stats. 2025) until June 30, 2027. (1) 0010238-Kings Beach SRA: Recreational Pier Replacement and Support Buildings (a) Preliminary plans (2) Reimbursements to 0010238-Kings Beach SRA: Recreational Pier Replacement and Support Buildings (a) Preliminary plans (5) Item 3790-301 -0392, Budget Act of 2022 (Chs. 43, 45, and 249, Stats. 2022), as reappropriated by Item 3790-494, Budget Act of 2024 (Chs. 22, 35, and 994, Stats. 2024) until June 30, 2027. (3) 0010255-Mount Diablo SP: Visitor Center (a) Preliminary plans (b) Working drawings (4) Reimbursements to 0010255-Mount Diablo SP: Visitor Center (a) Preliminary plans (b) Working drawings (6) Item 3790-301-0392, Budget Act of 2023 (Chs. 12, 38, and 189, Stats. 2023) until June 30, 2027. (5) 0000912-El Capitan SB: Entrance Improvements (a) Construction (6) Reimbursements to 0000912-El Capitan SB: Entrance Improvements (a) Construction (7) Item 3790-301-0392, Budget Act of 2023 (Chs. 12, 38, and 189, Stats. 2023) as reappropriated by Item 3790-494, Budget Act of 2025 (Chs. 4 and 5, Stats. 2025) until June 30, 2027. (1) 0010238-Kings Beach SRA: Recreational Pier Replacement and Support Buildings (a) Working drawings (2) Reimbursements to 0010238-Kings Beach SRA: Recreational Pier Replacement and Support Buildings (a) Working drawings (8) Item 3790-301-0392, Budget Act of 2023 (Chs. 12, 38, and 189, Stats. 2023) until June 30, 2028. (3) 0010255-Mount Diablo SP: Visitor Center (a) Construction (4) Reimbursements to 0010255-Mount Diablo SP: Visitor Center (a) Construction (9) Item 3790-301-0392, Budget Act of 2025 (Chs. 4 and 5, Stats. 2025) until June 30, 2027. (1.5) 0007312-Silver Strand State Beach: Low Cost Accommodations (a) Preliminary plans (3) Reimbursements to 0007312-Silver Strand State Beach: Low Cost Accommodations (a) Preliminary plans 0952—State Park Contingent Fund (1) Item 3790-301-0952, Budget Act of 2017 (Chs. 14, 22, and 54, Stats. 2017), as reappropriated by Item 3790-491, Budget Act of 2020 (Chs. 6 and 7, Stats. 2020), Item 3790-491, Budget Act of 2021 (Chs. 21, 69, and 240, Stats. 2021), Item 3790-491, Budget Act of 2022 (Chs. 43, 45, and 249, Stats. 2022), and Item 3790-493, Budget Act of 2025 (Chs. 4 and 5, Stats. 2025). (1) 0001449-Candlestick SRA: Yosemite Slough (North)-Public Use Improvements (a) Construction (2) Item 3790-301-0952, Budget Act of 2020 (Chs. 6 and 7, Stats. 2020), as reappropriated by Item 3790-491, Budget Act of 2021 (Chs. 21, 69, and 240, Stats. 2021), Item 3790-491, Budget Act of 2022 (Chs. 43, 45, and 249, Stats. 2022), and Item 3790-491, Budget Act of 2023 (Chs. 12, 38, and 189, Stats. 2023) until June 30, 2027. (1) 0002696-Pfeiffer Big Sur SP: Low Cost Alternative Coastal Lodging (a) Working drawings (3) Item 3790-301-0952, Budget Act of 2022 (Chs. 43, 45, and 249, Stats. 2022) as reappropriated by Item 3790-491, Budget Act of 2024 (Chs. 22, 35, and 994, Stats. 2024) until June 30, 2027. (1) 0002696-Pfeiffer Big Sur SP: Low Cost Alternative Coastal Lodging (a) Working drawings (2) 0006839-Humboldt Redwoods SP: Replace Founders Grove Restroom (a) Working drawings (4) Item 3790-301-0952, Budget Act of 2022 (Chs. 43, 45, and 249, Stats. 2022) as reappropriated by Item 3790-491, Budget Act of 2023 (Chs. 12, 38, and 189, Stats. 2023) until June 30, 2028. (1) 0002696-Pfeiffer Big Sur SP: Low Cost Alternative Coastal Lodging (b) Construction (5) Item 3790-301-0952, Budget Act of 2023 (Chs. 12, 38, and 189, Stats. 2023) until June 30, 2028. (1) 00006839-Humboldt Redwoods SP: Founders Grove Parking Lot and Restroom Replacement (a) Construction 3312—Natural Resources and Parks Preservation Fund (1) Item 3790-801-3312, Budget Act of 2018 (Chs. 29 and 30, Stats. 2018), as reappropriated by Item 3790-491, Budget Act of 2023 (Chs. 12, 38, and 189, Stats. 2023) until June 30, 2027. (1) 0004006-California Indian Heritage Center (a) Preliminary plans (2) Item 3790-301-3312, Budget Act of 2023 (Chs. 12, 38, and 189, Stats. 2023) until June 30, 2027. (1) 0000912-El Capitan SB: Entrance Improvements (a) Construction (3) Item 3790-301-3312, Budget Act of 2023 (Chs. 12, 38, and 189, Stats. 2023), as reappropriated Item 3790-494, Budget Act of 2025 (Chs. 4 and 5, Stats. 2025) until June 30, 2027. (2) 0011998 - Border Field State Park: Monument Mesa Day Use and Interpretive Area (a) Preliminary plans (4) Item 3790-301-3312, Budget Act of 2025 (Chs. 4 and 5, Stats. 2025) until June 30, 2028. (2) 0004006-California Indian Heritage Center (a) Working drawings (3) 0011998-Border Field State Park: Monument Mesa Day Use and Interpretive Area (a) Working drawings 6051—Safe Drinking Water, Water Quality and Supply, Flood Control, River and Coastal Protection Fund of 2006 (1) Item 3790-301-6051, Budget Act of 2018 (Chs. 29 and 30, Stats. 2018), as reappropriated by Item 3790-491, Budget Act of 2019 (Chs. 23 and 55, Stats. 2019), Item 3790-491, Budget Act of 2020 (Chs. 6 and 7, Stats. 2020), Item 3790-491, Budget Act of 2021 (Chs. 21, 69, and 240, Stats. 2021), Item 3790-491, Budget Act of 2022 (Chs. 43, 45, and 249, Stats. 2022), Item 3790-491, Budget Act of 2023 (Chs. 12, 38, and 189, Stats. 2023), and Section 20.00, Budget Act of 2024 (Chs. 22, 35, and 994, Stats. 2024) until June 30, 2027. (1) 0000932-Topanga SP: Rehabilitate Trippet Ranch Parking Lot (a) Construction (4) 0000696-Malibu Creek SP: New Stokes Creek Bridge (a) Working drawings (2) Item 3790-301-6051, Budget Act of 2019 (Chs. 23 and 55, Stats. 2019), as reappropriated by Item 3790-491, Budget Act of 2020 (Chs. 6 and 7, Stats. 2020), Item 3790-491, Budget Act of 2021 (Chs. 21, 69, and 240, Stats. 2021), Item 3790-491, Budget Act of 2022 (Chs. 43, 45, and 249, Stats. 2022), and Item 3790-491, Budget Act of 2023 (Chs. 12, 38, and 189, Stats. 2023) until June 30, 2027. (7) 0000696-Malibu Creek SP: New Stokes Creek Bridge (a) Working drawings (3) Item 3790-301-6051, Budget Act of 2019 (Chs. 23 and 55, Stats. 2019), as reappropriated by Item 3790-491, Budget Act of 2020 (Chs. 6 and 7, Stats. 2020), Item 3790-491, Budget Act of 2021 (Chs. 21, 69, and 240, Stats. 2021), Item 3790-491, Budget Act of 2022 (Chs. 43, 45, and 249, Stats. 2022), Item 3790-491, Budget Act of 2023 (Chs. 12, 38, and 189, Stats. 2023), and Section 20.00, Budget Act of 2024 (Chs. 22, 35, and 994, Stats. 2024) until June 30, 2028. (4) 0000220-Fort Ord Dunes SP: New Campground (a) Construction (4) Item 3790-301-6051, Budget Act of 2019 (Chs. 23 and 55, Stats. 2019), as reappropriated by Item 3790-491, Budget Act of 2020 (Chs. 6 and 7, Stats. 2020), Item 3790-491, Budget Act of 2021 (Chs. 21, 69, and 240, Stats. 2021), Item 3790-491, Budget Act of 2022 (Chs. 43, 45, and 249, Stats. 2022), Item 3790-491, Budget Act of 2023 (Chs. 12, 38, and 189, Stats. 2023), Section 20.00, Budget Act of 2024 (Chs. 22, 35, and 994, Stats. 2024), and Item 3790-494, Budget Act of 2025 (Chs. 4 and 5, Stats. 2025) until June 30, 2027. (1) 0000699-Old Sacramento SHP: Boiler Shop Renovation (a) Working drawings (8) 0000697-Torrey Pines SNR: Sewer and Utility Modernization (b) Working drawings (5) Item 3790-301-6051, Budget Act of 2020 (Chs. 6 and 7, Stats. 2020), as reappropriated by Item 3790-491, Budget Act of 2022 (Chs. 43, 45, and 249, Stats. 2022) and Item 3790-491, Budget Act of 2023 (Chs. 12, 38, and 189, Stats. 2023) until June 30, 2029. (5) 0000697-Torrey Pines SNR: Sewer and Utility Modernization (c) Construction (6) Item 3790-301-6051, Budget Act of 2021 (Chs. 21, 69, and 240, Stats. 2021), as reappropriated by Item 3790-491, Budget Act of 2022 (Chs. 43, 45, and 249, Stats. 2022) and Item 3790-491, Budget Act of 2023 (Chs. 12, 38, and 189, Stats. 2023) until June 30, 2027. (2) 0000912-El Capitan SB: Entrance Improvements (c) Construction (7) Item 3790-301-6051, Budget Act of 2021 (Chs. 21, 69, and 240, Stats. 2021), as reappropriated by Item 3790-491, Budget Act of 2022 (Chs. 43, 45, and 249, Stats. 2022) and Item 3790-491, Budget Act of 2023 (Chs. 12, 38, and 189, Stats. 2023) until June 30, 2028. (1) 0000699-Old Sacramento SHP: Boiler Shop Renovation (a) Construction (8) Item 3790-301-6051, Budget Act of 2022 (Chs. 43, 45, and 249, Stats. 2022), as reappropriated by Item 3790-491, Budget Act of 2023 (Chs. 12, 38, and 189, Stats. 2023) until June 30, 2027. (1) 0000227-MacKerricher SP: Replace Water Treatment System (a) Construction (2) 0000696-Malibu Creek SP: New Stokes Creek Bridge (a) Working drawings (5) 0000912-El Capitan SB: Entrance Improvements (a) Construction (9) Item 3790-301-6051, Budget Act of 2022 (Chs. 43, 45, and 249, Stats. 2022), as reappropriated by Item Section 20.00, Budget Act of 2024 (Chs. 22, 35, and 994, Stats. 2024) until June 30, 2027. (4) 0006839-Humboldt Redwoods SP: Replace Founders Grove Restroom (a) Working drawings (10) Item 3790-301-6051, Budget Act of 2023 (Chs. 12, 38, and 189, Stats. 2023), as reappropriated by Section 20.00, Budget Act of 2024 (Chs. 22, 35, and 994, Stats. 2024) until June 30, 2028. (1) 0006839-Humboldt Redwoods SP: Replace Founders Grove Restroom (a) Construction 6088—California Drought, Water, Parks, Climate, Coastal Protection, and Outdoor Access For All Fund (1) Item 3790-301-6088, Budget Act of 2020 (Chs. 6 and 7, Stats. 2020), as reappropriated by Item 3790-491, Budget Act of 2022 (Chs. 43, 45, and 249, Stats. 2022) and Item 3790-491, Budget Act of 2023 (Chs. 12, 38, and 189, Stats. 2023) until June 30, 2027. (3) 0006867-Colonel Allensworth SHP: Visitor Center (a) Preliminary plans (2) Item 3790-301-6088, Budget Act of 2020 (Chs. 6 and 7, Stats. 2020), as reappropriated by Section 20.00, Budget Act of 2022 (Chs. 43, 45, and 249, Stats. 2022), Item 3790-490, Budget Act of 2023 (Chs. 12, 38, and 189, Stats. 2023), Section 20.00, Budget Act of 2024 (Chs. 22, 35, and 994, Stats. 2024), and Item 3790-494, Budget Act of 2025 (Chs. 4 and 5, Stats. 2025) until June 30, 2027. (1) 0006837-Old Sacramento SHP: Riverfront Improvements (a) Preliminary plans (3) Item 3790-301-6088, Budget Act of 2021 (Chs. 21, 69, and 240, Stats. 2021), as reappropriated by Section 20.00, Budget Act of 2024 (Chs. 22, 35, and 994, Stats. 2024) until June 30, 2028. (0.2) 0000699-Old Sacramento SHP: Boiler Shop Renovation (a) Construction (4) Item 3790-301-6088, Budget Act of 2022 (Chs. 43, 45, and 249, Stats. 2022), as reappropriated by Item 3790-491, Budget Act of 2023 (Chs. 12, 38, and 189, Stats. 2023) until June 30, 2027. (3) 0003197-Picacho SRA: Park Power System Upgrade (a) Working drawings (8) 0000227-MacKerricher SP: Replace Water Treatment System (a) Construction (9) 0000697-Torrey Pines SNR: Sewer and Utility Modernization (a) Working drawings (5) Item 3790-301-6088, Budget Act of 2022 (Chs. 43, 45, and 249, Stats. 2022), as reappropriated by Section 20.00, Budget Act of 2024 (Chs. 22, 35, and 994, Stats. 2024) until June 30, 2027. (4) 0006838-Lake Perris SRA: Replace Lifeguard Headquarters (a) Working drawings (6) Item 3790-301-6088, Budget Act of 2022 (Chs. 43, 45, and 249, Stats. 2022), as reappropriated by Section 20.00, Budget Act of 2024 (Chs. 22, 35, and 994, Stats. 2024) and Item 3790-494, Budget Act of 2025 (Chs. 4 and 5, Stats. 2025) until June 30, 2027. (6) 0007312-Silver Strand SB: Low Cost Accommodations (a) Preliminary plans (7) Item 3790-301-6088, Budget Act of 2022 (Chs. 43, 45, and 249, Stats. 2022), as reappropriated by Item 3790-491, Budget Act of 2023 (Chs. 12, 38, and 189, Stats. 2023) until June 30, 2028. (2) 0002696-Pfeiffer Big Sur SP: Low-Cost Alternative Coastal Lodging (a) Construction (8) Item 3790-301-6088, Budget Act of 2022 (Chs. 43, 45, and 249, Stats. 2022), as reappropriated by Item 3790-491, Budget Act of 2023 (Chs. 12, 38, and 189, Stats. 2023) until June 30, 2029. (9) 0000697-Torrey Pines SNR: Sewer and Utility Modernization (b) Construction (9) Item 3790-301-6088, Budget Act of 2022 (Chs. 43, 45, and 249, Stats. 2022) until June 30, 2028. (1) 0000696-Malibu Creek SP: New Stokes Creek Bridge (a) Construction (2) 0003197-Picacho SRA: Park Power System Upgrade (a) Construction (4) 0006838-Lake Perris SRA: Replace Lifeguard Headquarters (a) Construction (5) 0007312-Silver Strand SB: Low Cost Accommodations (a) Working drawings (10) Item 3790-301-6088, Budget Act of 2022 (Chs. 43, 45, and 249, Stats. 2022) as reappropriated by Item 3790-494, Budget Act of 2025 (Chs. 4 and 5, Stats. 2025) until June 30, 2028. (3) 0006837-Old Sacramento SHP: Riverfront Improvements (a) Working drawings (11) Item 3790-301-6088, Budget Act of 2025 (Chs. 4 and 5, Stats. 2025) until June 30, 2028. (3) 0006866-Candlestick Point SRA: Build-Out of Park (a) Working drawings 3790-495—Reversion, Department of Parks and Recreation. As of June 30, 2026, ,the unencumbered balances of the appropriations provided in the following citations shall revert to the fund balances of the funds from which the appropriations were made. 0392—State Parks and Recreation Fund (1) Item 3790-301-0392, Budget Act of 2025 (Chs. 4 and 5, Stats. 2025) (1) 0004006 - California Indian Heritage Center (a) Working Drawings (2) Reimbursements to 0004006 - California Indian Heritage Center (a) Working Drawings 3790-496—Reversion, Department of Parks and Recreation. As of June 30, 2026, the unencumbered balances of the appropriations provided in the following citations shall revert to the fund balances of the funds from which the appropriations were made. 0005—Safe Neighborhood Parks, Clean Water, Clean Air, and Coastal Protection Bond Fund (1) 3790-002-0005, Budget Act of 2021 (Chs. 21, 69, and 240, Stats. 2021). 3810-001-0140—For support of Santa Monica Mountains Conservancy, payable from the California Environmental License Plate Fund ........................ 424,000 Schedule: (1) 2940-Santa Monica Mountains Conservancy ........................ 556,000 (2) Reimbursements to 2940-Santa Monica Mountains Conservancy ........................ −132,000 Provisions: 1. (a) The Santa Monica Mountains Conservancy shall not encumber state-appropriated funds for the purchase or acquisition of real property directly or through any public agency intermediary, including the State Public Works Board, that requires the payment of interest costs, or late fees or penalties, unless the conservancy certifies all of the following: (i) that the purchase is necessary to implement an acquisition identified in the high-priority category of the work program submitted annually to the Legislature pursuant to Section 33208 of the Public Resources Code, or amendments made thereto, (ii) that the purchase agreement does not involve interest payments or terms in excess of those that the State Public Works Board may enter into pursuant to Section 15854.1 of the Government Code, and (iii) that the purchase agreement does not commit the state to future appropriations. (b) The Santa Monica Mountains Conservancy shall report periodically to the Legislature, but no less frequently than twice yearly, concerning the status of any purchases certified as required in subdivision (a) and the amount of state funds thus far encumbered for interest, penalties, or other principal surcharges. 3810-001-6083—For support of Santa Monica Mountains Conservancy, payable from the Water Quality, Supply, and Infrastructure Improvement Fund of 2014 ........................ 224,000 Schedule: (1) 2940-Santa Monica Mountains Conservancy ........................ 224,000 3810-001-6088—For support of Santa Monica Mountains Conservancy, payable from the California Drought, Water, Parks, Climate, Coastal Protection, and Outdoor Access For All Fund ........................ 707,000 Schedule: (1) 2940-Santa Monica Mountains Conservancy ........................ 707,000 3810-001-6093—For support of Santa Monica Mountains Conservancy, payable from the Safe Drinking Water, Wildfire Prevention, Drought Preparedness, and Clean Air Fund ........................ 400,000 Schedule: (1) 2940-Santa Monica Mountains Conservancy ........................ 400,000 3810-002-6093—For support of Santa Monica Mountains Conservancy, payable from the Safe Drinking Water, Wildfire Prevention, Drought Preparedness, and Clean Air Fund ........................ 400,000 Schedule: (1) 2940-Santa Monica Mountains Conservancy ........................ 400,000 3810-003-6093—For support of Santa Monica Mountains Conservancy, payable from the Safe Drinking Water, Wildfire Prevention, Drought Preparedness, and Clean Air Fund ........................ 400,000 Schedule: (1) 2940-Santa Monica Mountains Conservancy ........................ 400,000 3810-101-0140—For local assistance, Santa Monica Mountains Conservancy, payable from the California Environmental License Plate Fund ........................ 120,000 Schedule: (1) 2945-Local Assistance Grants ........................ 120,000 Provisions: 1. The funds appropriated in this item shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2028. 3810-101-0941—For local assistance, Santa Monica Mountains Conservancy, payable from the Santa Monica Mountains Conservancy Fund ........................ 200,000 Schedule: (1) 2945-Local Assistance Grants ........................ 200,000 Provisions: 1. The funds appropriated in this item are available for encumbrance or expenditure for local assistance or capital outlay until June 30, 2027. 3810-490—Reappropriation, Santa Monica Mountains Conservancy. The balances of the appropriations provided in the following citations are reappropriated for the purposes provided for in those appropriations and shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2028: 6093—Safe Drinking Water, Wildfire Prevention, Drought Preparedness, and Clean Air Fund (1) Item 3810-004-6093, Budget Act of 2025 (Chs. 4 and 5, Stats. 2025). (2) Item 3810-005-6093, Budget Act of 2025 (Chs. 4 and 5, Stats. 2025). 3810-491—Reappropriation, Santa Monica Mountains Conservancy. Notwithstanding any other law, the period to liquidate encumbrances of the following citations is extended to June 30, 2027: 0001—General Fund (1) Item 3810-101-0001, Budget Act of 2021 (Chs. 21, 69, and 240, Stats. 2021). (2) Item 3810-103-0001, Budget Act of 2021 (Chs. 21, 69, and 240, Stats. 2021). (3) Subparagraph (A) of paragraph (4) of subdivision (b) of Section 19.56, Budget Act of 2022 (Chs. 43, 45, and 249, Stats. 2022), as allocated to technical Item 3810-601-0001. (4) Paragraph (21) of subdivision (b) of Section 19.56, Budget Act of 2022 (Chs. 43, 45, and 249, Stats. 2022), as allocated to technical Item 3810-601-0001. 3815-001-6093—For support of the Salton Sea Conservancy, payable from the Safe Drinking Water, Wildfire Prevention, Drought Preparedness, and Clean Air Fund ........................ 3,224,000 Schedule: (1) 2970-Salton Sea Conservancy ........................ 3,224,000 3820-001-0001—For support of San Francisco Bay Conservation and Development Commission ........................ 11,474,000 Schedule: (1) 2980-Bay Conservation and Development ........................ 14,547,000 (2) Reimbursements to 2980-Bay Conservation and Development ........................ −3,073,000 Provisions: 1. The Director of Finance may authorize one or more short-term cash loans, not to exceed a cumulative total amount of $1,500,000, from the General Fund to provide the cashflow needed to facilitate execution of reimbursable contracts. The cash loan shall be subject to the terms and conditions for repayment as may be prescribed by the Department of Finance. Interest charges may be waived pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 16314 of the Government Code. For purposes of the budgetary and legal basis of accounting and budgeting, the principal amount of any loans made pursuant to this provision shall not be considered part of the balance of the fund that receives the loan, nor shall it be deducted from the balance of the fund from which the loan is made. These loans are considered cashflow loans for temporary cash shortages and shall not constitute budgetary loans, revenues, or expenditures. The Department of Finance shall make the final determination of the budgetary and accounting transactions and treatments to ensure proper implementation of this provision pursuant to Section 13344 of the Government Code. 3820-001-0890—For support of San Francisco Bay Conservation and Development Commission, payable from the Federal Trust Fund ........................ 233,000 Schedule: (1) 2980-Bay Conservation and Development ........................ 233,000 3820-001-0914—For support of San Francisco Bay Conservation and Development Commission, payable from the Bay Fill Clean-Up and Abatement Fund ........................ 458,000 Schedule: (1) 2980-Bay Conservation and Development ........................ 458,000 3820-490—Reappropriation, San Francisco Bay Conservation and Development Commission. The balances of the appropriations provided in the following citations are reappropriated for the purposes provided for in those appropriations and shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2027. 0001—General Fund (1) Item 3820-001-0001, Budget Act of 2025 (Chs. 4 and 5, Stats 2025). 3825-001-0140—For support of San Gabriel and Lower Los Angeles Rivers and Mountains Conservancy, payable from the California Environmental License Plate Fund ........................ 642,000 Schedule: (1) 2990-San Gabriel and Lower Los Angeles Rivers and Mountains Conservancy ........................ 1,142,000 (2) Reimbursements to 2990-San Gabriel and Lower Los Angeles Rivers and Mountains Conservancy ........................ −500,000 3825-001-6031—For support of San Gabriel and Lower Los Angeles Rivers and Mountains Conservancy, payable from the Water Security, Clean Drinking Water, Coastal and Beach Protection Fund of 2002 ........................ 5,000 Schedule: (1) 2990-San Gabriel and Lower Los Angeles Rivers and Mountains Conservancy ........................ 5,000 3825-001-6088—For support of San Gabriel and Lower Los Angeles Rivers and Mountains Conservancy, payable from the California Drought, Water, Parks, Climate, Coastal Protection, and Outdoor Access For All Fund ........................ 49,000 Schedule: (1) 2990-San Gabriel and Lower Los Angeles Rivers and Mountains Conservancy ........................ 49,000 3825-001-6093—For support of San Gabriel and Lower Los Angeles Rivers and Mountains Conservancy, payable from the Safe Drinking Water, Wildfire Prevention, Drought Preparedness, and Clean Air Fund ........................ 500,000 Schedule: (1) 2990-San Gabriel and Lower Los Angeles Rivers and Mountains Conservancy ........................ 500,000 3825-002-6088—For support of San Gabriel and Lower Los Angeles Rivers and Mountains Conservancy, payable from the California Drought, Water, Parks, Climate, Coastal Protection, and Outdoor Access For All Fund ........................ 24,000 Schedule: (1) 2990-San Gabriel and Lower Los Angeles Rivers and Mountains Conservancy ........................ 24,000 3825-002-6093—For support of San Gabriel and Lower Los Angeles Rivers and Mountains Conservancy, payable from the Safe Drinking Water, Wildfire Prevention, Drought Preparedness, and Clean Air Fund ........................ 400,000 Schedule: (1) 2990-San Gabriel and Lower Los Angeles Rivers and Mountains Conservancy ........................ 400,000 3825-003-6093—For support of San Gabriel and Lower Los Angeles Rivers and Mountains Conservancy, payable from the Safe Drinking Water, Wildfire Prevention, Drought Preparedness, and Clean Air Fund ........................ 450,000 Schedule: (1) 2990-San Gabriel and Lower Los Angeles Rivers and Mountains Conservancy ........................ 450,000 3825-101-0140—For local assistance, San Gabriel and Lower Los Angeles Rivers and Mountains Conservancy, payable from the California Environmental License Plate Fund ........................ 0 Schedule: (1) 2990-San Gabriel and Lower Los Angeles Rivers and Mountains Conservancy ........................ 15,200,000 (2) Reimbursements to 2990-San Gabriel and Lower Los Angeles Rivers and Mountains Conservancy ........................ −15,200,000 3825-101-0890—For local assistance, San Gabriel and Lower Los Angeles Rivers and Mountains Conservancy, payable from the Federal Trust Fund ........................ 1,000,000 Schedule: (1) 2990-San Gabriel and Lower Los Angeles Rivers and Mountains Conservancy ........................ 1,000,000 3825-101-6088—For local assistance, San Gabriel and Lower Los Angeles Rivers and Mountains Conservancy, payable from the California Drought, Water, Parks, Climate, Coastal Protection, and Outdoor Access For All Fund ........................ 269,000 Schedule: (1) 2990-San Gabriel and Lower Los Angeles Rivers and Mountains Conservancy ........................ 269,000 Provisions: 1. The funds appropriated in this item are available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2029, for local assistance or capital outlay. 3825-490—Reappropriation, San Gabriel and Lower Los Angeles Rivers and Mountains Conservancy. The balances of the appropriations provided in the following citations are reappropriated for the purposes provided for in those appropriations and shall be available for encumbrance, expenditure, or liquidation as specified: 0001—​General Fund (1) $10,000,000 in subschedule (D) of Schedule (13) of Section 19.57 of the Budget Act of 2021 (Chs. 21, 69, and 240, Stats. 2021), as allocated to technical Item 3825-692-0001, which shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2027, and for liquidation until June 30, 2029. (2) The remaining balance of paragraph (5) of subdivision (b) of Section 19.56, Budget Act of 2022 (Chs. 43, 45, and 249, Stats. 2022), as allocated to technical Item 3825-602-0001, which shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2028, and for liquidation until June 30, 2030. (3) Up to $1,259,000 of the amount appropriated in Item 3825-001-0001, Budget Act of 2022 (Chs. 43, 45, and 249, Stats. 2022), as reappropriated by Item 3825-490, Budget Act of 2024 (Chs. 22, 35, and 994, Stats. 2024), which shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2028, and for liquidation until June 30, 2030. (4) Subparagraph (B) of paragraph (5) of subdivision (b) of Section 19.56, Budget Act of 2022 (Chs. 43, 45, and 249, Stats. 2022), as allocated to technical Item 3825-601-0001, which shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2028, and for liquidation until June 30, 2030. (5) Subparagraph (D) of paragraph (5) of subdivision (b) of Section 19.56, Budget Act of 2022 (Chs. 43, 45, and 249, Stats. 2022), as allocated to technical Item 3825-601-0001, which shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2028, and for liquidation until June 30, 2030. (6) Up to $45,000,000 in paragraph (13) of subdivision (e) of Section 19.57, Budget Act of 2021 (Chs. 21, 69, and 240, Stats. 2021), as allocated to technical Item 3825-691-0001, which shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2028, and for liquidation until June 30, 2030. (7) Item 3825-101-0001, Budget Act of 2021 (Chs. 21, 69, and 240, Stats. 2021), as reappropriated by Item 3825-491, Budget Act of 2023 (Chs. 12, 38, and 189, Stats. 2023), which shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2029, and for liquidation until June 30, 2031. 3830-001-0104—For support of San Joaquin River Conservancy, payable from the San Joaquin River Conservancy Fund ........................ 450,000 Schedule: (1) 3050-San Joaquin River Conservancy ........................ 450,000 3830-001-0140—For support of San Joaquin River Conservancy, payable from the California Environmental License Plate Fund ........................ 461,000 Schedule: (1) 3050-San Joaquin River Conservancy ........................ 461,000 3830-001-6051—For support of San Joaquin River Conservancy, payable from the Safe Drinking Water, Water Quality and Supply, Flood Control, River and Coastal Protection Fund of 2006 ........................ 512,000 Schedule: (1) 3050-San Joaquin River Conservancy ........................ 512,000 3830-001-6093—For support of San Joaquin River Conservancy, payable from the Safe Drinking Water, Wildfire Prevention, Drought Preparedness, and Clean Air Fund ........................ 192,000 Schedule: (1) 3050-San Joaquin River Conservancy ........................ 192,000 3830-490—Reappropriation, San Joaquin River Conservancy. The balances of the appropriations provided in the following citations are reappropriated for the purposes provided for in those appropriations and shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2029: 0001—General Fund (1) Item 3830-001-0001, Budget Act of 2021 (Chs. 21, 69, and 240, Stats. 2021), as reappropriated by Item 3830-490, Budget Act of 2024 (Chs. 22, 35, and 994, Stats. 2024). Notwithstanding any other law, these funds shall be available for operations, maintenance, or capital outlay costs as well as local assistance costs associated with the River West Fresno, Eaton Trail Extension Project as specified in a settlement agreement between the San Joaquin River Access Corporation and the San Joaquin River Conservancy. 3835-001-0140—For support of Baldwin Hills and Urban Watersheds Conservancy, payable from the California Environmental License Plate Fund ........................ 464,000 Schedule: (1) 3090-Baldwin Hills and Urban Watersheds Conservancy ........................ 464,000 3835-001-6051—For support of Baldwin Hills and Urban Watersheds Conservancy, payable from the Safe Drinking Water, Water Quality and Supply, Flood Control, River and Coastal Protection Fund of 2006 ........................ 144,000 Schedule: (1) 3090-Baldwin Hills and Urban Watersheds Conservancy ........................ 144,000 3835-001-6083—For support of Baldwin Hills and Urban Watersheds Conservancy, payable from the Water Quality, Supply, and Infrastructure Improvement Fund of 2014 ........................ 138,000 Schedule: (1) 3090-Baldwin Hills and Urban Watersheds Conservancy ........................ 138,000 3835-001-6088—For support of Baldwin Hills and Urban Watersheds Conservancy, payable from the California Drought, Water, Parks, Climate, Coastal Protection, and Outdoor Access For All Fund ........................ 251,000 Schedule: (1) 3090-Baldwin Hills and Urban Watersheds Conservancy ........................ 251,000 Provisions: 1. The funds appropriated in this item shall be available for conservancy specified purposes, consistent with paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 80110 of the Public Resources Code. 3835-001-6093—For support of Baldwin Hills and Urban Watersheds Conservancy, payable from the Safe Drinking Water, Wildfire Prevention, Drought Preparedness, and Clean Air Fund ........................ 400,000 Schedule: (1) 3090-Baldwin Hills and Urban Watersheds Conservancy ........................ 400,000 3835-101-0001—For local assistance, Baldwin Hills and Urban Watersheds Conservancy ........................ 0 Schedule: (1) 3090-Baldwin Hills and Urban Watersheds Conservancy ........................ 1,000,000 (2) Reimbursements to 3090-Baldwin Hills and Urban Watersheds Conservancy ........................ −1,000,000 Provisions: 1. The funds appropriated in this item shall be available for expenditure for local assistance and capital outlay until June 30, 2029. 3835-101-6088—For Local Assistance, Baldwin Hills and Urban Watersheds Conservancy, payable from the California Drought, Water, Parks, Climate, Coastal Protection, and Outdoor Access For All Fund ........................ 3,500,000 Schedule: (1) 3090-Baldwin Hills and Urban Watersheds Conservancy ........................ 3,500,000 Provisions: 1. The funds appropriated in this item shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2029. 2. The funds appropriated in this item shall be available for conservancy specified purposes, consistent with paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 80110 of the Public Resources Code. 3840-001-0140—For support of Delta Protection Commission, payable from the California Environmental License Plate Fund ........................ 1,532,000 Schedule: (1) 3130-Delta Protection ........................ 1,927,000 (2) Reimbursements to 3130-Delta Protection ........................ −395,000 3840-001-0516—For support of Delta Protection Commission, payable from the Harbors and Watercraft Revolving Fund ........................ 302,000 Schedule: (1) 3130-Delta Protection ........................ 302,000 3840-001-0890—For support of Delta Protection Commission, payable from the Federal Trust Fund ........................ 500,000 Schedule: (1) 3130-Delta Protection ........................ 500,000 Provisions: 1. The funds appropriated in this item are available for expenditure for local assistance or state operations. 2. The amount appropriated in this item is available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2028. 3845-001-0140—For support of San Diego River Conservancy, payable from the California Environmental License Plate Fund ........................ 442,000 Schedule: (1) 3140-San Diego River Conservancy ........................ 502,000 (2) Reimbursements to 3140-San Diego River Conservancy ........................ −60,000 3845-001-6083—For support of San Diego River Conservancy, payable from the Water Quality, Supply, and Infrastructure Improvement Fund of 2014 ........................ 130,000 Schedule: (1) 3140-San Diego River Conservancy ........................ 130,000 3845-001-6088—For support of San Diego River Conservancy, payable from the California Drought, Water, Parks, Climate, Coastal Protection, and Outdoor Access For All Fund ........................ 133,000 Schedule: (1) 3140-San Diego River Conservancy ........................ 133,000 3845-001-6093—For support of San Diego River Conservancy, payable from the Safe Drinking Water, Wildfire Prevention, Drought Preparedness, and Clean Air Fund ........................ 200,000 Schedule: (1) 3140-San Diego River Conservancy ........................ 200,000 3845-002-6093—For support of San Diego River Conservancy, payable from the Safe Drinking Water, Wildfire Prevention, Drought Preparedness, and Clean Air Fund ........................ 200,000 Schedule: (1) 3140-San Diego River Conservancy ........................ 200,000 3845-101-0140—For local assistance, San Diego River Conservancy, payable from the California Environmental License Plate Fund ........................ 0 Schedule: (1) 3140-San Diego River Conservancy ........................ 1,000,000 (2) Reimbursements to 3140-San Diego River Conservancy ........................ −1,000,000 Provisions: 1. The funds appropriated in this item are available for encumbrance or expenditure for local assistance or capital outlay. 3845-101-6088—For local assistance, San Diego River Conservancy, payable from the California Drought, Water, Parks, Climate, Coastal Protection, and Outdoor Access For All Fund ........................ 1,224,000 Schedule: (1) 3140-San Diego River Conservancy ........................ 1,224,000 Provisions: 1. The funds appropriated in this item are available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2029, for local assistance or capital outlay. 3845-490—Reappropriation, San Diego River Conservancy. Notwithstanding any other law, the period to liquidate encumbrances of the following citations is extended to June 30, 2027: 0001—​General Fund (1) Paragraph (26) of subdivision (b) of Section 19.56, Budget Act of 2022 (Chs. 43, 45, and 249, Stats. 2022) as allocated to technical Item 3845-601-0001. 3845-491—Reappropriation, San Diego River Conservancy. The balances of the appropriations provided in the following citations are reappropriated for the purposes provided for in those appropriations and shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2027. 0001—​General Fund (0.1) Item 3845-102-0001, Budget Act of 2020 (Chs. 6 and 7, Stats. 2020), as reappropriated by Item 3845-490, Budget Act of 2024 (Chs. 22, 35, and 994, Stats. 2024), including associated administrative funding transferred to technical Item 3845-594-0001. (0.3) Item 3845-101-0001, Budget Act of 2021 (Chs. 21, 69, and 240, Stats. 2021), as reappropriated by Item 3845-490, Budget Act of 2024 (Chs. 22, 35, and 994, Stats. 2024), including associated administrative funding transferred to technical Item 3845-591-0001. (0.5) Item 3845-102-0001, Budget Act of 2021 (Chs. 21, 69, and 240, Stats. 2021), including associated administrative funding transferred to technical Item 3845-592-0001. (0.9) Item 3845-001-0001, Budget Act of 2022 (Chs. 43, 45, and 249, Stats. 2022). (1) Item 3845-101-0001, Budget Act of 2022 (Chs. 43, 45, and 249, Stats. 2022). 3850-001-0140—For support of Coachella Valley Mountains Conservancy, payable from the California Environmental License Plate Fund ........................ 457,000 Schedule: (1) 3180-Coachella Valley Mountains Conservancy ........................ 547,000 (2) Reimbursements to 3180-Coachella Valley Mountains Conservancy ........................ −90,000 3850-001-6051—For support of Coachella Valley Mountains Conservancy, payable from the Safe Drinking Water, Water Quality and Supply, Flood Control, River and Coastal Protection Fund of 2006 ........................ 27,000 Schedule: (1) 3180-Coachella Valley Mountains Conservancy ........................ 27,000 3850-001-6088—For support of Coachella Valley Mountains Conservancy, payable from the California Drought, Water, Parks, Climate, Coastal Protection, and Outdoor Access For All Fund ........................ 170,000 Schedule: (1) 3180-Coachella Valley Mountains Conservancy ........................ 170,000 3850-001-6093—For support of Coachella Valley Mountains Conservancy, payable from the Safe Drinking Water, Wildfire Prevention, Drought Preparedness, and Clean Air Fund ........................ 100,000 Schedule: (1) 3180-Coachella Valley Mountains Conservancy ........................ 100,000 3850-101-6083—For local assistance, Coachella Valley Mountains Conservancy, payable from the Water Quality, Supply, and Infrastructure Improvement Fund of 2014 ........................ 1,604,000 Schedule: (1) 3180-Coachella Valley Mountains Conservancy ........................ 1,604,000 Provisions: 1. The funds appropriated in this item shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure for local assistance or capital outlay until June 30, 2029. 3850-301-6051—For capital outlay, Coachella Valley Mountains Conservancy, payable from the Safe Drinking Water, Water Quality and Supply, Flood Control, River and Coastal Protection Fund of 2006 ........................ 5,545,000 Schedule: (1) 3190248-Coachella Valley Mountains Acquisition and Enhancement Projects and Costs ........................ 5,545,000 Provisions: 1. The funds appropriated in this item shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure for capital outlay or local assistance until June 30, 2029. 3855-001-0140—For support of Sierra Nevada Conservancy, payable from the California Environmental License Plate Fund ........................ 5,976,000 Schedule: (1) 3220-Sierra Nevada Conservancy ........................ 5,977,000 (2) Reimbursements to 3220-Sierra Nevada Conservancy ........................ −1,000 Provisions: 1. The funds appropriated in this item may be used for support or local assistance. 3855-001-0890—For support of Sierra Nevada Conservancy, payable from the Federal Trust Fund ........................ 1,275,000 Schedule: (1) 3220-Sierra Nevada Conservancy ........................ 1,275,000 Provisions: 1. The funds appropriated in this item may be used for support or local assistance. 3855-001-6051—For support of Sierra Nevada Conservancy, payable from the Safe Drinking Water, Water Quality and Supply, Flood Control, River and Coastal Protection Fund of 2006 ........................ 39,000 Schedule: (1) 3220-Sierra Nevada Conservancy ........................ 39,000 3855-001-6083—For support of Sierra Nevada Conservancy, payable from the Water Quality, Supply, and Infrastructure Improvement Fund of 2014 ........................ 62,000 Schedule: (1) 3220-Sierra Nevada Conservancy ........................ 62,000 3855-001-6088—For support of Sierra Nevada Conservancy, payable from the California Drought, Water, Parks, Climate, Coastal Protection, and Outdoor Access For All Fund ........................ 78,000 Schedule: (1) 3220-Sierra Nevada Conservancy ........................ 78,000 Provisions: 1. The funds appropriated in this item shall be available for planning, monitoring, and administration consistent with paragraph (9) of subdivision (b) of Section 80110 or subdivision (c) of Section 80135 of the Public Resources Code. 3855-001-6093—For support of Sierra Nevada Conservancy, payable from the Safe Drinking Water, Wildfire Prevention, Drought Preparedness, and Clean Air Fund ........................ 250,000 Schedule: (1) 3220-Sierra Nevada Conservancy ........................ 250,000 Provisions: 1. The funds appropriated in this item shall be available for the administration of regional projects to improve local fire prevention capacity, improve forest health and resilience, and reduce the risk of wildfire spreading into populated areas from wildlands pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 91520 of the Public Resources Code. 3855-001-8120—For support of Sierra Nevada Conservancy, payable from the Sierra Nevada Conservancy Fund ........................ 0 Schedule: (1) 3220-Sierra Nevada Conservancy ........................ 648,000 (2) Reimbursements to 3220-Sierra Nevada Conservancy ........................ −648,000 Provisions: 2. Notwithstanding any other law, one or more loans, not to exceed a cumulative total of $450,000, shall be made available from the General Fund to the Sierra Nevada Conservancy Fund, to be transferred as needed to meet cash needs resulting from the delay in receipt of reimbursements. All moneys so transferred shall be repaid as soon as sufficient reimbursements have been collected to meet immediate cash needs, but not later than by October 31 of the fiscal year following the year in which the loan was authorized. Interest charges may be waived pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 16314 of the Government Code. 3855-002-6093—For support of Sierra Nevada Conservancy, payable from the Safe Drinking Water, Wildfire Prevention, Drought Preparedness, and Clean Air Fund ........................ 41,000 Schedule: (1) 3220-Sierra Nevada Conservancy ........................ 41,000 3855-003-6093—For support of Sierra Nevada Conservancy, payable from the Safe Drinking Water, Wildfire Prevention, Drought Preparedness, and Clean Air Fund ........................ 59,000 Schedule: (1) 3220-Sierra Nevada Conservancy ........................ 59,000 3855-011-8120—For transfer by the Controller from the Sierra Nevada Conservancy Fund to the California Environmental License Plate Fund ........................ (1,450,000) 3855-101-6088—For local assistance, Sierra Nevada Conservancy, payable from the California Drought, Water, Parks, Climate, Coastal Protection, and Outdoor Access For All Fund ........................ 375,000 Schedule: (1) 3220-Sierra Nevada Conservancy ........................ 375,000 Provisions: 1. The funds appropriated in this item shall be available for grants to implement the Sierra Nevada Watershed Improvement Program, consistent with subdivision (c) of Section 80135 of the Public Resources Code. 2. The funds appropriated in this item shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2029. 3855-101-8120—For local assistance, Sierra Nevada Conservancy, payable from the Sierra Nevada Conservancy Fund ........................ 0 Schedule: (1) 3220-Sierra Nevada Conservancy ........................ 1,000,000 (2) Reimbursements to 3220-Sierra Nevada Conservancy ........................ −1,000,000 Provisions: 1. Notwithstanding any other law, one or more loans, not to exceed a cumulative total of $1,000,000, shall be made available from the General Fund to the Sierra Nevada Conservancy Fund, to be transferred as needed to meet cash needs resulting from the delay in receipt of reimbursements. All moneys so transferred shall be repaid as soon as sufficient reimbursements have been collected to meet immediate cash needs, but not later than by October 31 of the fiscal year following the year in which the loan was authorized. Interest charges may be waived pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 16314 of the Government Code. 3855-102-6088—For local assistance, Sierra Nevada Conservancy, payable from the California Drought, Water, Parks, Climate, Coastal Protection, and Outdoor Access For All Fund ........................ 450,000 Schedule: (1) 3220-Sierra Nevada Conservancy ........................ 450,000 Provisions: 1. The funds appropriated in this item shall be available for grants consistent with paragraph (9) of subdivision (b) of Section 80110 of the Public Resources Code. 2. The funds appropriated in this item shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2029. 3855-490—Reappropriation, Sierra Nevada Conservancy. The amounts specified in the following citations are reappropriated for the purposes provided for in those appropriations and shall be available for encumbrance, expenditure, or liquidation as specified below: 0001—General Fund (1) Up to 5 percent of the amount described in Provision 1 of Item 3855-101-0001, Budget Act of 2022 (Chs. 43, 45, and 249, Stats. 2022), shall be available for encumbrance, expenditure, or liquidation until June 30, 2028. (2) Up to 5 percent of the amount described in Provision 2 of Item 3855-102-0001, Budget Act of 2022 (Chs. 43, 45, and 249, Stats. 2022), shall be available for encumbrance, expenditure, or liquidation until June 30, 2028. 6088—California Drought, Water, Parks, Climate, Coastal Protection, and Outdoor Access For All Fund (1) The unencumbered balance of Item 3855-102-6088, Budget Act of 2024 (Chs. 22, 35, and 994, Stats. 2024), shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2027. The funds appropriated in this item shall be available for grants to the 40 Acre Conservation League for purposes consistent with paragraph (9) of subdivision (b) of Section 80110 or subdivision (c) of Section 80135 of the Public Resources Code and Sierra Nevada Conservancy grant guidelines. Any projects funded, in whole or in part, from this appropriation that provide public access and outdoor recreation shall be completed such that all development or recreational facilities are made available at low or no cost to maximize the general public benefit. Any revenue generated by activities conducted on property acquired, in whole or in part, with this funding shall be reinvested into the operations and maintenance of the property, natural landscape restoration or resilience of the property, or both. 3855-491—Reappropriation, Sierra Nevada Conservancy. Notwithstanding any other law, the period to liquidate encumbrances of the following citations is extended to June 30, 2028: 0001—General Fund (1) Item 3855-101-0001, Budget Act of 2022 (Chs. 43, 45, and 249, Stats. 2022). (2) Item 3855-102-0001, Budget Act of 2022 (Chs. 43, 45, and 249, Stats. 2022). 3860-001-0001—For support of Department of Water Resources ........................ 235,122,000 Schedule: (1) 3230-Continuing Formulation of the California Water Plan ........................ 107,285,000 (2) 3240-Implementation of the State Water Resources Development System ........................ 583,000 (3) 3245-Public Safety and Prevention of Damage ........................ 134,389,000 (4) 3250-Central Valley Flood Protection Board ........................ 23,549,000 (5) 3255-Services ........................ 7,582,000 (6) 9900100-Administration ........................ 108,050,000 (7) 9900200-Administration—​Distributed ........................ −108,050,000 (8) Reimbursements to 3230-Continuing Formulation of the California Water Plan ........................ −7,594,000 (9) Reimbursements to 3240-Implementation of the State Water Resources Development System ........................ −386,000 (10) Reimbursements to 3245-Public Safety and Prevention of Damage ........................ −13,220,000 (11) Reimbursements to 3250-Central Valley Flood Protection Board ........................ −9,484,000 (12) Reimbursements to 3255-Services ........................ −7,582,000 Provisions: 1. The amounts appropriated in this item may be transferred to the Water Resources Revolving Fund for direct expenditure in such amounts as needed to meet operational needs. 3860-001-0140—For support of Department of Water Resources, payable from the California Environmental License Plate Fund ........................ 3,333,000 Schedule: (1) 3230-Continuing Formulation of the California Water Plan ........................ 3,333,000 Provisions: 1. The amounts appropriated in this item may be transferred to the Water Resources Revolving Fund (0691) for direct expenditure in such amounts as needed to meet operational needs. 3860-001-0465—For support of Department of Water Resources, payable from the Energy Resources Programs Account ........................ 3,814,000 Schedule: (1) 3230-Continuing Formulation of the California Water Plan ........................ 3,814,000 Provisions: 1. The amounts appropriated in this item may be transferred to the Water Resources Revolving Fund (0691) for direct expenditure in such amounts as needed to meet operational needs. 3860-001-0890—For support of Department of Water Resources, payable from the Federal Trust Fund ........................ 212,536,000 Schedule: (1) 3230-Continuing Formulation of the California Water Plan ........................ 175,447,000 (2) 3240-Implementation of the State Water Resources Development System ........................ 4,118,000 (3) 3245-Public Safety and Prevention of Damage ........................ 31,837,000 (4) 3255-Services ........................ 1,134,000 Provisions: 1. The amounts appropriated in this item may be transferred to the Water Resources Revolving Fund for direct expenditure in such amounts as needed to meet operational needs. 2. Notwithstanding Section 28.00, the Department of Finance may augment the amount available for expenditure in this item for federal disaster relief and ratepayer funds to be made available during the budget year for repairing flood damage. Any augmentation shall be authorized no sooner than 30 days after notification in writing to the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, or no sooner than whatever lesser time the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, or the chairperson’s designee, may determine. 3. Of the amount appropriated in this item, $110,000,000 shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2031, and for liquidation until June 30, 2034. 3860-001-3057—For support of Department of Water Resources, payable from the Dam Safety Fund ........................ 23,659,000 Schedule: (1) 3245-Public Safety and Prevention of Damage ........................ 23,659,000 Provisions: 1. The amounts appropriated in this item may be transferred to the Water Resources Revolving Fund (0691) for direct expenditure in such amounts as needed to meet operational needs. 3860-001-3100—For support of Department of Water Resources, payable from the Department of Water Resources Electric Power Fund ........................ 6,220,000 Schedule: (1) 3260-California Energy Bond Office ........................ 6,220,000 Provisions: 1. The amounts appropriated in this item may be transferred to the Water Resources Revolving Fund (0691) for direct expenditure in such amounts as needed to meet operational needs. 3860-001-3237—For support of Department of Water Resources, payable from the Cost of Implementation Account, Air Pollution Control Fund ........................ 408,000 Schedule: (1) 3230-Continuing Formulation of the California Water Plan ........................ 408,000 Provisions: 1. The amounts appropriated in this item may be transferred to the Water Resources Revolving Fund (0691) for direct expenditure in such amounts as needed to meet operational needs. 3860-001-3296—For support of Department of Water Resources, payable from the Flood Risk Management Fund ........................ 308,000 Schedule: (1) 3250-Central Valley Flood Protection Board ........................ 308,000 Provisions: 1. The amounts appropriated in this item may be transferred to the Water Resources Revolving Fund (0691) for direct expenditure in such amounts as needed to meet operational needs. 3860-001-6027—For support of Department of Water Resources, payable from the Interim Water Supply and Water Quality Infrastructure and Management Subaccount ........................ 280,000 Schedule: (1) 3230-Continuing Formulation of the California Water Plan ........................ 280,000 Provisions: 1. The amounts appropriated in this item may be transferred to the Water Resources Revolving Fund (0691) for direct expenditure in such amounts as needed to meet operational needs. 3860-001-6031—For support of Department of Water Resources, payable from the Water Security, Clean Drinking Water, Coastal and Beach Protection Fund of 2002 ........................ 2,054,000 Schedule: (1) 3230-Continuing Formulation of the California Water Plan ........................ 1,844,000 (2) 3245-Public Safety and Prevention of Damage ........................ 210,000 Provisions: 1. The amounts appropriated in this item may be transferred to the Water Resources Revolving Fund (0691) for direct expenditure in such amounts as needed to meet operational needs. 3860-001-6051—For support of Department of Water Resources, payable from the Safe Drinking Water, Water Quality and Supply, Flood Control, River and Coastal Protection Fund of 2006 ........................ 226,000 Schedule: (1) 3230-Continuing Formulation of the California Water Plan ........................ 226,000 Provisions: 1. The amounts appropriated in this item may be transferred to the Water Resources Revolving Fund for direct expenditure in such amounts as needed to meet operational needs. 3860-001-6083—For support of Department of Water Resources, payable from the Water Quality, Supply, and Infrastructure Improvement Fund of 2014 ........................ 24,482,000 Schedule: (1) 3230-Continuing Formulation of the California Water Plan ........................ 16,332,000 (2) 3245-Public Safety and Prevention of Damage ........................ 8,150,000 Provisions: 1. The amounts appropriated in this item may be transferred to the Water Resources Revolving Fund (0691) for direct expenditure in such amounts as needed to meet operational needs. 2. $8,150,000 of the amount appropriated in Schedule (2) for the delta levees special flood control projects shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2028. 3860-001-6088—For support of Department of Water Resources, payable from the California Drought, Water, Parks, Climate, Coastal Protection, and Outdoor Access For All Fund ........................ 6,041,000 Schedule: (1) 3230-Continuing Formulation of the California Water Plan ........................ 391,000 (2) 3245-Public Safety and Prevention of Damage ........................ 5,650,000 Provisions: 1. The amounts appropriated in this item may be transferred to the Water Resources Revolving Fund for direct expenditure in such amounts as needed to meet operational needs. 2. The amounts appropriated in the item may be used for local assistance or state operations. 3860-001-6093—For support of Department of Water Resources, payable from the Safe Drinking Water, Wildfire Prevention, Drought Preparedness, and Clean Air Fund ........................ 4,703,000 Schedule: (1) 3230-Continuing Formulation of the California Water Plan ........................ 4,703,000 Provisions: 1. The amounts appropriated in this item may be transferred to the Water Resources Revolving Fund for direct expenditure in such amounts needed to meet operational needs. 3860-001-8110—For support of Department of Water Resources, payable from the Water Data Administration Fund ........................ 1,350,000 Schedule: (1) 3230-Continuing Formulation of the California Water Plan ........................ 1,350,000 Provisions: 1. The amount appropriated in this item may be transferred to the Water Resources Revolving Fund (0691) for direct expenditure in such amounts as needed to meet operational needs. 3860-002-0001—For support of Department of Water Resources ........................ 7,900,000 Schedule: (1) 3230-Continuing Formulation of the California Water Plan ........................ 7,900,000 Provisions: 1. The amounts appropriated in this item may be transferred to the Water Resources Revolving Fund (0691) for direct expenditure in such amounts as needed to meet operational needs. 2. The amounts appropriated in this item are for the development of a regional conservation investment strategy and the purchase of mitigation credits. 3. Of the amounts appropriated in Schedule 1, up to $1,400,000 can be used for the regional conservation investment strategy. 3860-002-6093—For support of Department of Water Resources, payable from the Safe Drinking Water, Wildfire Prevention, Drought Preparedness, and Clean Air Fund ........................ 4,000,000 Schedule: (1) 3230-Continuing Formulation of the California Water Plan ........................ 4,000,000 Provisions: 1. The amounts appropriated in this item may be transferred to the Water Resources Revolving Fund for direct expenditure in such amounts needed to meet operational needs. 3860-003-0001—For support of Department of Water Resources ........................ 1,000,000 Schedule: (1) 3245-Public Safety and Prevention of Damage ........................ 1,000,000 Provisions: 1. The Department of Water Resources shall notify the Joint Legislative Budget Committee within 30 days of expending funds from this item for flood emergency response. 2. The Department of Water Resources is authorized to use funds from this item only for emergency response if they are spent on activities to respond to a flood emergency event pursuant to the criteria identified in the Water Resources Engineering Memorandum Process. 3. The Department of Water Resources may access funds from this item only for a period of seven days for each event following the identification of a flood emergency event. 4. If additional funds are needed beyond the amount appropriated in this item, the Department of Finance is authorized to transfer funds from Item 9840-001-0001 to this item, pursuant to Provision 5 of Item 9840-001-0001. 5. If no additional funds are transferred pursuant to Provision 4, the Department of Water Resources may transfer funds from this item to Item 3860-001-0001, if the department has determined that the funds are not ultimately needed for emergency response activities. 3860-003-6093—For support of Department of Water Resources, payable from the Safe Drinking Water, Wildfire Prevention, Drought Preparedness, and Clean Air Fund ........................ 4,233,000 Schedule: (1) 3245-Public Safety and Prevention of Damage ........................ 4,233,000 Provisions: 1. The amounts appropriated in this item may be transferred to the Water Resources Revolving Fund for direct expenditure in amounts needed to meet operational needs. 3860-004-3057—For support of Department of Water Resources, payable from the Dam Safety Fund ........................ 3,828,000 Schedule: (1) 3245-Public Safety and Prevention of Damage ........................ 3,828,000 Provisions: 1. The amounts appropriated in this item may be transferred to the Water Resources Revolving Fund (0691) for direct expenditure in such amounts as needed to meet operational needs. 3860-005-6093—For support of Department of Water Resources, payable from the Safe Drinking Water, Wildfire Prevention, Drought Preparedness, and Clean Air Fund ........................ 251,000 Schedule: (1) 3230-Continuing Formulation of the California Water Plan ........................ 251,000 Provisions: 1. The amounts appropriated in this item may be transferred to the Water Resources Revolving Fund (0691) for direct expenditure in such amounts needed to meet operational needs. 3860-101-0001—For local assistance, Department of Water Resources ........................ 25,000,000 Schedule: (1) 3230-Continuing Formulation of the California Water Plan ........................ 25,000,000 Provisions: 1. The funds appropriated in this item may be used for support or local assistance. 2. Of the amount appropriated in this item, $25,000,000 shall be used to implement the Healthy Rivers and Landscape Program and shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2028. 3. Of the amount appropriated in this item for the Healthy Rivers and Landscapes Program, encumbrance of the funding is contingent upon the State Water Resources Control Board’s adoption of the Water Quality Control Plan for the San Francisco Bay/Sacramento-San Joaquin Delta Estuary, also known as the Bay-Delta Water Quality Control Plan. 3860-101-6083—For local assistance, Department of Water Resources, payable from the Water Quality, Supply, and Infrastructure Improvement Fund of 2014 ........................ 1,941,000 Schedule: (1) 3230-Continuing Formulation of the California Water Plan ........................ 1,141,000 (2) 3245-Public Safety and Prevention of Damage ........................ 800,000 Provisions: 1. The amounts appropriated in this item shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2028. 3860-101-6088—For local assistance, Department of Water Resources, payable from the California Drought, Water, Parks, Climate, Coastal Protection, and Outdoor Access for All Fund ........................ 7,478,000 Schedule: (1) 3230-Continuing Formulation of the California Water Plan ........................ 742,000 (2) 3245-Public Safety and Prevention of Damage ........................ 6,736,000 Provisions: 1. The amount appropriated in this item shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2028. 3860-301-6026—For capital outlay, Department of Water Resources, payable from the Bay-Delta Multipurpose Water Management Subaccount ........................ 4,373,000 Schedule: (1) 0011155-South Delta Permanent Operable Gates ........................ 4,373,000 (a) Construction ........................ 4,373,000 Provisions: 1. The amounts appropriated in this item may be transferred to the Water Resources Revolving Fund (0691) for direct expenditure in such amounts as needed to meet operational needs. 2. The amount appropriated in this item shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2031, and for liquidation until June 30, 2034. 3860-301-6031—For capital outlay, Department of Water Resources, payable from the Water Security, Clean Drinking Water, Coastal and Beach Protection Fund of 2002 ........................ 31,460,000 Schedule: (1) 0011155-South Delta Permanent Operable Gates ........................ 31,460,000 (a) Construction ........................ 31,460,000 Provisions: 1. The amount appropriated in this item may be transferred to the Water Resources Revolving Fund (0691) for direct expenditure in such amounts as needed to meet operational needs. 2. The amount appropriated in this item shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2030, and for liquidation until June 30, 2032. 3860-301-6083—For capital outlay, Department of Water Resources, payable from the Water Quality, Supply, and Infrastructure Improvement Fund of 2014 ........................ 5,900,000 Schedule: (1) 0000745-Systemwide Flood Risk Reduction Program ........................ 5,900,000 (a) Construction ........................ 5,900,000 3860-301-6088—For capital outlay, Department of Water Resources, payable from the California Drought, Water, Parks, Climate, Coastal Protection, and Outdoor Access For All Fund ........................ 16,228,000 Schedule: (1) 0006461-Salton Sea North Lake Project ........................ 16,228,000 (a) Construction ........................ 16,228,000 3860-490—Reappropriation, Department of Water Resources. The amounts specified in the following citations are reappropriated for the purposes provided for in those appropriations and shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2028. 0001—​General Fund (1) Up to $805,000 in Schedule (1) of Item 3860-101-0001, Budget Act of 2020 (Chs. 6 and 7, Stats. 2020), as reappropriated by Item 3860-490, Budget Act of 2023 (Chs. 12, 38, and 189, Stats. 2023), as reappropriated by Item 3860-490, Budget Act of 2024 (Chs. 22, 35, and 994, Stats. 2024) (2) Up to $7,015,000 in Schedule (2) of Item 3860-001-0001, Budget Act of 2021 (Chs. 21, 69, and 240, Stats. 2021), as amended by Chapter 44 of the Statutes of 2022, as reappropriated by Item 3860-490, Budget Act of 2024 (Chs. 22, 35, and 994, Stats. 2024) (3) Up to $77,998,000 in Schedule (3) of Item 3860-001-0001, Budget Act of 2021 (Chs. 21, 69, and 240, Stats. 2021), as reappropriated by Item 3860-490, Budget Act of 2024 (Chs. 22, 35, and 994, Stats. 2024) (4) Up to $3,725,000 in Schedule (1)(a), (b), and (c) of Item 3860-101-0001, Budget Act of 2021 (Chs. 21, 69, and 240, Stats. 2021), as reappropriated by Provision 3 in Item 3860-490, Budget Act of 2024 (Chs. 22, 35, and 994, Stats. 2024) (5) Up to $9,501,000 in Schedule (2) of Item 3860-101-0001, Budget Act of 2022 (Chs. 43, 45, and 249, Stats. 2022) (6) Up to $4,000,000 in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 35 of Chapter 574 of Statutes of 2022, as reappropriated by Item 3860-490, Budget Act of 2024 (Chs. 22, 35, and 994, Stats. 2024) (7) Up to $1,025,000 in Schedule (1) of Item 3860-001-0001, Budget Act of 2023 (Chs. 12, 38, and 189, Stats. 2023) (8) Up to $1,998,000 in Schedule (2) of Item 3860-001-0001, Budget Act of 2023 (Chs. 12, 38, and 189, Stats. 2023) (9) Up to $1,800,000 in Schedule (1) of Item 3860-101-0001, Budget Act of 2023 (Chs. 12, 38, and 189, Stats. 2023) (10) Up to $8,144,000 in Schedule (2) of Item 3860-101-0001, Budget Act of 2023 (Chs. 12, 38, and 189, Stats. 2023) (11) Up to $24,722,000 in Schedule (3) of Item 3860-101-0001, Budget Act of 2023 (Chs. 12, 38, and 189, Stats. 2023) 3860-491—Reappropriation, Department of Water Resources. Notwithstanding any other law, the period to liquidate encumbrances of the following citations is extended until June 30, 2028: 0001—​General Fund (1) Schedule (3) of Item 3860-001-0001, Budget Act of 2019 (Chs. 23 and 55, Stats. 2019), as reappropriated by Item 3860-491, Budget Act of 2021 (Chs. 21, 69, and 240, Stats. 2021), as reappropriated by Item 3860-491, Budget Act of 2022 (Chs. 43, 45, and 249, Stats. 2022), as reappropriated by Item 3860-491, Budget Act of 2024 (Chs. 22, 35, and 994, Stats. 2024). (2) Schedule (1) of Item 3860-001-0001, Budget Act of 2021 (Chs. 21, 69, and 240, Stats. 2021), as reappropriated by Item 3860-491, Budget Act of 2024 (Chs. 22, 35, and 994, Stats. 2024). (3) Schedule (1) of Item 3860-001-0001, Budget Act of 2021 (Chs. 21, 69, and 240, Stats. 2021). (4) Schedule (3) of Item 3860-001-0001, Budget Act of 2021 (Chs. 21, 69, and 240, Stats. 2021), as reappropriated by Item 3860-491, Budget Act of 2024 (Chs. 22, 35, and 994, Stats. 2024). (5) Schedule (3) of Item 3860-001-0001, Budget Act of 2021 (Chs. 21, 69, and 240, Stats. 2021), as reappropriated by Item 3860-491, Budget Act of 2024 (Chs. 22, 35, and 994, Stats. 2024). (6) Schedules (1)(a), (b), and (c) of Item 3860-101-0001, Budget Act of 2021 (Chs. 21, 69, and 240, Stats. 2021), as partially reappropriated by Item 3860-491, Budget Act of 2024 (Chs. 22, 35, and 994, Stats. 2024). (7) Schedule (3) of Item 3860-101-0001, Budget Act of 2021(Chs. 21, 69, and 240, Stats. 2021). (8) Schedule (1) of Item 3860-101-0001, Budget Act of 2021 (Chs. 21, 69, and 240, Stats. 2022), transferred by Provision 3 in Item 0540-101-0001, Budget Act of 2022 (Chs. 43, 45, and 249, Stats. 2022). (9) Schedule (1) of Item 3860-102-0001, Budget Act of 2021 (Chs. 21, 69, and 240, Stats. 2021). (10) Subdivision (e) of Section 19.56, Budget Act of 2021 (Chs. 21, 69, and 240, Stats. 2021), as partially reappropriated by Item 3860-491, Budget Act of 2024 (Chs. 22, 35, and 994, Stats. 2024). (11) Subparagraph (A) of paragraph (4) of subsection (a) of Section 35 of Chapter 574 of the Statutes of 2022, as partially reappropriated by Item 3860-490, Budget Act of 2024 (Chs. 22, 35, and 994, Stats. 2024). (12) Subdivision (b) of Section 19.58, Budget Act of 2022 (Chs. 43, 45, and 249, Stats. 2022). (13) Schedule (1) of Item 3860-001-0001, Budget Act of 2023 (Chs. 12, 38, and 189, Stats. 2023). (14) Schedule (3) of Item 3860-001-0001, Budget Act of 2023 (Chs. 12, 38, and 189, Stats. 2023). (15) Schedule (2) of Item 3860-001-0001, Budget Act of 2021 (Chs. 21, 69, and 240, Stats. 2021). 3398—​California Emergency Relief Fund (15) Item 3860-001-3398, Budget Act of 2021 (Chs. 21, 69, and 240, Stats. 2021), as amended by Chapter 44 of the Statutes of 2022. (16) Subdivision (a) of Section 19.54, Budget Act of 2021 (Chs. 21, 69, and 240, Stats. 2021). (17) Schedule (1) of Item 3860-602-3398, Budget Act of 2022 (Chs. 43, 45, and 249, Stats. 2022). 3860-495—Reversion, Department of Water Resources. Notwithstanding any other law, as of June 30, 2026, the balances specified below of the appropriations provided in the following citations shall revert to the balances in the funds from which the appropriations were made. 6031—Water Security, Clean Drinking Water, Coastal and Beach Protection Fund of 2002 (1) $1,495,261 of Item 3860-001-6031, Budget Act of 2018 (Chs. 29 and 30, Stats. 2018), as reappropriated by Item 3860-490, Budget Act of 2019 (Chs. 23 and 55, Stats. 2019), as reappropriated by Section 20.00, Budget Act of 2022 (Chs. 43, 45, and 249, Stats. 2022), as reappropriated by Section 20.00, Budget Act of 2024 (Chs. 22, 35, and 994, Stats. 2024). (2) $3,356 of Item 3860-001-6031, Budget Act of 2019 (Chs. 23 and 55, Stats. 2019), as reappropriated by Item 3860-490, Budget Act of 2020 (Chs. 6 and 7, Stats. 2020), as reappropriated by Section 20.00, Budget Act of 2022 (Chs. 43, 45, and 249, Stats. 2022), as reappropriated by Section 20.00, Budget Act of 2024 (Chs. 22, 35, and 994, Stats. 2024). (3) $15,699 of Item 3860-001-6031, Budget Act of 2020 (Chs. 6 and 7, Stats. 2020), as reappropriated by Item 3806-490, Budget Act of 2021 (Chs. 21, 69, and 240, Stats. 2021), as reappropriated by Section 20.00, Budget Act of 2023 (Chs. 12, 38, and 189, Stats. 2023), as reappropriated by Section 20.00, Budget Act of 2025 (Chs. 4 and 5, Stats. 2025). (4) $770 of Item 3860-001-6031, Budget Act of 2021 (Chs. 21, 69, and 240, Stats. 2021), as reappropriated by Budget Act of 2022 (Chs. 43, 45, and 249, Stats. 2022), as reappropriated by Section 20.00, Budget Act of 2024 (Chs. 22, 35, and 994, Stats. 2024). (5) $4,250,000 of Item 3860-101-6031, Budget Act of 2021 (Chs. 21, 69, and 240, Stats. 2021), as reappropriated by Section 20.00, Budget Act of 2023 (Chs. 12, 38, and 189, Stats. 2023), as reappropriated by Section 20.00, Budget Act of 2025 (Chs. 4 and 5, Stats. 2025). (6) $1,000,000 of Item 3860-101-6031, Budget Act of 2023 (Chs. 12, 38, and 189, Stats. 2023), as reappropriated by Section 20.00, Budget Act of 2025 (Chs. 4 and 5, Stats. 2025). (7) $398,000 of Item 3860-001-6031, Budget Act of 2024, (Chs. 22, 35, and 994, Stats. 2024). (8) $1,344,428 of Item 3860-101-6031, Budget Act of 2024, (Chs. 22, 35, and 994, Stats. 2024). (9) $2,800,000 of Item 3860-301-6031, Budget Act of 2009 (Ch. 1, 2009–10 3rd Ex. Sess., as revised by Ch. l, 2009–10 4th Ex. Sess.), as reappropriated by Item 3860-492, Budget Act of 2012 (Chs. 21 and 29, Stats. 2012), as reappropriated by Item 3860-490, Budget Act of 2016 (Ch. 23, Stats. 2016), and as reappropriated by Item 3860-491, Budget Act of 2018 (Chs. 29 and 30, Stats. 2018), as reappropriated by Item 3860-490, Budget Act of 2020 (Chs. 6 and 7, Stats. 2020), as reappropriated by Section 20.00, Budget Act of 2023 (Chs. 12, 38, and 189, Stats. 2023), as reappropriated by Section 20.00, Budget Act of 2025 (Chs. 4 and 5, Stats. 2025). (10) $323,678 of Item 3860-001-6031, Budget Act of 2010 (Ch. 712, Stats. 2010), as reappropriated by Item 3860-490, Budget Act of 2011 (Ch. 33, Stats. 2011), as reappropriated by Item 3860-491, Budget Act of 2013 (Chs. 20 and 354, Stats. 2013), as reappropriated by Item 3860-491, Budget Act of 2014 (Chs. 25 and 663, Stats. 2014), as reappropriated by Item 3860-490, Budget Act of 2015 (Chs. 10 and 11, Stats. 2015), as reappropriated by Item 3860-490, Budget Act of 2016 (Ch. 23, Stats. 2016), as partially reverted by Item 3860-495, Budget Act of 2013 (Chs. 20 and 354, Stats. 2013), as partially reverted by Item 3860-495, Budget Act of 2014 (Chs. 25 and 663, Stats. 2014), and as partially reverted by Item 3860-496, Budget Act of 2017 (Chs. 14, 22, and 54, Stats. 2017), as reappropriated by Item 3860-491, Budget Act of 2018 (Chs. 29 and 30, Stats. 2018), as reappropriated by Item 3860-491, Budget Act of 2020 (Chs. 6 and 7, Stats. 2020), as reappropriated by Section 20.00, Budget Act of 2022 (Chs. 43, 45, and 249, Stats. 2022), as reappropriated by Section 20.00, Budget Act of 2024 (Chs. 22, 35, and 994, Stats. 2024). 6083—​Water Quality, Supply, and Infrastructure Improvement Fund of 2014 (1) $4,756,224 of Item 3860-101-6083, Budget Act of 2021 (Chs. 21, 69, and 240, Stats. 2021) as reappropriated by Control Section 20.00, Budget Act of 2022 (Chs. 43, 45, and 249, Stats. 2022). (2) $1,799,864 of Item 3860-001-6083, Budget Act of 2024 (Chs. 22, 35, and 994, Stats. 2024) as reappropriated by Control Section 20.00, Budget Act of 2024 (Chs. 22, 35, and 994, Stats. 2024). (3) $1,538,800 of Item 3860-001-6083, Budget Act of 2022 (Chs. 43, 45, and 249, Stats. 2022) as reappropriated by Control Section 20.00, Budget Act of 2022 (Chs. 43, 45, and 249, Stats. 2022), as reappropriated by Control Section 20.00, Budget Act of 2024 (Chs. 22, 35, and 994, Stats. 2024). (4) $55,493 of Item 3860-001-6083, Budget Act of 2021 (Chs. 21, 69, and 240, Stats. 2021) as reappropriated by Item 3860-490, Budget Act of 2022 (Chs. 43, 45, and 249, Stats. 2022), as reappropriated by Control Section 20.00, Budget Act of 2023 (Chs. 12, 38, and 189, Stats. 2023). (5) $2,000,000 of Item 3860-001-6083, Budget Act of 2024 (Chs. 22, 35, and 994, Stats. 2024). (6) $800,000 of Item 3860-001-6083, Budget Act of 2022, (Chs. 43, 45, and 249, Stats. 2022), as reappropriated by Section 20.00, Budget Act of 2023 (Chs. 12, 38, and 189, Stats. 2023), as reappropriated by Section 20.00, Budget Act of 2025 (Chs. 4 and 5, Stats. 2025). 6088—California Drought, Water, Parks, Climate, Coastal Protection, and Outdoor Access For All Fund (1) $2,000,000 of Item 3860-001-6088, Budget Act of 2019 (Chs. 23 and 55, Stats. 2019), as reappropriated by Section 20.00, Budget Act of 2022 (Chs. 43, 45, and 249, Stats. 2022), as reappropriated by Section 20.00, Budget Act of 2024 (Chs. 22, 35, and 994, Stats. 2024). (2) $2,019,000 of Item 3860-001-6088, Budget Act of 2020 (Chs. 6 and 7, Stats. 2020), as reappropriated by Section 20.00, Budget Act of 2023 (Chs. 12, 38, and 189, Stats. 2023), as reappropriated by Section 20.00, Budget Act of 2025 (Chs. 4 and 5, Stats. 2025). (3) $1,675,000 of Item 3860-001-6088, Budget Act of 2021 (Chs. 21, 69, and 240, Stats. 2021), as reappropriated by Section 20.00, Budget Act of 2024 (Chs. 22, 35, and 994, Stats. 2024). (4) $16,828,225 of Item 3860-101-6088, Budget Act of 2020 (Chs. 6 and 7, Stats. 2020), as reappropriated by Section 20.00, Budget Act of 2025 (Chs. 4 and 5, Stats. 2025). 3875-001-0001—For support of Sacramento-San Joaquin Delta Conservancy ........................ 1,511,000 Schedule: (1) 3350-Sacramento-San Joaquin Delta Conservancy ........................ 2,183,000 (2) Reimbursements to 3350-Sacramento-San Joaquin Delta Conservancy ........................ −672,000 3875-001-0140—For support of Sacramento-San Joaquin Delta Conservancy, payable from the California Environmental License Plate Fund ........................ 130,000 Schedule: (1) 3350-Sacramento-San Joaquin Delta Conservancy ........................ 130,000 3875-001-0890—For support of Sacramento-San Joaquin Delta Conservancy, payable from the Federal Trust Fund ........................ 681,000 Schedule: (1) 3350-Sacramento-San Joaquin Delta Conservancy ........................ 681,000 3875-001-6083—For support of Sacramento-San Joaquin Delta Conservancy, payable from the Water Quality, Supply, and Infrastructure Improvement Fund of 2014 ........................ 459,000 Schedule: (1) 3350-Sacramento-San Joaquin Delta Conservancy ........................ 459,000 3875-001-6088—For support of Sacramento-San Joaquin Delta Conservancy, payable from the California Drought, Water, Parks, Climate, Coastal Protection, and Outdoor Access For All Fund ........................ 277,000 Schedule: (1) 3350-Sacramento-San Joaquin Delta Conservancy ........................ 277,000 3875-001-6093—For support of Sacramento-San Joaquin Delta Conservancy, payable from the Safe Drinking Water, Wildfire Prevention, Drought Preparedness, and Clean Air Fund ........................ 150,000 Schedule: (1) 3350-Sacramento-San Joaquin Delta Conservancy ........................ 150,000 3875-101-6088—For local assistance, Sacramento-San Joaquin Delta Conservancy, payable from the California Drought, Water, Parks, Climate, Coastal Protection, and Outdoor Access For All Fund ........................ 181,000 Schedule: (1) 3350-Sacramento-San Joaquin Delta Conservancy ........................ 181,000 Provisions: 1. The funds appropriated in this item are available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2029, and available for liquidation until June 30, 2031. 3875-490—Reappropriation, Sacramento-San Joaquin Delta Conservancy. The balances of the appropriations provided in the following citations are reappropriated for the purposes provided for in those appropriations, including, but not limited to, the funding transferred for administrative costs, and shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2029: 0001—General Fund (1) Item 3875-101-0001, Budget Act of 2021 (Chs. 21, 69, and 240, Stats. 2021) as reappropriated by Item 3875-490, Budget Act of 2024 (Chs. 22, 35, and 994, Stats. 2024). (2) Item 3875-101-0001, Budget Act of 2022 (Chs. 43, 45, and 249, Stats. 2022) as reappropriated by Item 3875-490, Budget Act of 2024 (Chs. 22, 35, and 994, Stats. 2024). 3885-001-0001—For support of Delta Stewardship Council ........................ 20,577,000 Schedule: (1) 3370-Delta Stewardship Council ........................ 25,027,000 (2) Reimbursements to 3370-Delta Stewardship Council ........................ −4,450,000 Provisions: 1. Of the amount appropriated in this item, up to $4,000,000 shall be available for research contracts. This amount is available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2028, and available for liquidation until June 30, 2031. 2. Upon order of the Department of Finance, this item may be augmented by an amount necessary to cover rate increases for the members of the Delta Independent Science Board associated with inflation and cost of living adjustments in accordance with subdivision (b) of Section 85213 of the Water Code. 3885-001-0140—For support of Delta Stewardship Council, payable from the California Environmental License Plate Fund ........................ 1,028,000 Schedule: (1) 3370-Delta Stewardship Council ........................ 1,028,000 3885-001-0890—For support of Delta Stewardship Council, payable from the Federal Trust Fund ........................ 2,805,000 Schedule: (1) 3370-Delta Stewardship Council ........................ 2,805,000 CALIFORNIA ENVIRONMENTAL PROTECTION AGENCY 3900-001-0042—For support of State Air Resources Board, payable from the State Highway Account, State Transportation Fund ........................ 83,000 Schedule: (1) 3500-Mobile Source ........................ 83,000 Provisions: 1. The funds appropriated in this item shall be available to continue implementation of Chapter 5 of the Statutes of 2017. 3900-001-0044—For support of State Air Resources Board, payable from the Motor Vehicle Account, State Transportation Fund ........................ 145,805,000 Schedule: (1) 3500-Mobile Source ........................ 155,412,000 (2) Reimbursements to 3500-Mobile Source ........................ −9,607,000 3900-001-0115—For support of State Air Resources Board, payable from the Air Pollution Control Fund ........................ 163,884,000 Schedule: (1) 3500-Mobile Source ........................ 42,638,000 (2) 3505-Stationary Source ........................ 35,541,000 (3) 3510-Climate Change ........................ 80,792,000 (4) 3530-Community Air Protection ........................ 4,913,000 Provisions: 1. The amount appropriated in Schedule (1) and Schedule (2) includes revenues derived from the assessment of fines and penalties imposed as specified in Section 13332.18 of the Government Code. 2. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (3), $72,448,000 is for workload and investments related to meeting the requirements of the Hino Motors, Ltd. court-ordered Consent Decree, issued on January 15, 2025. 3. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (1), $2,200,000 is for workload related to research and risk reduction strategies for the air toxics acrolein and ethylene oxide, and shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2028. 3900-001-0421—For support of State Air Resources Board, payable from the Vehicle Inspection and Repair Fund ........................ 20,858,000 Schedule: (1) 3500-Mobile Source ........................ 20,858,000 3900-001-0434—For support of State Air Resources Board, payable from the Air Toxics Inventory and Assessment Account ........................ 727,000 Schedule: (1) 3505-Stationary Source ........................ 727,000 3900-001-0462—For support of State Air Resources Board, payable from the Public Utilities Commission Utilities Reimbursement Account ........................ 209,000 Schedule: (1) 3510-Climate Change ........................ 209,000 3900-001-0890—For support of State Air Resources Board, payable from the Federal Trust Fund ........................ 18,465,000 Schedule: (1) 3500-Mobile Source ........................ 7,976,000 (2) 3505-Stationary Source ........................ 10,489,000 3900-001-3046—For support of State Air Resources Board, payable from the Oil, Gas, and Geothermal Administrative Fund ........................ 6,295,000 Schedule: (1) 3505-Stationary Source ........................ 5,331,000 (2) 3510-Climate Change ........................ 964,000 3900-001-3119—For support of State Air Resources Board, payable from the Air Quality Improvement Fund ........................ 6,250,000 Schedule: (1) 3500-Mobile Source ........................ 6,250,000 3900-001-3237—For support of State Air Resources Board, payable from the Cost of Implementation Account, Air Pollution Control Fund ........................ 84,245,000 Schedule: (0.5) 3500-Mobile Source ........................ 828,000 (1) 3510-Climate Change ........................ 83,417,000 Provisions: 1. When evaluating the efficacy, safety, and viability of CCUS technology pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 39741.1 of the Health and Safety Code, the State Air Resources Board shall prioritize technologies that are well-suited to help decrease emissions from sectors that are difficult to decarbonize, such as cement and steel production. 3900-001-3290—For support of State Air Resources Board, payable from the Road Maintenance and Rehabilitation Account, State Transportation Fund ........................ 19,000 Schedule: (1) 3500-Mobile Source ........................ 19,000 Provisions: 1. The funds appropriated in this item shall be available to continue implementation of Chapter 5 of the Statutes of 2017. 3900-001-3291—For support of State Air Resources Board, payable from the Trade Corridor Enhancement Account, State Transportation Fund ........................ 9,000 Schedule: (1) 3500-Mobile Source ........................ 9,000 Provisions: 1. The funds appropriated in this item shall be available to continue implementation of Chapter 5 of the Statutes of 2017. 3900-001-3358—For support of State Air Resources Board, payable from the Truck Emission Check Fund ........................ 19,102,000 Schedule: (1) 3500-Mobile Source ........................ 19,102,000 3900-001-3359—For support of State Air Resources Board, payable from the Certification and Compliance Fund ........................ 45,900,000 Schedule: (1) 3500-Mobile Source ........................ 45,900,000 3900-001-6054—For support of State Air Resources Board, payable from the California Ports Infrastructure, Security, and Air Quality Improvement Account, Highway Safety, Traffic Reduction, Air Quality, and Port Security Fund of 2006 ........................ 1,326,000 Schedule: (1) 3500-Mobile Source ........................ 1,326,000 3900-002-0115—For support of State Air Resources Board, payable from the Air Pollution Control Fund ........................ 1,834,000 Schedule: (1) 3500-Mobile Source ........................ 16,761,000 (2) Reimbursements to 3500-Mobile Source ........................ −14,927,000 Provisions: 1. The amount appropriated in this item includes revenues derived from the assessment of fines and penalties imposed as specified in Section 13332.18 of the Government Code. 2. Notwithstanding any other law, the funds appropriated from this item shall be from penalty revenues that are subject to separate accounting in accordance with Sections 38580, 39674, 39675, 42400 to 42410, inclusive, 43016, 43025 to 43031.5, inclusive, 43154, 43211, and 43212 of the Health and Safety Code. These funds shall be available to support the State Air Resources Board in administering and implementing the provisions of the Volkswagen Consent Decree entered by the court on October 25, 2016. 3. Up to $14,433,000 in Schedule (1), and up to $14,433,000 in Schedule (2), shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2034, to support the State Air Resources Board in administering and implementing the provisions of the Volkswagen Consent Decree. 3900-002-3237—For support of State Air Resources Board, payable from the Cost of Implementation Account, Air Pollution Control Fund ........................ 5,300,000 Schedule: (1) 3510-Climate Change ........................ 5,300,000 Provisions: 1. Notwithstanding any other law, the State Air Resources Board may provide advance payment of up to 25 percent of quarterly membership costs to Western Climate Initiative, Incorporated. 3900-012-0115—For transfer by the Controller, upon order of the Department of Finance, from the Air Pollution Control Fund to the Certification and Compliance Fund ........................ (8,000,000) 3900-093-0044—For support of State Air Resources Board, payable from the Motor Vehicle Account, State Transportation Fund, for rental payments on lease-revenue bonds (Southern California Headquarters) ........................ 12,699,000 Schedule: (1) 3500-Mobile Source ........................ 12,699,000 Provisions: 1. The Controller shall transfer funds appropriated in this item for base rental as and when provided for in the schedule submitted by the State Public Works Board. Notwithstanding the payment dates in any related Facility Lease or Indenture, the schedule may provide for an earlier transfer of funds to ensure debt requirements are met and pay base rental in full when due. 2. No later than 30 days after enactment of this budget, the Controller shall transfer $156,000 of the amount appropriated in this item for additional rental to the Expense Account in the Public Buildings Construction Fund. 3. This item may be adjusted pursuant to Section 4.30. Any adjustments to this item shall be reported to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee pursuant to Section 4.30. 3900-093-0115—For support of State Air Resources Board, payable from the Air Pollution Control Fund, for rental payments on lease-revenue bonds (Southern California Headquarters) ........................ 3,907,000 Schedule: (1) 3500-Mobile Source ........................ 3,907,000 Provisions: 1. The Controller shall transfer funds appropriated in this item for base rental as and when provided for in the schedule submitted by the State Public Works Board. Notwithstanding the payment dates in any related Facility Lease or Indenture, the schedule may provide for an earlier transfer of funds to ensure debt requirements are met and pay base rental in full when due. 2. The Controller shall transfer for additional rental no later than 30 days after enactment of this budget, $48,000 of the amount appropriated in this item, to the Expense Account in the Public Buildings Construction Fund. 3. This item may be adjusted pursuant to Section 4.30. Any adjustments to this item shall be reported to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee pursuant to Section 4.30. 3900-093-0421—For support of State Air Resources Board, payable from the Vehicle Inspection and Repair Fund, for rental payments on lease-revenue bonds (Southern California Headquarters) ........................ 2,931,000 Schedule: (1) 3500-Mobile Source ........................ 2,931,000 Provisions: 1. The Controller shall transfer funds appropriated in this item for base rental as and when provided for in the schedule submitted by the State Public Works Board. Notwithstanding the payment dates in any related Facility Lease or Indenture, the schedule may provide for an earlier transfer of funds to ensure debt requirements are met and pay base rental in full when due. 2. No later than 30 days after enactment of this budget, the Controller shall transfer $36,000 of the amount appropriated in this item for additional rental to the Expense Account in the Public Buildings Construction Fund. 3. This item may be adjusted pursuant to Section 4.30. Any adjustments to this item shall be reported to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee pursuant to Section 4.30. 3900-101-0044—For local assistance, State Air Resources Board, for assistance to counties in the operation of local air pollution control districts, payable from the Motor Vehicle Account, State Transportation Fund ........................ 10,111,000 Schedule: (1) 3515-Subvention ........................ 10,111,000 Provisions: 1. It is the intent of the Legislature that funds appropriated in this item shall not be used to reduce the fees paid by permittees to the local air quality management and air pollution control districts. 3900-101-0115—For local assistance, State Air Resources Board, payable from the Air Pollution Control Fund ........................ 130,733,000 Schedule: (1) 3500-Mobile Source ........................ 130,733,000 Provisions: 1. Notwithstanding any other law, the funds appropriated in this item shall be available for allocation to local air pollution control districts for implementation of the Carl Moyer Memorial Air Quality Standards Attainment Program. 3900-101-3119—For local assistance, State Air Resources Board, payable from the Air Quality Improvement Fund ........................ 34,940,000 Schedule: (1) 3500-Mobile Source ........................ 34,940,000 Provisions: 1. The funds in this item shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2029. 3900-101-3122—For local assistance, State Air Resources Board, payable from the Enhanced Fleet Modernization Subaccount, High Polluter Repair or Removal Account ........................ 2,800,000 Schedule: (1) 3500-Mobile Source ........................ 2,800,000 3900-101-3237—For local assistance, State Air Resources Board, payable from the Cost of Implementation Account, Air Pollution Control Fund ........................ 3,000,000 Schedule: (1) 3510-Climate Change ........................ 3,000,000 3900-490—Reappropriation, State Air Resources Board. Notwithstanding any other law, the period to liquidate encumbrances of the following citations is extended to June 30, 2028: 0001—General Fund (1) Up to $21,716,000 of Provision 2 of Item 3900-101-0001, of the Budget Act of 2021 (Ch. 21, 69, and 240, Stats. 2021), for the Zero-Emission Drayage Truck and Infrastructure Pilot Project. 0044—Motor Vehicle Account, State Transportation Fund (1) Up to $550,000 of Item 3900-001-0044 of the Budget Act of 2019 (Chs. 23 and 55, Stats. 2019), as reappropriated by Item 3900-492 of the Budget Act of 2023 (Chs. 12, 38, and 189, Stats. 2023) for Emission Testing and Test Method Development for Commercial Harbor Craft and Ocean-Going Vessels. (2) Up to $104,000 of Item 3900-001-0044 of the Budget Act of 2023 (Chs. 12, 38, and 189, Stats. 2023) for contracts related to the Commercial Harbor Craft regulations. 3119—​Air Quality Improvement Fund (1) Up to $14,340,000 of Item 3900-101-3119, Budget Act of 2023 (Chs. 12, 38, and 189, Stats. 2023), for the Clean Off-Road Equipment Voucher Incentive Project. 3900-492—Reappropriation, State Air Resources Board. The balances of the appropriations provided in the following citations are reappropriated for the purposes provided for in this appropriation and shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure as specified below: 0001—​General Fund (0.5) Up to $9,907,000 of technical item 3900-593-0001 from Provision 3 of Item 3900-101-0001, Budget Act of 2021 (Chs. 21, 69, and 240, Stats. 2021) used for administrative costs for various programs, shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2028. (1) The funding in Provision 5 of Item 3900-101-0001, Budget Act of 2023 (Chs. 12, 38, and 189, Stats. 2023) used for administrative costs for various programs shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2030. (1.1) Up to $1,000,000 of technical item 3900-594-0001 from Provision 5 of Item 3900-101-0001, Budget Act of 2023 (Chs. 12, 38, and 189, Stats. 2023) used for administrative costs for various programs, shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2028. 0115—​Air Pollution Control Fund (0.5) Up to $5,674,000 of technical item 3900-591-0115 from Provision 1(a) of Item 3900-101 -0115, Budget Act of 2021 (Chs. 21, 69, and 240, Stats. 2021) used for administrative costs for the Carl Moyer Memorial Air Quality Standards Attainment Program, shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2028. (0.6) Up to $5,844,000 of technical item 3900-592-0115 from Provision 1(a) of Item 3900-101-0115, Budget Act of 2021 (Chs. 21. 69, and 240, Stats. 2021), used for administrative costs for the Carl Moyer Memorial Air Quality Standards Attainment Program, shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2028. (1) Technical Item 3900-591-0115 used for administrative costs pursuant to Item 3900-101-0115, Budget Act of 2023 (Chs. 12, 38, and 189, Stats. 2023), related to the Carl Moyer program shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2028. (2) Technical Item 3900-592-0115 used for administrative costs pursuant to Item 3900-101-0115, Budget Act of 2024 (Chs. 22, 35, and 994, Stats. 2024), related to the Carl Moyer program shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2029. 6054—California Ports Infrastructure, Security, and Air Quality Improvement Account, Highway Safety, Traffic Reduction, Air Quality, and Port Security Fund of 2006 (1) Up to $10,795,0000 $10,795,000 in Item 3900-101-6054, Budget Act of 2018 (Chs. 29 and 30, Stats. 2018), as reappropriated by Item 3900-493, Budget Act of 2021 (Chs. 21, 69, and 240, Stats. 2021), Item 3900-492, Budget Act of 2024 (Chs. 22, 35, and 994, Stats. 2024), and shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2028, for previously authorized Proposition l B programs and projects related to the Goods Movement Emission Reduction Program. (2) Up to $8,746,000 in Item 3900-101-6054, Budget Act of 2019 (Chs. 23 and 55, Stats. 2019), as reappropriated by Item 3900-494, Budget Act of 2021 (Chs. 21, 69, and 240, Stats. 2021), as reappropriated by Item 3900-490, Budget Act of 2025 (Chs. 4 and 5, Stats. 2025), and shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2028, for previously authorized Proposition l B programs and projects related to the Goods Movement Emission Reduction Program. 3930-001-0106—For support of Department of Pesticide Regulation, payable from the Department of Pesticide Regulation Fund ........................ 111,776,000 Schedule: (1) 3540-Pesticide Programs ........................ 112,386,000 (2) Reimbursements to 3540-Pesticide Programs ........................ −610,000 Provisions: 1. The amount appropriated in this item includes revenues derived from the assessment of fines and penalties imposed as specified in Section 13332.18 of the Government Code. 2. The amount appropriated in Schedule (1) for an agreement with the Department of Food and Agriculture to perform analytical chemistry testing shall be adjusted annually, as necessary, for state-negotiated employee compensation and benefit adjustments. 3930-001-0140—For support of Department of Pesticide Regulation, payable from the California Environmental License Plate Fund ........................ 666,000 Schedule: (1) 3540-Pesticide Programs ........................ 666,000 3930-001-0890—For support of Department of Pesticide Regulation, payable from the Federal Trust Fund ........................ 2,390,000 Schedule: (1) 3540-Pesticide Programs ........................ 2,390,000 3930-101-0106—For support of Department of Pesticide Regulation, payable from the Department of Pesticide Regulation Fund ........................ 1,000,000 Schedule: (1) 3540-Pesticide Programs ........................ 1,000,000 Provisions: 1. The funds in this item shall be available to fund county takeback events and shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2029. 3930-102-0106—For support of Department of Pesticide Regulation, payable from the Department of Pesticide Regulation Fund ........................ 2,000,000 Schedule: (1) 3540-Pesticide Programs ........................ 2,000,000 Provisions: 1. The funds in this item shall be available to counties for community engagement activities and shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2029. 3930-103-0106—For support of Department of Pesticide Regulation, payable from the Department of Pesticide Regulation Fund ........................ 5,900,000 Schedule: (1) 3540-Pesticide Programs ........................ 5,900,000 Provisions: 1. Of the funds available in this item, $5,900,000 is available to fund Sustainable Pest Management grants and shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2029. 3930-104-0106—For support of Department of Pesticide Regulation, payable from the Department of Pesticide Regulation Fund ........................ 1,000,000 Schedule: (1) 3540-Pesticide Programs ........................ 1,000,000 Provisions: 1. Of the funds available in this item, $1,000,000 is available to fund demonstration projects related to Integrated Pest Management (IPM) and Sustainable Pest Management (SPM) and shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2029. 3940-001-0001—For support of State Water Resources Control Board ........................ 58,010,000 Schedule: (1) 3560-Water Quality ........................ 29,842,000 (2) 3565-Drinking Water Quality ........................ 7,519,000 (3) 3570-Water Rights ........................ 19,688,000 (3.5) 3571-Administrative Hearings Office ........................ 572,000 (4) 3575-Department of Justice Legal Services ........................ 389,000 Provisions: 1. The amount appropriated in Program 3575 shall be used to reimburse the Department of Justice for legal services. In addition to the amount in Program 3575, upon order of the Director of Finance, any non-General Fund Budget Act item for support of the State Water Resources Control Board may be augmented to reimburse the Department of Justice for legal services. An augmentation shall not be made sooner than 30 days after the Joint Legislative Budget Committee has been notified in writing. 2. Of this amount, $981,000 is to reimburse the State Department of Public Health for lease-revenue bond base rental payments associated with the State Water Resources Control Board’s occupancy in the State Department of Public Health’s Richmond Laboratory. 3. The Controller shall transfer funds appropriated in this item to the State Department of Public Health, in the amount shown in Provision 2, as and when provided for in the schedule submitted by the State Public Works Board. 4. The amount appropriated in Program 3571 shall be used to administer Sections 1110 to 1114, inclusive, of the Water Code for operation of the Administrative Hearings Office. 3940-001-0028—For support of State Water Resources Control Board, payable from the Unified Program Account ........................ 673,000 Schedule: (1) 3560-Water Quality ........................ 673,000 3940-001-0129—For support of State Water Resources Control Board, payable from the Water Certification Special Account ........................ 390,000 Schedule: (1) 3565-Drinking Water Quality ........................ 390,000 3940-001-0179—For support of State Water Resources Control Board, payable from the Environmental Laboratory Improvement Fund ........................ 5,549,000 Schedule: (1) 3565-Drinking Water Quality ........................ 5,549,000 Provisions: 1. Of this amount, $7,000 is to reimburse the State Department of Public Health for lease-revenue bond base rental payments associated with the State Water Resources Control Board’s occupancy in the State Department of Public Health’s Richmond Laboratory. 2. The Controller shall transfer funds appropriated in this item to the State Department of Public Health, in the amount shown in Provision 1, as and when provided for in the schedule submitted by the State Public Works Board. 3940-001-0193—For support of State Water Resources Control Board, payable from the Waste Discharge Permit Fund ........................ 191,620,000 Schedule: (1) 3560-Water Quality ........................ 189,508,000 (2) 3565-Drinking Water Quality ........................ 736,000 (3) 3575-Department of Justice Legal Services ........................ 1,376,000 Provisions: 1. The amount appropriated in Program 3575 shall be used to reimburse the Department of Justice for legal services. In addition to the amount in Program 3575, upon order of the Department of Finance, any non-General Fund Budget Act item for support of the State Water Resources Control Board may be augmented to reimburse the Department of Justice for legal services. An augmentation shall not be made sooner than 30 days after the Joint Legislative Budget Committee has been notified in writing. 2. The amount appropriated in this item includes revenues derived from the assessment of fines and penalties imposed as specified in Section 13332.18 of the Government Code. 3. The Director of Finance may authorize a short-term cash loan of up to $75,000,000 from the Underground Storage Tank Cleanup Fund to provide cashflow needed to support operational costs that will be covered by fee revenue received by the end of the fiscal year. The cash loan shall be subject to the terms and conditions for repayment as may be prescribed by the Department of Finance. Interest charges may be waived pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 16314 of the Government Code. For purposes of the budgetary and legal bases of accounting and budgeting, the principal amount of any loans made pursuant to this provision shall not be considered part of the balance of the fund that receives the loan, nor shall it be deducted from the balance of the fund from which the loan is made. These loans are considered cashflow loans for temporary cash shortages and shall not constitute budgetary loans, revenues, or expenditures. The Department of Finance shall make the final determination of the budgetary and accounting transactions and treatments to ensure proper implementation of this provision pursuant to Section 13344 of the Government Code. 3940-001-0212—For support of State Water Resources Control Board, payable from the Marine Invasive Species Control Fund ........................ 97,000 Schedule: (1) 3560-Water Quality ........................ 97,000 3940-001-0235—For support of State Water Resources Control Board, payable from the Public Resources Account, Cigarette and Tobacco Products Surtax Fund ........................ 234,000 Schedule: (1) 3560-Water Quality ........................ 171,000 (2) 3570-Water Rights ........................ 63,000 3940-001-0247—For support of State Water Resources Control Board, payable from the Drinking Water Operator Certification Special Account ........................ 2,880,000 Schedule: (1) 3560-Water Quality ........................ 2,880,000 3940-001-0306—For support of State Water Resources Control Board, payable from the Safe Drinking Water Account ........................ 52,521,000 Schedule: (1) 3565-Drinking Water Quality ........................ 52,521,000 Provisions: 1. Notwithstanding any other law, upon approval and order of the Department of Finance, the State Water Resources Control Board may borrow sufficient funds for cash purposes from special funds that otherwise provide support for the board. Any such loans are to be repaid with interest at the rate earned in the Pooled Money Investment Account. 2. Notwithstanding subdivision (c) of Section 116590 of the Health and Safety Code, the funds appropriated in this item shall be available for compliance with the California Safe Drinking Water Act. 3. The Director of Finance may authorize a short-term cash loan of up to $17,000,000 from the Underground Storage Tank Cleanup Fund to provide cashflow needed to support operational costs that will be covered by fee revenue received by the end of the fiscal year. The cash loan shall be subject to the terms and conditions for repayment as may be prescribed by the Department of Finance. Interest charges may be waived pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 16314 of the Government Code. For purposes of the budgetary and legal bases of accounting and budgeting, the principal amount of any loans made pursuant to this provision shall not be considered part of the balance of the fund that receives the loan, nor shall it be deducted from the balance of the fund from which the loan is made. These loans are considered cashflow loans for temporary cash shortages and shall not constitute budgetary loans, revenues, or expenditures. The Department of Finance shall make the final determination of the budgetary and accounting transactions and treatments to ensure proper implementation of this provision pursuant to Section 13344 of the Government Code. 3940-001-0387—For support of State Water Resources Control Board, payable from the Integrated Waste Management Account, Integrated Waste Management Fund ........................ 7,280,000 Schedule: (1) 3560-Water Quality ........................ 7,280,000 3940-001-0436—For support of State Water Resources Control Board, payable from the Underground Storage Tank Tester Account ........................ 19,000 Schedule: (1) 3560-Water Quality ........................ 19,000 3940-001-0439—For support of State Water Resources Control Board, payable from the Underground Storage Tank Cleanup Fund ........................ 199,681,000 Schedule: (1) 3560-Water Quality ........................ 220,544,000 (2) Reimbursements to 3560-Water Quality ........................ −20,863,000 Provisions: 1. Notwithstanding any other law, upon approval and order of the Department of Finance, the State Water Resources Control Board may borrow sufficient funds for cash purposes from special funds that otherwise provide support for the board. Any such loans are to be repaid with interest at the rate earned in the Pooled Money Investment Account. 3940-001-0740—For support of State Water Resources Control Board, payable from the 1984 State Clean Water Bond Fund ........................ 313,000 Schedule: (1) 3560-Water Quality ........................ 313,000 3940-001-0890—For support of State Water Resources Control Board, payable from the Federal Trust Fund ........................ 271,825,000 Schedule: (1) 3560-Water Quality ........................ 255,075,000 (2) 3565-Drinking Water Quality ........................ 16,519,000 (3) 3570-Water Rights ........................ 231,000 3940-001-1018—For support of State Water Resources Control Board, payable from the Lake Tahoe Science and Lake Improvement Account ........................ 499,000 Schedule: (1) 3560-Water Quality ........................ 499,000 3940-001-3046—For support of State Water Resources Control Board, payable from the Oil, Gas, and Geothermal Administrative Fund ........................ 8,193,000 Schedule: (1) 3560-Water Quality ........................ 8,193,000 3940-001-3058—For support of State Water Resources Control Board, payable from the Water Rights Fund ........................ 37,851,000 Schedule: (1) 3570-Water Rights ........................ 33,777,000 (1.5) 3571-Administrative Hearings Office ........................ 3,038,000 (2) 3575-Department of Justice Legal Services ........................ 1,036,000 Provisions: 1. The amount appropriated in this item includes revenues derived from the assessment of fines and penalties imposed as specified in Section 13332.18 of the Government Code. 2. The amount appropriated in Program 3575 shall be used to reimburse the Department of Justice for legal services. In addition to the amount in Program 3575, upon order of the Department of Finance, any non-General Fund Budget Act item for support of the State Water Resources Control Board may be augmented to reimburse the Department of Justice for legal services. No augmentation shall be made sooner than 30 days after the Joint Legislative Budget Committee has been notified in writing. 3. The Director of Finance may authorize a short-term cash loan of up to $15,000,000 from the Underground Storage Tank Cleanup Fund to provide cashflow needed to support operational costs that will be covered by fee revenue received by the end of the fiscal year. The cash loan shall be subject to the terms and conditions for repayment as may be prescribed by the Department of Finance. Interest charges may be waived pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 16314 of the Government Code. For purposes of the budgetary and legal bases of accounting and budgeting, the principal amount of any loans made pursuant to this provision shall not be considered part of the balance of the fund that receives the loan, nor shall it be deducted from the balance of the fund from which the loan is made. These loans are considered cashflow loans for temporary cash shortages and shall not constitute budgetary loans, revenues, or expenditures. The Department of Finance shall make the final determination of the budgetary and accounting transactions and treatments to ensure proper implementation of this provision pursuant to Section 13344 of the Government Code. 4. The amount appropriated in Program 3571 shall be used to administer Sections 1110 to 1114, inclusive, of the Water Code for operation of the Administrative Hearings Office. 3940-001-3160—For support of State Water Resources Control Board, payable from the Wastewater Operator Certification Fund ........................ 1,334,000 Schedule: (1) 3560-Water Quality ........................ 1,334,000 3940-001-3212—For support of State Water Resources Control Board, payable from the Timber Regulation and Forest Restoration Fund ........................ 5,423,000 Schedule: (1) 3560-Water Quality ........................ 5,423,000 3940-001-3237—For support of State Water Resources Control Board, payable from the Cost of Implementation Account, Air Pollution Control Fund ........................ 761,000 Schedule: (1) 3560-Water Quality ........................ 761,000 3940-001-3264—For support of State Water Resources Control Board, payable from the Site Cleanup Subaccount ........................ 4,462,000 Schedule: (1) 3560-Water Quality ........................ 4,462,000 3940-001-6083—For support of State Water Resources Control Board, payable from the Water Quality, Supply, and Infrastructure Improvement Fund of 2014 ........................ 1,642,000 Schedule: (1) 3560-Water Quality ........................ 1,642,000 3940-001-6088—For support of State Water Resources Control Board, payable from the California Drought, Water, Parks, Climate, Coastal Protection, and Outdoor Access For All Fund ........................ 1,662,000 Schedule: (1) 3560-Water Quality ........................ 1,662,000 3940-001-6093—For support of State Water Resources Control Board, payable from the Safe Drinking Water, Wildfire Prevention, Drought Preparedness, and Clean Air Fund ........................ 2,604,000 Schedule: (1) 3560-Water Quality ........................ 2,604,000 3940-001-8026—For support of State Water Resources Control Board, payable from the Petroleum Underground Storage Tank Financing Account ........................ 734,000 Schedule: (1) 3560-Water Quality ........................ 734,000 3940-001-8110—For support of State Water Resources Control Board, payable from the Water Data Administration Fund ........................ 289,000 Schedule: (1) 3560-Water Quality ........................ 289,000 3940-001-9739—For support of State Water Resources Control Board, payable from the State Water Pollution Control Revolving Fund Administration Fund ........................ 15,853,000 Schedule: (1) 3560-Water Quality ........................ 15,853,000 3940-001-9755—For support of State Water Resources Control Board, payable from the Safe Drinking Water State Revolving Fund Administration Fund ........................ 3,500,000 Schedule: (1) 3560-Water Quality ........................ 3,500,000 3940-002-6093—For support of State Water Resources Control Board, payable from the Safe Drinking Water, Wildfire Prevention, Drought Preparedness, and Clean Air Fund ........................ 475,000 Schedule: (1) 3560-Water Quality ........................ 475,000 3940-003-6093—For support of State Water Resources Control Board, payable from the Safe Drinking Water, Wildfire Prevention, Drought Preparedness, and Clean Air Fund ........................ 3,400,000 Schedule: (1) 3560-Water Quality ........................ 3,400,000 3940-004-6093—For support of State Water Resources Control Board, payable from the Safe Drinking Water, Wildfire Prevention, Drought Preparedness, and Clean Air Fund ........................ 50,000 Schedule: (1) 3570-Water Rights ........................ 50,000 3940-005-0001—For support of State Water Resources Control Board ........................ 12,620,000 Schedule: (2) 3570-Water Rights ........................ 12,620,000 3940-005-6093—For support of State Water Resources Control Board, payable from the Safe Drinking Water, Wildfire Prevention, Drought Preparedness, and Clean Air Fund ........................ 1,400,000 Schedule: (1) 3560-Water Quality ........................ 1,400,000 3940-006-6093—For support of State Water Resources Control Board, payable from the Safe Drinking Water, Wildfire Prevention, Drought Preparedness, and Clean Air Fund ........................ 675,000 Schedule: (1) 3560-Water Quality ........................ 675,000 3940-101-0001—For local assistance, State Water Resources Control Board ........................ 50,000 Schedule: (1) 3560-Water Quality ........................ 50,000 Provisions: 1. The amount appropriated in this item shall be used consistent with Section 116090.7 of the Health and Safety Code. 3940-101-0193—For local assistance, State Water Resources Control Board, payable from the Waste Discharge Permit Fund ........................ 1,800,000 Schedule: (1) 3560-Water Quality ........................ 1,800,000 3940-101-0439—For local assistance, State Water Resources Control Board, payable from the Underground Storage Tank Cleanup Fund ........................ 80,899,000 Schedule: (1) 3560-Water Quality ........................ 80,899,000 Provisions: 1. The amount appropriated in this item shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2029, and liquidation through June 30, 2032. 3940-101-3147—For local assistance, State Water Resources Control Board, payable from the State Water Pollution Control Revolving Fund Small Community Grant Fund ........................ 8,000,000 Schedule: (1) 3560-Water Quality ........................ 8,000,000 Provisions: 1. The funds appropriated in this item shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure through June 30, 2029. 3940-101-3264—For local assistance, State Water Resources Control Board, payable from the Site Cleanup Subaccount ........................ 40,000,000 Schedule: (1) 3560-Water Quality ........................ 40,000,000 Provisions: 1. The funds appropriated in this item shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure through June 30, 2029, and liquidation through June 30, 2032. 3940-101-6083—For local assistance, State Water Resources Control Board, payable from the Water Quality, Supply, and Infrastructure Improvement Fund of 2014 ........................ 32,100,000 Schedule: (1) 3560-Water Quality ........................ 32,100,000 3940-101-8026—For local assistance, State Water Resources Control Board, payable from the Petroleum Underground Storage Tank Financing Account ........................ 19,643,000 Schedule: (1) 3560-Water Quality ........................ 19,643,000 Provisions: 1. The funds appropriated in this item shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure through June 30, 2029, and liquidation of encumbrances through June 30, 2032. 3940-102-0001—For local assistance, State Water Resources Control Board ........................ 1,000,000 Schedule: (1) 3560-Water Quality ........................ 1,000,000 Provisions: 1. $1,000,000 shall be available to the State Water Resources Control Board to support tribes and nongovernmental organizations in conducting 6PPD-quinone (6PPD-q) sampling in the North Coast (Region 1), the Central Coast (Region 3), and the Central Valley (Region 5). 3940-490—Reappropriation, State Water Resources Control Board. Notwithstanding any other law, the period to liquidate encumbrances of the appropriations in the following citations is extended to June 30, 2028. 3398—California Emergency Relief Fund (1) Paragraph (2) of subdivision (c) of Section 35 of Chapter 574 of the Statutes of 2022, for water rights data modernization. 3960-001-0014—For support of Department of Toxic Substances Control, payable from the Hazardous Waste Control Account ........................ 96,451,000 Schedule: (1) 3620011-Other Site Mitigation Activities ........................ 0 (2) 3625-Hazardous Waste Management ........................ 96,220,000 (3) 3626-Hazardous Waste Facilities ........................ 2,024,000 (4) 3650-Board of Environmental Safety ........................ 1,805,000 (5) 9900100-Administration ........................ 58,607,000 (6) 9900200-Administration—​Distributed ........................ −58,607,000 (7) Reimbursements to 3625-Hazardous Waste Management ........................ −3,598,000 Provisions: 1. Positions approved under this item or any other actions of the Department of Toxic Substances Control shall not be used to investigate or work on a sale, lease, or other transfer of control of land at Santa Susana Field Laboratory until the Director of Toxic Substances Control certifies that the cleanups specified in the Administrative Orders on Consent signed on December 6, 2010, for that portion of Santa Susana Field Laboratory, have been completed and the requirements of Section 79465 of the Health and Safety Code, are met. 3960-001-0018—For support of Department of Toxic Substances Control, payable from the Site Remediation Account ........................ 40,200,000 Schedule: (1) 3620011-Other Site Mitigation Activities ........................ 40,200,000 Provisions: 1. The amount appropriated in this item includes revenues derived from the assessment of fines and penalties imposed as specified in Section 13332.18 of the Government Code. 2. The Director of Toxic Substances Control shall report, in writing, not later than 180 days after the end of the fiscal year to the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, the chairpersons of the legislative fiscal committees that act on the department’s budget, the Chairperson of the Assembly Committee on Environmental Safety and Toxic Materials, and the Chairperson of the Senate Committee on Environmental Quality, actions funded by this item. 3. This appropriation shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure in accordance with the provisions of Section 78265 of the Health and Safety Code. 3960-001-0028—For support of Department of Toxic Substances Control, payable from the Unified Program Account ........................ 1,258,000 Schedule: (1) 3625-Hazardous Waste Management ........................ 1,258,000 3960-001-0065—For support of Department of Toxic Substances Control, payable from the Illegal Drug Lab Cleanup Account ........................ 684,000 Schedule: (1) 3620011-Other Site Mitigation Activities ........................ 684,000 3960-001-0080—For support of Department of Toxic Substances Control, payable from the Childhood Lead Poisoning Prevention Fund ........................ 61,000 Schedule: (1) 3630-Safer Consumer Products ........................ 61,000 3960-001-0100—For support of Department of Toxic Substances Control, payable from the California Used Oil Recycling Fund ........................ 471,000 Schedule: (1) 3625-Hazardous Waste Management ........................ 471,000 3960-001-0106—For support of Department of Toxic Substances Control, payable from the Department of Pesticide Regulation Fund ........................ 52,000 Schedule: (1) 3630-Safer Consumer Products ........................ 52,000 3960-001-0115—For support of Department of Toxic Substances Control, payable from the Air Pollution Control Fund ........................ 54,000 Schedule: (1) 3630-Safer Consumer Products ........................ 54,000 3960-001-0557—For support of Department of Toxic Substances Control, payable from the Toxic Substances Control Account ........................ 165,542,000 Schedule: (1) 3620011-Other Site Mitigation Activities ........................ 113,196,000 (2) 3625-Hazardous Waste Management ........................ 555,000 (3) 3630-Safer Consumer Products ........................ 27,079,000 (4) 3645-Exide Technologies Facility Contamination Cleanup ........................ 50,029,000 (5) 3650-Board of Environmental Safety ........................ 1,805,000 (6) Reimbursements to 3620011-Other Site Mitigation Activities ........................ −26,805,000 (7) Reimbursements to 3630-Safer Consumer Products ........................ −317,000 Provisions: 1. The amount appropriated in this item includes revenues derived from the assessment of fines and penalties imposed as specified in Section 13332.18 of the Government Code. 2. The amount appropriated in this item includes state oversight costs at military installations. The expenditure of these funds shall not relieve the federal government of the responsibility to pay for all state oversight costs. The Department of Toxic Substances Control shall take all steps necessary to recover these costs from the federal government, including, but not limited to, filing civil actions authorized by state and federal law. 3. The funds appropriated in Schedule (4) shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2030, for any of the following: (a) Activities related to the cleanup and investigation of properties contaminated with lead in the communities surrounding the Exide Technologies facility in the City of Vernon, California. (b) Notwithstanding Section 25173.6 of the Health and Safety Code, job training activities related to the cleanup and investigation of the properties contaminated with lead in the communities surrounding the Exide Technologies facility in the City of Vernon, California. (c) Actions taken to pursue all available remedies against potentially responsible parties, including, but not limited to, cost recovery actions against entities that are potentially responsible for the costs related to the cleanup and investigation of properties contaminated with lead in the communities surrounding the Exide Technologies facility in the City of Vernon, California. 3960-001-0890—For support of Department of Toxic Substances Control, payable from the Federal Trust Fund ........................ 34,476,000 Schedule: (1) 3620011-Other Site Mitigation Activities ........................ 23,685,000 (2) 3625-Hazardous Waste Management ........................ 5,519,000 (3) 3626-Hazardous Waste Facilities ........................ 4,793,000 (4) 3630-Safer Consumer Products ........................ 479,000 Provisions: 1. Upon receipt of the federal Revolving Fund Grant, the Department of Toxic Substances Control is authorized to make loans and grants as authorized under federal regulations and in accordance with all applicable federal laws and guidelines. 3960-001-1033—For support of Department of Toxic Substances Control, payable from the Hazardous Waste Facilities Account, Hazardous Waste Control Account ........................ 7,834,000 Schedule: (1) 3626-Hazardous Waste Facilities ........................ 7,834,000 3960-001-1034—For support of Department of Toxic Substances Control, payable from the Metal Shredding Facility Subaccount, Hazardous Waste Control Account ........................ 2,169,000 Schedule: (1) 3626-Hazardous Waste Facilities ........................ 2,169,000 3960-001-3065—For support of Department of Toxic Substances Control, payable from the Electronic Waste Recovery and Recycling Account ........................ 3,002,000 Schedule: (1) 3625-Hazardous Waste Management ........................ 3,002,000 3960-001-3084—For support of Department of Toxic Substances Control, payable from the State Certified Unified Program Agency Account ........................ 2,444,000 Schedule: (1) 3635-State Certified Unified Program Agency ........................ 2,444,000 Provisions: 1. The amount appropriated in this item includes revenues derived from the assessment of fines and penalties imposed as specified in Section 13332.18 of the Government Code. 3960-001-3114—For support of Department of Toxic Substances Control, payable from the Birth Defects Monitoring Program Fund ........................ 77,000 Schedule: (1) 3630-Safer Consumer Products ........................ 77,000 3960-001-3301—For support of Department of Toxic Substances Control, payable from the Lead-Acid Battery Cleanup Fund ........................ 34,768,000 Schedule: (1) 3620011-Other Site Mitigation Activities ........................ 13,624,000 (2) 3645-Exide Technologies Facility Contamination Cleanup ........................ 21,144,000 Provisions: 1. By March 1, annually, the Department of Toxic Substances Control shall provide to the Chairperson and the Vice Chairperson of Senate Budget Subcommittee No. 2 and Assembly Budget Subcommittee No. 3 a report on the department’s progress towards implementing provisions of the Lead-Acid Battery Recycling Act of 2016 (Ch. 666, Stats. 2016). The report shall include a list of all sites that: (a) have been identified as potentially meeting the definition of a lead-acid battery recycling facility, as defined in subdivision (g) of Section 25215.1 of the Health and Safety Code, (b) have been investigated to determine if they qualify as lead-acid battery recycling facilities that require cleanup along with a summary of the results of those investigations, (c) are pending investigation, and (d) have been evaluated for lead contamination, along with a summary of those evaluations. 1.1. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (2), $21,144,000 shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2030, for any of the following: (a) Activities related to the cleanup and investigation of properties contaminated with lead in the communities surrounding the Exide Technologies facility in the City of Vernon, California. (b) Notwithstanding Section 25173.6 of the Health and Safety Code, job training activities related to the cleanup and investigation of the properties contaminated with lead in the communities surrounding the Exide Technologies facility in the City of Vernon, California. (c) Actions taken to pursue all available remedies against potentially responsible parties, including, but not limited to, cost recovery actions against entities that are potentially responsible for the costs related to the cleanup and investigation of properties contaminated with lead in the communities surrounding the Exide Technologies facility in the City of Vernon, California. (d) Activities related to the oversight or performance of closure activities and response and corrective actions to protect public health and the environment from hazardous substances and hazardous waste at or from the former Exide Technologies lead-acid battery recycling facility in the City of Vernon, California. 3960-001-3390—For support of the Department of Toxic Substances Control, payable from the Mercury Thermostat Collection Program Fund ........................ 307,000 Schedule: (1) 3625-Hazardous Waste Management ........................ 307,000 3960-001-3416—For support of Department of Toxic Substances Control, payable from the Covered Battery Recycling Fund Account ........................ 216,000 Schedule: (1) 3625-Hazardous Waste Management ........................ 216,000 3960-001-3483—For support of Department of Toxic Substances Control, payable from the PFAS Enforcement Fund ........................ 1,840,000 Schedule: (1) 3630-Safer Consumer Products ........................ 1,840,000 3960-001-3484—For support of Department of Toxic Substances Control, payable from the T.A.M.P.O.N. Act Fund ........................ 734,000 Schedule: (1) 3630-Safer Consumer Products ........................ 734,000 3960-002-0001—For support of Department of Toxic Substances Control ........................ 16,484,000 Schedule: (1) 3620010-Stringfellow Removal Remedial Action ........................ 4,736,000 (2) 3620011-Other Site Mitigation Activities ........................ 11,748,000 Provisions: 1. The funds appropriated in this item shall be for the following activities at the federal Stringfellow Superfund site: (a) operation and maintenance of pretreatment plants to treat contaminated groundwater extracted from the site, (b) site maintenance and groundwater monitoring, and (c) implementation of work to stabilize the site. 2. Notwithstanding any other law, the funds appropriated for removal and remedial action at the federal Stringfellow Superfund site shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2030. 3960-004-0001—For support of Department of Toxic Substances Control ........................ 7,550,000 Schedule: (1) 3620011-Other Site Mitigation Activities ........................ 7,550,000 Provisions: 1. The Director of Toxic Substances Control shall send a letter notifying the chairpersons of the fiscal committees of each house of the Legislature that act on the department’s budget and the Legislative Analyst’s Office on a quarterly basis with the amounts of any moneys received from potentially responsible parties for the BKK Landfill. 2. Notwithstanding any other law, the funds appropriated for the BKK Landfill shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2028 and for liquidation until June 30, 2030. 3960-011-0001—For transfer by the Controller to the Toxic Substances Control Account ........................ (50,000,000) Provisions: 1. The Department of Finance may transfer, until June 30, 2030, up to $50,000,000 as a loan from the General Fund to the Toxic Substances Control Account for the Toxic Substances Control Account to use for any of the following purposes: (a) Activities related to the cleanup and investigation of properties contaminated with lead in the communities surrounding the Exide Technologies facility in the City of Vernon, California. (b) Notwithstanding Section 25173.6 of the Health and Safety Code, job training activities related to the cleanup and investigation of the properties contaminated with lead in the communities surrounding the Exide Technologies facility in the City of Vernon, California. (c) Actions taken to pursue all available remedies against potentially responsible parties, including, but not limited to, cost recovery actions against entities that are potentially responsible, for the costs related to the cleanup and investigation of properties contaminated with lead in the communities surrounding the Exide Technologies facility in the City of Vernon, California. 3960-011-0294—For transfer by the Controller from the Removal and Remedial Action Account in the Hazardous Substance Account to the Toxic Substances Control Account ........................ (800,000) Provisions: 1. Notwithstanding any other law, upon request of the Department of Toxic Substances Control, the Controller shall transfer those funds deposited in the Removal and Remedial Action Subaccount in the Hazardous Substance Account to the Toxic Substances Control Account in an amount sufficient to fund the department’s costs of providing oversight to sites with deposits in the subaccount for removal and remedial action. The amount of funds transferred for the oversight of a given site shall not exceed the amount deposited in the subaccount for removal and remedial action pursuant to the settlement for that specific site. 3960-011-0458—For transfer by the Controller from the Site Operation and Maintenance Account, Hazardous Substances Account to the Toxic Substances Control Account ........................ (140,000) Provisions: 1. Notwithstanding any other law, upon request of the Department of Toxic Substances Control, the Controller shall transfer funds from the Site Operation and Maintenance Account, Hazardous Substances Account to the Toxic Substances Control Account in an amount sufficient to fund the department’s costs of providing oversight for sites requiring long-term operation and maintenance. The amount of this transfer can be increased or decreased based on the department’s actual costs. The amount of funds transferred for the oversight shall not exceed the amount deposited in the Site Operation and Maintenance Account. 3960-011-0557—For transfer by the Controller from the Toxic Substances Control Account to the PFAS Enforcement Fund Account ........................ (1,840,000) Provisions: 1. The Department of Finance may transfer up to $1,840,000 as a loan to the PFAS Enforcement Fund. The Department of Finance shall order the repayment of all or a portion of this loan if it determines that either of the following circumstances exists: (a) the fund or account from which the loan was made has a need for the moneys, or (b) there is no longer a need for the moneys in the fund or account that received the loan. This loan shall be repaid with the interest calculated at the rate earned by the Pooled Money Investment Account at that time of transfer. 2. The Department of Finance may adjust the amount of the loan in this item annually, as necessary, for negotiated employee compensation and benefit adjustments. 3960-011-1003—For transfer by the Controller from the Cleanup Loans and Environmental Assistance to Neighborhoods Account to the Toxic Substances Control Account ........................ (40,000) Provisions: 1. Notwithstanding any other law, upon request of the Department of Toxic Substances Control, the Controller shall transfer funds from the Cleanup Loans and Environmental Assistance to Neighborhoods Account to the Toxic Substances Control Account in an amount sufficient to fund the department’s costs for its oversight of Cleanup Loans and Environmental Assistance to Neighborhoods loan projects, provided that sufficient funds are available for those purposes. The amount of this transfer can be increased or decreased based on the department’s actual costs. The amount of funds transferred for the oversight shall not exceed the amount deposited in the Site Operation and Maintenance Account. 3960-012-0557—For transfer by the Controller from the Toxic Substances Control Account to the Site Remediation Account ........................ (40,200,000) 3960-013-0557—For transfer by the Controller from the Toxic Substances Control Account to the T.A.M.P.O.N. Act Fund Account ........................ (734,000) Provisions: 1. The Department of Finance may transfer up to $734,000 as a loan to the T.A.M.P.O.N. Act Fund. The Department of Finance shall order the repayment of all or a portion of this loan if it determines that either of the following circumstances exists: (a) the fund or account from which the loan was made has a need for the moneys, or (b) there is no longer a need for the moneys in the fund or account that received the loan. This loan shall be repaid with the interest calculated at the rate earned by the Pooled Money Investment Account at that time of transfer. 2. The Department of Finance may adjust the amount of the loan in this item annually, as necessary, for negotiated employee compensation and benefit adjustments. 3960-014-0001—For transfer by the Controller to the Toxic Substances Control Account ........................ 425,000 3960-093-0001—For support of Department of Toxic Substances Control, for rental payments on lease-revenue bonds ........................ 3,126,000 Schedule: (1) 3620011-Other Site Mitigation Activities ........................ 3,126,000 Provisions: 1. The Controller shall transfer funds appropriated in this item for base rental as and when provided for in the schedule submitted by the State Public Works Board. Notwithstanding the payment dates in any related facility lease or indenture, the schedule may provide for an earlier transfer of funds to ensure debt requirements are met and pay base rental in full when due. 2. The Controller shall transfer for additional rental no later than 30 days after enactment of this budget, $38,000 of the amount appropriated in this item, to the Expense Account in the Public Buildings Construction Fund. 3. This item may be adjusted pursuant to Section 4.30. Any adjustments to this item shall be reported to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee pursuant to Section 4.30. 3960-101-0890—For local assistance, Department of Toxic Substances Control, payable from the Federal Trust Fund ........................ 306,000 Schedule: (1) 3620011-Other Site Mitigation Activities ........................ 220,000 (2) 3625-Hazardous Waste Management ........................ 86,000 Provisions: 1. Upon receipt of the federal Revolving Fund Grant, the Department of Toxic Substances Control is authorized to make loans and grants as authorized under federal regulations in accordance with all applicable federal laws and guidelines. 3960-490—Reappropriation, Department of Toxic Substances Control. The amounts specified in the following citations are reappropriated for the purposes provided for in those appropriations and shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2028: 0001—​General Fund (1) Up to $6,000,000 of the amount appropriated in Schedule (1) of Item 3960-001-0001, Budget Act of 2025, (Chs. 4 and 5, Stats. 2025) for BKK landfill. 3301—​Lead-Acid Battery Cleanup Fund (1) Up to $3,000,000 of the amount appropriated in Item 3960-001-3301, Budget Act of 2024 (Chs. 22, 35, and 994, Stats. 2024) including, but not limited to, the funding transferred for administrative costs per Provision 9. 0557—Toxic Substances Control Account (1) Up to $104,000 of the amount appropriated in subparagraph (C) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 106 of Chapter 73 of the Statutes of 2021, as transferred to technical item 3960-501-0557, to remediate properties contaminated with lead in the communities surrounding the former Exide Technologies facility. 3970-001-0001—For support of Department of Resources Recycling and Recovery ........................ 7,045,000 Schedule: (1) 3700-Waste Reduction and Management ........................ 7,045,000 3970-001-0100—For support of Department of Resources Recycling and Recovery, payable from the California Used Oil Recycling Fund ........................ 4,722,000 Schedule: (1) 3700-Waste Reduction and Management ........................ 4,722,000 Provisions: 1. Notwithstanding subdivision (e) of Section 48653 of the Public Resources Code, the aggregate of appropriations from the California Used Oil Recycling Fund may exceed $3,000,000 during the 2026–27 fiscal year. 3970-001-0106—For support of Department of Resources Recycling and Recovery, payable from the Department of Pesticide Regulation Fund ........................ 87,000 Schedule: (1) 3710-Education and Environment Initiative ........................ 87,000 3970-001-0133—For support of Department of Resources Recycling and Recovery, payable from the California Beverage Container Recycling Fund ........................ 64,127,000 Schedule: (2) 3715-Beverage Container Recycling and Litter Reduction ........................ 64,221,000 (3) 9900100-Administration ........................ 21,768,000 (4) 9900200-Administration—​Distributed ........................ −21,768,000 (5) Reimbursements to 3715-Beverage Container Recycling and Litter Reduction ........................ −94,000 Provisions: 1. Notwithstanding any other law, upon approval and order of the Department of Finance, the Department of Resources Recycling and Recovery may borrow sufficient funds for cashflow needs from special funds that otherwise provide support for the department. Any such loans are to be repaid with interest at the rate earned in the Pooled Money Investment Account. 2. Upon the order of the Department of Finance, the Department of Resources Recycling and Recovery may borrow sufficient funds from the General Fund for cashflow needs of the Beverage Container Recycling Fund. A cashflow loan made pursuant to this provision shall be short term and shall not constitute General Fund expenditures. A cashflow loan and the repayment of a cashflow loan shall not affect the General Fund reserve. Interest shall be charged at the rate earned by moneys in the Pooled Money Investment Account. 3970-001-0193—For support of Department of Resources Recycling and Recovery, payable from the Waste Discharge Permit Fund ........................ 478,000 Schedule: (1) 3710-Education and Environment Initiative ........................ 478,000 3970-001-0226—For support of Department of Resources Recycling and Recovery, payable from the California Tire Recycling Management Fund ........................ 29,223,000 Schedule: (1) 3700-Waste Reduction and Management ........................ 29,223,000 Provisions: 1. The amount appropriated in this item includes revenues derived from the assessment of fines and penalties imposed as specified in Section 13332.18 of the Government Code. 2. Notwithstanding Section 42889 of the Public Resources Code, expenditures for administration of the Tire Recycling Program may exceed the limits set forth in subdivisions (a) and (b) of Section 42889 of the Public Resources Code. 3. Grant funds under the five-year plan specified in Section 42885.5 of the Public Resources Code shall be available for expenditure until June 30, 2028. 4. Notwithstanding any other law, upon approval and order of the Department of Finance, the Department of Resources Recycling and Recovery may borrow sufficient funds for cashflow needs from special funds that otherwise provide support for the department. Any such loans are to be repaid with interest at the rate earned in the Pooled Money Investment Account. 5. Of the amount appropriated in this item, up to $2,000,000 shall be made available to the Department of Parks and Recreation for the removal of sediment and debris in the Tijuana Estuary and the Border Field State Park. 3970-001-0281—For support of Department of Resources Recycling and Recovery, payable from the Recycling Market Development Revolving Loan Subaccount, Integrated Waste Management Account ........................ 1,501,000 Schedule: (1) 3700-Waste Reduction and Management ........................ 1,501,000 3970-001-0386—For support of Department of Resources Recycling and Recovery, payable from the Solid Waste Disposal Site Cleanup Trust Fund ........................ 847,000 Schedule: (1) 3700-Waste Reduction and Management ........................ 847,000 Provisions: 1. Notwithstanding Section 48020 of the Public Resources Code, expenditures for administration of the Solid Waste Disposal Site and Codisposal Site Cleanup Program may exceed the limits set forth in subdivision (c) of Section 48020 of the Public Resources Code. 3970-001-0387—For support of Department of Resources Recycling and Recovery, payable from the Integrated Waste Management Account, Integrated Waste Management Fund ........................ 51,014,000 Schedule: (1) 3700-Waste Reduction and Management ........................ 49,649,000 (2) 3710-Education and Environment Initiative ........................ 2,172,000 (3) Reimbursements to 3700-Waste Reduction and Management ........................ −807,000 Provisions: 1. The amount appropriated in this item includes revenues derived from the assessment of fines and penalties imposed as specified in Section 13332.18 of the Government Code. 2. Notwithstanding any other law, upon approval and order of the Department of Finance, the Department of Resources Recycling and Recovery may borrow sufficient funds for cashflow needs from special funds that otherwise provide support for the department. Any such loans are to be repaid with interest at the rate earned in the Pooled Money Investment Account. 3970-001-0558—For support of Department of Resources Recycling and Recovery, payable from the Farm and Ranch Solid Waste Cleanup and Abatement Account ........................ 989,000 Schedule: (1) 3700-Waste Reduction and Management ........................ 989,000 Provisions: 1. Notwithstanding Section 48100 of the Public Resources Code, expenditures for administration of the Farm and Ranch Solid Waste Cleanup and Abatement Grant Program may exceed the limits set forth in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (c) of Section 48100 of the Public Resources Code. 2. The amount appropriated in this item shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2028. 3970-001-0679—For support of Department of Resources Recycling and Recovery, payable from the State Water Quality Control Fund ........................ 763,000 Schedule: (1) 3710-Education and Environment Initiative ........................ 763,000 Provisions: 1. The amount appropriated in this item includes revenues derived from the assessment of fines and penalties imposed as specified in Section 13332.18 of the Government Code. 3970-001-3024—For support of Department of Resources Recycling and Recovery, payable from the Rigid Container Account, Integrated Waste Management Fund ........................ 153,000 Schedule: (1) 3700-Waste Reduction and Management ........................ 153,000 3970-001-3065—For support of Department of Resources Recycling and Recovery, payable from the Electronic Waste Recovery and Recycling Account, Integrated Waste Management Fund ........................ 7,357,000 Schedule: (1) 3700-Waste Reduction and Management ........................ 7,357,000 Provisions: 1. Notwithstanding any other law, upon approval and order of the Department of Finance, the Department of Resources Recycling and Recovery may borrow sufficient funds for cashflow needs from special funds that otherwise provide support for the Department of Resources Recycling and Recovery. Any such loans are to be repaid with interest at the rate earned in the Pooled Money Investment Account. 3970-001-3195—For support of Department of Resources Recycling and Recovery, payable from the Carpet Stewardship Account, Integrated Waste Management Fund ........................ 558,000 Schedule: (1) 3700-Waste Reduction and Management ........................ 558,000 Provisions: 1. Notwithstanding any other law, the Department of Finance may authorize expenditures for the Department of Resources Recycling and Recovery in excess of the amount appropriated in this item by a cumulative total through June 30, 2028, not to exceed $336,000. The Department of Finance shall notify the Legislature within 10 days of authorizing an augmentation pursuant to this provision. The 10-day notification to the Legislature shall describe the reason for the augmentation and the fiscal assumptions used. 3970-001-3202—For support of Department of Resources Recycling and Recovery, payable from the Architectural Paint Stewardship Account, Integrated Waste Management Fund ........................ 1,139,000 Schedule: (1) 3700-Waste Reduction and Management ........................ 1,139,000 Provisions: 1. Notwithstanding any other law, the Department of Finance may authorize expenditures for the Department of Resources Recycling and Recovery in excess of the amount appropriated in this item by a cumulative total through June 30, 2028, not to exceed $227,000. The Department of Finance shall notify the Legislature within 10 days of authorizing an augmentation pursuant to this provision. The 10-day notification to the Legislature shall describe the reason for the augmentation and the fiscal assumptions used. 3970-001-3237—For support of Department of Resources Recycling and Recovery, payable from the Cost of Implementation Account, Air Pollution Control Fund ........................ 2,734,000 Schedule: (1) 3700-Waste Reduction and Management ........................ 2,734,000 3970-001-3257—For support of Department of Resources Recycling and Recovery, payable from the Used Mattress Recycling Fund ........................ 32,000 Schedule: (1) 3700-Waste Reduction and Management ........................ 1,175,000 (2) Reimbursements to 3700-Waste Reduction and Management ........................ −1,143,000 3970-001-3328—For support of Department of Resources Recycling and Recovery, payable from the Pharmaceutical and Sharps Stewardship Fund ........................ 2,103,000 Schedule: (1) 3700-Waste Reduction and Management ........................ 2,103,000 3970-001-3408—For support of Department of Resources Recycling and Recovery, payable from the California Circular Economy Fund ........................ 9,684,000 Schedule: (1) 3700-Waste Reduction and Management ........................ 9,684,000 Provisions: 1. These funds shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2028. 3970-001-3416—For support of Department of Resources Recycling and Recovery, payable from the Covered Battery Recycling Fund ........................ 2,729,000 Schedule: (1) 3700-Waste Reduction and Management ........................ 2,729,000 3970-001-3418—For support of Department of Resources Recycling and Recovery, payable from the Covered Battery-Embedded Waste Recycling Fee Subaccount ........................ 2,043,000 Schedule: (1) 3700-Waste Reduction and Management ........................ 2,043,000 3970-001-3450—For support of Department of Resources Recycling and Recovery, payable from the Textile Stewardship Recovery Fund ........................ 3,257,000 Schedule: (1) 3700-Waste Reduction and Management ........................ 3,257,000 3970-001-8020—For support of Department of Resources Recycling and Recovery, payable from the Environmental Education Account ........................ 580,000 Schedule: (1) 3710-Education and Environment Initiative ........................ 580,000 Provisions: 1. The funding appropriated and available for expenditure in this item is limited to the amount of funding received in the Environmental Education Account established by Section 71305 of the Public Resources Code. 2. Notwithstanding any other law, upon the request of the Director of the Department of Resources Recycling and Recovery, the Director of Finance may authorize expenditures of up to $5,000,000 in excess of the amount appropriated in this item, if sufficient funds are available in the Environmental Education Account, to pay for the costs associated with the program described in Part 4 (commencing with Section 71300) of Division 34 of the Public Resources Code, not sooner than 30 days after notification in writing of the necessity therefor is provided to the chairpersons of the committees in each house of the Legislature that consider appropriations and the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee. 3970-001-9747—For support of Department of Resources Recycling and Recovery, payable from the Greenhouse Gas Reduction Revolving Loan Fund ........................ 154,000 Schedule: (1) 3700-Waste Reduction and Management ........................ 154,000 3970-011-0100—For transfer by the Controller from the California Used Oil Recycling Fund to the Farm and Ranch Solid Waste Cleanup and Abatement Account pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) of Section 48653 of the Public Resources Code ........................ (266,000) 3970-011-0133—For transfer by the Controller, upon order of the Department of Finance, from the Beverage Container Recycling Fund to the California Circular Economy Fund as a loan ........................ (10,499,000) Provisions: 1. The Department of Finance may transfer up to $10,499,000 as a loan to the California Circular Economy Fund. The Department of Finance shall order the repayment of all or a portion of the loan, from either the California Circular Economy Fund or the General Fund, if the department determines that either of the following circumstances exists: (a) the fund or account from which the loan was made has a need for the moneys, including, but not limited to, the potential for proportional reduction in payments pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 14581 of the Public Resources Code, or (b) there is no longer a need for the moneys in the fund or account that received the loan. This loan shall be repaid with interest calculated at the rate earned by the Pooled Money Investment Account at the time of transfer, no later than June 30, 2030. 3970-011-0226—For transfer by the Controller from the California Tire Recycling Management Fund to the Farm and Ranch Solid Waste Cleanup and Abatement Account pursuant to paragraph (10) of subdivision (b) of Section 42889 of the Public Resources Code ........................ (400,000) 3970-011-0387—For transfer by the Controller from the Integrated Waste Management Account, Integrated Waste Management Fund to the Farm and Ranch Solid Waste Cleanup and Abatement Account pursuant to subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (c) of Section 48100 of the Public Resources Code ........................ (334,000) 3970-011-3065—For transfer by the Controller, upon order of the Department of Finance, from the Electronic Waste Recovery and Recycling Account, Integrated Waste Management Fund, to the Pharmaceutical and Sharps Stewardship Fund ........................ (2,430,000) Provisions: 1. The Department of Finance may transfer up to $2,430,000 as a loan to the Pharmaceutical and Sharps Stewardship Fund. The Department of Finance shall order the repayment of all or a portion of this loan if it determines that either of the following circumstances exists: (a) the fund or account from which the loan was made has a need for the moneys, or (b) there is no longer a need for the moneys in the fund or account that received the loan. This loan shall be repaid with the interest calculated at the rate earned by the Pooled Money Investment Account at that time of transfer. 3970-012-0133—For transfer by the Controller, upon order of the Department of Finance, from the California Beverage Container Recycling Fund, to the Textile Stewardship Recovery Fund ........................ (1,629,000) Provisions: 1. Notwithstanding any other law, the Department of Finance may transfer up to $1,629,000 as a loan to the Textile Stewardship Recovery Fund. The Department of Finance shall order the repayment of all or a portion of this loan if the department determines that either of the following circumstances exists: (a) the fund or account from which the loan was made has a need for the moneys, including, but not limited to, the potential for proportional reduction in payments pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 14581 of the Public Resources Code, or (b) there is no longer a need for the moneys in the fund or account that received the loan. This loan shall be repaid with interest calculated at the rate earned by the Pooled Money Investment Account at the time of transfer, no later than June 30, 2033. 2. The Department of Finance may adjust the amount of the loan in this item annually, as necessary, for negotiated employee compensation and benefit adjustments. 3970-012-0387—For transfer by the Controller from the Integrated Waste Management Account, Integrated Waste Management Fund, to the Solid Waste Disposal Site Cleanup Trust Fund pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) of Section 48027 of the Public Resources Code ........................ (5,000,000) 3970-013-3065—For transfer by the Controller, upon order of the Department of Finance, from the Electronic Waste Recovery and Recycling Account, Integrated Waste Management Fund, to the Covered Battery-Embedded Waste Recycling Fee Subaccount ........................ (862,000) Provisions: 1. The Department of Finance may transfer up to $862,000 as a loan to the Covered Battery-Embedded Waste Recycling Fee Subaccount. The department shall order the repayment of all or a portion of this loan if it determines that either of the following circumstances exists: (a) the fund or account from which the loan was made has a need for the moneys, or (b) there is no longer a need for the moneys in the fund or account that received the loan. This loan shall be repaid with the interest calculated at the rate earned by the Pooled Money Investment Account at that time of transfer. 3970-014-0133—For transfer by the Controller, upon order of the Department of Finance, from the California Beverage Container Recycling Fund to the California Plastic Pollution Mitigation Fund as a loan ........................ (628,000) Provisions: 1. Notwithstanding any other law, the Department of Finance may transfer up to $628,000 as a loan to the California Plastic Pollution Mitigation Fund. The department shall order the repayment of all or a portion of this loan if the director determines that either of the following circumstances exists: (a) the fund or account from which the loan was made has a need for the moneys, including, but not limited to, the potential for proportional reduction in payments pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 14581 of the Public Resources Code, or (b) there is no longer a need for the moneys in the fund or account that received the loan. This loan shall be repaid with the interest calculated at the rate earned by the Pooled Money Investment Account at that time of transfer. 2. The Department of Finance may adjust the amount of the loan in this item annually, as necessary, for negotiated employee compensation and benefit adjustments. 3970-014-3065—For transfer by the Controller, upon order of the Department of Finance, from the Electronic Waste Recovery and Recycling Account, Integrated Waste Management Fund, to the Textile Stewardship Recovery Fund ........................ (1,628,000) Provisions: 1. Notwithstanding any other law, the Department of Finance may transfer up to $1,628,000 as a loan to the Textile Stewardship Recovery Fund. The Department of Finance shall order the repayment of all or a portion of this loan if the department determines that either of the following circumstances exists: (a) the fund or account from which the loan was made has a need for the moneys, including, but not limited to, the potential for proportional reduction in payments pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 14581 of the Public Resources Code, or (b) there is no longer a need for the moneys in the fund or account that received the loan. This loan shall be repaid with interest calculated at the rate earned by the Pooled Money Investment Account at the time of transfer, no later than June 30, 2033. 2. The Department of Finance may adjust the amount of the loan in this item annually, as necessary, for negotiated employee compensation and benefit adjustments. 3970-101-0133—For local assistance, Department of Resources Recycling and Recovery, payable from the California Beverage Container Recycling Fund ........................ 150,000,000 Schedule: (1) 3715-Beverage Container Recycling and Litter Reduction ........................ 150,000,000 Provisions: 1. Of the funds available in this item, $50,000,000 is available to support rural local jurisdictions in the establishment of California Redemption Value redemption locations and shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2031. 2. Of the funds available in this item, $100,000,000 is available for the Beverage Container Quality Infrastructure Grant Program and shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2029, for support and local assistance. Not more than 5 percent of the amount available for these purposes may be used for administrative costs. 3970-101-0226—For local assistance, Department of Resources Recycling and Recovery, payable from the California Tire Recycling Management Fund ........................ 11,353,000 Schedule: (1) 3700-Waste Reduction and Management ........................ 11,353,000 Provisions: 1. The amount appropriated in this item includes revenues derived from the assessment of fines and penalties imposed as specified in Section 13332.18 of the Government Code. 2. The amount appropriated in this item shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2028. 3. The funds appropriated in this item are available for expenditure for local assistance or support projects. 3970-101-0387—For local assistance, Department of Resources Recycling and Recovery, payable from the Integrated Waste Management Account, Integrated Waste Management Fund ........................ 3,904,000 Schedule: (1) 3700-Waste Reduction and Management ........................ 3,904,000 Provisions: 1. The amount appropriated in this item shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2028, and available for liquidation until June 30, 2031. 3970-103-0100—For local assistance, Department of Resources Recycling and Recovery, payable from the California Used Oil Recycling Fund ........................ 2,000,000 Schedule: (1) 3700-Waste Reduction and Management ........................ 2,000,000 3970-103-0226—For local assistance, Department of Resources Recycling and Recovery, payable from the California Tire Recycling Management Fund ........................ 5,000,000 Schedule: (1) 3700-Waste Reduction and Management ........................ 5,000,000 3970-103-3065—For local assistance, Department of Resources Recycling and Recovery, payable from the Electronic Waste Recovery and Recycling Account, Integrated Waste Management Fund ........................ 8,000,000 Schedule: (1) 3700-Waste Reduction and Management ........................ 8,000,000 3970-490—Reappropriation, Department of Resources Recycling and Recovery. The amounts specified in the following citations are reappropriated for the purposes provided for in the appropriation and shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2029, and for liquidation until June 30, 2031: 0133—Beverage Container Recycling Fund (1) Up to $5,000,000 of Provision 1 of Item 3970-101-0133, Budget Act of 2022 (Chs. 43, 45, and 249, Stats. 2022) for recycling program start-up costs associated with mobile recycling, reverse-vending machines, and bag drop programs. (2) Up to $3,600,000 of Item 3970-101-0133, Budget Act of 2024 (Chs. 22, 35, and 994, Stats. 2024), including, but not limited to, the funding transferred for administrative costs pursuant to Provision 3 of Item 3970-101-0133, Budget Act of 2024 (Chs. 22, 35, and 994, Stats. 2024). 3970-495—Reversion, Department of Resources Recycling and Recovery. As of June 30, 2026, the balances specified below, of the appropriations provided in the following citations shall revert to the balances in the funds from which the appropriations were made. 0133—California Beverage Container Recycling Fund (1) Up to $30,000,000 in Item 3970-101-0133, Budget Act of 2022 (Chs. 43, 45, and 249, Stats. 2022) for the Beverage Container Loan Program. (2) Up to $865,000 in Item 3970-101-0133, Budget Act of 2022 (Chs. 43, 45, and 249, Stats. 2022) for the Workforce Development Program. (3) Up to $1,228,000 in Item 3970-101-0133, Budget Act of 2022 (Chs. 43, 45, and 249, Stats. 2022) for the Beverage Container Quality Infrastructure Grant Program. (4) Up to $18,000,000 in Item 3970-101-0133, Budget Act of 2022 (Chs. 43, 45, and 249, Stats. 2022) for the Reusable Beverage Containers Infrastructure Grant Program. 3980-001-0001—For support of Office of Environmental Health Hazard Assessment ........................ 10,822,000 Schedule: (1) 3730-Health Risk Assessment ........................ 14,931,000 (2) Reimbursements to 3730-Health Risk Assessment ........................ −4,109,000 Provisions: 1. Notwithstanding any other law, the Director of Finance may authorize a loan from the General Fund, in an amount not to exceed 20 percent of reimbursements appropriated in Schedule (2), to the Office of Environmental Health Hazard Assessment, provided that: (a) The loan is to meet cash needs resulting from the delay in receipt of reimbursements for services provided. (b) The loan is for a short term and shall be repaid by September 30 of the fiscal year following that in which the loan was authorized. (c) Interest charges may be waived pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 16314 of the Government Code. 3980-001-0028—For support of Office of Environmental Health Hazard Assessment, payable from the Unified Program Account ........................ 227,000 Schedule: (1) 3730-Health Risk Assessment ........................ 227,000 3980-001-0044—For support of Office of Environmental Health Hazard Assessment, payable from the Motor Vehicle Account, State Transportation Fund ........................ 5,164,000 Schedule: (1) 3730-Health Risk Assessment ........................ 5,164,000 3980-001-0080—For support of Office of Environmental Health Hazard Assessment, payable from the Childhood Lead Poisoning Prevention Fund ........................ 200,000 Schedule: (1) 3730-Health Risk Assessment ........................ 200,000 3980-001-0106—For support of Office of Environmental Health Hazard Assessment, payable from the Department of Pesticide Regulation Fund ........................ 2,907,000 Schedule: (1) 3730-Health Risk Assessment ........................ 2,907,000 3980-001-0115—For support of Office of Environmental Health Hazard Assessment, payable from the Air Pollution Control Fund ........................ 1,288,000 Schedule: (1) 3730-Health Risk Assessment ........................ 1,288,000 Provisions: 1. Of the funds available in this item, $300,000 is available to fund contracting to help address the high cancer risk from air toxics and shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2028. 3980-001-0140—For support of Office of Environmental Health Hazard Assessment, payable from the California Environmental License Plate Fund ........................ 1,239,000 Schedule: (1) 3730-Health Risk Assessment ........................ 1,239,000 3980-001-0320—For support of Office of Environmental Health Hazard Assessment, payable from the Oil Spill Prevention and Administration Fund ........................ 249,000 Schedule: (1) 3730-Health Risk Assessment ........................ 249,000 3980-001-0387—For support of Office of Environmental Health Hazard Assessment, payable from the Integrated Waste Management Account, Integrated Waste Management Fund ........................ 377,000 Schedule: (1) 3730-Health Risk Assessment ........................ 377,000 3980-001-0462—For support of Office of Environmental Health Hazard Assessment, payable from the Public Utilities Commission Utilities Reimbursement Account ........................ 232,000 Schedule: (1) 3730-Health Risk Assessment ........................ 232,000 3980-001-0557—For support of Office of Environmental Health Hazard Assessment, payable from the Toxic Substances Control Account ........................ 305,000 Schedule: (1) 3730-Health Risk Assessment ........................ 305,000 3980-001-3046—For support of Office of Environmental Health Hazard Assessment, payable from the Oil, Gas, and Geothermal Administrative Fund ........................ 317,000 Schedule: (1) 3730-Health Risk Assessment ........................ 317,000 3980-001-3056—For support of Office of Environmental Health Hazard Assessment, payable from the Safe Drinking Water and Toxic Enforcement Fund ........................ 2,521,000 Schedule: (1) 3730-Health Risk Assessment ........................ 2,521,000 Provisions: 1. The amount appropriated in this item includes revenues derived from the assessment of fines and penalties imposed as specified in Section 13332.18 of the Government Code. 3980-001-3114—For support of Office of Environmental Health Hazard Assessment, payable from the Birth Defects Monitoring Program Fund ........................ 191,000 Schedule: (1) 3730-Health Risk Assessment ........................ 191,000 3980-001-3237—For support of Office of Environmental Health Hazard Assessment, payable from the Cost of Implementation Account, Air Pollution Control Fund ........................ 1,203,000 Schedule: (1) 3730-Health Risk Assessment ........................ 1,203,000 HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES 4100-001-0001—For support of State Council on Developmental Disabilities ........................ 0 Schedule: (1) 3810-Regional Offices and Regional Advisory Committees ........................ 6,843,000 (2) Reimbursements to 3810-Regional Offices and Regional Advisory Committees ........................ −6,843,000 4100-001-0890—For support of State Council on Developmental Disabilities, payable from the Federal Trust Fund ........................ 8,904,000 Schedule: (1) 3800-State Council Planning and Administration ........................ 2,875,000 (2) 3805-Community Program Development ........................ 260,000 (3) 3810-Regional Offices and Regional Advisory Committees ........................ 5,769,000 4120-001-0001—For support of Emergency Medical Services Authority ........................ 23,466,00023,987,000 Schedule: (1) 3820-Emergency Medical Services Authority ........................ 30,537,00031,058,000 (2) Reimbursements to 3820-Emergency Medical Services Authority ........................ −7,071,000 Provisions: 1. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (1), $500,000 shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2028, to acquire disaster response vehicles. 2. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (1), $521,000 shall be available to develop and publish a report on allowable maximum rates for ground ambulance transportation services, pursuant to Section 1797.124 of the Health and Safety Code. 4120-001-0194—For support of Emergency Medical Services Authority, payable from the Emergency Medical Services Training Program Approval Fund ........................ 233,000 Schedule: (1) 3820-Emergency Medical Services Authority ........................ 233,000 4120-001-0312—For support of Emergency Medical Services Authority, payable from the Emergency Medical Services Personnel Fund ........................ 3,535,000 Schedule: (1) 3820-Emergency Medical Services Authority ........................ 3,535,000 4120-001-0890—For support of Emergency Medical Services Authority, payable from the Federal Trust Fund ........................ 3,820,000 Schedule: (1) 3820-Emergency Medical Services Authority ........................ 3,820,000 4120-001-3137—For support of Emergency Medical Services Authority, payable from the Emergency Medical Technician Certification Fund ........................ 1,353,000 Schedule: (1) 3820-Emergency Medical Services Authority ........................ 1,353,000 4120-001-3414—For support of Emergency Medical Services Authority, payable from the 988 State Suicide and Behavioral Health Crisis Services Fund ........................ 203,000 Schedule: (1) 3820-Emergency Medical Services Authority ........................ 203,000 4120-101-0001—For local assistance, Emergency Medical Services Authority, grants to local agencies ........................ 11,320,000 Schedule: (1) 3820-Emergency Medical Services Authority ........................ 22,776,000 (2) Reimbursements to 3820-Emergency Medical Services Authority ........................ −11,456,000 Provisions: 1. The General Fund support for poison control centers shall augment, but not replace, local expenditures for existing poison control center services. These funds shall be used primarily to increase services to underserved counties and populations and for poison prevention and information services. The Director of the Emergency Medical Services Authority may contract with eligible poison control centers for the distribution of these funds. 2. The Emergency Medical Services Authority shall use the following guidelines in administering state-funded grants to local agencies: (a) funding eligibility shall be limited to rural multicounty regions that demonstrate a heavy use of the emergency medical services system by nonresidents, (b) local agencies shall provide matching funds of at least $1 for each dollar of state funds received, (c) state funding shall be used to provide only essential minimum services necessary to operate the system, as defined by the authority, (d) no region shall receive both federal and state funds in the same fiscal year for the same purpose, and (e) the authority shall monitor the use of the funds by recipients to ensure that these funds are used in an appropriate manner. 3. Each region shall be eligible to receive up to one-half of the total cost of a minimal system for that region, as defined by the Emergency Medical Services Authority. However, the authority may reallocate unclaimed funds among regions. 4. Notwithstanding Provision 2(b), each region with a population of 300,000 or fewer as of June 30, 2026, shall receive the full amount for which it is eligible if it provides a cash match of $0.41 per capita or more. Failure to provide local cash contributions at the specified level shall result in a proportional reduction in state funding. 5. It is the intent of the Legislature that the Director of the Emergency Medical Services Authority provide assistance, when feasible, to poison control centers in seeking sources of funding other than General Fund support, including grants from health-related foundations, federal grants, and assistance from the California Children and Families Commission, or other relevant entities. It is also the intent of the Legislature that poison control centers assertively seek and obtain funding from foundations, private sector entities, the federal government, and sources other than the General Fund. 4120-101-0890—For local assistance, Emergency Medical Services Authority, payable from the Federal Trust Fund ........................ 671,000 Schedule: (1) 3820-Emergency Medical Services Authority ........................ 671,000 4120-101-3137—For local assistance, Emergency Medical Services Authority, payable from the Emergency Medical Technician Certification Fund ........................ 300,000 Schedule: (1) 3820-Emergency Medical Services Authority ........................ 300,000 4140-001-0001—For support of Department of Health Care Access and Information ........................ 56,763,00057,763,000 Schedule: (1) 3831-Health Care Quality and Affordability ........................ 49,252,00049,252,000 (2) 3835-Health Care Workforce ........................ 2,160,0003,160,000 (3) 3845-Cal-Mortgage Loan Insurance ........................ 10,000,000 (4) 3860-Administration ........................ 5,351,0005,351,000 (5) Reimbursements to 3831-Health Care Quality and Affordability ........................ −10,000,000 Provisions: 1. The Department of Finance may authorize the transfer of expenditure authority between this item and Item 4140-101-0001 to effectively administer the healthcare workforce programs funded in these items. 2. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (2), $100,000 is available to conduct evaluations for the Abortion Practical Support Fund, pursuant to Chapter 566 of the Statutes of 2022. 3. Until June 30, 2031, notwithstanding any other law, information and documents obtained for the purpose of generating reports required under Section 127501.6 of the Health and Safety Code shall not be required to be disclosed pursuant to the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code) or any similar local law requiring the disclosure of public records until the publication of those baseline and annual reports required by Section 127501.6 of the Health and Safety Code. 4. For purposes of implementing Chapter 2.6 (commencing with Section 127500) of Part 2 of Division 107 of the Health and Safety Code, including hiring staff and consultants, through the procurement authority and processes of the Department of Health Care Access and Information, facilitating and conducting meetings, conducting research and analysis, and developing the required reports, the Office of Health Care Affordability may enter into exclusive or nonexclusive contracts on a bid or negotiated basis. Until June 30, 2031, contracts entered into or amended pursuant to Chapter 2.6 (commencing with Section 127500) of Part 2 of Division 107 of the Health and Safety Code are exempt from Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 14825) of Part 5.5 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, Part 2 (commencing with Section 10100) of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code, and the State Administrative Manual, and are exempt from the review or approval of any division of the Department of General Services. 5. (a) Until June 30, 2031, any necessary rules and regulations for the purpose of implementing Chapter 2.6 (commencing with Section 127500) of Part 2 of Division 107 of the Health and Safety Code may be adopted as emergency regulations in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code). The adoption of emergency regulations pursuant to this provision shall be deemed to be an emergency and necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, or general welfare. (b) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, including subdivisions (e) and (h) of Section 11346.1, an emergency regulation adopted pursuant to this provision shall be repealed by operation of law unless the adoption, amendment, or repeal of the regulation is promulgated by the office pursuant to Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code within five years of the initial adoption of the emergency regulation. (c) Any rule or regulation adopted pursuant to this provision shall be discussed by the Office of Health Care Affordability board during at least one board meeting before the office adopts the rule or regulation. 6. (a) Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (1), $12,500,000 is available in the 2026–27 fiscal year on a one-time basis to implement the Diaper Access Initiative. In addition to contracting to procure low-cost diapers for a direct-to-consumer purchasing portal, the Department of Health Care Access and Information shall also contract to procure low-cost wipes for purchase through the portal. (b) Until June 30, 2028, contracts entered into or amended pursuant to this provision shall be exempt from Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 14825) of Part 5.5 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, Part 2 (commencing with Section 10100) of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code, and the State Administrative Manual, and shall be exempt from the review or approval of any division of the Department of General Services. This exemption shall last until June 30, 2028. 7. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (3), $10,000,000 is available to establish a health care access stability unit to evaluate hospitals’ strategic importance to their communities, assist in planning for maintaining critical services in the event of a hospital’s financial distress, and provide technical assistance to currently distressed hospitals in returning to fiscal sustainability. 8. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (2), $1,000,000 is available to support the implementation of a study of midwifery education and training in California, pursuant to Section 128300 of the Health and Safety Code. 4140-001-0121—For support of Department of Health Care Access and Information, payable from the Hospital Building Fund ........................ 67,935,000 Schedule: (1) 3840-Facilities Development ........................ 57,507,000 (2) 3860-Administration ........................ 10,548,000 (3) Reimbursements to 3840-Facilities Development ........................ −115,000 (4) Reimbursements to 3860-Administration ........................ −5,000 Provisions: 1. Notwithstanding any other law, the Department of Finance may augment the amount available for expenditure in this item to pay costs associated with the review of hospital building plans. The augmentation may be effected not sooner than 30 days after notification in writing of the necessity therefor to the chairpersons of the committees in each house of the Legislature that consider appropriations and the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, or not sooner than whatever lesser time the chairperson of the joint committee, or the chairperson’s designee, may determine. 2. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (1), $120,000 is available to conduct evaluations for the Hospital’s Seismic Safety, pursuant to Chapter 584 of the Statutes of 2022. 3. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (1), $1,452,000 is available for Skilled Nursing Facilities: Backup Power Source, pursuant to Chapter 788 of the Statutes of 2022. 4140-001-0143—For support of Department of Health Care Access and Information, payable from the California Health Data and Planning Fund ........................ 48,797,000 Schedule: (1) 3831-Health Care Quality and Affordability ........................ 1,744,0001,578,000 (2) 3835-Health Care Workforce ........................ 6,458,000 (3) 3855-Health Care Information and Quality Analysis ........................ 20,071,000 (3.5) 3856-Data Exchange Framework ........................ 10,189,000 (4) 3860-Administration ........................ 11,311,00011,477,000 (5) Reimbursements to 3835-Health Care Workforce ........................ −782,000 (6) Reimbursements to 3855-Health Care Information and Quality Analysis ........................ −194,000 Provisions: 1. The Department of Finance may authorize an increase in Schedule (3) of this item to support legal services costs associated with Chapter 603 of the Statutes of 2017. 2. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $597,000 is available to support health care data reporting related to new federal regulations promulgated by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services. These funds shall only be available to the extent the relevant federal regulations remain operative. 4140-001-0181—For support of Department of Health Care Access and Information, payable from the Registered Nurse Education Fund ........................ 466,000 Schedule: (1) 3835-Health Care Workforce ........................ 398,000 (2) 3860-Administration ........................ 68,000 4140-001-0890—For support of Department of Health Care Access and Information, payable from the Federal Trust Fund ........................ 13,043,000 Schedule: (1) 3835-Health Care Workforce ........................ 1,647,000 (2) 3861-Rural Health Transformation ........................ 11,396,000 Provisions: 1. Until June 30, 2028, the Department of Health Care Access and Information may execute grants and contracts, including exclusive or nonexclusive contracts, or amend existing contracts, on a bid or negotiated basis. Contracts and grants entered into or amended pursuant to the federal Rural Health Transformation Program shall be exempt from Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 14825) of Part 5.5 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, Section 19130 of the Government Code, Part 2 (commencing with Section 10100) of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code (excepting Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 12100)), and the State Administrative Manual, and shall be exempt from the review or approval of any division of the Department of General Services. This exemption does not apply to procurements overseen by the Department of Technology. 2. The Department of Healthcare Access and Information may contract with a third-party nonprofit organization to implement the requirements of the federal Rural Health Transformation Program. 4140-001-3064—For support of Department of Health Care Access and Information, payable from the Mental Health Practitioner Education Fund ........................ 65,000 Schedule: (1) 3835-Health Care Workforce ........................ 30,000 (2) 3860-Administration ........................ 35,000 Provisions: 1. Notwithstanding any other law, the Department of Finance may increase or decrease expenditure authority based on revenue amounts available in the Mental Health Practitioner Education Fund for the purpose of increasing the number of loan repayment grants awarded by the Licensed Mental Health Service Provider Education Program. 4140-001-3068—For support of Department of Health Care Access and Information, payable from the Vocational Nurse Education Fund ........................ 91,000 Schedule: (1) 3835-Health Care Workforce ........................ 74,000 (2) 3860-Administration ........................ 17,000 4140-001-3085—For support of Department of Health Care Access and Information, payable from the Behavioral Health Services Fund ........................ 6,134,000 Schedule: (1) 3835-Health Care Workforce ........................ 5,802,000 (2) 3860-Administration ........................ 332,000 Provisions: 1. The Department of Health Care Access and Information may execute grants and contracts, including exclusive or nonexclusive contracts, or amend existing contracts, on a bid or negotiated basis. Contracts and grants entered into or amended shall be exempt from Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 14825) of Part 5.5 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, Section 19130 of the Government Code, Part 2 (commencing with Section 10100) of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code (excepting Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 12100)), and the State Administrative Manual, and shall be exempt from the review or approval of any division of the Department of General Services. This exemption does not apply to procurements typically overseen by the Department of Technology. 2. The funds appropriated in this item shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2029. 4140-001-3209—For support of the Department of Healthcare Access and Information, payable from the Health Plan Improvement Trust Fund ........................ 2,382,000 Schedule: (1) 3857-Office of Patient Advocate ........................ 2,382,000 4140-001-3436—For support of Department of Health Care Access and Information, payable from the Health Care Payments Data Fund ........................ 17,674,000 Schedule: (0.5) 3860-Administration ........................ 206,000 (1) 3865-Health Care Payments Data Program ........................ 22,468,000 (2) Reimbursements to 3865-Health Care Payments Data program ........................ −5,000,000 Provisions: 1. The Department of Managed Health Care shall transfer an amount not to exceed $4,500,000 to the Health Care Payments Data Fund from the Pharmacy Benefit Manager Fund. 2. The Department of Health Care Access and Information shall transfer an amount not to exceed $6,250,000 to the Health Care Payments Data Fund from the California Health Data and Planning Fund. 3. The Secretary of California Health and Human Services Department of Health Care Access and Information shall transfer an amount not to exceed $6,250,000 to the Health Care Payments Data Fund from the Health Plan Improvement Trust Fund. 4140-001-8034—For support of Department of Health Care Access and Information, payable from the Medically Underserved Account for Physicians, Health Professions Education Fund ........................ 65,000 Schedule: (1) 3835-Health Care Workforce ........................ 60,000 (2) 3860-Administration ........................ 5,000 4140-002-0001—For support of Department of Health Care Access and Information ........................ 32,050,000 Schedule: (1) 3836-BH Connect Workforce Initiative ........................ 46,156,000 (2) 3860-Administration ........................ 17,944,000 (3) Reimbursements to 3836-BH Connect Workforce Initiative ........................ −23,078,000 (4) Reimbursements to 3860-Administration ........................ −8,972,000 4140-017-0143—For support of Department of Health Care Access and Information, payable from the California Health Data and Planning Fund ........................ 136,000 Schedule: (1) 3860-Administration ........................ 136,000 4140-101-0001—For local assistance, Department of Health Care Access and Information ........................ 224,133,00084,133,000 Schedule: (1) 3831-Health Care Quality and Affordability ........................ 40,000,000 (1)(2) 3835-Health Care Workforce ........................ 34,133,00044,133,000 (2)3845-Cal-Mortgage Loan Insurance190,000,000 Provisions: 1. The Department of Finance may authorize the transfer of expenditure authority between this item and Item 4140-001-0001 to effectively administer the programs funded in these items. 2. (a) Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (1), (2), up to $18,667,000 is available to fund grant awards for existing primary care residency slots, up to $3,333,000 is available to fund new primary care residency slots at existing residency programs, and up to $5,667,000 is available to fund primary care residency slots for existing teaching health centers under the Song-Brown Health Care Workforce Training Act (Article 1 (commencing with Section 128200) of Chapter 4 of Part 3 of Division 107 of the Health and Safety Code). Of the funds appropriated in this item, up to $3,333,000 is available to fund newly accredited primary care residency programs and, as of June 30, 2028, unspent amounts may be redirected to fund new residency slots at existing programs if newly accredited primary care residency programs have not been established. Of the funds appropriated in this item, up to $333,000 is available for the State Loan Repayment Program. (b) The funds described in Provision 2 are available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2030. 3. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $2,800,000 shall be available to support the California Medicine Scholars Program. 4. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (2), $190 million is available Upon approval of the Department of Finance, the amount available for expenditure in this item may be augmented by up to $190,000,000 to support additional rounds of support for financially distressed hospitals, pursuant to the Distressed Hospital Loan Program established by Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 129380) of Part 6 of Division 107 of the Health and Safety Code. 5. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (1), $30,000,000 is available to support an uncompensated care fund for abortion services. These funds shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2029. 6. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (1), $10,000,000 is available to support the Abortion Practical Support Fund, which will provide grants for non-profit organizations and health care providers assisting patients overcoming barriers to abortion care, consistent with the provisions of Article 2.3 (commencing with Section 123451) of Chapter 2 of Part 2 of Division 106 of the Health and Safety Code. These fund shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2029. 7. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (2), $5,000,000 is available to support the Charles R. Drew University of Medicine and Science. 4140-101-0143—For local assistance, Department of Health Care Access and Information, payable from the California Health Data and Planning Fund ........................ 6,956,000 Schedule: (1) 3835-Health Care Workforce ........................ 10,336,000 (2) Reimbursements to 3835-Health Care Workforce ........................ −3,380,000 Provisions: 1. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (1), $2,725,000 is appropriated for nursing education pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 128235 of the Health and Safety Code. 2. The funds appropriated in this item for contracts with accredited medical schools, teaching health centers, or programs that train primary care physician assistants or primary care nurse practitioners, as well as contracts with hospitals or other health care delivery systems located in California, pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with Section 128200) of Chapter 4 of Part 3 of Division 107 of the Health and Safety Code, are available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2029. 3. Of the funds appropriated in Schedules (1) and (2) of this item, $2,000,000 shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2029, for the administration of the County Medical Services Loan Repayment Program. 4140-101-0181—For local assistance, Department of Health Care Access and Information, payable from the Registered Nurse Education Fund ........................ 1,816,000 Schedule: (1) 3835-Health Care Workforce ........................ 1,816,000 4140-101-0890—For local assistance, Department of Health Care Access and Information, payable from the Federal Trust Fund ........................ 116,593,000 Schedule: (1) 3835-Health Care Workforce ........................ 1,625,000 (2) 3861-Rural Health Transformation ........................ 114,968,000 Provisions: 1. Until June 30, 2028, the Department of Health Care Access and Information may execute grants and contracts, including exclusive or nonexclusive contracts, or amend existing contracts, on a bid or negotiated basis. Contracts and grants entered into or amended pursuant to the federal Rural Health Transformation Program shall be exempt from Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 14825) of Part 5.5 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, Section 19130 of the Government Code, Part 2 (commencing with Section 10110) of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code (excepting Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 12100)), and the State Administrative Manual, and shall be exempt from the review or approval of any division of the Department of General Services. This exemption does not apply to procurements overseen by the Department of Technology. 2. The Department of Health Care Access and Information may contract with a third-party nonprofit organization to implement the requirements of the federal Rural Health Transformation Program. 4140-101-3064—For local assistance, Department of Health Care Access and Information, payable from the Mental Health Practitioner Education Fund ........................ 931,000 Schedule: (1) 3835-Health Care Workforce ........................ 931,000 Provisions: 1. Notwithstanding any other law, the Department of Finance may increase or decrease expenditure authority based on revenue amounts available in the Mental Health Practitioner Education Fund for the purpose of increasing the number of loan repayment grants awarded by the Licensed Mental Health Service Provider Education Program. 4140-101-3068—For local assistance, Department of Health Care Access and Information, payable from the Vocational Nurse Education Fund ........................ 142,000 Schedule: (1) 3835-Health Care Workforce ........................ 142,000 4140-101-3085—For local assistance, Department of Health Care Access and Information, payable from the Behavioral Health Services Fund ........................ 124,993,000 Schedule: (1) 3835-Health Care Workforce ........................ 96,493,000 (1.5) 3836-BH Connect Workforce Initiative ........................ 28,500,000 Provisions: 1. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $28,500,000 shall be available to support the Behavioral Health Services Act Program. 2. The Department of Health Care Access and Information may execute grants and contracts, including exclusive or nonexclusive contacts, or amend existing contracts, on a bid or negotiated basis. Contracts and grants entered into or amended shall be exempt from Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 14825) of Part 5.5 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, Section 19130 of the Government Code, Part 2 (commencing with Section 10100) of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code (excepting Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 12100)), and the State Administrative Manual, and shall be exempt from the review or approval of any division of the Department of General Services. This exemption does not apply to procurements typically overseen by the California Department of Technology. 3. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (1), $4,500,000 shall be available to support the Title IV-E Stipend Project. 4. The funds appropriated in this item shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2029. 4140-101-8034—For local assistance, Department of Health Care Access and Information, payable from the Medically Underserved Account for Physicians, Health Professions Education Fund ........................ 950,000 Schedule: (1) 3835-Health Care Workforce ........................ 950,000 4140-102-0001—For local assistance, Department of Health Care Access and Information ........................ 153,200,000 Schedule: (1) 3836-BH Connect Workforce Initiative ........................ 334,900,000 (2) Reimbursements to 3836-BH Connect Workforce Initiative ........................ −181,700,000 Provisions: 1. (a) The funds appropriated in this item, in Item 4140-002-0001, or in Provision 1 of Item 4140-101-3085 may be used to contract with an entity to administer the workforce initiatives referenced in Section 14184.102 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, the Behavioral Health Community-Based Organized Networks of Equitable Care and Treatment (BH-CONNECT) Terms and Conditions, and the Behavioral Health Services Act (Chapter 790, Statutes of 2023). (b) The entity that administers the workforce initiatives in subsection (a) may perform, but is not limited to, the following: (A) Process awardee payments. (B) Monitor awardee compliance with terms and conditions. (C) Provide awardees technical assistance. (D) Report regularly to the department on the administration of the awards, and awardee compliance. (c) For the purpose of implementing this provision, the department may enter into exclusive or nonexclusive contracts on a bid or negotiated basis, including contracts for the purpose of obtaining subject matter expertise or other assistance. Contracts entered into or amended pursuant to this section shall be exempt from Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 14825) of Part 5.5 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, Section 19130 of the Government Code, Part 2 (commencing with Section 10100) of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code, and the State Administrative Manual, and shall be exempt from the review or approval of any division of the Department of General Services or the Department of Technology. 4140-490—Reappropriation, Department of Health Care Access and Information. The amounts specified in the following citations are reappropriated for the purposes provided for in those appropriations and shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2029: 0001—General Fund (1) Up to $105,000 in Item 4140-001-0001, Budget Act of 2022 (Chs. 43, 45, and 249, Stats. 2022) to implement the CalRX Biosimilar Insulin Initiative. (2) Up to $18,300,000 in Item 4140-101-0001, Budget Act of 2022 (Chs. 43, 45, and 249, Stats. 2022) to implement the CalRX Biosimilar Insulin Initiative. 4140-495—Reversion, Department of Health Care Access and Information. As of June 30, 2026, the balances specified below of the appropriations provided in the following citations shall revert to the balances in the funds from which the appropriations were made. 0001—General Fund (1) $8,500,000 in Item 4141-101-0001, Budget Act of 2021 (Chs. 21, 69, and 240, Stats. 2021), appropriated in Program 3835-Health Care Workforce. 4140-496—Reversion, Department of Health Care Access and Information. As of June 30, 2026, the balances specified below of the appropriations provided in the following citations shall revert to the balances in the funds from which the appropriations were made. 3397—Opioid Settlements Fund (1) $19,629,000 in Item 4141-101-3397, Budget Act of 2023 (Chs. 12, 38, and 189, Stats. 2023), appropriated in Program 3831-Health Care Quality and Affordability. 4150-001-0933—For support of Department of Managed Health Care, payable from the Managed Care Fund ........................ 189,858,000 Schedule: (1) 3870-Health Plan Program ........................ 189,858,000 Provisions: 1. Of the amount appropriated in this item, $2,600,000 is available to the Department of Managed Health Care to contract with community-based organizations to provide assistance to consumers in navigating private and public health care coverage pursuant to Section 1368.05 of the Health and Safety Code. 4150-001-3447—For support of Department of Managed Health Care, payable from the Pharmacy Benefit Manager Fund ........................ 7,398,000 Schedule: (1) 3870-Health Plan Program ........................ 7,398,000 4170-001-0001—For support of California Department of Aging ........................ 24,520,000 Schedule: (1) 3890-Nutrition ........................ 2,283,000 (2) 3900-Supportive Services ........................ 6,986,000 (3) 3905-Community-Based Programs and Projects ........................ 404,000 (4) 3910-Medi-Cal Programs ........................ 16,978,000 (5) 3915-Policy and Planning ........................ 8,630,000 (6) Reimbursements to 3890-Nutrition ........................ −1,718,000 (7) Reimbursements to 3900-Supportive Services ........................ −443,000 (8) Reimbursements to 3905-Community-Based Programs and Projects ........................ −398,000 (9) Reimbursements to 3910-Medi-Cal Programs ........................ −8,202,000 Provisions: 1. The Department of Finance may decrease this item by up to $2,705,000 if the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services’ Medicaid and Children’s Health Insurance Program Managed Care Access, Finance, and Quality Final Rule (CMS-2439-F) is rescinded or repealed. Any adjustment of this item shall be reported in writing to the chairpersons of the fiscal committees in each house of the Legislature and the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee within 10 days of the date the adjustment is approved. 4170-001-0289—For support of California Department of Aging, payable from the State HICAP Fund ........................ 1,026,000 Schedule: (1) 3905-Community-Based Programs and Projects ........................ 1,026,000 Provisions: 1. Notwithstanding any other law, the amount appropriated in this item shall be exempt from the ratio provided in subdivision (d) of Section 9541.5 of the Welfare and Institutions Code. 2. No later than March 1, annually, the California Department of Aging shall provide a written update to the fiscal committees of the Legislature, and the Legislative Analyst’s Office on the Health Insurance Counseling and Advocacy Program (HICAP). The written update shall provide the following information on the progress of the HICAP modernization efforts: (a) The annual number of clients served. (b) The number of active HICAP counselors, both volunteer and paid. (c) The average number of clients served per counselor. (d) The percentage of California’s Medicare population receiving HICAP services. (e) The number and type of public and media events of the California Department of Aging. (f) Any deidentified client-level demographic information that is available. 4170-001-0890—For support of California Department of Aging, payable from the Federal Trust Fund ........................ 18,107,000 Schedule: (1) 3890-Nutrition ........................ 7,249,000 (2) 3895-Senior Community Employment Service ........................ 409,000 (3) 3900-Supportive Services ........................ 8,357,000 (4) 3905-Community-Based Programs and Projects ........................ 2,092,000 Provisions: 1. Notwithstanding any other law, the Department of Finance may authorize the transfer of funds between this item and Item 4170-101-0890 no sooner than 30 days after written notification to the chairpersons of the fiscal committees of each house of the Legislature and the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, or not sooner than whatever lesser time the chairperson of the joint committee, or the chairperson’s designee, may determine. The notification shall include: (a) the amount of the proposed transfer, (b) an identification of the purposes for which the funds will be used, (c) documentation that the proposed activities must be carried out in the current year and that no other funds are available for their support, and (d) the impact of any transfer on the level of services. 2. Notwithstanding any other law, the Department of Finance, upon request by the California Department of Aging, may authorize augmentations in this item for federal grant notices of award, reallocation, and supplemental allocations, and for unexpended prior year federal grant funds. The Department of Finance shall provide notification of the augmentation to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee within 10 working days from the date of the Department of Finance’s approval of the adjustment. 4170-002-0942—For support of California Department of Aging, payable from the State Health Facilities Citation Penalties Account, Special Deposit Fund ........................ 142,000 Schedule: (1) 3900-Supportive Services ........................ 142,000 4170-101-0001—For local assistance, California Department of Aging ........................ 138,903,000158,903,000 Schedule: (1) 3890-Nutrition ........................ 108,754,000 (2) 3900-Supportive Services ........................ 39,995,00059,995,000 (3) 3905-Community-Based Programs and Projects ........................ 4,493,000 (4) Reimbursements to 3890-Nutrition ........................ −9,780,000 (5) Reimbursements to 3900-Supportive Services ........................ −66,000 (6) Reimbursements to 3905-Community-Based Programs and Projects ........................ −4,493,000 Provisions: 1. Notwithstanding any other law, the Department of Finance, upon request by the California Department of Aging, may authorize transfers between Program 3890-Nutrition and Program 3900-Supportive Services in response to budget revisions submitted by the area agencies on aging. 2. Notwithstanding any other law, upon request by the California Department of Aging, the Department of Finance may increase the expenditure authority in Schedule (2) for the Long-Term Care Patient Representative Program established by Chapter 3.6 (commencing with Section 9260) of Division 8.5 of the Welfare and Institutions Code if the expenditure authority in this item is projected to be insufficient to provide adequate patient representative services based on program caseload and service costs. The Department of Finance shall not authorize an increase pursuant to this provision sooner than 30 days after notification in writing of the necessity thereof is provided to the chairpersons of the committees in each house of the Legislature that considers appropriations and the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, or not sooner than whatever lesser time after that notification the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, or the chairperson’s designee, may determine. 3. Of the amount appropriated in this item, $37,200,000 shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2028, to support modernizing the Mello-Granlund Older Californians Act (Division 8.5 (commencing with Section 9000) of the Welfare and Institutions Code). The California Department of Aging, in consultation with the area agencies on aging, shall allocate this funding to support nutrition. 4. Notwithstanding any other law, the California Department of Aging may advance available funds to an area agency on aging in an amount up to one-fourth of the annual allocation when necessary to continue the provision of services or operations when a cashflow problem has been demonstrated according to the criteria set forth by the department. In addition to this item, this provision shall be applicable to Items 4170-101-0289, 4170-101-0890, 4170-101-3098, and 4170-102-0942. 5. Notwithstanding any other law, the California Department of Aging may provide annual local assistance by direct allocation to its local assistance partners to support older adult programs. Direct allocations will be provided via Memoranda of Understanding and supplemental agreements, wherever necessary, between the department and its local assistance partners. Instruction to the area agency on aging on the management and provision of direct services to older adults will be provided by a program manual or other similar instruction. In addition to this item, this provision shall be applicable to Items 4170-101-0289, 4170-101-0890, 4170-101-3098, and 4170-102-0942. 6. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $20,000,000 shall be allocated on a one-time basis for disadvantaged seniors, subject to the enactment of a statute governing the use of these funds, and shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2028. 4170-101-0289—For local assistance, California Department of Aging, payable from the State HICAP Fund ........................ 7,316,000 Schedule: (1) 3905-Community-Based Programs and Projects ........................ 7,316,000 Provisions: 1. Notwithstanding any other law, the amount appropriated within this item shall be exempt from the ratio provided in subdivision (d) of Section 9541.5 of the Welfare and Institutions Code. 4170-101-0890—For local assistance, California Department of Aging, payable from the Federal Trust Fund ........................ 217,612,000 Schedule: (1) 3890-Nutrition ........................ 116,563,000 (2) 3895-Senior Community Employment Service ........................ 7,339,000 (3) 3900-Supportive Services ........................ 84,037,000 (4) 3905-Community-Based Programs and Projects ........................ 9,673,000 Provisions: 1. Provision 1 of Item 4170-001-0890 shall also apply to this item. 2. Notwithstanding any other law, the Department of Finance, upon request by the California Department of Aging, may authorize augmentations in this item for federal grant Notices of Award, Reallocation, and Supplemental allocations and for unexpended prior year federal grant funds. The Department of Finance shall provide notification of the augmentation to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee within 10 working days from the date of the Department of Finance approval of the adjustment. 3. Notwithstanding any other law, the Department of Finance, upon request by the California Department of Aging, may authorize transfers between Schedules (1) and (3) in response to budget revisions submitted by the area agencies on aging. 4170-101-3098—For local assistance, California Department of Aging, payable from the State Department of Public Health Licensing and Certification Program Fund ........................ 400,000 Schedule: (1) 3900-Supportive Services ........................ 400,000 4170-102-0942—For local assistance, California Department of Aging, payable from the State Health Facilities Citation Penalties Account, Special Deposit Fund ........................ 4,094,000 Schedule: (1) 3900-Supportive Services ........................ 4,094,000 Provisions: 1. Notwithstanding any other law, funds appropriated in this item shall be allocated by the California Department of Aging to each local ombudsman program in accordance with a formula calculated on the number of beds in licensed skilled nursing home facilities in each program’s area of service in proportion to the total number of beds in licensed skilled nursing home facilities in the state. 2. This funding shall be available for the local long-term care ombudsman programs to investigate complaints made against long-term care facilities and to increase visits to those facilities for the purposes of ensuring residents’ rights, safety, health, and quality of life. 3. The California Department of Aging, in coordination with the State Department of Public Health and the Department of Finance, shall publish the projected amount of the applicable fund balance for the following fiscal year subsequent to the publication of the 2027–28 Governor’s Budget and the 2027–28 May Revision. 4170-495—Reversion, California Department of Aging. As of June 30, 2026, the balances specified below of the appropriations provided in the following citations shall revert to the balances in the funds from which the appropriations were made. 0001—General Fund (1) Item 4170-001-0001, Budget Act of 2025 (Chs. 4 and 5, Stats. 2025). $51,000 appropriated in Program 3910-Medi-Cal Programs for Multipurpose Senior Services Program Case Management Software and Support. 4180-001-0001—For support of California Commission on Aging ........................ 48,000 Schedule: (1) 3930-California Commission on Aging ........................ 48,000 4180-002-0886—For support of California Commission on Aging, payable from the California Seniors Special Fund ........................ 62,000 Schedule: (1) 3930-Commission on Aging ........................ 62,000 Provisions: 1. Pursuant to Section 18773 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, the balance of this item as well as the balance of prior year appropriations from the California Seniors Special Fund may be carried over and expended in any following fiscal year. Upon approval from the Department of Finance, any unexpended funds from Item 4180-002-0886 from previous budget acts shall be in augmentation of Item 4180-002-0886 of this act. 2. Notwithstanding any other law, the Director of Finance may authorize expenditures from the California Seniors Special Fund for the California Commission on Aging in excess of the amount appropriated not sooner than 30 days after notification in writing of the necessity therefor is provided to the chairpersons of the fiscal committees of the Legislature and the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, or not sooner than whatever lesser time the chairperson of the joint committee, or the chairperson’s designee, may in each instance determine. 4180-002-0890—For support of California Commission on Aging, payable from the Federal Trust Fund ........................ 964,000 Schedule: (1) 3930-Commission on Aging ........................ 964,000 Provisions: 1. Notwithstanding any other law, the Director of Finance may authorize expenditures from the Federal Trust Fund for the California Commission on Aging in excess of the amount appropriated not sooner than 30 days after notification in writing of the necessity therefor is provided to the chairpersons of the fiscal committees of the Legislature and the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, or not sooner than whatever lesser time the chairperson of the joint committee, or the chairperson’s designee, may in each instance determine. 4185-001-0001—For support of California Senior Legislature ........................ 300,000 Schedule: (1) 3940-California Senior Legislature ........................ 300,000 4185-001-8815—For support of California Senior Legislature, payable from the California Senior Citizen Advocacy Voluntary Tax Contribution Fund ........................ 115,000 Schedule: (1) 3940-California Senior Legislature ........................ 115,000 Provisions: 1. Funds appropriated in this item from the California Senior Citizen Advocacy Voluntary Tax Contribution Fund shall be allocated by the California Senior Legislature for the purposes specified in Section 18730 of the Revenue and Taxation Code. 2. Pursuant to Section 18730 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, the balance of this item as well as the balance of prior year appropriations from the California Senior Citizen Advocacy Voluntary Tax Contribution Fund shall be carried over and may be expended in any following fiscal year. 3. Notwithstanding any other law, the Director of Finance may authorize expenditures from the California Senior Citizen Advocacy Voluntary Tax Contribution Fund for the California Senior Legislature in excess of the amount appropriated not sooner than 30 days after notification in writing of the necessity therefor is provided to the chairpersons of the fiscal committees of the Legislature and the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee. 4260-001-0001—For support of State Department of Health Care Services ........................ 351,564,000351,964,000 Schedule: (1) 3960-Health Care Services ........................ 381,402,000381,802,000 (2) Reimbursements to 3960-Health Care Services ........................ −29,838,000 Provisions: 1. The State Department of Health Care Services, in coordination with other state entities involved in the Medi-Cal Enterprise Systems modernization project efforts, shall provide the appropriate fiscal and policy committees of the Legislature, the Legislative Analyst’s Office, the Department of Technology, and the California State Auditor with annual project status updates, including newly executed contracts, their purpose, and cost. 2. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $605,000 is to reimburse the State Department of Public Health for lease-revenue bond base rental payments associated with the State Department of Health Care Services’ occupancy in the State Department of Public Health’s Richmond Laboratory. The Controller shall transfer funds appropriated in this item to the State Department of Public Health, in the amount shown in this provision as and when provided for in the schedule submitted by the State Public Works Board. 3. The Department of Finance may decrease this item by up to $7,811,000 if the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services’ Medicaid and Children’s Health Insurance Program Managed Care Access, Finance, and Quality Final Rule (CMS-2439-F) or the Ensuring Access to Medicaid Services Final Rule (CMS-2442-F) is rescinded or repealed. Any adjustment of this item shall be reported in writing to the chairpersons of the fiscal committees in each house of the Legislature and the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee within 10 days of the date the adjustment is approved. 4. (a) Of the funds appropriated in this item, $15,549,000 is available to support implementation of the provisions of Public Law 119-21. (b) For purposes of implementing this provision, the State Department of Health Care Services may enter into exclusive or nonexclusive contracts, or amend existing contracts, on a bid or negotiated basis. Contracts entered into or amended pursuant to this provision, through June 30, 2027, shall be exempt from Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 14825) of Part 5.5 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, Section 19130 of the Government Code, Part 2 (commencing with Section 10100) of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code, and the State Administrative Manual, and shall be exempt from the review or approval of any division of the Department of General Services. (c) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the State Department of Health Care Services may implement, interpret, or make specific this provision, in whole or in part, by means of plan or county letters, information notices, plan or provider bulletins, or other similar instructions without taking any further regulatory action. (d) The Department of Finance may decrease this item by up to $15,549,000 if federal policy provisions related to Medicaid Eligibility within Public Law 119-21 are rescinded or repealed. Any adjustment of this item shall be reported in writing to the chairpersons of the fiscal committees in each house of the Legislature and the chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee within 10 days of the date the adjustment is approved. 5. (a) Of the funds appropriated in this item, $5,332,000 is available to support the State Department of Health Care Services in development of a comprehensive hospital value strategy to advance access to high-quality inpatient and outpatient hospital services, financially incentivize appropriate care delivery, and improve health outcomes for Medi-Cal beneficiaries. (b) The State Department of Health Care Services may enter into exclusive or nonexclusive contracts, or amend existing contracts, on a bid, nonbid, or negotiated basis to support the design, implementation, and ongoing support of the hospital value strategy and state directed payments for hospitals. Contracts entered into or amended pursuant to this provision, through June 30, 2027, shall be exempt from Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 14825) of Part 5.5 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, Article 4 (commencing with Section 19130) of Chapter 5 of Part 2 of Division 5 of Title 2 of the Government Code, Part 2 (commencing with Section 10100) of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code, the State Contracting Manual and the State Administrative Manual, and shall be exempt from the review or approval of any division of the Department of General Services. (c) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the State Department of Health Care Services may implement, interpret, or make specific this provision, in whole or in part, by means of plan or county letters, information notices, plan or provider bulletins, or other similar instructions without taking any further regulatory action. 6. The Department of Finance may increase expenditure authority in this item up to $25,000,000 in the 2026–27 fiscal year to support administrative costs for the transition of individuals with unsatisfactory immigration status to the fee-for-service delivery system. 7. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (1), $400,000 is available to hire additional nursing staff to evaluate the applications of frail, older Californians applying to enroll in a Program of All-Inclusive Care for the Elderly (PACE). 4260-001-0009—For support of State Department of Health Care Services, payable from the Breast Cancer Control Account ........................ 4,596,000 Schedule: (1) 3960-Health Care Services ........................ 4,596,000 4260-001-0139—For support of State Department of Health Care Services, payable from the Driving-Under-the-Influence Program Licensing Trust Fund ........................ 2,460,000 Schedule: (1) 3960-Health Care Services ........................ 2,460,000 4260-001-0143—For support of State Department of Health Care Services, payable from the California Health Data and Planning Fund ........................ 207,000 Schedule: (1) 3960-Health Care Services ........................ 207,000 4260-001-0236—For support of State Department of Health Care Services, payable from the Unallocated Account, Cigarette and Tobacco Products Surtax Fund ........................ 761,000 Schedule: (1) 3960-Health Care Services ........................ 761,000 4260-001-0243—For support of State Department of Health Care Services, payable from the Narcotic Treatment Program Licensing Trust Fund ........................ 3,243,000 Schedule: (1) 3960-Health Care Services ........................ 3,243,000 4260-001-0309—For support of State Department of Health Care Services, payable from the Perinatal Insurance Fund ........................ 396,000 Schedule: (1) 3960-Health Care Services ........................ 396,000 4260-001-0816—For support of State Department of Health Care Services, payable from the Audit Repayment Trust Fund ........................ 41,000 Schedule: (1) 3960-Health Care Services ........................ 41,000 4260-001-0890—For support of State Department of Health Care Services, payable from the Federal Trust Fund ........................ 653,133,000653,533,000 Schedule: (1) 3960-Health Care Services ........................ 653,133,000653,533,000 Provisions: 1. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $605,000 is to reimburse the State Department of Public Health for lease-revenue bond base rental payments associated with the State Department of Health Care Services’ occupancy in the State Department of Public Health’s Richmond Laboratory. The Controller shall transfer funds appropriated in this item to the State Department of Public Health in the amount shown in this provision as and when provided for in the schedule submitted by the State Public Works Board. 2. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $1,500,000 shall be available for the State Department of Health Care Services, in consultation with stakeholders, to develop a Comprehensive Value Strategy for Skilled Nursing Facility Services, to inform the reauthorization of the Medi-Cal Long-Term Care Reimbursement Act (Article 3.8 (commencing with Section 14126) of Chapter 7 of Part 3 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code) for dates of service on or after January 1, 2028. The State Department of Health Care Services may enter into exclusive or nonexclusive contracts, or amend existing contracts, on a bid or negotiated basis to implement this provision. Contracts entered into or amended pursuant to this provision shall be exempt from Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 14825) of Part 5.5 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, Section 19130 of the Government Code, Part 2 (commencing with Section 10100) of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code, and the State Administrative Manual, and shall be exempt from review or approval of any division of the Department of General Services. 3. (a) Of the funds appropriated in this item, $17,500,000 is available to support implementation of the provisions of the federal One, Big, Beautiful Bill Act (Public Law 119-21). (b) For purposes of implementing this provision, the State Department of Health Care Services may enter into exclusive or nonexclusive contracts, or amend existing contracts, on a bid or negotiated basis. Contracts entered into or amended pursuant to this provision, through June 30, 2027, shall be exempt from Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 14825) of Part 5.5 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, Section 19130 of the Government Code, Part 2 (commencing with Section 10100) of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code, and the State Administrative Manual, and shall be exempt from the review or approval of any division of the Department of General Services. (c) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the State Department of Health Care Services may implement, interpret, or make specific this provision, in whole or in part, by means of plan or county letters, information notices, plan or provider bulletins, or other similar instructions without taking any further regulatory action. (d) The Department of Finance may decrease this item by up to $17,500,000 if federal policy provisions related to Medicaid within the federal One, Big, Beautiful Bill Act (Public Law 119-21) are rescinded or repealed. Any adjustment of this item shall be reported in writing to the chairpersons of the fiscal committees in each house of the Legislature and the chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee within 10 days of the date the adjustment is approved. 4. (a) Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (1), $5,332,000 is available to support the State Department of Health Care Services in development of a comprehensive hospital value strategy to advance access to high-quality inpatient and outpatient hospital services, financially incentivize appropriate care delivery, and improve health outcomes for Medi-Cal beneficiaries. (b) The State Department of Health Care Services may enter into exclusive or nonexclusive contracts, or amend existing contracts, on a bid, nonbid, or negotiated basis to support the design, implementation, and ongoing support of the hospital value strategy and state directed payments for hospitals. Contracts entered into or amended pursuant to this provision, through June 30, 2027, shall be exempt from Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 14825) of Part 5.5 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, Article 4 (commencing with Section 19130) of Chapter 5 of Part 2 of Division 5 of Title 2 of the Government Code, Part 2 (commencing with Section 10100) of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code, the State Contracting Manual and the State Administrative Manual, and shall be exempt from the review or approval of any division of the Department of General Services. (c) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the State Department of Health Care Services may implement, interpret, or make specific this provision, in whole or in part, by means of plan or county letters, information notices, plan or provider bulletins, or other similar instructions without taking any further regulatory action. 4260-001-3085—For support of State Department of Health Care Services, payable from the Behavioral Health Services Fund ........................ 86,517,000 Schedule: (1) 3960-Health Care Services ........................ 86,517,000 Provisions: 1. Funds appropriated in this item are in lieu of the amounts that otherwise would have been appropriated for administration pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 5892 of the Welfare and Institutions Code. 4260-001-3099—For support of State Department of Health Care Services, payable from the Mental Health Facility Licensing Fund ........................ 375,000 Schedule: (1) 3960-Health Care Services ........................ 375,000 4260-001-3113—For support of State Department of Health Care Services, payable from the Residential and Outpatient Program Licensing Fund ........................ 11,896,000 Schedule: (1) 3960-Health Care Services ........................ 11,896,000 Provisions: 1. Notwithstanding the requirements of subdivision (e) of Section 11833.02 of the Health and Safety Code, the fee charged in accordance with subdivision (a) of Section 11833.02 of the Health and Safety Code shall be increased by up to 20 percent each fiscal year through the 2026–27 fiscal year to reach a cumulative fee increase of 75 percent. 4260-001-3213—For support of State Department of Health Care Services, payable from the Long-Term Care Quality Assurance Fund ........................ 4,117,000 Schedule: (1) 3960-Health Care Services ........................ 4,117,000 Provisions: 1. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $1,500,000 shall be available for the State Department of Health Care Services, in consultation with stakeholders, to develop a Comprehensive Value Strategy comprehensive value strategy for Skilled Nursing Facility Services, to inform the reauthorization of the Medi-Cal Long-Term Care Reimbursement Act of 1990 for dates of service on or after January 1, 2028. The State Department of Health Care Services may enter into exclusive or nonexclusive contracts, or amend existing contracts, on a bid or negotiated basis to implement this provision. Contracts entered into or amended pursuant to this provision shall be exempt from Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 14825) of Part 5.5 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, Section 19130 of the Government Code, Part 2 (commencing with Section 10100) of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code, and the State Administrative Manual, and shall be exempt from review or approval of any division of the Department of General Services. 2. (a) Of the funds appropriated in this item, $1,247,000 $1,208,000 shall be available to support healthcare data reporting related to new federal regulations promulgated by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services, including the Minimum Staffing Standards for Long-Term Care Facilities and Medicaid Institutional Payment Transparency Reporting Final Rule. These funds shall only be available to the extent the relevant federal regulations remain operative. (b) Of the amount appropriated in Provision 2(a), subprovision (a), $500,000 are shall be used as contract resources to be used to support the implementation of necessary system changes. Contracts entered into or amended pursuant to this provision, through June 30, 2026, shall be exempt from Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 14825) of Part 5.5 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, Section 19130 of the Government Code, Part 2 (commencing with Section 10100) of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code, and the State Administrative Manual, and shall be exempt from review or approval of any division of the Department of General Services. 4260-001-3305—For support of State Department of Health Care Services, payable from the Healthcare Treatment Fund ........................ 1,570,000 Schedule: (1) 3960-Health Care Services ........................ 1,570,000 Provisions: 1. The funds appropriated in this item are available for expenditure pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 30130.55 of the Revenue and Taxation Code and subdivision (f) of Section 30130.57 of the Revenue and Taxation Code. The Legislature finds and declares that the expenditures are made in accordance with the California Healthcare, Research and Prevention Tobacco Tax Act of 2016 (Proposition 56). The funds appropriated in this item are for the implementation of Proposition 56 payments pursuant to Item 4260-101-3305. 4260-001-3311—For support of State Department of Health Care Services, payable from the Health Care Services Plan Fines and Penalties Fund ........................ 485,000 Schedule: (1) 3960-Health Care Services ........................ 485,000 4260-001-3362—For support of State Department of Health Care Services, payable from the PACE Oversight Fund of the State Department of Health Care Services ........................ 750,000 Schedule: (1) 3960-Health Care Services ........................ 750,000 Provisions: 1. To effectively administer the Medi-Cal program, the Department of Finance may decrease or increase this item to conform the appropriation to revised revenue estimates pursuant to Section 14592 of the Welfare and Institutions Code. 4260-001-3414—For support of State Department of Health Care Services, payable from the 988 State Suicide and Behavioral Health Crisis Services Fund ........................ 7,173,000 Schedule: (1) 3960-Health Care Services ........................ 7,173,000 4260-001-8140—For support of State Department of Health Care Services, payable from the Vision Services CHIP-HSI Special Fund ........................ 96,000 Schedule: (1) 3960-Health Care Services ........................ 96,000 4260-003-0890—For support of State Department of Health Care Services, payable from the Federal Trust Fund, for County Health Initiative Matching Fund Program ........................ 333,000 Schedule: (1) 3960-Health Care Services ........................ 333,000 4260-003-3055—For support of State Department of Health Care Services, payable from the County Health Initiative Matching Fund, for the County Health Initiative Matching Fund Program ........................ 174,000 Schedule: (1) 3960-Health Care Services ........................ 174,000 4260-004-0942—For support of State Department of Health Care Services, payable from the Local Educational Agency Medi-Cal Recovery Fund, Special Deposit Fund ........................ 1,685,000 Schedule: (1) 3960-Health Care Services ........................ 1,685,000 4260-007-0890—For support of State Department of Health Care Services, payable from the Federal Trust Fund ........................ 19,096,000 Schedule: (1) 3960-Health Care Services ........................ 19,096,000 Provisions: 1. Notwithstanding Section 28.00, adjustments may be made to this item by the Director of Finance to align this appropriation with legislative actions and other technical adjustments affecting any recipient department’s appropriation authority. 4260-017-0001—For support of State Department of Health Care Services, for implementation of the Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996 ........................ 6,913,000 Schedule: (1) 3960-Health Care Services ........................ 6,913,000 4260-017-0309—For support of State Department of Health Care Services, payable from the Perinatal Insurance Fund, for implementation of the Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act ........................ 3,000 Schedule: (1) 3960-Health Care Services ........................ 3,000 4260-017-0890—For support of State Department of Health Care Services, payable from the Federal Trust Fund, for implementation of the Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act ........................ 17,631,000 Schedule: (1) 3960-Health Care Services ........................ 17,631,000 4260-101-0001—For local assistance, State Department of Health Care Services, California Medical Assistance Program, payable from the Health Care Deposit Fund after transfer from the General Fund ........................ 45,877,381,00046,572,226,000 Schedule: (1) 3960015-County and Other Local Assistance Administration ........................ 2,063,037,000 (2) 3960022-Benefits (Medical Care and Services) ........................ 50,836,962,00051,536,907,000 (3) Reimbursements to 3960015-County and Other Local Assistance Administration ........................ −92,131,000 (4) Reimbursements to 3960022-Benefits (Medical Care and Services) ........................ −6,930,487,000−6,935,587,000 Provisions: 1. The aggregate principal amount of disproportionate share hospital general obligation debt that may be issued in the current fiscal year pursuant to subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (f) of Section 14085.5 of the Welfare and Institutions Code shall be $0. 2. Notwithstanding any other law, both the federal and nonfederal shares of any moneys recovered for previously paid health care services, provided pursuant to Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 14000) of Part 3 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, are hereby appropriated and shall be expended as soon as practicable for medical care and services as defined in the Welfare and Institutions Code. 3. Notwithstanding any other law, accounts receivable for recoveries as described in Provision 2 shall have no effect upon the positive balance of the General Fund or the Health Care Deposit Fund. Notwithstanding any other law, moneys recovered as described in this item that are required to be transferred from the Health Care Deposit Fund to the General Fund shall be credited by the Controller to the General Fund without regard to the appropriation from which it was drawn. 4. WithoutUpon order of the Department of Finance and without regard to fiscal year, the General Fund shall make one or more loans available not to exceed a cumulative total of $1,000,000,000 to be transferred as needed to the Health Care Deposit Fund to meet cash needs. All moneys so transferred shall be repaid as soon as sufficient revenue or reimbursements have been collected to meet immediate cash needs and in installments as revenue or reimbursements accumulate if the loan is outstanding for more than one year. 5. Notwithstanding any other law, the State Department of Health Care Services may give public notice relative to proposing or amending any rule or regulation or administrative directive that could result in increased costs in the Medi-Cal program only after approval by the Department of Finance. Additionally, any rule or regulation adopted by the State Department of Health Care Services and any communication that increases costs in the Medi-Cal program shall be effective only after the date upon which it is approved by the Department of Finance. 6. Change orders to the medical or the dental fiscal intermediary contract for amounts exceeding a total cost of $250,000 shall be approved by the Department of Finance not sooner than 30 days after written notification of the change order is provided to the chairpersons of the fiscal and policy committees in each house of the Legislature and to the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, or not sooner than whatever lesser time after that notification as the chairperson of the joint committee, or the chairperson’s designee, may determine. The semiannual estimates of Medi-Cal expenditures provided to the Legislature in January and May may constitute the notification required by this provision. 7. Recoveries of advances made to counties in prior years pursuant to Section 14153 of the Welfare and Institutions Code are reappropriated to the Health Care Deposit Fund for reimbursement of those counties where allowable costs exceeded the amounts advanced. Recoveries in excess of the amounts required to fully reimburse allowable costs shall be transferred to the General Fund. When a projected deficiency exists in the California Medical Assistance Program, these funds, subject to notification to the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, are appropriated and shall be expended as soon as practicable for the state’s share of payments for medical care and services and county and other local assistance administration. 8. The Department of Finance may transfer funds representing all or any portion of any estimated savings that are a result of improvements in the Medi-Cal claims processing procedures from the Medi-Cal services budget or the support budget of the State Department of Health Care Services (Item 4260-001-0001) to the fiscal intermediary budget item for purposes of making improvements to the Medi-Cal claims system. 9. Notwithstanding any other law, the Department of Finance may authorize the transfer of expenditure authority between schedules within this item and between this item and Items 4260-102-0001, 4260-111-0001, 4260-114-0001, and 4260-117-0001 in order to effectively administer the programs funded in these items. The Department of Finance may revise reimbursement authority in this item in order to effectively administer the programs funded in those items. The Department of Finance shall notify the Legislature within 10 days of authorizing such a transfer unless prior notification of the transfer has been included in the Medi-Cal estimates submitted pursuant to Section 14100.5 of the Welfare and Institutions Code. The 10-day notification to the Legislature shall include the reasons for the transfer, the fiscal assumptions used in calculating the transfer amount, and any potential fiscal effects on the program from which funds are being transferred or for which funds are being reduced. 10. If a federal grant that provides 75 percent federal financial participation to allow individuals in nursing homes to voluntarily move into a community setting and still receive the same amount of funding for services is awarded to the State Department of Health Care Services during the current fiscal year, then, notwithstanding any other law, the department may count expenditures from the appropriation made to this item as state matching funds for that grant. 11. Notwithstanding any other law, the Department of Finance may authorize an increase to this appropriation to address costs resulting from adverse court rulings. The Department of Finance shall provide a 30-day notice of any proposed increase to the Legislature. The notification shall include the specifics of any cases with adverse rulings and the overall fiscal impact. Submission of the semiannual Medi-Cal estimate provided to the Legislature in January and May shall be considered meeting the notification requirement of this provision if the required information is included in the estimate. 12. To the extent practicable and consistent with existing procedures, the State Department of Health Care Services, in its sole discretion, shall seek favorable terms from the federal government regarding the repayment of federal funds for state-only populations in order to minimize the annual impact on the General Fund in any individual fiscal year. 13. Notwithstanding any other law, the Department of Finance may adjust amounts in this item, Item 4260-111-0001, or any other related item resulting from the State Department of Health Care Services obtaining federal approval to claim federal financial participation for expenditures associated with Designated State Health Programs as part of the CalAIM Demonstration. Within 30 days of making any adjustment pursuant to this provision, the Department of Finance shall report the adjustment in writing to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee. Submission of the semiannual Medi-Cal estimate provided to the Legislature in January and May shall be considered meeting the reporting requirement of this provision if the required information is included in the estimate. 14.(a)Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (2), up to $10,000,000 is available for the Hearing Aid Coverage for Children Program for the purpose of providing medically necessary hearing aids and related services to eligible persons as described in subprovision (b). (b)A person is eligible for the program described in this provision if they meet all of the following criteria: (1)(A)The person is under 18 years of age; or (B)effective January 1, 2023, the person is under 21 years of age. (2)The person’s household income does not exceed 600 percent of the federal poverty level. (3)The person is not eligible for the Medi-Cal program or the California Children’s Services Program. (4)The person does not have health insurance coverage for hearing aids. (c)For purposes of paragraph (4) of subprovision (b), a person is deemed to have no health insurance coverage if any of the following apply: (1)The person has no health insurance coverage. (2)The person has health insurance coverage that excludes coverage for hearing aids. (3)Effective January 1, 2023, the person has health insurance coverage that has a coverage limit of $1,500 or less for hearing aids. (d)The State Department of Health Care Services shall specify the benefits and services provided to eligible persons under the program described in this provision. This shall include hearing aids, including bone conduction devices, when medically necessary. (e)The State Department of Health Care Services shall develop processes to ensure, to the extent practicable, health insurance coverage for hearing aids and related services covered pursuant to this provision is used before the Hearing Aid Coverage for Children Program is billed. (f)The State Department of Health Care Services may contract with public and private entities in order to implement this provision. Contracts entered into or amended pursuant to this provision shall be exempt from Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 14600) of Part 5.5 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 14825) of Part 5.5 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, Article 4 (commencing with Section 19130) of Chapter 5 of Part 2 of Division 5 of Title 2 of the Government Code, Part 2 (commencing with Section 10100) of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code, the State Contracting Manual, and the State Administrative Manual, and shall be exempt from the review or approval of any division of the State Department of General Services. (g)Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the State Department of Health Care Services may implement, interpret, or make specific this provision, in whole or in part, by means of provider bulletin or similar instructions, without taking any further regulatory action. 15.14. (a) The State Department of Health Care Services may enter into exclusive or nonexclusive contracts on a bid, non-bid, or negotiated basis with a drug rebate aggregator or another entity that provides rebate aggregation services to consolidate and manage drug rebate negotiation, invoicing, collection, dispute resolution, and other related activities with manufacturers, distributors, dispensers, or suppliers of single-source and multiple source drugs, appliances, durable medical equipment, medical supplies, and other product type health care services. Contracts entered into or amended pursuant to this section shall be exempt from Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 14825) of Part 5.5 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, Article 4 (commencing with Section 19130) of Chapter 5 of Part 2 of Division 5 of Title 2 of the Government Code, Part 2 (commencing with Section 10100) of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code, the State Contracting Manual and the State Administrative Manual and shall be exempt from the review or approval of any division of the Department of General Services. (b) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the State Department of Health Care Services may implement, interpret, or make specific this section, in whole or in part, by means of plan or county letters, information notices, plan or provider bulletins, or other similar instructions without taking any further regulatory action. 16.15. Notwithstanding Section 16531.1 of the Government Code, the General Fund cash loans made to the Medical Providers Interim Payment Fund in the 2024–25 and 2025–26 fiscal years are available over the 2024–25 and 2025–26 fiscal years for programs funded within this item. No later than June 30, 2034, an allocation from the General Fund shall be made to recognize for budgetary financial reporting the cost of the loans made to the Medical Providers Interim Payment Fund in the 2024–25 and 2025–26 fiscal years. The Director of Finance may order the repayment of all or a portion of the loans sooner if the Department of Finance, in consultation with the State Department of Health Care Services, determines that the funds appropriated in this item exceed the required costs for programs funded within the item. 17.16. The Legislature finds that the total funds appropriated in this item exceeds the amount of General Fund revenue appropriated to support the Medi-Cal program prior to the effective date of Chapter 7.5 (commencing with Section 14199.100) of Part 3 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code (Proposition 35). The Legislature further finds that, for purposes of Proposition 35, increases in Medi-Cal base managed care capitation rates reflect an expansion of healthcare benefits, healthcare services, health-care workforce, and payment rates above and beyond those already in effect or in existence as of January 1, 2024, and are in addition to existing reimbursement rates and any other payments made by the department as of January 1, 2024, and do not supplant amounts that would otherwise be payable by a Medi-Cal managed care plan or the department, as applicable, to a recipient of moneys provided by Article 4 (commencing with Section 14199.109) of Chapter 7.5 of Part 3 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code. 18.17. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (3), $2,000,000 is available for the H.R. 1 Navigators for Clinics Program. (a) These funds will be made available as a reimbursement to the General Fund, subject to the deposit of nonstate money made to the State Department of Health Care Services and made with the intent for the exclusive use of the H.R. 1 Navigators for Clinics Program. (b) The department State Department of Health Care Services shall seek any necessary federal approvals for purposes of obtaining federal funding for activities conducted under this item. (c) Notwithstanding any other law, these funds shall be allocated for Medi-Cal outreach and enrollment activities. (d) For purposes of implementing this provision, the State Department of Health Care Services may enter into exclusive or nonexclusive contracts, or amend existing contracts, on a bid or negotiated basis. Notwithstanding any other law, contracts entered into or amended pursuant to this subdivision shall be exempt from Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 14825) of Part 5.5 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, Section 19130 of the Government Code, and Part 2 (commencing with Section 10100) of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code, and the State Administrative Manual, and shall be exempt from the review or approval of any division of the Department of General Services. (e) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the State Department of Health Care Services may implement, interpret, or make specific this provision, in whole or in part, by means of all-county letters, plan letters, information notices, provider bulletins, or other similar instructions, without taking any further regulatory action. (f) Notwithstanding any other law, the Department of Finance may authorize an increase to this appropriation for reimbursements received for providing health navigation to Community Health Centers and Regional Clinic Associations to maintain enrollment or retain coverage for Medi-Cal eligible individuals. Submission of the semiannual Medi-Cal estimate provided to the Legislature in January and May shall be considered meeting the notification requirement of this provision if the required information is included in the estimate. 18. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (2), $125,000,000 shall support county indigent care programs to provide, at a minimum, emergency services benefits for uninsured Californians. 19. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (2), $250,000,000 shall support California’s public hospital system. 20. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (2), $7,700,000 shall support rate increases as bridge funding for Congregate Living Health Facilities pending transition into the managed care delivery system. 21. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (2), $1,500,000 shall support staffing or contract authority to enable the Department to clear the Medi-Cal Home and Community Based Alternatives (HCBA) Waiver waitlist and serve all eligible individuals seeking enrollment in the HCBA Waiver program. 22. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (2), $25,000,000 shall support a gender-affirming care provider network stabilization and uncompensated care grant program, and $1,000,000 shall support the establishment of a gender-affirming care state-only Medi-Cal coverage and billing pathway. 4260-101-0232—For local assistance, State Department of Health Care Services, payable from the Hospital Services Account, Cigarette and Tobacco Products Surtax Fund ........................ 52,996,000 Schedule: (1) 3960022-Benefits (Medical Care and Services) ........................ 52,996,000 4260-101-0233—For local assistance, State Department of Health Care Services, payable from the Physician Services Account, Cigarette and Tobacco Products Surtax Fund ........................ 15,144,000 Schedule: (1) 3960022-Benefits (Medical Care and Services) ........................ 15,144,000 4260-101-0236—For local assistance, State Department of Health Care Services, payable from the Unallocated Account, Cigarette and Tobacco Products Surtax Fund ........................ 24,421,000 Schedule: (1) 3960022-Benefits (Medical Care and Services) ........................ 24,421,000 4260-101-0890—For local assistance, State Department of Health Care Services, payable from the Federal Trust Fund ........................ 131,721,418,000132,926,806,000 Schedule: (1) 3960015-County and Other Local Assistance Administration ........................ 6,455,582,0006,455,582,000 (2) 3960022-Benefits (Medical Care and Services) ........................ 125,265,836,000126,471,224,000 Provisions: 1. Notwithstanding any other law, the Department of Finance may authorize the transfer of expenditure authority between Schedules (1) and (2) of this item and between this item and Items 4260-102-0890, 4260-106-0890, 4260-111-0890, 4260-114-0890, and 4260-117-0890 in order to effectively administer the programs funded in these items. The Department of Finance shall notify the Legislature within 10 days of authorizing such a transfer unless prior notification of the transfer has been included in the Medi-Cal estimates submitted pursuant to Section 14100.5 of the Welfare and Institutions Code. The 10-day notification to the Legislature shall include the reasons for the transfer, the fiscal assumptions used in calculating the transfer amount, and any potential fiscal effects on the program from which funds are being transferred or for which funds are being reduced. 2. (a) The Department of Finance is authorized to approve expenditures payable from the Federal Trust Fund (Item 4260-101-0890) in those amounts made necessary by changes in either caseload or payments. (b) If the Department of Finance determines that the estimate of expenditures will exceed the expenditures authorized for this item, the Department of Finance shall so report to the Legislature. At the time the report is made, the amount of the appropriation made in this item shall be increased by the amount of the excess unless and until otherwise provided by law. 3. (a) Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (1), up to $3,500,000 is available for California’s Transforming Maternal Health (TMaH) Provider Infrastructure Payments. For the purpose of implementing TMaH Provider Infrastructure Payments, the State Department of Health Care Services may enter into exclusive or nonexclusive contracts, or amend existing contracts, on a bid or negotiated basis. Contracts entered into or amended pursuant to this provision, through June 30, 2027, shall be exempt from Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 14600) of Part 5.5 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 14825) of Part 5.5 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, Article 4 (commencing with Section 19130) of Chapter 5 of Part 2 of Division 5 of Title 2 of the Government Code, Part 2 (commencing with Section 10100) of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code, the State Contracting Manual, and the State Administrative Manual, and shall be exempt from the review or approval of any division of the Department of General Services. (b) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the State Department of Health Care Services may implement this provision by means of plan or county letters, information notices, plan or provider bulletins, or other similar instructions, without taking regulatory action. 4260-101-3085—For local assistance, State Department of Health Care Services, payable from the Behavioral Health Services Fund ........................ 258,528,000 Schedule: (1) 3960015-County and Other Local Assistance Administration ........................ 10,000,000 (2) 3960022-Benefits (Medical Care and Services) ........................ 248,528,000 4260-101-3156—For local assistance, State Department of Health Care Services, payable from the Children’s Health and Human Services Special Fund ........................ 154,506,000 Schedule: (1) 3960022-Benefits (Medical Care and Services) ........................ 154,506,000 4260-101-3305—For local assistance, State Department of Health Care Services, payable from the Healthcare Treatment Fund ........................ 461,274,000 Schedule: (1) 3960022-Benefits (Medical Care and Services) ........................ 461,274,000 Provisions: 1. The funds appropriated in this item are available for expenditure pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 30130.55 of the Revenue and Taxation Code. The Legislature finds and declares that the expenditures are made in accordance with the California Healthcare, Research and Prevention Tobacco Tax Act of 2016 (Proposition 56). The Legislature finds that the expenditures described in this item increase funding for the existing health care programs and services described in subdivision (a) of Section 30130.55 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, and that payments and support for the nonfederal share of payments for health care, services, and treatment are increased based on the criteria described in this item, which ensures timely access, limiting specific geographic shortages of services or ensuring quality care. Expenditures shall be used only for care provided by health care professionals, clinics, and health facilities that are licensed pursuant to Section 1250 of the Health and Safety Code, and to health plans contracting with the State Department of Health Care Services to provide health benefits pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 30130.55 of the Revenue and Taxation Code. 2. (a) To effectively administer the Medi-Cal program, the Department of Finance may decrease or increase the expenditure authority in this item to conform the appropriation to revised revenue estimates pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 30130.55 of the Revenue and Taxation Code or to conform the appropriation to revised expenditure estimates pursuant to Section 14100.5 of the Welfare and Institutions Code. (b) The Department of Finance shall notify the Joint Legislative Budget Committee within 10 days of authorizing a revision to this appropriation. 3. The funding appropriated in this item may be available for extending supplemental payments for physician services base rate increases. The State Department of Health Care Services shall develop the structure and parameters for the payments and rate increases to be made pursuant to this item. 4. The payments authorized pursuant to this item that are eligible for federal financial participation shall be available after any necessary federal approvals have been obtained, except that the State Department of Health Care Services may make payments available while federal approval is pending, provided that any payment amounts for which federal approval is not obtained shall be recouped from applicable providers. This item shall be implemented only to the extent the State Department of Health Care Services obtains any necessary federal approvals for payments eligible for federal financial participation and determines that federal financial participation is not otherwise jeopardized. To the extent applicable, each of the payments by provider type may be implemented independently as federal approval is received and to the extent federal financial participation is available and not otherwise jeopardized. 5. The payments authorized pursuant to this item will be implemented only to the extent federal Medicaid policy does not reduce federal financial participation as projected in the annual Budget Act as determined by the Department of Finance. 6. Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the State Department of Health Care Services may implement this item by means of plan or county letters, information notices, plan or provider bulletins, or other similar instructions, without taking regulatory action. 4260-101-3311—For local assistance, State Department of Health Care Services, payable from the Health Care Services Plan Fines and Penalties Fund ........................ 12,502,000 Schedule: (1) 3960022-Benefits (Medical Care and Services) ........................ 12,502,000 Provisions: 1. The funds appropriated in this item are available for expenditure pursuant to Section 15894 of the Welfare and Institutions Code. 2. To effectively administer the Medi-Cal program, the Department of Finance may decrease or increase this item to conform the appropriation to revised revenue estimates pursuant to Section 15894 of the Welfare and Institutions Code. 3. The Department of Finance shall notify the Joint Legislative Budget Committee within 10 days of authorizing a revision to this item. Submission of the semi-annual Medi-Cal estimate provided to the Legislature in January and May shall be deemed to have met the notification requirement of this provision if the required information is included in the estimate. 4260-101-3397—For local assistance, State Department of Health Care Services, payable from the Opioid Settlements Fund ........................ 59,453,000 Schedule: (1) 3960022-Benefits (Medical Care and Services) ........................ 59,453,000 4260-101-3414—For local assistance, State Department of Health Care Services, payable from the 988 State Suicide and Behavioral Health Crisis Services Fund ........................ 150,000,000125,000,000 Schedule: (1) 3960022-Benefits (Medical Care and Services) ........................ 150,000,000125,000,000 Provisions: 1.Of the funds appropriated in this item, $125,000,000 is available to support the nonfederal share of the mobile crisis benefit in the Medi-Cal program. 2.Of the funds appropriated in this item, $20,000,000 is available to support 988 crisis centers. 3.Of the funds appropriated in this item, $5,000,000 is available to support the California “Press 3” option for LGBTQ+ suicide prevention resources. 4260-101-3424—For local assistance, State Department of Health Care Services, payable from the CARE Act Accountability Fund ........................ 0 Schedule: (1) 3960022-Benefits (Medical Care and Services) ........................ 0 Provisions: 1. Upon approval of the Department of Finance, the amount available for expenditure in this item may be augmented up to the amount of resources available in the CARE Act Accountability Fund. 4260-101-3428—For local assistance, State Department of Health Care Services, payable from the Managed Care Enrollment Fund ........................ 2,827,156,000 Schedule: (1) 3960022-Benefits (Medical Care and Services) ........................ 2,827,156,000 Provisions: 1. The funds appropriated in this item are available for expenditure pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 14199.82 and subdivision (c) of Section 14105.200 of the Welfare and Institutions Code. 2. To effectively administer the Medi-Cal program, the Department of Finance may decrease or increase the expenditure authority in this item to conform the appropriation to revised revenue estimates pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 14199.82 of the Welfare and Institutions Code or to conform the appropriation to revised expenditure estimates pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 14105.200 of the Welfare and Institutions Code. 3. The Department of Finance shall notify the Joint Legislative Budget Committee within 10 days of authorizing a revision to this item. Submission of the semiannual Medi-Cal estimate provided to the Legislature in January and May shall be considered meeting the notification requirement of this provision if the required information is included in the estimate. 4260-101-3451—For local assistance, State Department of Health Care Services, payable from the Behavioral Health Schoolsite Fee Schedule Administration Fund. ........................ 50,900,000 Schedule: (1) 3960022-Benefits (Medical Care and Services) ........................ 50,900,000 4260-101-8140—For local assistance, State Department of Health Care Services, payable from the Vision Services CHIP-HSI Special Fund ........................ 773,000 Schedule: (1) 3960015-County and Other Local Assistance Administration ........................ 773,000 4260-102-0001—For local assistance, State Department of Health Care Services, 3960022-Benefits (Medical Care and Services), for supplemental reimbursement for debt service pursuant to Section 14085.5 of the Welfare and Institutions Code ........................ 27,610,000 Schedule: (1) 3960022-Benefits (Medical Care and Services) ........................ 27,610,000 Provisions: 1. Notwithstanding any other law, the Department of Finance may authorize transfer of expenditure authority between this item and Items 4260-101-0001, 4260-111-0001, 4260-114-0001, and 4260-117-0001 in order to effectively administer the programs funded in these items. The Department of Finance shall notify the Legislature within 10 days of authorizing such a transfer unless prior notification of the transfer has been included in the Medi-Cal estimates submitted pursuant to Section 14100.5 of the Welfare and Institutions Code. The 10-day notification to the Legislature shall include the reasons for the transfer, the fiscal assumptions used in calculating the transfer amount, and any potential effects on the program from which funds are being transferred or reduced. 4260-102-0890—For local assistance, State Department of Health Care Services, 3960022-Benefits (Medical Care and Services), payable from the Federal Trust Fund, for supplemental reimbursement for debt service pursuant to Section 14085.5 of the Welfare and Institutions Code ........................ 55,149,000 Schedule: (1) 3960022-Benefits (Medical Care and Services) ........................ 55,149,000 Provisions: 1. Notwithstanding any other law, the Department of Finance may authorize the transfer of expenditure authority between this item and Items 4260-101-0890, 4260-106-0890, 4260-111-0890, 4260-114-0890, and 4260-117-0890 in order to effectively administer the programs funded in these items. The Department of Finance shall notify the Legislature within 10 days of authorizing such a transfer unless prior notification of the transfer has been included in the Medi-Cal estimates submitted pursuant to Section 14100.5 of the Welfare and Institutions Code. The 10-day notification to the Legislature shall include the reasons for the transfer, the fiscal assumptions used in calculating the transfer amount, and any potential fiscal effects on the program from which funds are being transferred or for which funds are being reduced. 4260-105-0001—For transfer by the Controller to the Private Hospital Supplemental Fund ........................ 118,400,000 4260-106-0890—For local assistance, State Department of Health Care Services, payable from the Federal Trust Fund ........................ 102,614,000 Schedule: (1) 3960022-Benefits (Medical Care and Services) ........................ 100,298,000 (2) 3960015-County and Other Local Assistance Administration ........................ 2,316,000 Provisions: 1. Notwithstanding any other law, the Department of Finance may authorize the transfer of expenditure authority between this item and Items 4260-101-0890, 4260-102-0890, 4260-111-0890, 4260-114-0890, and 4260-117-0890 in order to effectively administer the programs funded in these items. The Department of Finance shall notify the Legislature within 10 days of authorizing such a transfer unless prior notification of the transfer has been included in the Medi-Cal estimate submitted pursuant to Section 14100.5 of the Welfare and Institutions Code. The 10-day notification to the Legislature shall include the reasons for the transfer, the final assumptions used in calculating the transfer amount, and any potential effects on the program from which the funds are being transferred or reduced. 2. (a) The Department of Finance is authorized to approve expenditures payable from the Federal Trust Fund (Item 4260-106-0890) in those amounts made necessary by changes in either caseload or payments. (b) If the Department of Finance determines that the estimate of expenditures will exceed the expenditures authorized for this item, the department shall so report to the Legislature. At the time the report is made, the amount of the appropriation made in this item shall be increased by the amount of the excess unless and until otherwise provided by law. 4260-111-0001—For local assistance, State Department of Health Care Services ........................ 297,707,000 Schedule: (1) 3960023-Children’s Medical Services ........................ 280,774,000 (2) 3960032-Primary, Rural and Indian Health ........................ 23,204,000 (3) Reimbursements to 3960023-Children’s Medical Services ........................ −5,643,000 (4) Reimbursements to 3960032-Primary, Rural and Indian Health ........................ −628,000 Provisions: 1. Program 3960023-Children’s Medical Services: Counties may retain 50 percent of total enrollment and assessment fees that are collected by the counties for the California Children’s Services Program. Fifty percent of the enrollment and assessment fee for each county shall be offset from the state’s match for that county. 2. Notwithstanding any other law, the Director of Finance may authorize transfer of expenditure authority between Schedules (1), (2), (3), and (4) of this item and between this item and Items 4260-101-0001, 4260-102-0001, 4260-114-0001, and 4260-117-0001 in order to effectively administer the programs funded in these items. The Director of Finance shall notify the Legislature within 10 days of authorizing such a transfer unless prior notification of the transfer has been included in the Medi-Cal estimates submitted pursuant to Section 14100.5 of the Welfare and Institutions Code. The 10-day notification to the Legislature shall include the reasons for the transfer, the fiscal assumptions used in calculating the transfer amount, and any potential fiscal effects on the program from which funds are being transferred or reduced. 4260-111-0890—For local assistance, State Department of Health Care Services, payable from the Federal Trust Fund ........................ 0 Schedule: (1) 3960032-Primary, Rural and Indian Health ........................ 0 Provisions: 1. Notwithstanding any other law, the Department of Finance may authorize the transfer of expenditure authority between this item and Items 4260-101-0890, 4260-102-0890, 4260-106-0890, 4260-114-0890, and 4260-117-0890 in order to effectively administer the programs funded in these items. The Department of Finance shall notify the Legislature within 10 days of authorizing such a transfer unless prior notification of the transfer has been included in the Medi-Cal estimates submitted pursuant to Section 14100.5 of the Welfare and Institutions Code. The 10-day notification to the Legislature shall include the reasons for the transfer, the fiscal assumptions used in calculating the transfer amount, and any potential fiscal effects on the program from which funds are being transferred or for which funds are being reduced. 4260-114-0009—For local assistance, State Department of Health Care Services, payable from the Breast Cancer Control Account ........................ 1,148,000 Schedule: (1) 3960050-Other Care Services ........................ 1,148,000 4260-114-0236—For local assistance, State Department of Health Care Services, payable from the Unallocated Account, Cigarette and Tobacco Products Surtax Fund ........................ 6,286,000 Schedule: (1) 3960050-Other Care Services ........................ 6,286,000 4260-114-0890—For local assistance, State Department of Health Care Services, payable from the Federal Trust Fund ........................ 6,253,000 Schedule: (1) 3960050-Other Care Services ........................ 6,253,000 Provisions: 1. Notwithstanding any other law, the Department of Finance may authorize the transfer of expenditure authority between this item and Items 4260-101-0890, 4260-102-0890, 4260-106-0890, 4260-111-0890, and 4260-117-0890 in order to effectively administer the programs funded in these items. The Department of Finance shall notify the Legislature within 10 days of authorizing such a transfer unless prior notification of the transfer has been included in the Medi-Cal estimates submitted pursuant to Section 14100.5 of the Welfare and Institutions Code. The 10-day notification to the Legislature shall include the reasons for the transfer, the fiscal assumptions used in calculating the transfer amount, and any potential fiscal effects on the program from which funds are being transferred or for which funds are being reduced. 4260-115-0001—For local assistance, State Department of Health Care Services ........................ 500,000 Schedule: (1) 3960050-Other Care Services ........................ 500,000 4260-115-0890—For local assistance, State Department of Health Care Services, payable from the Federal Trust Fund ........................ 86,825,000 Schedule: (1) 3960050-Other Care Services ........................ 86,825,000 Provisions: 1. Notwithstanding any other law, the Director of Finance may authorize the transfer of expenditure authority between this item and Item 4260-116-0890 in order to effectively administer the programs funded in these items. The Director of Finance shall notify the Legislature within 10 days of authorizing such a transfer. The 10-day notification to the Legislature shall include the reason for transfer and any potential fiscal effects on the program from which funds are being transferred or reduced. 2. For purposes of administering or implementing federal grants that support first episode psychosis, crisis services, or 988 Suicide and Crisis Lifeline centers, the State Department of Health Care Services may enter into exclusive or nonexclusive contracts, or amend existing contracts, on a bid or negotiated basis. Contracts entered into or amended pursuant to this provision shall be exempt from Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 14825) of Part 5.5 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, Part 2 (commencing with Section 10100) of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code, and the State Administrative Manual, and shall be exempt from the review or approval of any division of the Department of General Services. 4260-115-3414—For local assistance, State Department of Health Care Services, payable from the 988 State Suicide and Behavioral Health Crisis Services Fund ........................ 31,961,00056,961,000 Schedule: (1) 3960050-Other Care Services ........................ 31,961,00056,961,000 Provisions: 1. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $5,000,000 is available to support the California “Press 3” option for LGBTQ+ suicide prevention resources. 4260-116-0001—For local assistance, State Department of Health Care Services ........................ 33,900,000 Schedule: (1) 3960050-Other Care Services ........................ 45,503,000 (2) Reimbursements to 3960050-Other Care Services ........................ −11,603,000 4260-116-0890—For local assistance, State Department of Health Care Services, payable from the Federal Trust Fund ........................ 253,034,000 Schedule: (1) 3960050-Other Care Services ........................ 253,034,000 Provisions: 1. Notwithstanding any other law, the Director of Finance may authorize the transfer of expenditure authority between this item and Item 4260-115-0890 in order to effectively administer the programs funded in these items. The Director of Finance shall notify the Legislature within 10 days of authorizing such a transfer. The 10-day notification to the Legislature shall include the reason for transfer and any potential fiscal effects on the program from which funds are being transferred or reduced. 2. For purposes of implementing federal grants included in this item, that address the opioid and stimulant epidemics through prevention, treatment, harm reduction, or recovery services, the State Department of Health Care Services may enter into exclusive or nonexclusive contracts, or amend existing contracts, on a bid or negotiated basis. Contracts entered into or amended pursuant to this provision shall be exempt from Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 14825) of Part 5.5 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, Part 2 (commencing with Section 10100) of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code, and the State Administrative Manual, and shall be exempt from the review or approval of any division of the Department of General Services. 4260-117-0001—For local assistance, State Department of Health Care Services, for implementation of the federal Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996 ........................ 6,694,000 Schedule: (1) 3960015-County and Other Local Assistance Administration ........................ 6,694,000 Provisions: 1. Notwithstanding any other law, the Department of Finance may authorize the transfer of expenditure authority between this item and Items 4260-101-0001, 4260-102-0001, 4260-111-0001, and 4260-114-0001, in order to effectively administer the programs funded in these items. The Department of Finance shall notify the Legislature within 10 days of authorizing such transfer unless prior notification of the transfer has been included in the Medi-Cal estimates submitted pursuant to Section 14100.5 of the Welfare and Institutions Code. The 10-day notification to the Legislature shall include the reasons for the transfer, the fiscal assumptions used in calculating the transfer amount, and any potential fiscal effects on the program from which funds are being transferred or reduced. 4260-117-0890—For local assistance, State Department of Health Care Services, payable from the Federal Trust Fund, for implementation of the federal Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996 ........................ 18,845,000 Schedule: (1) 3960015-County and Other Local Assistance Administration ........................ 18,845,000 Provisions: 1. Notwithstanding any other law, the Department of Finance may authorize the transfer of expenditure authority between this item and Items 4260-101-0890, 4260-102-0890, 4260-106-0890, 4260-111-0890, and 4260-114-0890 in order to effectively administer the programs funded in these items. The Department of Finance shall notify the Legislature within 10 days of authorizing such a transfer unless prior notification of the transfer has been included in the Medi-Cal estimates submitted pursuant to Section 14100.5 of the Welfare and Institutions Code. The 10-day notification to the Legislature shall include the reasons for the transfer, the fiscal assumptions used in calculating the transfer amount, and any potential fiscal effects on the program from which funds are being transferred or for which funds are being reduced. 2. (a) The Department of Finance is authorized to approve expenditures payable from the Federal Trust Fund (Item 4260-117-0890) in those amounts made necessary by changes in either caseload or payments. (b) If the Department of Finance determines that the estimate of expenditures will exceed the expenditures authorized for this item, the department shall so report to the Legislature. At the time the report is made, the amount of the appropriation made in this item shall be increased by the amount of the excess unless and until otherwise provided by law. 4265-001-0001—For support of State Department of Public Health ........................ 374,617,000 Schedule: (1) 4040-Public Health Emergency Preparedness ........................ 17,351,000 (2) 4045-Public and Environmental Health ........................ 567,555,000 (3) 4050-Licensing and Certification ........................ 28,685,000 (4) 9900100-Administration ........................ 60,433,000 (5) 9900200-Administration—​Distributed ........................ −60,433,000 (6) Reimbursements to 4045-Public and Environmental Health ........................ −222,833,000 (7) Reimbursements to 4050-Licensing and Certification ........................ −16,141,000 Provisions: 1. Except as otherwise prohibited by law, the State Department of Public Health shall promulgate emergency regulations to adjust the public health fees set by regulation to an amount such that, if the new fees were effective throughout the 2026–27 fiscal year, the estimated revenues would be sufficient to offset at least 95 percent of the approved program level intended to be supported by those fees. The General Fund fees of the department that are subject to the annual fee adjustment pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 100425 of the Health and Safety Code shall be increased by 20.3 percent. The special fund fees of the department that are subject to the annual fee adjustment pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 100425 of the Health and Safety Code may be increased by 20.3 percent only if the fund condition statement for a fund projects a reserve less than 10 percent of estimated expenditures and the revenues projected for the 2026–27 fiscal year are less than the appropriation contained in this act. 2. Notwithstanding subdivision (b) of Section 100450 of the Health and Safety Code, departmental fees that are subject to the annual fee adjustment pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 100450 of the Health and Safety Code shall not be increased for the 2026–27 fiscal year. This adjustment shall not be applied to fees established by subdivisions (f), (g), (m), and (s) of Section 1300 of the Business and Professions Code. 3. The State Department of Public Health shall limit expenditures in this item to implement the Uniform Anatomical Gift Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 7150) of Part 1 of Division 7 of the Health and Safety Code) to the amount of actual fees collected from tissue banks. 4. Notwithstanding any other law, and upon approval of the Director of Finance, the amount appropriated in Schedule (1) shall be increased to adjust for federal reimbursement from the Federal Emergency Management Agency for wildfires and related emergencies. The Department of Finance shall notify the Legislature within 10 days of authorizing an augmentation pursuant to this provision. The notification to the Legislature shall describe the reason for the augmentation. 5. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (2), $1,020,000 shall be available for implementation and consulting contract costs associated with the implementation of the Real Foods, Healthy Kids Act upon approval of Stage 4 of the Project Approval Lifecycle or a Project Delegation Request by the Department of Technology. 6. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (2), up to $10,000,000 shall be available to design, develop, and implement a disease surveillance system upon approval of Stage 4 Project Approval Lifecycle project documents by the Department of Technology. 4265-001-0007—For support of State Department of Public Health, payable from the Breast Cancer Research Account, Breast Cancer Fund ........................ 491,000 Schedule: (1) 4045-Public and Environmental Health ........................ 491,000 4265-001-0029—For support of State Department of Public Health, payable from the Nuclear Planning Assessment Special Account ........................ 1,130,000 Schedule: (1) 4045-Public and Environmental Health ........................ 1,130,000 4265-001-0044—For support of State Department of Public Health, payable from the Motor Vehicle Account, State Transportation Fund ........................ 1,632,000 Schedule: (1) 4045-Public and Environmental Health ........................ 1,632,000 4265-001-0066—For support of State Department of Public Health, payable from the Sale of Tobacco to Minors Control Account ........................ 3,029,000 Schedule: (1) 4045-Public and Environmental Health ........................ 3,029,000 Provisions: 1. The amount appropriated in this item includes revenues derived from the assessment of fines and penalties imposed as specified in Section 13332.18 of the Government Code. 4265-001-0070—For support of State Department of Public Health, payable from the Occupational Lead Poisoning Prevention Account ........................ 3,724,000 Schedule: (1) 4045-Public and Environmental Health ........................ 3,724,000 Provisions: 1. The amount appropriated in this item includes revenues derived from the assessment of fines and penalties imposed as specified in Section 13332.18 of the Government Code. 4265-001-0074—For support of State Department of Public Health, payable from the Medical Waste Management Fund ........................ 3,350,000 Schedule: (1) 4045-Public and Environmental Health ........................ 3,350,000 Provisions: 1. The amount appropriated in this item includes revenues derived from the assessment of fines and penalties imposed as specified in Section 13332.18 of the Government Code. 4265-001-0075—For support of State Department of Public Health, payable from the Radiation Control Fund ........................ 36,763,000 Schedule: (1) 4045-Public and Environmental Health ........................ 36,763,000 Provisions: 1. The amount appropriated in this item includes revenues derived from the assessment of fines and penalties imposed as specified in Section 13332.18 of the Government Code. 4265-001-0076—For support of State Department of Public Health, payable from the Tissue Bank License Fund ........................ 1,479,000 Schedule: (1) 4050-Licensing and Certification ........................ 1,479,000 4265-001-0080—For support of State Department of Public Health, payable from the Childhood Lead Poisoning Prevention Fund ........................ 16,087,000 Schedule: (1) 4045-Public and Environmental Health ........................ 16,087,000 4265-001-0082—For support of State Department of Public Health, payable from the Export Document Program Fund ........................ 710,000 Schedule: (1) 4045-Public and Environmental Health ........................ 710,000 4265-001-0098—For support of State Department of Public Health, payable from the Clinical Laboratory Improvement Fund ........................ 23,129,000 Schedule: (1) 4045-Public and Environmental Health ........................ 5,000,000 (2) 4050-Licensing and Certification ........................ 18,129,000 Provisions: 1. The amount appropriated in this item includes revenues derived from the assessment of fines and penalties imposed as specified in Section 13332.18 of the Government Code. 4265-001-0099—For support of State Department of Public Health, payable from the Health Statistics Special Fund ........................ 43,812,000 Schedule: (1) 4045-Public and Environmental Health ........................ 43,812,000 Provisions: 1. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (1), $4,100,000 shall be available for the procurement platform licensing, subscription, and integration services contingent upon the approval of the Department of Finance. 4265-001-0106—For support of State Department of Public Health, payable from the Department of Pesticide Regulation Fund ........................ 284,000 Schedule: (1) 4045-Public and Environmental Health ........................ 284,000 4265-001-0115—For support of State Department of Public Health, payable from the Air Pollution Control Fund ........................ 244,000 Schedule: (1) 4045-Public and Environmental Health ........................ 244,000 4265-001-0177—For support of State Department of Public Health, payable from the Food Safety Fund ........................ 13,656,000 Schedule: (1) 4045-Public and Environmental Health ........................ 13,656,000 4265-001-0203—For support of State Department of Public Health, payable from the Genetic Disease Testing Fund ........................ 35,852,000 Schedule: (1) 4045-Public and Environmental Health ........................ 35,852,000 4265-001-0231—For support of State Department of Public Health, payable from the Health Education Account, Cigarette and Tobacco Products Surtax Fund ........................ 13,694,000 Schedule: (1) 4045-Public and Environmental Health ........................ 13,694,000 4265-001-0234—For support of State Department of Public Health, payable from the Research Account, Cigarette and Tobacco Products Surtax Fund ........................ 2,172,000 Schedule: (1) 4045-Public and Environmental Health ........................ 2,172,000 4265-001-0236—For support of State Department of Public Health, payable from the Unallocated Account, Cigarette and Tobacco Products Surtax Fund ........................ 753,0001,211,000 Schedule: (1) 4045-Public and Environmental Health ........................ 753,0001,211,000 4265-001-0272—For support of State Department of Public Health, payable from the Infant Botulism Treatment and Prevention Fund ........................ 16,865,000 Schedule: (1) 4045-Public and Environmental Health ........................ 16,865,000 4265-001-0279—For support of State Department of Public Health, payable from the Child Health and Safety Fund ........................ 22,000 Schedule: (1) 4045-Public and Environmental Health ........................ 22,000 Provisions: 1. The funds appropriated in this item shall not exceed 5 percent of the total amount appropriated to the State Department of Public Health from the Child Health and Safety Fund. These funds shall be used to administer the Kids’ Plates Program. 4265-001-0335—For support of State Department of Public Health, payable from the Registered Environmental Health Specialist Fund ........................ 519,000 Schedule: (1) 4045-Public and Environmental Health ........................ 519,000 4265-001-0367—For support of State Department of Public Health, payable from the Indian Gaming Special Distribution Fund ........................ 4,051,000 Schedule: (1) 4045-Public and Environmental Health ........................ 4,051,000 4265-001-0478—For support of State Department of Public Health, payable from the Vectorborne Disease Account ........................ 276,000 Schedule: (1) 4045-Public and Environmental Health ........................ 276,000 4265-001-0557—For support of State Department of Public Health, payable from the Toxic Substances Control Account ........................ 397,000 Schedule: (1) 4045-Public and Environmental Health ........................ 397,000 4265-001-0642—For support of State Department of Public Health, payable from the Domestic Violence Training and Education Fund ........................ 384,000 Schedule: (1) 4045-Public and Environmental Health ........................ 384,000 4265-001-0823—For support of State Department of Public Health, payable from the California Alzheimer’s Disease and Related Disorders Research Fund ........................ 177,000 Schedule: (1) 4045-Public and Environmental Health ........................ 177,000 4265-001-0890—For support of State Department of Public Health, payable from the Federal Trust Fund ........................ 601,812,000 Schedule: (1) 4040-Public Health Emergency Preparedness ........................ 69,522,000 (2) 4045-Public and Environmental Health ........................ 390,211,000 (3) 4050-Licensing and Certification ........................ 142,079,000 Provisions: 1. Notwithstanding Section 28.00, the State Department of Public Health shall report on a listing of all federal funds received to the Department of Finance on October 15 and March 15 of the fiscal year. This report will serve as the basis for the budget year expenditure authority in this item. If an augmentation is needed above the reporting threshold in Section 28.00, then legislative notification is required for approval not sooner than 30 days after notification, per the requirements of Section 28.00. If an augmentation is not needed, then legislative notification is not required. 2. The Department of Finance may authorize the transfer of expenditure authority from this item to Item 4265-111-0890 in order to reflect modifications in the use of federal public health emergency preparedness grants. Transfers pursuant to this provision shall not be approved sooner than 30 days after notification in writing is provided to the chairpersons of the committees in each house of the Legislature that consider appropriations and the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, or no sooner than whatever lesser time the chairperson of the joint committee, or the chairperson’s designee, may in each instance determine. 4265-001-3018—For support of State Department of Public Health, payable from the Drug and Device Safety Fund ........................ 8,406,000 Schedule: (1) 4045-Public and Environmental Health ........................ 8,406,000 4265-001-3081—For support of State Department of Public Health, payable from the Cannery Inspection Fund ........................ 3,559,000 Schedule: (1) 4045-Public and Environmental Health ........................ 3,559,000 4265-001-3085—For support of State Department of Public Health, payable from the Behavioral Health Services Fund ........................ 114,836,000 Schedule: (1) 4045-Public and Environmental Health ........................ 114,836,000 Provisions: 1. Funds appropriated in this item shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2029, for the State Department of Public Health to implement behavioral health programs and initiatives authorized under Proposition 1 (March 5, 2024, statewide general election). 2. Contracts entered into or amended pursuant to this provision shall be exempt from Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 14825) of Part 5.5 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, Section 19130 of the Government Code, Part 2 (commencing with Section 10100) of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code, and the State Administrative Manual, and shall be exempt from the review or approval of any division of the Department of General Services. 4265-001-3098—For support of State Department of Public Health, payable from the State Department of Public Health Licensing and Certification Program Fund ........................ 345,055,000 Schedule: (1) 4040-Public Health Emergency Preparedness ........................ 1,211,000 (2) 4045-Public and Environmental Health ........................ 2,000,000 (3) 4050-Licensing and Certification ........................ 341,844,000 Provisions: 1. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (3), $450,000 shall be available for the Program Flex Waiver, contingent upon Department of Technology approval through the Project Approval Lifecycle or the Project Delivery Lifecycle or upon the proposed effort being scoped into the Patient Safety and Antidiscrimination Project, requiring approval of the development and implementation phase. 4265-001-3110—For support of State Department of Public Health, payable from the Gambling Addiction Program Fund ........................ 150,000 Schedule: (1) 4045-Public and Environmental Health ........................ 150,000 4265-001-3114—For support of State Department of Public Health, payable from the Birth Defects Monitoring Program Fund ........................ 2,238,000 Schedule: (1) 4045-Public and Environmental Health ........................ 2,238,000 4265-001-3155—For support of State Department of Public Health, payable from the Lead-Related Construction Fund ........................ 890,000 Schedule: (1) 4045-Public and Environmental Health ........................ 890,000 4265-001-3237—For support of State Department of Public Health, payable from the Cost of Implementation Account, Air Pollution Control Fund ........................ 388,000 Schedule: (1) 4045-Public and Environmental Health ........................ 388,000 4265-001-3288—For support of State Department of Public Health, payable from the Cannabis Control Fund ........................ 544,000 Schedule: (1) 4045-Public and Environmental Health ........................ 544,000 4265-001-3385—For support of State Department of Public Health, payable from the Transgender, Gender Nonconforming, and Intersex (TGI) Wellness and Equity Fund ........................ 500,000 Schedule: (1) 4045-Public and Environmental Health ........................ 500,000 Provisions: 1. Notwithstanding any other law, contracts entered into or amended pursuant to this item are exempt from the personal services contracting requirements of Article 4 (commencing with Section 19130) of Chapter 5 of Part 2 of Division 5 of Title 2 of the Government Code, from Part 2 (commencing with Section 10100) of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code, the State Administrative Manual, and the State Contracting Manual, and are exempt from the review or approval of the Department of General Services, including as specified in Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 14825) of Part 5.5 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code. 2. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (1), $500,000 shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2029, to fund services related to prevention, care and treatment for eligible individuals living with HIV and AIDS, or at risk of HIV infection. 4265-001-3396—For support of State Department of Public Health, payable from the Industrial Hemp Enrollment and Oversight Fund ........................ 1,235,000 Schedule: (1) 4045-Public and Environmental Health ........................ 1,235,000 4265-001-3397—For support of State Department of Public Health, payable from the Opioid Settlements Fund ........................ 2,104,000 Schedule: (1) 4045-Public and Environmental Health ........................ 2,104,000 Provisions: 1. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $960,000 shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2027, for fentanyl program grants and innovative approaches to make fentanyl test strips and naloxone more widely available. 2. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $885,000 shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2028, to support and provide technical assistance for the Overdose Prevention and Harm Reduction Initiative and related activities by the State Department of Public Health. 3. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $259,000 shall be available to implement Senate Bill 908 (Ch. 867, Stats. 2024) to monitor and report on fentanyl-related deaths in children, develop guidance, and spread awareness about how to prevent overdoses in children. 4265-001-3477—For support of State Department of Public Health, payable from the Internal Departmental Quality Improvement Account ........................ 10,164,000 Schedule: (1) 4040-Public Health Emergency Preparedness ........................ 1,211,000 (2) 4050-Licensing and Certification ........................ 8,953,000 Provisions: 1. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (2), $5,941,000 shall be available upon approval of Stage 4 of the Project Approval Lifecycle by the Department of Technology. 2. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (2), $1,400,000 shall be available for the Program Flex Waiver contingent upon Department of Technology approval through the Project Approval Lifecycle or the Project Delivery Lifecycle, or upon the proposed effort being scoped into the Patient Safety and Antidiscrimination Project requiring approval of the development and implementation phase. 4265-001-3479—For support of State Department of Public Health, payable from the State Health Facilities Citation Penalties Account ........................ 1,400,000 Schedule: (1) 4050-Licensing and Certification ........................ 1,400,000 4265-001-8139—For support of State Department of Public Health, payable from the California ALS Research Network Voluntary Tax Contribution Fund ........................ 185,000 Schedule: (1) 4045-Public and Environmental Health ........................ 185,000 4265-001-8141—For support of State Department of Public Health, payable from the Electronic Cigarette Settlements Fund ........................ 6,660,000 Schedule: (1) 4045-Public and Environmental Health ........................ 6,660,000 Provisions: 1. The funds appropriated in this item shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2029, to support media and outreach campaigns, research, surveys, focus groups, and other targeted outreach involving youth and young adults, training and technical assistance, and special projects related to awareness of the harms of vaping, vaping cessation, and tobacco addiction intervention. 4265-001-8510—For support of State Department of Public Health, payable from the Federal Health Facilities Citation Penalties Account ........................ 471,0007,920,000 Schedule: (1) 4050-Licensing and Certification ........................ 471,0007,920,000 4265-004-0001—For transfer to State Department of Public Health Licensing and Certification Program Fund ........................ 3,700,000 4265-005-8510—For support of State Department of Public Health, payable from the Federal Health Facilities Citation Penalties Account7,449,000Schedule:(1)4050-Licensing and Certification7,449,000 4265-012-3080—For transfer by the Controller, from the AIDS Drug Assistance Program Rebate Fund, to the Transgender, Gender Nonconforming, and Intersex (TGI) Wellness and Equity Fund ........................ (5,000,000) 4265-017-0203—For support of State Department of Public Health, for implementation of the federal Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996 payable from the Genetic Disease Testing Fund ........................ 551,000 Schedule: (1) 4045-Public and Environmental Health ........................ 551,000 4265-093-0001—For support of State Department of Public Health, for rental payments on lease-revenue bonds (Richmond Laboratory) ........................ 2,244,000 Schedule: (1) 4045-Public and Environmental Health ........................ 5,010,000 (2) Reimbursements to 4045-Public and Environmental Health ........................ −2,766,000 Provisions: 1. The Controller shall transfer funds appropriated in this item for base rental as and when provided for in the schedule submitted by the State Public Works Board. Notwithstanding the payment dates in any related Facility Lease or Indenture, the schedule may provide for an earlier transfer of funds to ensure debt requirements are met and pay base rental in full when due. 2. The Controller shall transfer for additional rental no later than 30 days after enactment of this budget, $50,000 of the amount appropriated in this item, to the Expense Account in the Public Buildings Construction Fund. 3. This item may be adjusted pursuant to Section 4.30. Any adjustments to this item shall be reported to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee pursuant to Section 4.30. 4265-093-0044—For support of State Department of Public Health, for rental payments on lease-revenue bonds, payable from the Motor Vehicle Account, State Transportation Fund ........................ 26,000 Schedule: (1) 4045-Public and Environmental Health ........................ 26,000 Provisions: 1. The Controller shall transfer funds appropriated in this item for base rental as and when provided for in the schedule submitted by the State Public Works Board. Notwithstanding the payment dates in any related Facility Lease or Indenture, the schedule may provide for an earlier transfer of funds to ensure debt requirements are met and pay base rental in full when due. 2. The Controller shall transfer for additional rental no later than 30 days after enactment of this budget, $0 of the amount appropriated in this item, to the Expense Account in the Public Buildings Construction Fund. 3. This item may be adjusted pursuant to Section 4.30. Any adjustments to this item shall be reported to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee pursuant to Section 4.30. 4265-093-0066—For support of State Department of Public Health, for rental payments on lease-revenue bonds, payable from the Sale of Tobacco to Minors Control Account ........................ 1,000 Schedule: (1) 4045-Public and Environmental Health ........................ 1,000 Provisions: 1. The Controller shall transfer funds appropriated in this item for base rental as and when provided for in the schedule submitted by the State Public Works Board. Notwithstanding the payment dates in any related Facility Lease or Indenture, the schedule may provide for an earlier transfer of funds to ensure debt requirements are met and pay base rental in full when due. 2. The Controller shall transfer for additional rental no later than 30 days after enactment of this budget, $0 of the amount appropriated in this item, to the Expense Account in the Public Buildings Construction Fund. 3. This item may be adjusted pursuant to Section 4.30. Any adjustments to this item shall be reported to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee pursuant to Section 4.30. 4265-093-0070—For support of State Department of Public Health, for rental payments on lease-revenue bonds, payable from the Occupational Lead Poisoning Prevention Account ........................ 41,000 Schedule: (1) 4045-Public and Environmental Health ........................ 41,000 Provisions: 1. The Controller shall transfer funds appropriated in this item for base rental as and when provided for in the schedule submitted by the State Public Works Board. Notwithstanding the payment dates in any related Facility Lease or Indenture, the schedule may provide for an earlier transfer of funds to ensure debt requirements are met and pay base rental in full when due. 2. The Controller shall transfer for additional rental no later than 30 days after enactment of this budget, $0 of the amount appropriated in this item, to the Expense Account in the Public Buildings Construction Fund. 3. This item may be adjusted pursuant to Section 4.30. Any adjustments to this item shall be reported to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee pursuant to Section 4.30. 4265-093-0075—For support of State Department of Public Health, for rental payments on lease-revenue bonds, payable from the Radiation Control Fund ........................ 16,000 Schedule: (1) 4045-Public and Environmental Health ........................ 16,000 Provisions: 1. The Controller shall transfer funds appropriated in this item for base rental as and when provided for in the schedule submitted by the State Public Works Board. Notwithstanding the payment dates in any related Facility Lease or Indenture, the schedule may provide for an earlier transfer of funds to ensure debt requirements are met and pay base rental in full when due. 2. The Controller shall transfer for additional rental no later than 30 days after enactment of this budget, $0 of the amount appropriated in this item, to the Expense Account in the Public Buildings Construction Fund. 3. This item may be adjusted pursuant to Section 4.30. Any adjustments to this item shall be reported to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee pursuant to Section 4.30. 4265-093-0076—For support of State Department of Public Health, for rental payments on lease-revenue bonds, payable from the Tissue Bank License Fund ........................ 7,000 Schedule: (1) 4050-Licensing and Certification ........................ 7,000 Provisions: 1. The Controller shall transfer funds appropriated in this item for base rental as and when provided for in the schedule submitted by the State Public Works Board. Notwithstanding the payment dates in any related Facility Lease or Indenture, the schedule may provide for an earlier transfer of funds to ensure debt requirements are met and pay base rental in full when due. 2. The Controller shall transfer for additional rental no later than 30 days after enactment of this budget, $0 of the amount appropriated in this item, to the Expense Account in the Public Buildings Construction Fund. 3. This item may be adjusted pursuant to Section 4.30. Any adjustments to this item shall be reported to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee pursuant to Section 4.30. 4265-093-0080—For support of State Department of Public Health, for rental payments on lease-revenue bonds, payable from the Childhood Lead Poisoning Prevention Fund ........................ 183,000 Schedule: (1) 4045-Public and Environmental Health ........................ 183,000 Provisions: 1. The Controller shall transfer funds appropriated in this item for base rental as and when provided for in the schedule submitted by the State Public Works Board. Notwithstanding the payment dates in any related Facility Lease or Indenture, the schedule may provide for an earlier transfer of funds to ensure debt requirements are met and pay base rental in full when due. 2. The Controller shall transfer for additional rental no later than 30 days after enactment of this budget, $2,000 of the amount appropriated in this item, to the Expense Account in the Public Buildings Construction Fund. 3. This item may be adjusted pursuant to Section 4.30. Any adjustments to this item shall be reported to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee pursuant to Section 4.30. 4265-093-0098—For support of State Department of Public Health, for rental payments on lease-revenue bonds, payable from the Clinical Laboratory Improvement Fund ........................ 99,000 Schedule: (1) 4050-Licensing and Certification ........................ 99,000 Provisions: 1. The Controller shall transfer funds appropriated in this item for base rental as and when provided for in the schedule submitted by the State Public Works Board. Notwithstanding the payment dates in any related Facility Lease or Indenture, the schedule may provide for an earlier transfer of funds to ensure debt requirements are met and pay base rental in full when due. 2. The Controller shall transfer for additional rental no later than 30 days after enactment of this budget, $1,000 of the amount appropriated in this item, to the Expense Account in the Public Buildings Construction Fund. 3. This item may be adjusted pursuant to Section 4.30. Any adjustments to this item shall be reported to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee pursuant to Section 4.30. 4265-093-0106—For support of State Department of Public Health, for rental payments on lease-revenue bonds, payable from the Department of Pesticide Regulation Fund ........................ 12,000 Schedule: (1) 4045-Public and Environmental Health ........................ 12,000 Provisions: 1. The Controller shall transfer funds appropriated in this item for base rental as and when provided for in the schedule submitted by the State Public Works Board. Notwithstanding the payment dates in any related Facility Lease or Indenture, the schedule may provide for an earlier transfer of funds to ensure debt requirements are met and pay base rental in full when due. 2. The Controller shall transfer for additional rental no later than 30 days after enactment of this budget, $0 of the amount appropriated in this item, to the Expense Account in the Public Buildings Construction Fund. 3. This item may be adjusted pursuant to Section 4.30. Any adjustments to this item shall be reported to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee pursuant to Section 4.30. 4265-093-0115—For support of State Department of Public Health, for rental payments on lease-revenue bonds, payable from the Air Pollution Control Fund ........................ 11,000 Schedule: (1) 4045-Public and Environmental Health ........................ 11,000 Provisions: 1. The Controller shall transfer funds appropriated in this item for base rental as and when provided for in the schedule submitted by the State Public Works Board. Notwithstanding the payment dates in any related Facility Lease or Indenture, the schedule may provide for an earlier transfer of funds to ensure debt requirements are met and pay base rental in full when due. 2. The Controller shall transfer for additional rental no later than 30 days after enactment of this budget, $0 of the amount appropriated in this item, to the Expense Account in the Public Buildings Construction Fund. 3. This item may be adjusted pursuant to Section 4.30. Any adjustments to this item shall be reported to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee pursuant to Section 4.30. 4265-093-0177—For support of State Department of Public Health, for rental payments on lease-revenue bonds, payable from the Food Safety Fund ........................ 12,000 Schedule: (1) 4045-Public and Environmental Health ........................ 12,000 Provisions: 1. The Controller shall transfer funds appropriated in this item for base rental as and when provided for in the schedule submitted by the State Public Works Board. Notwithstanding the payment dates in any related Facility Lease or Indenture, the schedule may provide for an earlier transfer of funds to ensure debt requirements are met and pay base rental in full when due. 2. The Controller shall transfer for additional rental no later than 30 days after enactment of this budget, $0 of the amount appropriated in this item, to the Expense Account in the Public Buildings Construction Fund. 3. This item may be adjusted pursuant to Section 4.30. Any adjustments to this item shall be reported to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee pursuant to Section 4.30. 4265-093-0203—For support of State Department of Public Health, for rental payments on lease-revenue bonds, payable from the Genetic Disease Testing Fund ........................ 344,000 Schedule: (1) 4045-Public and Environmental Health ........................ 344,000 Provisions: 1. The Controller shall transfer funds appropriated in this item for base rental as and when provided for in the schedule submitted by the State Public Works Board. Notwithstanding the payment dates in any related Facility Lease or Indenture, the schedule may provide for an earlier transfer of funds to ensure debt requirements are met and pay base rental in full when due. 2. The Controller shall transfer for additional rental no later than 30 days after enactment of this budget, $4,000 of the amount appropriated in this item, to the Expense Account in the Public Buildings Construction Fund. 3. This item may be adjusted pursuant to Section 4.30. Any adjustments to this item shall be reported to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee pursuant to Section 4.30. 4265-093-0234—For support of State Department of Public Health, for rental payments on lease-revenue bonds, payable from the Research Account, Cigarette and Tobacco Products Surtax Fund ........................ 6,000 Schedule: (1) 4045-Public and Environmental Health ........................ 6,000 Provisions: 1. The Controller shall transfer funds appropriated in this item for base rental as and when provided for in the schedule submitted by the State Public Works Board. Notwithstanding the payment dates in any related Facility Lease or Indenture, the schedule may provide for an earlier transfer of funds to ensure debt requirements are met and pay base rental in full when due. 2. The Controller shall transfer for additional rental no later than 30 days after enactment of this budget, $0 of the amount appropriated in this item, to the Expense Account in the Public Buildings Construction Fund. 3. This item may be adjusted pursuant to Section 4.30. Any adjustments to this item shall be reported to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee pursuant to Section 4.30. 4265-093-0236—For support of State Department of Public Health, for rental payments on lease-revenue bonds, payable from the Unallocated Account, Cigarette and Tobacco Products Surtax Fund ........................ 8,000 Schedule: (1) 4045-Public and Environmental Health ........................ 8,000 Provisions: 1. The Controller shall transfer funds appropriated in this item for base rental as and when provided for in the schedule submitted by the State Public Works Board. Notwithstanding the payment dates in any related Facility Lease or Indenture, the schedule may provide for an earlier transfer of funds to ensure debt requirements are met and pay base rental in full when due. 2. The Controller shall transfer for additional rental no later than 30 days after enactment of this budget, $0 of the amount appropriated in this item, to the Expense Account in the Public Buildings Construction Fund. 3. This item may be adjusted pursuant to Section 4.30. Any adjustments to this item shall be reported to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee pursuant to Section 4.30. 4265-093-0272—For support of State Department of Public Health, for rental payments on lease-revenue bonds, payable from the Infant Botulism Treatment and Prevention Fund ........................ 25,000 Schedule: (1) 4045-Public and Environmental Health ........................ 25,000 Provisions: 1. The Controller shall transfer funds appropriated in this item for base rental as and when provided for in the schedule submitted by the State Public Works Board. Notwithstanding the payment dates in any related Facility Lease or Indenture, the schedule may provide for an earlier transfer of funds to ensure debt requirements are met and pay base rental in full when due. 2. The Controller shall transfer for additional rental no later than 30 days after enactment of this budget, $0 of the amount appropriated in this item, to the Expense Account in the Public Buildings Construction Fund. 3. This item may be adjusted pursuant to Section 4.30. Any adjustments to this item shall be reported to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee pursuant to Section 4.30. 4265-093-0557—For support of State Department of Public Health, for rental payments on lease-revenue bonds, payable from the Toxic Substances Control Account ........................ 32,000 Schedule: (1) 4045-Public and Environmental Health ........................ 32,000 Provisions: 1. The Controller shall transfer funds appropriated in this item for base rental as and when provided for in the schedule submitted by the State Public Works Board. Notwithstanding the payment dates in any related Facility Lease or Indenture, the schedule may provide for an earlier transfer of funds to ensure debt requirements are met and pay base rental in full when due. 2. The Controller shall transfer for additional rental no later than 30 days after enactment of this budget, $0 of the amount appropriated in this item, to the Expense Account in the Public Buildings Construction Fund. 3. This item may be adjusted pursuant to Section 4.30. Any adjustments to this item shall be reported to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee pursuant to Section 4.30. 4265-093-3098—For support of State Department of Public Health, for rental payments on lease-revenue bonds, payable from the State Department of Public Health Licensing and Certification Program Fund ........................ 69,000 Schedule: (1) 4050-Licensing and Certification ........................ 69,000 Provisions: 1. The Controller shall transfer funds appropriated in this item for base rental as and when provided for in the schedule submitted by the State Public Works Board. Notwithstanding the payment dates in any related Facility Lease or Indenture, the schedule may provide for an earlier transfer of funds to ensure debt requirements are met and pay base rental in full when due. 2. The Controller shall transfer for additional rental no later than 30 days after enactment of this budget, $1,000 of the amount appropriated in this item, to the Expense Account in the Public Buildings Construction Fund. 3. This item may be adjusted pursuant to Section 4.30. Any adjustments to this item shall be reported to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee pursuant to Section 4.30. 4265-093-3114—For support of State Department of Public Health, for rental payments on lease-revenue bonds, payable from the Birth Defects Monitoring Program Fund ........................ 21,000 Schedule: (1) 4045-Public and Environmental Health ........................ 21,000 Provisions: 1. The Controller shall transfer funds appropriated in this item for base rental as and when provided for in the schedule submitted by the State Public Works Board. Notwithstanding the payment dates in any related Facility Lease or Indenture, the schedule may provide for an earlier transfer of funds to ensure debt requirements are met and pay base rental in full when due. 2. The Controller shall transfer for additional rental no later than 30 days after enactment of this budget, $0 of the amount appropriated in this item, to the Expense Account in the Public Buildings Construction Fund. 3. This item may be adjusted pursuant to Section 4.30. Any adjustments to this item shall be reported to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee pursuant to Section 4.30. 4265-093-3155—For support of State Department of Public Health, for rental payments on lease-revenue bonds, payable from the Lead-Related Construction Fund ........................ 8,000 Schedule: (1) 4045-Public and Environmental Health ........................ 8,000 Provisions: 1. The Controller shall transfer funds appropriated in this item for base rental as and when provided for in the schedule submitted by the State Public Works Board. Notwithstanding the payment dates in any related facility lease or indenture, the schedule may provide for an earlier transfer of funds to ensure debt requirements are met and pay base rental in full when due. 2. The Controller shall transfer for additional rental no later than 30 days after enactment of this budget, $0 of the amount appropriated in this item, to the Expense Account in the Public Buildings Construction Fund. 3. This item may be adjusted pursuant to Section 4.30. Any adjustments to this item shall be reported to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee pursuant to Section 4.30. 4265-111-0001—For local assistance, State Department of Public Health ........................ 350,037,000363,537,000 Schedule: (1) 4040-Public Health Emergency Preparedness ........................ 4,960,000 (2) 4045-Public and Environmental Health ........................ 696,908,000710,408,000 (3) Reimbursements to 4045-Public and Environmental Health ........................ −351,831,000 Provisions: 1. The Office of AIDS in the State Department of Public Health, in allocating and processing contracts and grants, shall comply with the same requirements that are established for contracts and grants for other public health programs. Notwithstanding any other law, the contracts or grants administered by the Office of AIDS shall be exempt from the Public Contract Code and shall not require approval by the Department of General Services prior to their execution. 2. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (2), $6,000,000 shall be available for Sickle Cell Centers for Excellence. Excellence as pass-through funds. 3. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (2), $3,500,000 shall be available to the ALS Network, to provide a wraparound model of care for individuals diagnosed with amyotrophic lateral sclerosis and their caregivers. 4. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (2), $10,000,000 shall be available to support LGBTQ+ Community Centers. 4265-111-0080—For local assistance, State Department of Public Health, payable from the Childhood Lead Poisoning Prevention Fund ........................ 27,604,000 Schedule: (1) 4045-Public and Environmental Health ........................ 27,604,000 4265-111-0099—For local assistance, State Department of Public Health, payable from the Health Statistics Special Fund ........................ 510,000 Schedule: (1) 4045-Public and Environmental Health ........................ 510,000 4265-111-0143—For local assistance, State Department of Public Health, payable from the California Health Data and Planning Fund ........................ 240,000 Schedule: (1) 4045-Public and Environmental Health ........................ 240,000 4265-111-0203—For local assistance, State Department of Public Health, payable from the Genetic Disease Testing Fund ........................ 135,309,000 Schedule: (1) 4045-Public and Environmental Health ........................ 135,309,000 4265-111-0231—For local assistance, State Department of Public Health, payable from the Health Education Account, Cigarette and Tobacco Products Surtax Fund ........................ 9,626,000 Schedule: (1) 4045-Public and Environmental Health ........................ 9,626,000 4265-111-0279—For local assistance, State Department of Public Health, payable from the Child Health and Safety Fund ........................ 526,000 Schedule: (1) 4045-Public and Environmental Health ........................ 526,000 4265-111-0367—For local assistance, State Department of Public Health, payable from the Indian Gaming Special Distribution Fund ........................ 4,000,000 Schedule: (1) 4045-Public and Environmental Health ........................ 4,000,000 4265-111-0642—For local assistance, State Department of Public Health, payable from the Domestic Violence Training and Education Fund ........................ 300,000 Schedule: (1) 4045-Public and Environmental Health ........................ 300,000 4265-111-0823—For local assistance, State Department of Public Health, payable from the California Alzheimer’s Disease and Related Disorders Research Fund ........................ 3,000 Schedule: (1) 4045-Public and Environmental Health ........................ 3,000 4265-111-0890—For local assistance, State Department of Public Health, payable from the Federal Trust Fund ........................ 1,749,283,000 Schedule: (1) 4040-Public Health Emergency Preparedness ........................ 161,861,000 (2) 4045-Public and Environmental Health ........................ 1,587,422,000 Provisions: 1. Notwithstanding Section 28.00, the State Department of Public Health shall report on a listing of all federal funds received to the Department of Finance on October 15 and March 15 of the fiscal year. This report will serve as the basis for the budget year expenditure authority in this item. If an augmentation is needed above the reporting threshold in Section 28.00, then legislative notification is required for approval not sooner than 30 days after notification, per the requirements of Section 28.00. If an augmentation is not needed, then legislative notification is not required. 2. Any provisions in Item 4265-111-0001 that are relevant to this item shall apply to this item. 4265-111-3023—For local assistance, State Department of Public Health, payable from the WIC Manufacturer Rebate Fund ........................ 147,506,000 Schedule: (1) 4045-Public and Environmental Health ........................ 147,506,000 Provisions: 1. Notwithstanding any other law, if revenues to the WIC Manufacturer Rebate Fund are received in excess of the amount appropriated in this item, the Department of Finance may augment this item in excess of the amount appropriated. Within 10 working days of such augmentation, the department shall provide written notification of the augmentation to the chairpersons of the fiscal committees in each house of the Legislature and the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee. 4265-111-3085—For support of State Department of Public Health, payable from the Behavioral Health Services Fund ........................ 60,000,000 Schedule: (1) 4045-Public and Environmental Health ........................ 60,000,000 Provisions: 1. Funds appropriated in this item shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2029, for the State Department of Public Health to implement behavioral health programs and initiatives authorized under Proposition 1. Activities include, but are not limited to, planning, coordination, and distribution of funds through allocations to local health jurisdictions and community-based organizations to expand access to behavioral health services. 2. Contracts entered into or amended pursuant to this provision shall be exempt from Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 14825) of Part 5.5 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, Section 19130 of the Government Code, Part 2 (commencing with Section 10100) of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code, and the State Administrative Manual, and shall be exempt from the review or approval of any division of the Department of General Services. 3. Notwithstanding any other law, the State Department of Public Health may provide local assistance by direct allocation to local health jurisdictions to support behavioral health programs and initiatives authorized under Proposition 1. Direct allocations will be provided via memoranda of understanding and supplemental agreements, wherever necessary, between the State Department of Public Health and local health jurisdictions. The State Department of Public Health’s allocation formula shall be exempt from the administrative regulation and rulemaking requirements of Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code. 4265-111-3098—For local assistance, State Department of Public Health, payable from the State Department of Public Health Licensing and Certification Program Fund ........................ 45,000 Schedule: (1) 4050-Licensing and Certification ........................ 45,000 4265-111-3110—For local assistance, State Department of Public Health, payable from the Gambling Addiction Program Fund ........................ 200,000 Schedule: (1) 4045-Public and Environmental Health ........................ 200,000 4265-111-3385—For local assistance, State Department of Public Health, payable from the Transgender, Gender Nonconforming, and Intersex (TGI) Wellness and Equity Fund ........................ 4,500,000 Schedule: (1) 4045-Public and Environmental Health ........................ 4,500,000 Provisions: 1. Notwithstanding any other law, contracts entered into or amended pursuant to this item are exempt from the personal services contracting requirements of Article 4 (commencing with Section 19130) of Chapter 5 of Part 2 of Division 5 of Title 2 of the Government Code, from Part 2 (commencing with Section 10100) of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code, the State Administrative Manual, and the State Contracting Manual, and are exempt from the review or approval of the Department of General Services, including as specified in Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 14825) of Part 5.5 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code. 2. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (1), $4,500,000 shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2029, to fund services related to prevention, care and treatment for eligible individuals living with HIV and AIDS, or at risk of HIV infection. 4265-111-3397—For local assistance, State Department of Public Health, payable from the Opioid Settlements Fund ........................ 12,146,000 Schedule: (1) 4045-Public and Environmental Health ........................ 12,146,000 Provisions: 1. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $540,000 shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2027, for fentanyl program grants and innovative approaches to make fentanyl test strips and naloxone more widely available. 2. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $11,606,000 shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2028, for the State Department of Public Health to support Overdose Prevention and Harm Reduction Initiative activities through grants to local health jurisdictions and community-based organizations for the purpose of supporting syringe exchange and disposal program activities, including treatment navigators. 4265-111-8141—For local assistance, State Department of Public Health, payable from the Electronic Cigarette Settlements Fund ........................ 1,120,000 Schedule: (1) 4045-Public and Environmental Health ........................ 1,120,000 Provisions: 1. The funds appropriated in this item shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2029, to support local tobacco and vaping cessation activities. 4265-111-8510—For support of State Department of Public Health, payable from the Federal Health Facilities Citation Penalties Account ........................ 8,080,00013,080,000 Schedule: (1) 4050-Licensing and Certification ........................ 8,080,00013,080,000 Provisions: 1. Of the amount appropriated in this item, $5,757,000 shall be available for expenditure or encumbrance until June 30, 2028, to support Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services approved projects to benefit nursing home residents. 4265-115-8510—For support of State Department of Public Health, payable from the Federal Health Facilities Citation Penalties Account5,000,000Schedule:(1)4050-Licensing and Certification5,000,000 4265-401—(1) The Department of Public Health may enter into exclusive or nonexclusive contracts, or amend existing contracts, on a bid or negotiated basis for the purposes of preparedness, mitigation, response and recovery activities for: (a) National, state, regional or local emergencies, defined as a sudden unexpected occurrence, emerging threat, natural disaster, or imminent public health hazard requiring Medical and Health Coordination Center activation or immediate action in preparedness for or in response to, the prevention or mitigation of loss or damage to life, health, property, or essential public services. (b) National, state, regional, or local threats, defined as a condition creating a substantial probability of harm requiring action to prevent, reduce, or mitigate damage to persons, property, or the public health or safety. Use of this exemption is limited to procure and address the need for required goods or services that cannot otherwise be met through normal procurement methods given the situational risk or urgency. (2) Contracts entered into or amended pursuant to this item shall be exempt from Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 14825) of Part 5.5 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, Section 19130 of the Government Code, Part 2 (commencing with Section 10100) of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code, and the State Administrative Manual, and shall be exempt from review or approval of any division of the Department of General Services. Use of this exemption is limited to procure and address the need for required goods or services that cannot otherwise be met through normal procurement methods given the situational risk or urgency. 4265-402—The Controller shall transfer $2,495,000 from Item 4265-111-0001, Budget Act of 2019 (Chs. 23 and 55, Stats. 2019) as reappropriated by Item 4265-490, Budget Act of 2025 (Chs. 4 and 5, Stats. 2025), to Item 4265-001-0001 for activities that address lesbian, bisexual and queer women’s health disparities and shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2028. 4265-492—Reappropriation, State Department of Public Health. The amount specified in the following citation is reappropriated for the purposes provided for in the appropriations and shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2027. 0001—General Fund (1) Up to $16,600,000 in Item 4265-001-0001, Budget Act of 2025 (Chs. 4 and 5, Stats. 2025), to support immunization and infectious disease data monitoring systems. 4265-493—Reappropriation, State Department of Public Health. The amount specified in the following citations are reappropriated for the purposes provided for in the appropriation and shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2027: 3098—State Department of Public Health Licensing and Certification Program Fund (1) Up to $1,112,000 in Item 4265-001-3098, Budget Act of 2025 (Chs. 4 and 5, Stats. 2025), to support the implementation and maintenance and operation of the Patient Safety and Antidiscrimination Project, upon approval of a Project Delegation Request or the Project Approval Lifecycle by the Department of Technology. 4300-001-0001—For support of State Department of Developmental Services ........................ 377,808,000 Schedule: (1) 4145046-State-Operated Residential and Community Services ........................ 284,399,000 (2) 4149001-Program Administration ........................ 182,847,000 (3) Reimbursements to 4145046-State-Operated Residential and Community Services ........................ −29,357,000 (4) Reimbursements to 4149001-Program Administration ........................ −60,081,000 Provisions: 1. A loan from the General Fund shall be made available to the State Department of Developmental Services not to exceed a cumulative total of $30,000,000. The loan funds shall be transferred to this item as needed to meet cashflow needs due to delays in collecting reimbursements from the Health Care Deposit Fund, and are subject to the repayment provisions in Section 16351 of the Government Code. 2. The State Department of Developmental Services may promulgate regulations specifically for implementing proposals to increase federal funding to the state. Notwithstanding any other law, such regulations shall be deemed emergency regulations necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, or general welfare for purposes of subdivision (b) of Section 11346.1 of the Government Code. 3. Upon order of the Department of Finance, the Controller shall transfer such funds as are necessary between this item and Item 4300-101-0001. Within 10 working days after approval of a transfer as authorized by this provision, the Department of Finance shall notify the chairpersons of the fiscal committees in each house of the Legislature and the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee of the transfer, including the amount transferred, how the amount transferred was determined, and how the amount transferred will be utilized. 4. The State Department of Developmental Services (DDS) shall notify the chairperson of each fiscal committee and the relevant policy committee of each house of the Legislature of specific outcomes resulting from citations and the results of annual surveys conducted by the State Department of Public Health, as well as findings of any other governmental agency authorized to conduct investigations or surveys of state developmental centers. DDS shall forward the notifications, including a copy of the specific findings, to the chairpersons of each fiscal committee and the relevant policy committee of each house of the Legislature within 10 working days of its receipt of these findings. DDS also shall forward these findings, within three working days of submission, to the appropriate investigating agency. In addition, DDS shall provide notification to the chairpersons of each fiscal committee and the relevant policy committee of each house of the Legislature, within three working days, of its receipt of information concerning any investigation initiated by the United States Department of Justice and the private nonprofit corporation designated by the Governor pursuant to Division 4.7 (commencing with Section 4900) of the Welfare and Institutions Code or concerning any findings or recommendations resulting from any of these investigations. 5. Contracts to procure services to implement Section 4519.10 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, effective through June 30, 2030, shall be exempt from the requirements contained in the Public Contract Code and the State Administrative Manual and from approval by the Department of General Services. 6. By April 1, 2027, the State Department of Developmental Services shall provide written reporting to the Legislature on outcomes and impacts associated with the Autism Services Branch, including updates on autism caseload data, and associated intake, ethnicity, age of eligibility determination, transitions out of secondary education, services and supports, and racial and ethnic inequities. This information shall be provided using historical data, yielding trend data over time, to the maximum extent feasible. As part of this written reporting, the department shall provide observations and analysis on the trends as demonstrated in the data related to autism, including information on areas of the system where there is a demonstration of unmet need. 7. The Department of Finance may decrease the amount of the appropriation in this item by up to $2,075,000 if the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services’ Ensuring Access to Medicaid Services Final Rule (CMS-2442-F) is rescinded or repealed. Any adjustment of the amount appropriated in this item shall be reported in writing to the chairpersons of the fiscal committees in each house of the Legislature and the chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee within 10 days of the date the adjustment is approved. 4300-001-0172—For support of State Department of Developmental Services, payable from the Developmental Disabilities Program Development Fund ........................ 461,000 Schedule: (1) 4149001-Program Administration ........................ 461,000 Provisions: 1. Notwithstanding any other law, the Department of Finance may authorize expenditures for the State Department of Developmental Services in excess of the amount appropriated no sooner than 30 days after notification in writing is provided to the chairpersons of the fiscal committees in each house of the Legislature and the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, or no sooner than such lesser time as the chairperson of the joint committee, or the chairperson’s designee, may in each instance determine. 4300-001-0890—For support of State Department of Developmental Services, payable from the Federal Trust Fund ........................ 4,167,000 Schedule: (1) 4149001-Program Administration ........................ 4,167,000 Provisions: 1. Upon order of the Department of Finance, the Controller shall transfer such funds as are necessary between this item and Item 4300-101-0890 in order to effectively administer the Early Intervention Program (Part C of the Individuals with Disabilities Education Act (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1431 et seq.)). 4300-001-3085—For support of State Department of Developmental Services, payable from the Behavioral Health Services Fund ........................ 516,000 Schedule: (1) 4149001-Program Administration ........................ 516,000 4300-004-0001—For support of State Department of Developmental Services (Proposition 98), for State-Operated Residential and Community Services ........................ 305,000 Schedule: (1) 4145010-AB 1202 Contracts ........................ 125,000 (2) 4145019-Medi-Cal Eligible Services ........................ 180,000 4300-017-0001—For support of State Department of Developmental Services, for implementation of the federal Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996 ........................ 180,000 Schedule: (1) 4145055-Implementation of Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act ........................ 180,000 4300-093-0001—For support of State Department of Developmental Services, for rental payments on lease-revenue bonds ........................ 8,257,000 Schedule: (1) 4145037-Rental Payments on Lease-Revenue Bonds ........................ 8,257,000 Provisions: 1. The Controller shall transfer funds appropriated in this item for base rental as and when provided for in the schedule submitted by the State Public Works Board. Notwithstanding the payment dates in any related Facility Lease or Indenture, the schedule may provide for an earlier transfer of funds to ensure debt requirements are met and pay base rental in full when due. 2. The Controller shall transfer for additional rental no later than 30 days after enactment of this budget, $89,000 of the amount appropriated in this item, to the Expense Account in the Public Buildings Construction Fund. 3. This item may be adjusted pursuant to Section 4.30. Any adjustments to this item shall be reported to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee pursuant to Section 4.30. 4300-101-0001—For local assistance, State Department of Developmental Services, for Regional Centers ........................ 13,091,743,00013,093,743,000 Schedule: (1) 4140015-Operations ........................ 1,803,093,000 (2) 4140019-Purchase of Services ........................ 19,227,874,00019,229,874,000 (3) 4140031-Early Start Family Resource Services ........................ 2,003,000 (4) Reimbursements to 4140015-Operations ........................ −593,966,000 (5) Reimbursements to 4140019-Purchase of Services ........................ −7,347,261,000 Provisions: 1. Upon order of the Director of Finance, the Controller shall transfer such funds as are necessary between this item and Item 4300-001-0001. Within 10 working days after approval of a transfer as authorized by this provision, the Director of Finance shall notify the chairpersons of the fiscal committees in each house of the Legislature and the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee of the transfer, including the amount transferred, how the amount transferred was determined, and how the amount transferred will be utilized. 2. A loan or loans shall be made available from the General Fund to the State Department of Developmental Services not to exceed a cumulative total of $1,588,373,000. The loan funds shall be transferred to this item as needed to meet cashflow needs due to delays in collecting reimbursements from the Health Care Deposit Fund. All moneys so transferred shall be repaid as soon as sufficient reimbursements have been collected to meet immediate cash needs and in installments as reimbursements accumulate if the loan is outstanding for more than one year. 3. Notwithstanding Section 26.00, the Director of Finance may authorize transfer of expenditure authority between Schedules (1) and (2) in order to more accurately reflect expenditures in the Early Intervention Program (Part C of the federal Individuals with Disabilities Education Act (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1431 et seq.)). 4. Notwithstanding Section 26.00, the Director of Finance may authorize transfer of expenditure authority from Schedule (3) 4140031-Early Start Family Resource Services to Schedule (2) 4140019-Purchase of Services to more accurately reflect expenditures in the Early Start Programs. 5. Notwithstanding Section 26.00, the Director of Finance may authorize a transfer of up to $5,000,000 in expenditure authority from Schedule (1) to Schedule (2) to more accurately reflect year-end expenditures. 4300-101-0496—For local assistance, State Department of Developmental Services, payable from the Developmental Disabilities Services Account ........................ 150,000 Schedule: (1) 4140015-Operations ........................ 150,000 4300-101-0890—For local assistance, State Department of Developmental Services, for Regional Centers, payable from the Federal Trust Fund ........................ 55,357,000 Schedule: (1) 4140015-Operations ........................ 1,150,000 (2) 4140019-Purchase of Services ........................ 33,783,000 (3) 4140027-Early Intervention Program ........................ 20,424,000 Provisions: 1. Upon order of the Department of Finance, the Controller shall transfer such funds as are necessary between this item and Item 4300-001-0890 in order to effectively administer the Early Intervention Program (Part C of the federal Individuals with Disabilities Education Act (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1431 et seq.)). 2. Notwithstanding Section 26.00, the Department of Finance may authorize transfer of expenditure authority between Programs 4140015-Operations and 4140019-Purchase of Services in order to more accurately reflect expenditures in the Early Intervention Program (Part C of the federal Individuals with Disabilities Education Act (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1431 et seq.)). 4300-101-3085—For local assistance, State Department of Developmental Services, for Regional Centers, payable from the Behavioral Health Services Fund ........................ 740,000 Schedule: (1) 4140015-Operations ........................ 740,000 4300-117-0001—For local assistance, State Department of Developmental Services, for implementation of the federal Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996 ........................ 637,000 Schedule: (1) 4140015-Operations ........................ 1,275,000 (2) Reimbursements to 4140015-Operations ........................ −638,000 4300-301-0001—For capital outlay, State Department of Developmental Services ........................ 7,934,000 Schedule: (1) 0007358-Porterville: Install Fire Sprinkler System ........................ 7,934,000 (a) Working drawings ........................ 915,000 (b) Construction ........................ 7,019,000 4300-490—Reappropriation, State Department of Developmental Services. The amounts specified in the following citations are reappropriated for the purposes provided for in those appropriations and shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2030. 0001—General Fund (1) $1,200,000 in Program 4140015-Operations in Item 4300-101-0001, Budget Act of 2023 (Chs. 12, 38, and 189, Stats. 2023) for activities related to Local Volunteer Advisory Committees. (2) $1,400,000 in Program 4140015-Operations in Item 4300-101-0001, Budget Act of 2024 (Chs. 22, 35, and 994, Stats. 2024) for activities related to Local Volunteer Advisory Committees. (3) $1,700,000 in Program 4140015-Operations in Item 4300-101-0001, Budget Act of 2025 (Chs. 4 and 5, Stats. 2025) for activities related to Local Volunteer Advisory Committees. 4300-496—Reversion, State Department of Developmental Services. As of June 30, 2026, the unencumbered balances of the appropriations provided in the following citations shall revert to the fund balances in the funds from which the appropriations were made. 0001—General Fund (1) Item 4300-301-0001, Budget Act of 2025 (Chs. 4 and 5, Stats. 2025). (1) 0007358-Porterville: Install Fire Sprinkler System (a) Construction 4440-011-0001—For support of State Department of State Hospitals ........................ 2,928,867,000 Schedule: (1) 4400-Administration ........................ 307,031,000 (2) 4410-State Hospitals ........................ 2,152,845,000 (3) 4420-Conditional Release Program ........................ 99,847,000 (4) 4430-Contracted Patient Services ........................ 529,551,000 (5) 4450-Evaluation and Forensic Services ........................ 34,217,000 (6) Reimbursements to 4400-Administration ........................ −250,000 (7) Reimbursements to 4410-State Hospitals ........................ −194,374,000 Provisions: 1. The reimbursements shall include amounts received in Schedule (7) by the State Department of State Hospitals as a result of billing state hospital bed day expenditures attributable to conservatees who are gravely disabled as defined in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (h) of Section 5008 of the Welfare and Institutions Code (Murphy Conservatee). 2. The Controller shall transfer the total amount attributable in the 2026–27 fiscal year to patient-generated collections as revenue to the General Fund. 3. Notwithstanding any other law, funds appropriated to accommodate projected hospital population levels in excess of those that actually materialize, if any, shall revert to the General Fund. However, the Department of Finance may approve an increase in expenditures that are not related to caseload for the state hospitals through the redirection of funding that is reasonably believed not to be needed for accommodating projected hospital population levels if the approval is made in writing and filed with the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee and the chairpersons of the committees of each house of the Legislature that consider appropriations not later than 30 days prior to the effective date of the approval, or prior to whatever lesser time the chairperson of the joint committee, or the chairperson’s designee, may in each instance determine. All notifications shall include (a) the reason for the proposed redirection of caseload funding to expenditures that are not related to caseload, (b) the approved amount, and (c) the basis of the Director of Finance’s determination that the funding is not needed for accommodating projected hospital population levels. 4. The funds appropriated in Schedule (3) shall be used to provide community services as provided in Section 4360 of the Welfare and Institutions Code. These funds shall support direct community services, as well as administrative and ancillary services related to the provision of direct services. 5. The State Department of State Hospitals shall provide forensic conditional release services mandated either in Title 15 (commencing with Section 1600) of Part 2 of the Penal Code or in Article 4 (commencing with Section 2960) of Chapter 7 of Title 1 of Part 3 of the Penal Code, through contracts with programs which integrate the supervision and treatment roles and providers selected consistent with Section 1615 of the Penal Code. 6. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (3), it is intended that funds shall not be available for the payment of treatment services to persons on court visit from state hospitals to the community as designated in subdivision (a) of Section 4117 of the Welfare and Institutions Code. 7. Upon approval of the State Department of State Hospitals, a portion of the funds appropriated in Schedule (2) shall be available to reimburse counties for the cost of treatment and legal services to patients in the five state hospitals, pursuant to Section 4117 of the Welfare and Institutions Code. Expenditures made under this item shall be charged to either the fiscal year in which the claim is received or the fiscal year in which the Controller issues the warrant. Claims filed by local jurisdictions for legal services may be scheduled by the Controller for payment. 8. The Director of State Hospitals shall submit, as part of the annual Governor’s Budget and May Revision estimate, each institution’s expenditures for its approved allotments. If any institution’s expenditures are trending above the allotments provided to it, the Director of State Hospitals shall detail the reasons why the institution is spending at a level above its allotments and list the actions the State Department of State Hospitals is undertaking in order to align expenditures with approved allotments. The report shall contain a yearend summary and an operating budget for each of the institutions under the control of the department. Specifically, the report shall include all of the following: (a) The year-end expenditures by line-item detail for each institution. (b) The budgeted amounts for each institution in the past year, current year, and budget year, and past year actual, projected current, and budget year expenditures for each institution including staffing, overtime, benefits, registry, and operating expenses. (c) The number of authorized and vacant positions for each institution. (d) The number of authorized and vacant positions for each institution specific to: (1) psychiatric technicians, (2) nurses, (3) physicians, (4) psychiatrists, (5) social workers, and (6) rehabilitation therapists. (e) The number of positions in the temporary help blanket for each institution. 9. The State Department of State Hospitals shall provide a status update on the recruitment and retention of hospital police officers, to be included in the department’s 2027–28 Governor’s Budget estimate and subsequent May Revision estimate. The update shall include the number of authorized and vacant positions for each hospital, the actual attrition rate for the 2026–27 fiscal year, the projected attrition rate for the 2027–28 fiscal year, and the rate of success pertaining to the number of hospital police officer cadet graduates of the OPS Police Academy. 10. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (2), $11,565,000 shall be expended for ligature risk special repair projects at Atascadero, Metropolitan, Napa, and Patton State Hospitals. The amount allocated shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2029. 11. Contracts entered into or amended from funding included in this item to address the Incompetent to Stand Trial waitlist are exempt from Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 14825) of Part 5.5 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, Section 19130 of the Government Code, and Part 2 (commencing with Section 10100) of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code, and from the review or approval of any division of the Department of General Services. 12. It is the intent of the Legislature that, to the extent possible, the Department of State Hospitals hire civil service psychiatric and mental health staff rather than utilizing contractors. It is also the intent of the Legislature that any cost savings realized from using fewer contractors should be prioritized towards hiring civil service employees or recruitment and retention efforts, as needed. 13. (a) The State Department of State Hospitals may enter into agreements with educational institutions and hospitals for the purpose of providing clinical training and educational opportunities related to providing care to patients. The training may take the form of, but not be limited to, rotations, residencies, fellowships, internships, or externships at a state-operated hospital, as described in Section 4100 of Welfare and Institutions Code, or internships for the State Department of State Hospital’s employees and interns to receive clinical training and educational opportunities at a hospital or clinical program. (b) These agreements shall be exempt from Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 14825) of Part 5.5 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, Section 19130 of the Government Code, Section 18670 of the Government Code, Part 2 (commencing with Section 10100) of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code, and the State Administrative Manual, and from the review or approval of any division of the Department of General Services. 15. The Department of Finance may increase expenditure authority in this item for the costs associated with an updated project schedule and negotiated vendor costs, as well as system administration, for the Electronic Health Record Continuum project, upon notification from the Department of State Hospitals. Any such increase shall be authorized not less than 30 days following written notification to the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, or a lesser period if requested by the department and approved by the chairperson or the chairperson’s designee. 16. Notwithstanding any other law, the Department of State Hospitals may enter into contracts for online services and subscriptions providing health care or pharmaceutical information that support the quality and access to patient health care without review, supervision, or approval of the Department of Technology or the Department of General Services in cases in which only one qualified bid may be received, until June 30, 2028. 4440-011-0890—For support of State Department of State Hospitals, payable from the Federal Trust Fund ........................ 100,000 Schedule: (1) 4410-State Hospitals ........................ 100,000 4440-017-0001—For support of State Department of State Hospitals, for implementation of the federal Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996 ........................ 1,554,000 Schedule: (1) 4400-Administration ........................ 1,554,000 4440-093-0001—For support of State Department of State Hospitals, for rental payments on lease-revenue bonds ........................ 35,282,000 Schedule: (1) 4410-State Hospitals ........................ 35,282,000 Provisions: 1. The Controller shall transfer funds appropriated in this item for base rental as and when provided for in the schedule submitted by the State Public Works Board. Notwithstanding the payment dates in any related facility lease or indenture, the schedule may provide for an earlier transfer of funds to ensure debt requirements are met and pay base rental in full when due. 2. The Controller shall transfer for additional rental no later than 30 days after enactment of this budget, $357,000 of the amount appropriated in this item, to the Expense Account in the Public Buildings Construction Fund. 3. This item may be adjusted pursuant to Section 4.30. Any adjustments to this item shall be reported to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee pursuant to Section 4.30. 4440-301-0001—For capital outlay, State Department of State Hospitals ........................ 1,757,000 Schedule: (1) 0016314-Patton: Electrical Infrastructure Upgrade ........................ 1,757,000 (a) Preliminary plans ........................ 1,757,000 4440-301-0660—For capital outlay, State Department of State Hospitals, payable from the Public Buildings Construction Fund ........................ 58,072,000 Schedule: (1) 0009434-Metropolitan: Central Utility Plant Replacement ........................ 58,072,000 (a) Construction ........................ 58,072,000 Provisions: 1. The State Department of State Hospitals and the Department of General Services are authorized to execute and deliver any and all leases, contracts, agreements, or other documents necessary or advisable to consummate the sale and issuance of bonds by the State Public Works Board in accordance with the State Building Construction Act of 1955 (Part 10b (commencing with Section 15800) of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code) or otherwise to effectuate the financing of the scheduled project. 4440-490—Reappropriation, State Department of State Hospitals. The amount specified in the following citations are reappropriated for the purposes provided for in those appropriations and shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2027: 0001—General Fund (1) Up to $6,300,000 in Item 4440-011-0001, Budget Act of 2024 (Chs. 22, 35, and 994, Stats. 2024), Program 4400-Administration, 4410-State Hospitals, as reappropriated by Item 4440-490, Budget Act of 2025 (Chs. 4 and 5, Stats. 2025), to support electronic health records. 4440-495—Reversion, State Department of State Hospitals. As of June 30, 2026, the balances specified below of the appropriations provided in the following citations shall revert to the balances in the funds from which the appropriations were made. 0001—General Fund (1) $20,000,000 in Item 4440-011-0001, Budget Act of 2024 (Chs. 22, 35, and 994, Stats. 2024). 2023 (Chs. 12, 38, and 189, Stats. 2023). 4440-496—Reversion, State Department of State Hospitals. As of June 30, 2026, the unencumbered balances of the appropriations provided in the following citations shall revert to the fund balances in the funds from which the appropriations were made. 0660—Public Buildings Construction Fund (1) Item 4440-301-0660, Budget Act of 2024 (Chs. 22, 35, and 994, Stats. 2024). (1) 0009434-Metropolitan: Central Utility Plant Replacement (a) Construction 4560-001-3085—For support of Behavioral Health Services Oversight and Accountability Commission, payable from the Behavioral Health Services Fund ........................ 17,134,000 Schedule: (1) 4170-Behavioral Health Services Oversight and Accountability Commission ........................ 17,134,000 4560-001-8116—For support of Behavioral Health Services Oversight and Accountability Commission, payable from the Early Psychosis and Mood Disorder Detection and Intervention Fund ........................ 0 Schedule: (1) 4170-Behavioral Health Services Oversight and Accountability Commission ........................ 0 Provisions: 1. Upon approval of the Department of Finance, the amount available for expenditure in this item may be augmented up to $500,000, from the Early Psychosis and Mood Disorder Detection and Intervention Fund. 4560-101-3085—For local assistance, Behavioral Health Services Oversight and Accountability Commission, payable from the Behavioral Health Services Fund ........................ 34,306,000 Schedule: (1) 4170-Behavioral Health Services Oversight and Accountability Commission ........................ 34,306,000 Provisions: 1. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $20,000,000 is available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2027, to support crisis prevention, early intervention, and crisis response strategies described in Part 3.8 (commencing with Section 5848.5) of Division 5 of the Welfare and Institutions Code. 4560-101-3485—For local assistance, Behavioral Health Services Oversight and Accountability Commission, payable from the Behavioral Health Services Act Innovation Partnership Fund ........................ 20,000,000 Schedule: (1) 4170-Behavioral Health Services Oversight and Accountability Commission ........................ 20,000,000 Provisions: 1. The purpose of the amount appropriated in this item is to award grants to private, public, and nonprofit partners to promote the development of innovative mental health and substance use disorder programs and practices pursuant to Proposition 1 (2024). 4560-101-8116—For local assistance, Behavioral Health Services Oversight and Accountability Commission, payable from the Early Psychosis and Mood Disorder Detection and Intervention Fund ........................ 0 Schedule: (1) 4170-Behavioral Health Services Oversight and Accountability Commission ........................ 0 Provisions: 1. Upon approval of the Department of Finance, the amount available for expenditure in this item may be augmented up to the amount of resources available in the Early Psychosis and Mood Disorder Detection and Intervention Fund. 4560-494—Reappropriation, Behavioral Health Services Oversight and Accountability Commission. Notwithstanding any other law, the period to liquidate encumbrances of the following citations is extended to June 30, 2027. 3085—​Mental Health Services Fund (1) Up to $4,062,000 of the amount appropriated in Provision 4 of Item 4560-101-3085, Budget Act of 2019 (Chs. 23 and 55, Stats. 2019) as reappropriated by Item 4560-494, Budget Act of 2022 (Chs. 43, 45, and 249, Stats. 2022). 4700-001-0001—For support of Department of Community Services and Development ........................ 0 Schedule: (1) 4181-Energy Programs ........................ 50,000 (2) 4185-Community Services ........................ 1,000,000 (3) Reimbursements to 4181-Energy Programs ........................ −50,000 (4) Reimbursements to 4185-Community Services ........................ −1,000,000 Provisions: 1. A loan or loans shall be made available from the General Fund to the Department of Community Services and Development not to exceed a cumulative total of $5,000,000. The loan funds shall be transferred to this item as needed to meet cashflow needs due to delays in collecting from federal funds. All moneys so transferred shall be repaid as soon as sufficient funds have been collected to meet immediate cash needs and in installments if the loan is outstanding for more than one year. 4700-001-0890—For support of Department of Community Services and Development, payable from the Federal Trust Fund ........................ 28,603,000 Schedule: (1) 4181-Energy Programs ........................ 22,177,000 (2) 4185-Community Services ........................ 6,426,000 Provisions: 1. On a federal fiscal year basis, the Department of Community Services and Development shall make the following program allocation for the community services block grant, as a percentage of the total block grant: (a) Administration ........................ 5 percent 2. Upon approval by the Department of Finance, any unexpended federal funds from Item 4700-001-0890 of the Budget Act of 2025 (Chs. 4 and 5, Stats. 2025) shall be in augmentation of Item 4700-001-0890 of this act and not subject to Section 28.00. The Department of Finance shall provide written notification of the augmentation to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee within 10 days from the date of approval. The notification shall include the following: (a) the amount of the augmentation, (b) an identification of the purposes for which the funds will be used, and (c) an explanation of the reason the funds were not spent in the 2025–26 fiscal year. 4700-001-6093—For support of Department of Community Services and Development, payable from the Safe Drinking Water, Wildfire Prevention, Drought Preparedness, and Clean Air Fund ........................ 230,000 Schedule: (1) Energy Programs ........................ 230,000 4700-101-0001—For local assistance, Department of Community Services and Development ........................ 0 Schedule: (1) 4181-Energy Programs ........................ 0 (2) 4185-Community Services ........................ 10,000,000 (3) Reimbursements to 4181-Energy Programs ........................ 0 (4) Reimbursements to 4185-Community Services ........................ −10,000,000 Provisions: 1. A loan or loans shall be made available from the General Fund to the Department of Community Services and Development not to exceed a cumulative total of $305,000,000. The loan funds shall be transferred to this item as needed to meet cashflow needs due to delays in collecting from federal funds. All moneys so transferred shall be repaid as soon as sufficient funds have been collected to meet immediate cash needs and in installments if the loan is outstanding for more than one year. 4700-101-0890—For local assistance, Department of Community Services and Development, for assistance to individuals and payments to service providers, payable from the Federal Trust Fund ........................ 315,846,000 Schedule: (1) 4181-Energy Programs ........................ 250,582,000 (2) 4185-Community Services ........................ 65,264,000 Provisions: 1. On a federal fiscal year basis, the Department of Community Services and Development shall make the following program allocations for the community services block grant as a percentage of the total block grant: (a) Discretionary ........................ 5 percent (b) Migrant and seasonal farmworkers ........................ 10 percent (c) Native American Indian programs ........................ 3.9 percent (d) Community action agencies and rural community services ........................ 76.1 percent All grantees under the community services block grant program are subject to standard state contracting procedures required under the program. 2. Funds scheduled in this item may be transferred to Item 4700-001-0890 for the administration of the Low-Income Home Energy Assistance Program, subject to approval of the Department of Finance. 3. Upon approval by the Department of Finance, any unexpended federal funds from Item 4700-101-0890 of the Budget Act of 2025 (Chs.4 and 5, Stats. 2025) shall be in augmentation of this item and are not subject to Section 28.00. The Department of Finance shall provide written notification of the augmentation to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee within 10 days from the date of approval. The notification shall include the following: (a) the amount of the augmentation, (b) an identification of the purposes for which the funds will be used, and (c) an explanation of the reason the funds were not spent in the 2025–26 fiscal year. These funds shall be used for local assistance for the programs for which they were originally budgeted. 4800-101-3381—For local assistance, California Health Benefit Exchange, payable from the Health Care Affordability Reserve Fund ........................ 364,198,000 Schedule: (1) 4202-State Subsidy Program ........................ 322,350,000 (2) 4203-Gender Affirming Care Program ........................ 41,848,000 Provisions: 1. (a) Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (1), up to $2,000,000 is available to support health care coverage for striking workers, pursuant to Chapter 695 of the Statutes of 2022. (b) Upon notification from the California Health Benefit Exchange that the program to support health care for striking workers will exceed the appropriation referenced in subprovision (a), the Department of Finance shall authorize one or more increases in this appropriation totaling up to $3,000,000 to pay for health care coverage for striking workers pursuant to Chapter 695 of the Statutes of 2022. The authorizations shall be contingent upon sufficient funding in the Health Care Affordability Reserve Fund, and subject to revenue availability, pursuant to Section 61035 of the Revenue and Taxation Code. The Department of Finance shall provide notification in writing of the necessity and amount of each of the augmentations to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee no later than 10 days prior to the effective date of each of the augmentations. The Department of Finance shall also provide notification in writing when the funding authorized in this item has been fully spent. 2. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (1), up to $300,000,000 is available to support a program of financial assistance, which may include premium subsidies, for coverage year 2027. 3. The amount appropriated in this item shall also provide any retroactive premium assistance subsidies owed to qualified health plan issuers under Item 4800-101-0001 of the Budget Act of 2019 (Chs. 23 and 55, Stats. 2019) and Item 4800-101-0001 of the Budget Act of 2020 (Chs. 6 and 7, Stats. 2020) due to eligibility and enrollment reconciliations. 4. (a) Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (2), up to $28,424,000 shall support the Gender Affirming Care Program, pursuant to Section 100503.6 of the Government Code. (b) The Director of Finance may authorize an increase in this appropriation to pay for gender affirming care benefits deemed in addition to essential health benefits for the 2027 coverage year pursuant to Section 100503.6 of the Government Code. Any augmentation under this provision shall be authorized no sooner than 10 days after notification in writing of the necessity thereof to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, or not sooner than whatever lesser time after notification the chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, or the chairperson’s designee, may in each instance determine. (c) Notwithstanding any other law, funds appropriated for the 2027 coverage year pursuant to this provision may be encumbered until December 31, 2028. 5. (a) Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (2), up to $13,424,000 shall support the Gender Affirming Care Program, pursuant to Section 100503.6 of the Government Code. (b) Notwithstanding any other law, funds appropriated for the 2026 coverage year pursuant to this provision may be encumbered until December 31, 2027. 6. (a) Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (1), up to $20,350,000 shall be available to support the One-Dollar Premium Subsidy Program pursuant to Section 100503.5 of the Government Code. (b) The Director of Finance may authorize an increase in this appropriation to pay all premium assistance subsidies authorized for the 2027 coverage year pursuant to Section 100503.5 of the Government Code. Any augmentation under this provision shall be authorized no sooner than 10 days after notification in writing of the necessity thereof to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, or not sooner than whatever lesser time after notification the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, or the chairperson’s designee, may in each instance determine. (c) Notwithstanding any other laws, funds appropriated for the 2027 coverage year pursuant to this provision may be encumbered until December 31, 2028. 5160-001-0001—For support of Department of Rehabilitation ........................ 77,166,000 Schedule: (1) 4210-Vocational Rehabilitation Services ........................ 88,142,000 (2) 4215-Independent Living Services ........................ 404,000 (3) Reimbursements to 4210-Vocational Rehabilitation Services ........................ −11,380,000 Provisions: 1. The Department of Rehabilitation shall maximize its use of certified time and cash as a match for federal vocational rehabilitation funds. To the extent that certified time or cash is available, it shall be used in lieu of the General Fund moneys. 2. Notwithstanding any other law, the Director of Finance may authorize a loan or loans from the General Fund to the Department of Rehabilitation for cashflow purposes subject to the following conditions: (a) A cumulative amount not to exceed $10,000,000 if the loan is to meet cash needs resulting from a delay in local certified match or cash from local partners reimbursements. (b) A cumulative amount not to exceed 50 percent of the amount appropriated in Item 5160-001-0890. The loan funds shall be transferred to Item 5160-001-0001 to meet cashflow needs due to a delay in receipt of federal vocational rehabilitation grant funds. (c) All moneys transferred shall be repaid within 30 days of receipt of the full federal grant award. (d) Interest charges may be waived pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 16314 of the Government Code. 5160-001-0311—For support of Department of Rehabilitation, payable from the Traumatic Brain Injury Fund ........................ 1,150,000 Schedule: (1) 4215-Independent Living Services ........................ 1,150,000 Provisions: 1. Funds appropriated in this item have been appropriated for administration pursuant to Sections 4354, 4355, 4356, 4357, and 4358.5 of the Welfare and Institutions Code. 5160-001-0483—For support of Department of Rehabilitation, payable from the Deaf and Disabled Telecommunications Program Administrative Committee Fund ........................ 3,667,000 Schedule: (1) 4215-Independent Living Services ........................ 3,667,000 5160-001-0600—For support of Department of Rehabilitation, payable from the Vending Stand Fund ........................ 3,361,000 Schedule: (1) 4210-Vocational Rehabilitation Services ........................ 3,361,000 5160-001-0890—For support of Department of Rehabilitation, payable from the Federal Trust Fund ........................ 467,770,000 Schedule: (1) 4210-Vocational Rehabilitation Services ........................ 461,606,000 (2) 4215-Independent Living Services ........................ 6,164,000 Provisions: 1. The amount appropriated in this item that is payable from federal Social Security Act funds for vocational rehabilitation services for SSI/SSDI recipients shall be expended only to the extent that funds received exceed the amount appropriated in Item 5160-101-0890 that is payable from the federal Social Security Act funds. It is the intent of the Legislature that first priority of federal Social Security Act funding be given to independent living centers in the amount of federal Social Security Act funding appropriated in Item 5160-101-0890. 5160-011-0001—For transfer by the Controller to the Traumatic Brain Injury Fund ........................ 1,150,000 5160-101-0001—For local assistance, Department of Rehabilitation ........................ 6,375,000 Schedule: (1) 4215-Independent Living Services ........................ 6,375,000 Provisions: 1. Notwithstanding subdivision (b) of Section 19806 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, of the amounts appropriated in this item, $705,000 shall be allocated to those independent living centers which have been both established and maintained using federal funding under Title VII(c) of the federal Rehabilitation Act of 1973 as amended as their primary base grant, as determined by the Department of Rehabilitation. 5160-101-0890—For local assistance, Department of Rehabilitation, payable from the Federal Trust Fund ........................ 10,066,000 Schedule: (1) 4215-Independent Living Services ........................ 10,066,000 5170-001-0001—For support of State Independent Living Council ........................ 0 Schedule: (1) 4250-State Council Services ........................ 755,000 (2) Reimbursements to 4250-State Council Services ........................ −755,000 5175-001-0001—For support of Department of Child Support Services ........................ 43,167,000 Schedule: (1) 4260010-Child Support Administration ........................ 43,340,000 (2) Reimbursements to 4260010-Child Support Administration ........................ −173,000 Provisions: 1. The Department of Child Support Services may transfer up to $500,000 total annually in unspent funds combined from Items 5175-001-0001, 5175-002-0001, and 5175-101-0001 to the Child Support Payment Trust Fund to offset unrecoverable overpayments pursuant to Section 17311 of the Family Code. 5175-001-0890—For support of Department of Child Support Services, payable from the Federal Trust Fund ........................ 93,653,000 Schedule: (1) 4260010-Child Support Administration ........................ 93,653,000 5175-002-0001—For support of Department of Child Support Services ........................ 22,269,000 Schedule: (1) 4260010-Child Support Administration ........................ 22,269,000 Provisions: 1. Funds in this item shall be used for contracts and interagency agreements in the child support program, unless otherwise authorized by the Department of Finance no sooner than 30 days after providing notification in writing to the chairpersons of the fiscal committees of each house of the Legislature and the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, or no sooner than such lesser time as the chairperson of the joint committee, or the chairperson’s designee, may in each instance determine. 2. Notwithstanding any other law, the Department of Finance may augment this item to reimburse the Judicial Council for the increased costs associated with salary adjustments for child support commissioners and family law facilitators pursuant to Section 17712 of the Family Code, in the event such salary adjustments are provided to superior court judges, no sooner than 30 days after notification in writing of the necessity therefor to the chairpersons of the committees in each house of the Legislature that consider appropriations and the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, or not sooner than whatever lesser time the chairperson of the joint committee, or the chairperson’s designee, may in each instance determine. 3. The department may transfer up to $500,000 total annually in unspent funds combined from Items 5175-001-0001, 5175-002-0001, and 5175-101-0001 to the Child Support Payment Trust Fund to offset unrecoverable overpayments pursuant to Section 17311 of the Family Code. 5175-002-0890—For support of Department of Child Support Services, payable from the Federal Trust Fund ........................ 57,203,000 Schedule: (1) 4260010-Child Support Administration ........................ 57,203,000 Provisions: 1. Provisions 1 and 2 of Item 5175-002-0001 also apply to this item. 5175-101-0001—For local assistance, Department of Child Support Services ........................ 306,600,000312,600,000 Schedule: (1) 4260010-Child Support Administration ........................ 281,768,000287,768,000 (2) 4260019-Child Support Automation ........................ 24,832,000 Provisions: 1. Notwithstanding any other law, a loan not to exceed $100,000,000 shall be made available from the General Fund, from funds not otherwise appropriated, to cover the federal share of costs of the program when federal funds have not been received by the state prior to the usual time for transmitting that federal share to the counties of the state or to cover the federal share of child support collections for which federal funds have been reduced prior to the collections being received from the counties. This loan from the General Fund shall be repaid when the federal share of costs for the program becomes available or when the collections are received from the counties. 2. The Department of Finance may authorize the establishment of positions and transfer of amounts from this item to Item 5175-001-0001 in order to allow the state to perform the functions or oversee the functions of the local child support agency of any county that fails to perform that function or is out of compliance with state performance standards. 3. The department may transfer up to $500,000 total annually in unspent funds combined from Items 5175-001-0001, 5175-002-0001, and 5175-101-0001 to the Child Support Payment Trust Fund to offset unrecoverable overpayments pursuant to Section 17311 of the Family Code. 5175-101-0890—For local assistance, Department of Child Support Services, payable from the Federal Trust Fund ........................ 582,582,000594,229,000 Schedule: (1) 4260010-Child Support Administration ........................ 534,377,000546,024,000 (2) 4260019-Child Support Automation ........................ 48,205,000 Provisions: 1. The Department of Finance may authorize the establishment of positions and transfer of amounts from this item to Item 5175-001-0890 in order to allow the state to perform the functions or oversee the functions of the local child support agency of any county that fails to perform that function or is out of compliance with state performance standards. 2. Notwithstanding Section 28.00 or any other law, upon request of the Department of Child Support Services, the Department of Finance may increase or decrease the expenditure authority in this item to offset any increases or decreases in collections deposited in the Child Support Collections Recovery Fund and appropriated in Item 5175-101-8004. The Department of Finance shall notify the Joint Legislative Budget Committee of any adjustment made pursuant to this provision within 10 working days from the date of Department of Finance approval. 5175-101-8004—For local assistance, Department of Child Support Services, payable from the Child Support Collections Recovery Fund ........................ 87,563,000 Schedule: (1) 4260010-Child Support Administration ........................ 87,563,000 Provisions: 1. Notwithstanding any other law, upon request by the Department of Child Support Services, the Director of Finance may increase or decrease this appropriation for the purposes of Section 17702.5 of the Family Code. Adjustments to expenditure authority shall be consistent with those made pursuant to Provision 2 of Item 5175-101-0890. The Department of Finance shall notify the Joint Legislative Budget Committee of the adjustment within 10 working days from the date of Department of Finance approval. 5180-001-0001—For support of State Department of Social Services ........................ 391,205,000 Schedule: (1) 4270-Welfare Programs ........................ 96,143,000 (2) 4275-Social Services and Licensing ........................ 297,424,000 (3) 4285-Disability Evaluation and Other Services ........................ 70,730,000 (4) Reimbursements to 4270-Welfare Programs ........................ −2,949,000 (5) Reimbursements to 4275-Social Services and Licensing ........................ −32,401,000 (6) Reimbursements to 4285-Disability Evaluation and Other Services ........................ −37,742,000 Provisions: 1. The Department of Finance may authorize the transfer of funds from Schedule (2) of this item to Schedule (1), Program 4275019, of Item 5180-151-0001, Children and Adult Services and Licensing, in order to allow counties to perform the facilities evaluation function. 2. The Department of Finance may authorize the transfer of funds from Schedule (2) of this item to Schedule (1), Program 4275019, of Item 5180-151-0001, Children and Adult Services and Licensing, in order to allow counties to perform the adoptions program function. 3. Nonfederal funds appropriated in this item that have been budgeted to meet the state’s Temporary Assistance for Needy Families maintenance-of-effort requirement established pursuant to the federal Personal Responsibility and Work Opportunity Reconciliation Act of 1996 (P.L. 104-193) shall not be expended in any way that would cause their disqualification as a federally allowable maintenance-of-effort expenditure. 4. Notwithstanding paragraph (4) of subdivision (b) of Section 1778 of the Health and Safety Code, the State Department of Social Services may use no more than 20 percent of the fees collected pursuant to Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 1770) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code for overhead costs, facilities operation, and indirect department costs. 5. Upon request of the State Department of Social Services and the State Department of Health Care Services, the Director of Finance may authorize the transfer of amounts from Item 4260-101-0001, State Department of Health Care Services, to this item to fund the cost of the administrative hearing process associated with changes in aid or service payments in the Medi-Cal program. The Department of Finance shall report to the Legislature the amount to be transferred pursuant to this provision. The transfer shall be authorized at the time the report is made. 6. Provision 1 of Items 5180-001-0270 and 5180-001-0279 also applies to this item. 7. Notwithstanding any other law, upon approval of the Department of Finance, expenditure and position authority may be transferred between schedules within or between the following items for the State Department of Education and the State Department of Social Services: Items 6100-001-0001, 5180-001-0001, and reimbursements. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (1), up to $6,000,000 shall be available for this purpose upon approval of the Department of Finance. The aggregate amount of General Fund appropriation increases provided under this item during the fiscal year may not exceed the aggregate amount of General Fund appropriation decreases. This provision supports the continuity of care in the programs transitioned from the State Department of Education to the State Department of Social Services. 8. The State Department of Social Services may contract with a vendor to provide direct deposit to childcare contractors. Contracts awarded pursuant to this section shall allow for advance payment. The department is hereby authorized to provide advance payment in order to implement direct deposit to childcare contractors. Contracts awarded pursuant to this section shall be exempt from the personal services contracting requirements of Article 4 (commencing with Section 19130) of Chapter 5 of Part 2 of Division 5 of Title 2 of the Government Code. For purposes of this provision, the State Department of Social Services is exempt from the requirements of Part 2 (commencing with Section 10100) of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code and from the requirements of Article 6 (commencing with Section 999) of Chapter 6 of Division 4 of the Military and Veterans Code. 9. The Department of Finance is authorized to approve expenditures in excess of the amounts appropriated in this item, upon notification from the State Department of Social Services, to cover costs associated with increased fair hearing requests due to Medi-Cal redeterminations or Public Law 119-21. 10. For the funds appropriated in this item for Child and Family Services Acute Review and Response, the State Department of Social Services shall report annually on January 10 to the policy and fiscal committees of the Legislature on key metrics, including, but not limited to, shelter stays for children under six years of age and overstays for youth at short-term residential therapeutic program placements. 11. The Department of Finance may increase expenditure authority in this item up to $250,000 to comply with the federal Able-Bodied Adult Without Dependents (ABAWD) rule. 12. Upon approval of the Department of Finance, Schedule (1) may be augmented to continue the contract to provide direct deposit payments with vendors until the FI$Cal EFT system is fully integrated into the State Department of Social Services’ accounting and payment business practices. The State Department of Social Services is hereby authorized to provide advance payment in order to implement direct deposit to childcare contractors. Contracts awarded pursuant to this section shall allow for advance payment. The department is hereby authorized to provide advance payment in order to implement direct deposit to childcare contractors. Contracts awarded pursuant to this section shall be exempt from the personal services contracting requirements of Article 4 (commencing with Section 19130) of Chapter 5 of Part 2 of Division 5 of Title 2 of the Government Code. For purposes of this provision, the State Department of Social Services is exempt from the requirements of Part 2 (commencing with Section 10100) of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code and from the requirements of Article 6 (commencing with Section 999) of Chapter 6 of Division 4 of the Military and Veterans Code. 13. Notwithstanding any other law, upon approval of the Plan for Operations and Management and the Implementation Advance Planning Document Update by the United States Department of Agriculture Food and Nutrition Service, the Department of Finance may augment this item for costs associated with the implementation and administration of the Summer Electronic Benefits Transfer for Children (Summer EBT) established pursuant to 42 U.S.C. Sec. 1762, also known as SUN Bucks, no sooner than 30 days after notification in writing is provided to the chairpersons of the fiscal committees in each house of the Legislature and the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee. 14. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $200,000 shall be allocated for the purposes of developing a strategic plan for how the State Department of Social Services’ methodology and outreach strategies will be implemented and executed to maximize benefits to those eligible for CalFresh benefits, pursuant to the requirements of Section 18901.58 of the Welfare and Institutions Code. 16. Notwithstanding Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 18000) of Part 6 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, a local loan not to exceed $125,587,000 shall be made available from the General Fund, from funds not otherwise appropriated, to cover the federal or reimbursable share, or both, of costs of a program or programs when the federal funds or reimbursements have not been received by the state prior to the usual time for transmitting state payments for the federal or reimbursable share of costs. This loan from the General Fund shall be repaid when the federal share of costs or the reimbursements for the program or programs become available. 5180-001-0131—For support of State Department of Social Services, payable from the Foster Family Home and Small Family Home Insurance Fund ........................ 600,000 Schedule: (1) 4275-Social Services and Licensing ........................ 600,000 Provisions: 1. The Department of Finance is authorized to approve expenditures from the unexpended balance available from prior years’ appropriations in the Foster Family Home and Small Family Home Insurance Fund during the 2026–27 fiscal year, in those amounts made necessary by increases in either the payment of claims or the costs of operating and maintaining the Foster Family Home and Small Family Home Insurance Fund, which are within or in excess of amounts appropriated in this act for that year. If the Department of Finance determines that the estimate of expenditures will exceed the expenditures authorized for the 2026–27 fiscal year, the department shall notify the Legislature. Upon notification, the amount of the appropriation made in this item shall be increased by the amount of such excess from the unexpended balance available from prior years’ appropriations in the Foster Family Home and Small Family Home Insurance Fund. 2. The Department of Finance is authorized to approve expenditures up to $4,200,000 in excess of the amount appropriated in this item, upon notification from the State Department of Social Services of approved claims exceeding the amount appropriated in this item, to cover the additional costs associated with the increased annual claims paid on behalf of foster family homes, small family homes, resource families, and tribally approved homes pursuant to Article 2.5 (commencing with Section 1527) of Chapter 3 of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code. The Department of Finance shall provide notification of any adjustment in excess of the amount appropriated in this item to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee within 10 working days from the date the Department of Finance approves the adjustment. The Department of Finance shall provide quarterly updates to the Legislature regarding the total number of approved claims in the fiscal year, the amount of each claim, and the final due date per the settlement agreement. 5180-001-0270—For support of State Department of Social Services, payable from the Technical Assistance Fund ........................ 23,779,000 Schedule: (1) 4275-Social Services and Licensing ........................ 23,779,000 Provisions: 1. The Department of Finance may increase the expenditure authority in this item based on the amount of unspent civil penalty revenue collected and correspondingly decrease the amount appropriated in Item 5180-001-0001. 5180-001-0271—For support of State Department of Social Services, payable from the Certification Fund ........................ 2,066,000 Schedule: (1) 4275-Social Services and Licensing ........................ 2,066,000 5180-001-0279—For support of State Department of Social Services, payable from the Child Health and Safety Fund ........................ 2,683,000 Schedule: (1) 4275-Social Services and Licensing ........................ 2,683,000 Provisions: 1. The Department of Finance may increase the expenditure authority in this item based on the amount of unspent civil penalty revenue collected and correspondingly decrease the amount appropriated in Item 5180-001-0001. 5180-001-0803—For support of State Department of Social Services, payable from the State Children’s Trust Fund ........................ 451,000 Schedule: (1) 4275-Social Services and Licensing ........................ 451,000 5180-001-0890—For support of State Department of Social Services, payable from the Federal Trust Fund ........................ 634,419,000 Schedule: (1) 4270-Welfare Programs ........................ 161,518,000 (2) 4275-Social Services and Licensing ........................ 153,830,000 (3) 4285-Disability Evaluation and Other Services ........................ 319,071,000 Provisions: 1. The Department of Finance may authorize the transfer of federal funds from this item to Item 5180-151-0890 in order to allow counties to perform the adoption program functions and the facilities evaluation function in the Community Care Licensing Division of the State Department of Social Services. 2. Notwithstanding any other law, upon approval of the Department of Finance, expenditure and position authority may be transferred between schedules within or between the following items for the State Department of Education and the State Department of Social Services: Items 6100-001-0890, 5180-001-0890, and reimbursements. The aggregate amount of appropriation increases provided under this section during the fiscal year may not exceed the aggregate amount of appropriation decreases. This provision supports the continuity of care in the programs transitioned from the State Department of Education to the State Department of Social Services. 3. Notwithstanding any other law, upon approval of the Department of Finance, expenditure and position authority may be transferred between schedules within or between the following items for the State Department of Education and the State Department of Social Services: Items 6100-001-0890, 5180-001-0890, and reimbursements. The aggregate amount of appropriation increases provided under this provision during the fiscal year may not exceed the aggregate amount of appropriation decreases. This provision supports the administration and implementation of the Summer Electronic Benefit Transfer program established pursuant to Section 1762 of Title 42 of the United States Code. 4. Notwithstanding any other law, upon selection of the State of California, the Department of Finance may augment this item in Schedule (1) for future annual expenditure authority to expend funding awarded through the Preschool Development Grant, no sooner than 30 days after notification in writing is provided to the chairpersons of the fiscal committees in each house of the Legislature and the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee. 5. The Department of Finance may increase expenditure authority in this item by up to $250,000 to comply with the federal able-bodied adults without dependents (ABAWD) time limit specified in Section 273.24 of Title 7 of the Code of Federal Regulations. 6. Provision 14 of Item 5180-001-0001 also applies to this item. 5180-001-3255—For support of State Department of Social Services, payable from the Home Care Fund ........................ 9,822,000 Schedule: (1) 4275-Social Services and Licensing ........................ 9,822,000 Provisions: 1. The Department of Finance may increase the expenditure authority in this item based on the amount of revenue collected pursuant to the Home Care Services Consumer Protection Act (Ch. 790, Stats. 2013). 2. Of the amount $7,955,000 loaned pursuant to the Budget Act of 2014 (Ch. 25, Stats. 2014), Budget Act of 2015 (Ch. 10, Stats. 2015), and Budget Act of 2016 (Ch. 23, Stats. 2016) up to $5,681,000 shall not be required to be repaid. 5180-001-8075—For support of State Department of Social Services, payable from the School Supplies for Homeless Children Fund ........................ 100,000 Schedule: (1) 4270-Welfare Programs ........................ 100,000 5180-011-0001—For transfer by the Controller to the Foster Family Home and Small Family Home Insurance Fund ........................ 600,000 Provisions: 1. Provision 1 of Item 5180-001-0131 also applies to this item. 2. The Department of Finance is authorized to approve expenditures up to $4,200,000 in excess of the transfer amount appropriated in this item upon notification from the State Department of Social Services of approved claims exceeding the amount appropriated in this item, to cover the additional costs associated with the increased annual claims paid on behalf of foster family homes, small family homes, resource families, and tribally approved homes pursuant to Article 2.5 (commencing with Section 1527) of Chapter 3 of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code. The Department of Finance shall provide notification of any adjustment in excess of the transfer amount appropriated in this item to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee within 10 working days from the date the Department of Finance approves the adjustment. The Department of Finance shall provide quarterly updates to the Legislature regarding the total number of approved claims in the fiscal year, the amount of each claim, and the final due date per the settlement agreement. 5180-011-0279—For transfer by the Controller from the Child Health and Safety Fund to the State Children’s Trust Fund ........................ 100,000 5180-101-0001—For local assistance, State Department of Social Services ........................ 7,094,930,0007,183,785,000 Schedule: (1) 4270010-CalWORKs ........................ 1,455,696,0001,476,196,000 (2) 4270019-Other Assistance Payments ........................ 738,160,000 (3) 4270020-Child Care ........................ 4,941,274,0005,009,629,000 (4) Reimbursements to 4270010-CalWORKs ........................ 0 (5) Reimbursements to 4270019-Other Assistance Payments ........................ −40,200,000 Provisions: 1. (a) Funds appropriated in this item shall not be encumbered unless every rule or regulation adopted and every all-county letter issued by the State Department of Social Services that adds to the costs of any program is approved by the Department of Finance as to the availability of funds before it becomes effective. In making the determination as to availability of funds to meet the expenditures of a rule, regulation, or all-county letter that would increase the costs of a program, the Department of Finance shall consider the amount of the proposed increase on an annualized basis, the effect the change would have on the expenditure limitations for the program set forth in this act, the extent to which the rule, regulation, or all-county letter constitutes a deviation from the premises under which the expenditure limitations were prepared, and any additional factors relating to the fiscal integrity of the program or the state’s fiscal situation. (b) Notwithstanding Sections 28.00 and 28.50, the availability of funds contained in this item for rules, regulations, or all-county letters that add to program costs funded from the General Fund in excess of $500,000 on an annual basis, including those that are the result of a federal regulation, but excluding those that are (1) specifically required as a result of the enactment of a federal or state law or (2) included in the appropriation made by this act, shall not be approved by the Department of Finance sooner than 30 days after notification in writing to the chairpersons of the committees in each house of the Legislature that consider appropriations and the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, or sooner than such lesser time after notification as the chairperson of the joint committee, or the chairperson’s designee, may in each instance determine. 2. Notwithstanding Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 18000) of Part 6 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, a loan not to exceed $1,485,361,000 shall be made available from the General Fund, from funds not otherwise appropriated, to: (a) cover the costs of a program or programs when the federal funds have not been received or funds in any subaccount within the Local Revenue Fund have not been deposited prior to the usual time for the state to transmit payment to the counties or (b) ensure cash disbursement needs in this item are met when abatements have not yet posted in time for disbursement. For this purpose, the Department of Finance may authorize an augmentation to this item to ensure cash disbursement requirements are met. This loan from the General Fund shall be repaid when the federal funds or the funds for any subaccounts within the Local Revenue Fund for the program or programs becomes available. 3. The Department of Finance may authorize the transfer of amounts from this item to Item 5180-001-0001 in order to fund the costs of the administrative hearing process associated with the CalWORKs program. 4. (a) The Department of Finance is authorized to approve expenditures in those amounts made necessary by changes in either caseload or payments, including, but not limited to, the timing of federal payments, or any rule or regulation adopted and any all-county letter issued as a result of the enactment of a federal or state law, the adoption of a federal regulation, or a court action, during the 2026–27 fiscal year that are within or in excess of amounts appropriated in this act for that year. (b) If the Department of Finance determines that the estimate of expenditures will exceed the expenditures authorized for this item, the department shall so report to the Legislature. At the time the report is made, the amount of the appropriation made in this item shall be increased by the amount of the excess unless and until otherwise provided by law. 5. Nonfederal funds appropriated in this item which have been budgeted to meet the state’s Temporary Assistance for Needy Families maintenance-of-effort requirement established pursuant to the federal Personal Responsibility and Work Opportunity Reconciliation Act of 1996 (Pub. L. 104-193 (Aug. 22, 1996) 110 Stat. 2105) shall not be expended in any way that would cause their disqualification as a federally allowable maintenance-of-effort expenditure. 6. In the event of a declared disaster and upon county request, the State Department of Social Services may act in the place of any county and assume direct responsibility for the administration of eligibility and grant determination. The Department of Finance may authorize the transfer of funds from this item and Item 5180-101-0890 to Items 5180-001-0001 and 5180-001-0890, for this purpose. 7. Pursuant to the Electronic Benefits Transfer (EBT) Act (Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 10065) of Part 1 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code) and in accordance with the EBT System regulations (Manual of Policies and Procedures Section 16-401.15), in the event a county fails to reimburse the EBT contractor for settlement of EBT transactions made against the county’s cash assistance programs, the state is required to pay the contractor. The State Department of Social Services may use funds from this item to reimburse the EBT contractor for settlement on behalf of the county. The county shall be required to reimburse the department for the county’s settlement via direct payment or administrative offset. 8. The Department of Finance is authorized to approve expenditures for the California Food Assistance Program in those amounts made necessary by changes in the CalFresh Program Standard Utility Allowance, including changes that result from midyear Standard Utility Allowance adjustments requested by the state and any adjustments necessary to maintain parity with federal program changes. If the Department of Finance determines that the estimate of expenditures will exceed the expenditure authority of this item, the department shall so report to the Legislature. At the time the report is made, the amount of the appropriation made in this item shall be increased by the amount of the excess unless and until otherwise provided by law. 9. The Department of Finance is authorized to approve expenditures in excess of the amounts appropriated in Schedule (2), upon notification from the State Department of Social Services, to replenish the State Emergency Food Bank Reserve. 10. Notwithstanding any other law, upon approval of the Department of Finance, expenditure authority may be transferred between schedules within or between the following items for the State Department of Education and the State Department of Social Services: Items 6100-194-0001, 5180-101-0001, and reimbursements. The aggregate amount of General Fund appropriation increases provided under this section during the fiscal year may not exceed the aggregate amount of General Fund appropriation decreases. This provision supports the continuity of care in the programs transitioned from the State Department of Education to the State Department of Social Services. 11. Notwithstanding any other law, the Department of Finance may authorize a cash loan from the General Fund for cashflow purposes, in an amount not to exceed $20,000,000, under the following conditions: (a) The loan shall meet cash needs resulting from a delay in the receipt of reimbursements from the General Child Care and Development program (CCTR) funds. (b) The loan shall be used for a short-term need and shall be repaid within 90 days of the loan origination date. (c) Interest charges may be waived pursuant to Section 16314 of the Government Code. 12. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (3), $1,841,566,000 $1,819,566,000 shall be allocated for Alternative Payment Program, General Child Care and Migrant Child Care slots to expand childcare access, with a priority for General Child Care and Development slots serving children who are 0 to 3 years of age. It is the intent of the Legislature that $221,000,000 $199,000,000 of this amount be allocated for approximately 2,500 2,070 additional General Child Care and Development slots, effective April 1, 2027, and 22,900 20,700 additional Alternative Payment Program slots, effective October 1, 2026. 13. Funds allocated for Resource and Referral, California Child Care Initiative, Quality Improvement, and Local Planning Councils shall be allocated to meet federal requirements to improve the quality of childcare and shall be used in accordance with the approved California State Plan for the federal Child Care and Development Fund that is developed pursuant to the requirements of Section 10211.5 of the Welfare and Institutions Code. 14. Notwithstanding any other law, funds in accounts payable are available for alternative payment programs for actual and allowable costs incurred for additional services, pursuant to Section 10228.1 of the Welfare and Institutions Code. The State Department of Social Services shall give priority for the allocation of these funds for accounts payable. 15. (a) (1) The State Department of Social Services shall conduct monthly analyses of CalWORKs Stage 2 and Stage 3 caseloads and expenditures and adjust agency contract maximum reimbursement amounts and allocations as necessary to ensure funds are distributed proportionally to need. (2) Notwithstanding any other law or any other provision of this act, the Department of Finance may augment the appropriation for CalWORKs Stage 3 if the estimate of expenditures, as determined by the Department of Finance, will exceed the expenditures authorized in Schedule (3). The Department of Finance shall report any augmentation pursuant to this paragraph to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee. At the time the report is made, the amount of the appropriation made in Schedule (3) shall be increased by the amount of the augmentation. (3) An augmentation may be authorized not sooner than 30 days after notification in writing of the necessity to exceed the limitations is provided to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, or whatever lesser time the chairperson of the joint committee may determine. Any request made by the State Department of Social Services to augment the CalWORKs Stage 3 appropriation shall be approved only in order to cover increases in costs that are consistent with assumptions of this act. This provision shall not be construed to treat Stage 3 as an entitlement. (b) Notwithstanding any other law, the funds in Schedule (3) are reserved exclusively for continuing childcare for the following families: (1) Former CalWORKs families who are working, have left cash aid, and have exhausted their two-year eligibility for transitional services in either Stage 1 or Stage 2 pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 10371 or Section 10372 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, respectively, but still meet eligibility requirements for receipt of subsidized childcare services. (2) Families who received lump-sum diversion payments or diversion services under Section 11266.5 of the Welfare and Institutions Code and have spent two years in Stage 2 off of cash aid, but still meet eligibility requirements for receipt of subsidized childcare services. (c) Notwithstanding any other law, each local planning council receiving funds appropriated in Schedule (3) shall meet the requirements of Section 10486 of the Welfare and Institutions Code to the extent feasible and to the extent data is readily accessible. (d) (1) Notwithstanding any other law, families shall be disenrolled from subsidized childcare services consistent with the priorities for services specified in subdivision (b) of Section 10271 of the Welfare and Institutions Code. Families shall be disenrolled in the following order: (A) Families with the highest income below 85 percent of the State Median Income (SMI) adjusted for family size. (B) Of families with the same income level, those that have been receiving childcare services for the longest period of time. (C) Of families with the same income level, those that have a child with exceptional needs. (D) Families with children who are receiving child protective services or are at risk of being neglected or abused, regardless of family income. (2) Notwithstanding any other law, the implementation of paragraph (1) of this subprovision is not subject to the appeal and resolution procedures for agencies that contract with the State Department of Social Services for the provision of childcare services or the due process requirements afforded to families that are denied services specified in Chapter 19 (commencing with Section 17906) of Division 1 of Title 5 of the California Code of Regulations. (3) The reimbursement for meals served in childcare centers and homes shall be $0.2203 per meal. 16. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (3), up to $9,144,890 $9,145,000 shall be available for the child nutrition program state match for the program. 17. The Department of Finance is authorized to approve expenditures in excess of the amounts appropriated in Schedule (3) for accounts payable, upon notification from the State Department of Social Services, to reimburse for actual and allowable costs incurred to Childcare and Development Programs, as defined in Section 10213.5 of the Welfare and Institutions Code. 18. The Department of Finance may increase expenditure authority in this item for increased costs related to the reimbursement of stolen food and cash benefits. 20. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (3), up to $70,000,000 is available to alternative payment programs funded by the State Department of Social Services pursuant to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 10225) or Chapter 21 (commencing with Section 10370) of Part 1.8 of, and Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 11200) of Part 3 of, Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, to provide resources to alternative payment program agencies for administration and support costs associated with implementing ongoing provisions of the Memorandum of Understanding with Child Care Providers United. Notwithstanding any other law, the State Department of Social Services may provide written directives for the amount and manner of reimbursement for these costs and the manner of implementation. 21. Upon approval by the Department of Finance, funds appropriated in Schedule (1) of this item for the CalWORKs Housing Support Program may be transferred to Item 5180-001-0001 for state operations. 22. Upon approval of the Department of Finance, the amount in Schedule (3) may be increased as follows to restore the balances of the Child Care Providers United—​California (CCPU) funds within 90 days of receiving the annual report from CCPU detailing the distribution of funds from the prior year and any remaining balance, pursuant to the agreement entered into by the Governor and CCPU: (a) Up to $100,000,000 for the CCPU Workers Health Care Fund. (b) Up to $80,000,000 for the CCPU Retirement Trust. (c) Up to $15,000,000 for the CCPU Training Partnership Fund. 23. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (3), up to $192,000 shall be available for the Infrastructure Grant Program pursuant to Section 10310.1 of the Welfare and Institutions Code. These funds shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2028. 24. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $100,000,000 shall be allocated on a one-time basis for the CalFood program. program and shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2028. This amount combined with the $8,000,000 in the CalFood Program baseline budget totals $108,000,000 appropriated for the program in this act. 25. (a) Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (1), $16,500,000 shall be available to the State Department of Social Services to provide allocations to the following organizations for diaper and wipe distribution to low income families with infants or toddlers; (1) Community Action Partnership of Orange County (2) Community Partnership of San Bernardino (3) Central California Food Bank (4) Help a Mother Out (located in the San Francisco Bay Area) (5) Los Angeles Regional Food Bank (6) Redwood Empire Food Bank (7) Sacramento Food Bank and Family Services (8) Jacobs and Cushman San Diego Food Bank (9) Food Share Ventura County (10) Second Harvest Food Bank of Santa Cruz (11) Food Bank of Contra Costa and Solano (b) The department shall determine the best method for allocation to ensure the funds are used for the purposes specified in this provision. Self-attestation by the receiving entity is an acceptable method of verification of the use of funds, if determined by the department. (c) These funds shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2027, and liquidation until June 30, 2029. (d) Notwithstanding any other law, the department may provide the allocation as an advance lump sum payment. (e) Notwithstanding any other law, allocations pursuant to this section are exempt from the personal services contracting requirements of Article 4 (commencing with Section 19130) of Chapter 5 of Part 2 of Division 5 of Title 2 of the Government Code, from Part 2 (commencing with Section 10100) of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code, and the State Contracting Manual, and are not subject to the approval of the Department of General Services, including the requirements of Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 14825) of Part 5.5 of Division 3 of the Title 2 of the Government Code. 5180-101-0122—For local assistance, State Department of Social Services, payable from the Emergency Food for Families Voluntary Tax Contribution Fund ........................ 661,000 Schedule: (1) 4270019-Other Assistance Payments ........................ 661,000 5180-101-0890—For local assistance, State Department of Social Services, payable from the Federal Trust Fund ........................ 7,166,140,000 Schedule: (1) 4270010-CalWORKs ........................ 3,022,209,000 (2) 4270019-Other Assistance Payments ........................ 2,358,752,000 (3) 4270020-Child Care ........................ 1,785,179,000 Provisions: 1. Provisions 1, 4, 6, and 7 of Item 5180-101-0001 also apply to this item. 2. The Department of Finance may authorize the transfer of amounts from this item to Item 5180-001-0890 in order to fund the costs of the administrative hearing process associated with the CalWORKs program. 3. Upon request of the State Department of Social Services, the Department of Finance may increase or decrease the expenditure authority in this item to offset any increases or decreases in collections deposited in the Child Support Collections Recovery Fund and appropriated in Item 5180-101-8004. The Department of Finance shall provide notification of the adjustment to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee within 10 working days from the date of the department’s approval of the adjustment. 4. Upon request by the Department of Finance, the Controller shall transfer funds between this item and Item 5180-151-0890 as needed to reflect the estimated expenditure amounts for counties receiving funds provided by the federal Families First Transition Act. The Department of Finance shall report to the Legislature the amount to be transferred pursuant to this provision. The transfer shall be authorized at the time the report is made. 5. Notwithstanding any other law, upon approval of the Department of Finance, expenditure authority may be transferred between schedules within or between the following items for the State Department of Education and the State Department of Social Services: Items 6100-201-0890 and 5180-101-0890, and reimbursements. The aggregate amount of appropriation increases provided under this section during the fiscal year may not exceed the aggregate amount of appropriation decreases. This provision supports the continuity of care in the programs transitioned from the State Department of Education to the State Department of Social Services. 6. (a) Funds shall be allocated to meet federal requirements to improve the quality of childcare and shall be used in accordance with the approved California state plan for the federal Child Care and Development Fund that is developed pursuant to the requirements of Section 10211.5 of the Welfare and Institutions Code. (b) Funds appropriated in this item shall not be expended to develop or support new information technology projects unless approved by the Department of Finance and not sooner than 30 days after notification to the chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee. 5180-101-8004—For local assistance, State Department of Social Services, payable from the Child Support Collections Recovery Fund ........................ 250,000 Schedule: (1) 4270019-Other Assistance Payments ........................ 250,000 Provisions: 1. Notwithstanding any other law, upon request by the State Department of Social Services, the Department of Finance may increase or decrease this appropriation for the purposes specified in Section 17702.5 of the Family Code. Adjustments to expenditure authority shall be consistent with those made pursuant to Provision 3 of Item 5180-101-0890. The Department of Finance shall provide notification of the adjustment to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee within 10 working days from the date the Department of Finance approves the adjustment. 5180-101-8075—For local assistance, State Department of Social Services, payable from the School Supplies for Homeless Children Fund ........................ 1,900,000 Schedule: (1) 4270019-Other Assistance Payments ........................ 1,900,000 5180-104-0001—For local assistance, State Department of Social Services (Proposition 98) ........................ 1,094,000 Schedule: (1) 4270020-Child Care ........................ 1,094,000 Provisions: 1. Notwithstanding any other law, upon approval of the Department of Finance, expenditure authority may be transferred between Item 6100-203-0001 and this item for the State Department of Education and the State Department of Social Services. The aggregate amount of General Fund appropriation increases provided under this item during the fiscal year may not exceed the aggregate amount of General Fund appropriation decreases. This provision supports the continuity of care in the programs transitioned from the State Department of Education to the State Department of Social Services. 5180-111-0001—For local assistance, State Department of Social Services ........................ 16,417,196,00016,504,293,000 Schedule: (1) 4270028-SSI/SSP ........................ 3,612,345,000 (2) 4275010-IHSS ........................ 33,876,530,00033,877,986,000 (3) Reimbursements to 4275010-IHSS ........................ −21,071,679,000−20,986,038,000 Provisions: 1. Provisions 1 and 4 of Item 5180-101-0001 also apply to this item. 2. Notwithstanding Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 18000) of Part 6 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, a loan not to exceed $2,000,000,000 shall be made available from the General Fund from funds not otherwise appropriated, to cover the federal share or reimbursable share, or both, of costs of a program or programs when the federal funds or reimbursements (from the Health Care Deposit Fund or counties) have not been received by this state prior to the usual time for transmitting payments for the federal or reimbursable share of costs for this state. That loan from the General Fund shall be repaid when the federal share of costs for the program or programs becomes available, or in the case of reimbursements, subject to Section 16351 of the Government Code. County reimbursements also shall be subject to Section 16314 of the Government Code, which specifies the rate of interest. The State Department of Social Services may offset a county’s share of cost of the In-Home Supportive Services (IHSS) program against local assistance payments made to the county if the county fails to reimburse its share of the cost of the IHSS program to the state. 3. The Department of Finance may authorize the transfer of amounts from this item to Item 5180-001-0001 in order to fund the cost of the administrative hearing process associated with changes in aid or service payments in the IHSS program. The Department of Finance shall report to the Legislature the amount to be transferred pursuant to this provision. The transfer shall be authorized at the time the report is made. 5180-141-0001—For local assistance, State Department of Social Services ........................ 1,940,401,0002,025,499,000 Schedule: (1) 4270037-County Administration and Automation Projects ........................ 2,140,280,0002,225,378,000 (2) Reimbursements to 4270037-County Administration and Automation Projects ........................ −199,879,000 Provisions: 1. Notwithstanding Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 18000) of Part 6 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, a loan not to exceed $400,417,000 shall be made available from the General Fund, from funds not otherwise appropriated, to cover the federal or reimbursable share, or both, of costs of a program or programs when the federal funds or reimbursements have not been received by this state prior to the usual time for transmitting state payments for the federal or reimbursable share of costs. This loan from the General Fund shall be repaid when the federal share of costs or the reimbursements for the program or programs become available. 2. In the event of a declared disaster and upon county request, the State Department of Social Services may act in the place of any county and assume direct responsibility for the administration of eligibility and grant determination. The Department of Finance may authorize the transfer of funds from this item and Item 5180-141-0890 to Items 5180-001-0001 and 5180-001-0890, for this purpose. 3. Provision 1 of Item 5180-101-0001 also applies to this item. 4. Pursuant to public assistance caseload estimates reflected in the annual Governor’s Budget, the Department of Finance may approve expenditures in those amounts made necessary by a court action or changes in caseload that are in excess of amounts appropriated in this act. If the Department of Finance determines that the estimate of expenditures will exceed the expenditures authorized for this item, the department shall so report to the Legislature. At the time the report is made, the amount of the appropriation made by this item shall be increased by the amount of the excess unless and until otherwise provided by law. 5. Nonfederal funds appropriated in this item which have been budgeted to meet the state’s Temporary Assistance for Needy Families maintenance-of-effort requirement established pursuant to the federal Personal Responsibility and Work Opportunity Reconciliation Act of 1996 (P.L. 104-193) shall not be expended in any way that would cause their disqualification as a federally allowable maintenance-of-effort expenditure. 6. This item may be increased by order of the Department of Finance to address system changes necessary to implement the requirements of the federal Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act (P.L. 111-148). The Director of Finance shall provide notification in writing to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee of any expenditure approved under this provision not less than 30 days prior to the effective date of the approval. 7. The Department of Finance may increase expenditure authority in this item for the State Department of Social Services in order to fund the administrative costs to prepare for and respond to a declaration of a major disaster by the President of the United States and to maximize the amount of assistance requested and received through the federal Disaster Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program and other federally funded nutrition assistance programs. 8. The Department of Finance may increase expenditure authority in this item for the costs associated with an updated project schedule, clarified requirements, and negotiated vendor costs for the California Statewide Automated Welfare System project, upon notification from the Office of Systems Integration. Any such increase shall be authorized not less than 30 days following written notification to the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, or a lesser period if requested by the department and approved by the chairperson or the chairperson’s designee. 9. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (1), up to $2,000,000 shall be available for the State Department of Social Services for the purpose of updating public benefit program forms, notices, or reports necessary to maintain compliance with federal regulation or state law. 10. The Department of Finance may authorize the transfer of amounts in this item to Item 5180-001-0001 in order to fund the costs of administration and implementation of the SUN Bucks California program established pursuant to Section 1762 of Title 42 of the United States Code. 11. The Department of Finance may increase expenditure authority in this item for increased costs related to the reimbursement of stolen food and cash benefits. 12. Notwithstanding any other law, upon request by the State Department of Social Services, the Department of Finance may adjust the expenditure authority in this item to support State Administrative Expenditures for the CalFresh program. The Department of Finance shall provide notification of the adjustment to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee within 10 working days from the date the Department of Finance approves the adjustment. 13. (a) Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (1), $179,774,000 is for the support of activities related to the Child Welfare Services-California Automated Response and Engagement System (CWS-CARES) project. Expenditure of these funds is contingent upon the CWS-CARES project receiving project continuation approval from the Department of Technology. This amount may be augmented from unspent appropriations and augmentation amounts authorized in prior years upon approval by the Department of Finance. In providing approval of any augmentation, the Department of Finance, in consultation with the Department of Technology, shall consider verified satisfactory progress toward milestones associated with the CWS-CARES Product Roadmap, product adoption, and the roadmap change management process. Satisfactory progress shall be defined as: (1) The completion of planned product milestones, including all planned data conversion, hardening, and resting testing without significant deviation from the baseline project cost, schedule, and scope in the most recent Special Project Report; (2) Incorporation of relevant end user feedback into product design, development, and implementation, to the extent possible, without significant increases in the total CWS-CARES project cost, schedule, and scope; (3) Demonstrable progress made towards user adoption that is consistent with the project’s strategic plan for user engagement, communication, and adoption, including clearly defined processes that measure and report on stakeholder engagements with the project (such as, for example, stakeholder impact assessments.) assessments). Such an augmentation shall be aligned with planned project activities and shall not be used to increase total project costs. Any such augmentation shall be authorized no fewer less than 30 calendar days following written notification to the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, or a lesser period of time requested by the Department of Finance and approved by the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, or the chairperson’s designee. The Department of Finance’s written notification shall include, at a minimum, its consideration of verified satisfactory progress as defined above. (b) The Department of Finance may authorize the transfer of funds appropriated for the CWS-CARES project in Schedule (1) to Item 5180-001-0001 for project-related activities, including, but not limited to, necessary personal services expenditures, interagency agreements, and contracts. (c) Of the amount appropriated in this item, $100,000 is available to fund reimbursements to Indian tribes, as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 224.1 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, or the tribe’s designee, for costs associated with participating with the State Department of Social Services to guide the development of an automated system used for Child Welfare Services. Notwithstanding any other law, the amount and manner of reimbursements shall be determined by the State Department of Social Services in written directives. (d) The Department of Social Services, in coordination with the Department of Finance and the Office of Technology and Solutions Integration, shall provide written notification to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, relevant fiscal and policy committee staff, and the Legislative Analyst’s Office if the scheduled implementation of any child welfare program changes will be delayed due to changes in the CWS-CARES project schedule. The Department of Social Services shall provide this written notification no later than 30 days after its determination that project schedule changes will delay program changes. 14. Of the amount appropriated in this item, $178,000,000 Schedule (1), up to $215,000,000 shall be available for county administration of the CalFresh program and to support increased workload and to help clients maintain access to CalFresh as a result of federal House Resolution H.R. 1 (Public Law 119-21). Funds allocated pursuant to this provision shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2029. 15. Of the amount appropriated in this item, $14,000,000 shall be used for the CalFresh Outreach Program. Program and shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2028. 16. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $5,000,000 shall be allocated on a one-time basis for the automation necessary to enable the policy changes in the California Food Assistance Program pursuant to statutory changes in Welfare and Institutions Code Sections 18930 and 18930.1 and shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2028. 5180-141-0890—For local assistance, State Department of Social Services, payable from the Federal Trust Fund ........................ 1,399,931,0001,442,931,000 Schedule: (1) 4270037-County Administration and Automation Projects ........................ 1,399,931,0001,442,931,000 Provisions: 1. Provisions 2, 4, 6, 7, 8, and 13 of Item 5180-141-0001 also apply to this item. 2. Upon notification by the Department of Social Services, the Controller is authorized to transfer funds from this item to the CalFresh E&T Workers’ Compensation Fund in accordance with Section 18926.8 of the Welfare and Institutions Code. This provision also applies to Item 5180-141-0890 of the Budget Act of 2023 (Chs. 12, 38, and 189, Stats. 2023) and Item 5180-141-0890 of the Budget Act of 2024 (Chs. 22, 35, and 994, Stats. 2024). 3. The Department of Finance may authorize the transfer of amounts from this item to Item 5180-001-0890 in order to fund the costs of the administrative hearing process associated with the CalWORKs program. 4. The Department of Finance may authorize the transfer of amounts in this item to Item 5180-001-0890 in order to fund the costs of administration and implementation of the SUN Bucks California program established pursuant to Section 1762 of Title 42 of the United States Code. This provision also applies to Item 5180-141-0890 of the Budget Act of 2025 (Chs. 4 and 5, Stats. 2025). 5. Of the amount appropriated in this item, $114,210,000 Schedule 1, up to $138,000,000 shall be available for county administration of the CalFresh program and to support increased workload and to help clients maintain access to CalFresh as a result of federal House Resolution H.R. 1 (Pub. L. 119-21 (Jul. 4, 2025) 139 Stat. 72). (Public Law 119-21). Funds allocated pursuant to this provision shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2029. 5180-151-0001—For local assistance, State Department of Social Services ........................ 673,392,000884,792,000 Schedule: (1) 4275019-Children and Adult Services and Licensing ........................ 1,125,368,0001,222,768,000 (2) 4275028-Special Programs ........................ 172,492,000286,492,000 (3) Reimbursements to 4275019-Children and Adult Services and Licensing ........................ −614,468,000 (4) Reimbursements to 4275028-Special Programs ........................ −10,000,000 Provisions: 1. Provision 1 of Item 5180-101-0001 also applies to this item. 2. Notwithstanding Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 18000) of Part 6 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code and pursuant to Section 30029.8 of the Government Code, a loan not to exceed $345,410,000 shall be made available from the General Fund, from funds not otherwise appropriated, to cover the federal share or reimbursable share, or both, of costs of a program or programs when the federal funds or reimbursements have not been received by the state prior to the usual time for transmitting state payments for the federal or reimbursable share of costs. The loan from the General Fund shall be repaid when the federal or reimbursable share of costs for the program or programs becomes available. 3. The Department of Finance may authorize the establishment of positions and transfer of amounts from this item to Item 5180-001-0001, in order to allow the state to perform the facilities evaluation function of the Community Care Licensing Division in the event the counties fail to perform that function. 4. Nonfederal funds appropriated in this item that have been budgeted to meet the state’s Temporary Assistance for Needy Families maintenance-of-effort requirement established pursuant to the federal Personal Responsibility and Work Opportunity Reconciliation Act of 1996 (P.L. 104-193) shall not be expended in any way that would cause their disqualification as a federally allowable maintenance-of-effort expenditure. 5. The Department of Finance may authorize the establishment of positions and transfer of amounts from this item to Item 5180-001-0001 in order to allow the state to perform the adoptions function in the event that a county notifies the State Department of Social Services that it intends to cease performing that function. 6. Funds appropriated in this item for the Commercially Sexually Exploited Children Program required by Chapter 5.2 (commencing with Section 16524.6) of Part 4 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code shall be appropriately reduced by the Department of Finance to the extent any activities for which funding is included are also required by the federal Preventing Sex Trafficking and Strengthening Families Act (P.L. 113-183). 7. Of the total amount appropriated in this item, up to $4,000,000 shall be available for a county-optional block grant program, for allocation to local agencies to fund activities the Commission on State Mandates identified as reimbursable state mandates in the Interagency Child Abuse and Neglect Investigation Reports (CSM-00-TC-22) mandate. A local agency that receives funding according to this item shall not be eligible to submit claims to the Controller for reimbursement under Section 17560 of the Government Code for any costs related to the reimbursable state-mandated activities identified in CSM-00-TC-22 incurred in the same fiscal year during which the local agency received funding according to this item. The State Department of Social Services, in consultation with the California State Association of Counties, shall develop an allocation methodology for the purpose of distributing these funds to participating counties. Block grant funding apportioned according to this item is subject to annual financial and compliance audits. 8. Of the amount appropriated in this item, $7,000,000 shall be available for contracts under the authority of Chapter 5.6 (commencing with Section 13300) of Part 3 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code with organizations qualified pursuant to that chapter, to provide legal services to persons on California State University campuses. Use of these funds shall be reported in updates provided to the Legislature on the State Department of Social Services’ immigration programs. 9. (a) Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (1), $87,000 shall be available to eligible federally recognized Indian tribes or tribal agencies to purchase Live Scan machines and receive ongoing reimbursements for fingerprinting costs, other maintenance and operation items, or related activities necessary to enable the tribes or tribal agencies to complete background checks for the purpose of approving tribally approved homes for the placement of Indian children into foster or adoptive care pursuant to Section 10553.12 of the Welfare and Institutions Code. (b) The funding in subdivision (a) shall be available to the tribes or tribal agencies currently approved by the Department of Justice to receive state and federal level summary criminal history information pursuant to Section 11105.08 of the Penal Code. (c) Of the funding in subdivision (a), the amount that each tribe or tribal agency can utilize for the purposes specified in subdivision (a) will be determined in consultation with, and subject to review and approval by, the State Department of Social Services. 10. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (1), $18,146,000 shall be available to support enhanced care planning and assessment services, exceptional care and supervision needs for a child in a licensed setting, or other exceptional community, educational, or family supports that have been identified by a qualified individual or a child and family team, as necessary to meet the needs of a child in the least restrictive setting. The State Department of Social Services shall allocate funds through contracts with community-based providers or entities or through local assistance allocations to counties that support new or expanded programs, services, and practices that ensure the provision of the high-quality continuum of care that is designed to support foster children in the least restrictive setting, consistent with a child’s permanency plan. 11. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (1), $4,145,000 shall be available for the State Department of Social Services to provide funding to support legal counsel to represent an Indian tribe in California juvenile court proceedings contingent upon the enactment of statutory changes detailing objectives, implementation design and timelines, data collection, and outcome measurements for these activities. 12. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (1), $4,777,000 shall be available for the State Department of Social Services to provide financial assistance with recruiting and approving homes for the purpose of foster or adoptive placement of an Indian child contingent upon the enactment of statutory changes detailing objectives, implementation design and timelines, data collection, and outcome measurements for these activities. The department shall seek federal approvals or waivers necessary to claim federal reimbursement under Title IV-E of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 670 et seq.) in order to maximize funding for the purpose described in this section. 13. Of the amount appropriated in this item, $10,000,000 shall be available for legal services pursuant to Chapter 5.6 (commencing with Section 13300) of Part 3 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, for, but not limited to, unaccompanied undocumented minors and other minors in removal proceedings, and current or past beneficiaries of federal temporary protected status, to be allocated at the discretion of the State Department of Social Services. Use of these funds shall be reported in updates provided to the Legislature on the department’s immigration programs. 14. Upon approval by the Department of Finance, funds appropriated in Schedule (1) and Schedule (2) of this item for the Home Safe, Bringing Families Home, and the Housing and Disability Income Advocacy Program may be transferred to Item 5180-001-0001 for state operations. 15.(a)Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (2), $20,000,000 shall be available to support legal strategies that increase legal capacity to help Californians who are facing immigration court proceedings, particularly for individuals in civil immigration detention. These funds shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2029, and liquidation until June 30, 2031. (b)Upon approval from the Department of Finance, up to 5 percent of the funds appropriated in Schedule (2) for the purposes described in this provision may be transferred to Item 5180-001-0001 to implement and administer legal services pursuant to Chapter 5.6 (commencing with Section 13300) of Part 3 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code. 16.15. (a) Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (2), $10,600,000 $35,500,000 shall be available for grants or contracts, and state operations, under the authority of Chapter 5.6 (commencing with Section 13300) of Part 3 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code with organizations qualified pursuant to that chapter to provide immigration-related services, including removal defense. These funds shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2028. (b) Upon approval of the Department of Finance, funds made available pursuant to subprovision (a) may be transferred to Item 5180-001-0001 to implement and administer immigration-related services. 17.16. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $15,000,000 shall be allocated on a one-time basis for the Children’s Holistic Immigration Representation Project and shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2028. 18.17. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $1,000,000 $5,000,000 shall be allocated on a one-time basis for the Black Immigrant and Refugee Equity Project. These funds shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2028. 19.18. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $2,400,000 $7,500,000 shall be allocated for the Immigration Legal Fellowship Project. These funds shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2029. 20.19. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $5,000,000 shall be allocated on a one-time basis for an access to counsel pilot project to operate at immigration courts through an attorney of the day model; to expand community-based legal support through coordinated screening, referral, and legal assistance; and to expand access to habeas relief. These funds shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2028. 21.20. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $5,000,000 shall be allocated on a one-time basis to the Coalition for Humane Immigrant Rights (CHIRLA) for immigration legal resources. These funds shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2028. 21. (a) Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (1), $20,000,000 shall be available to counties for the purpose of maintaining and increasing the number of child welfare social workers in emergency response services. The funding shall be used by county child welfare agencies to enhance existing emergency response services to ensure timely emergency response by well-trained social workers to reports of child abuse, neglect, or exploitation with the goal of reducing entries into foster care where possible and appropriate, reducing the disproportionate representation of children of color entering foster care, promoting kin-based care, and strengthening families through connection to community-based resources. These funds shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2028. (b) The State Department of Social Services shall develop, in consultation with the County Welfare Directors Association of California, a method for allocation of these funds, which may take into account historical referral data and outcomes, including, but not limited to, caseloads, timeliness to completion of investigations, expenditures, and the use of established risk and safety assessments. (c) The State Department of Social Services, in consultation with the County Welfare Directors Association of California, shall require an implementation plan and outcome report from the participating counties, which may be integrated into county system improvement plans required pursuant to Section 10601.2 of the Welfare and Institutions Code. (d) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the State Department of Social Services may implement, interpret, or make specific this item, in whole or in part, by means of information notices or other similar instructions, without taking any further regulatory action. 22. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $5,000,000 shall be allocated on a one-time basis for the Immigrant Welcome and Empowerment Center, and shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2028. 23. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $12,000,000 shall be allocated on a one-time basis for the Enhanced Services for Asylees and Vulnerable Noncitizens Program as established in Section 13650 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, and shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2028. 24. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $10,000,000 shall be allocated on a one-time basis for the regional capacity-building in underserved communities, including the Central Coast, Central Valley, Inland Empire, Imperial Valley, and North State, and shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2028. 25. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $25,000,000 shall be allocated on a one-time basis for the Housing and Disability Advocacy Program, and shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2028. 26. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $50,000,000 shall be allocated on a one-time basis for the Home Safe Program and shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2028. 27. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $25,000,000 shall be allocated on a one-time basis for the Bringing Families Home Program, and shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2028. 28. Of the funds appropriated in this item, a total of $30,000,000 shall be allocated on a one-time basis for the Stop the Hate Program, pursuant to statutory changes in Section 8260 of the Government Code. These funds shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2028. 29. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $2,400,000 shall be allocated on an on-going basis for the Tribal Foster Care Prevention Program to award grants to eligible tribes and tribal organizations to provide prevention services for children and families at risk of entering the foster care system, pursuant to statutory changes in Section 10553.16 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, and shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2028. 30. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $12,000,000 shall be allocated in the 2026–27 fiscal year, $12,000,000 shall be allocated in the 2027–28 fiscal year, and $12,000,000 shall be allocated in the 2028–29 fiscal year, for the Holocaust Survivor Assistance Program, and shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2028. 31. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $6,000,000 shall be allocated on a one-time basis for the Center Against Racism and Trauma (CART) to expand anti-racism programming and trauma-recovery resources in the Inland Empire. These funds shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2028. 5180-151-0279—For local assistance, State Department of Social Services, payable from the Child Health and Safety Fund ........................ 608,000 Schedule: (1) 4275019-Children and Adult Services and Licensing ........................ 608,000 5180-151-0803—For local assistance, State Department of Social Services, payable from the State Children’s Trust Fund ........................ 355,000 Schedule: (1) 4275019-Children and Adult Services and Licensing ........................ 355,000 5180-151-0890—For local assistance, State Department of Social Services, payable from the Federal Trust Fund ........................ 1,777,704,000 Schedule: (1) 4275019-Children and Adult Services and Licensing ........................ 1,775,454,000 (2) 4275028-Special Programs ........................ 2,250,000 Provisions: 1. Provisions 1, 3, and 5 of Item 5180-151-0001 also apply to this item. 2. Upon request by the Department of Finance, the Controller shall transfer funds between this item and Item 5180-101-0890 as needed to reflect the estimated expenditure amounts for counties receiving funds provided by the federal Family First Transition Act (Pub. L. 116-94, Sec. 602 (Dec. 20, 2019), 133 Stat. 3120). The Department of Finance shall report to the Legislature the amount to be transferred pursuant to this provision. The transfer shall be authorized at the time the report is made. 5180-151-8023—For local assistance, State Department of Social Services, payable from the Child Welfare Services Program Improvement Fund ........................ 4,000,000 Schedule: (1) 4275019-Children and Adult Services and Licensing ........................ 4,000,000 Provisions: 1. Notwithstanding any other law, upon request by the State Department of Social Services, the Department of Finance may increase or decrease the expenditure authority in this item, for the purposes of Section 16524 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, not sooner than 30 days after notification in writing is provided to the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee and the chairpersons of the committees in each house of the Legislature that consider appropriations, unless the chairperson of the joint committee, or the chairperson’s designee, imposes a lesser time. 5180-161-0001—For local assistance, State Department of Social Services (Proposition 98) ........................ 6,900,000 Schedule: (1) 4275028-Special Programs ........................ 6,900,000 5180-490—Reappropriation, State Department of Social Services. The amount specified in the following citations are reappropriated for the purposes provided for in those appropriations and shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2028: 0001—General Fund (1) Up to $4,100,000 in Schedule (1) of Item 5180-151-0001 of the Budget Act of 2022 (Chs. 43, 45, and 249, Stats. 2022) for the Home Safe Program as reappropriated by Item 5180-492 of the Budget Act of 2024 (Chs. 22, 35, and 994, Stats. 2024). (2) Up to $4,100,000 in Schedule (1) of Item 5180-151-0001 of the Budget Act of 2022 (Chs. 43, 45, and 249, Stats. 2022) for the Bringing Families Home Program as reappropriated by Items 5180-490 and 5180-492 of the Budget Act of 2024 (Chs. 22, 35, and 994, Stats. 2024). (3) Up to $7,400,000 in Schedule (2) of Item 5180-151-0001 of the Budget Act of 2022 (Chs. 43, 45, and 249, Stats. 2022) for the Housing and Disability Advocacy Program as reappropriated by Item 5180-492 of the Budget Act of 2024 (Chs. 22, 35, and 994, Stats. 2024). (4) Up to $1,516,000 in Schedule (3) of Item 5180-101-0001 of the Budget Act of 2021 (Chs. 21, 69, and 240, Stats. 2021) as reappropriated by Item 5180-492 of the Budget Act of 2022 (Chs. 43, 45, and 249, Stats. 2022), for the Infrastructure Grant Program acquisition, construction, development, and renovation of childcare facilities as outlined in Section 10310.1 of the Welfare and Institutions Code. (5) Up to $50,000,000 in Schedule (1) of Item 5180-151-0001 of the Budget Act of 2022 (Chs. 43, 45, and 249, Stats. 2022) for funding to increase the use of home-based family care and the provision of services and supports to children in foster care and their foster caregivers. (6) Up to $50,000,000 in Schedule (1) of Item 5180-151-0001 of the Budget Act of 2023 (Chs. 12, 38, and 189, Stats. 2023) for funding to increase the use of home-based family care and the provision of services and supports to children in foster care and their foster caregivers. 5180-491—Reappropriation, State Department of Social Services. The amounts specified in the following citations are reappropriated for the purposes provided for in those appropriations and shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2027: 0001—General Fund (1) Up to $4,290,000 in Schedule (1) of Item 5180-141-0001, Budget Act of 2025 (Chs. 4 and 5, Stats. 2025) for automation in the California Statewide Automated Welfare System to support implementation of the foster care Tiered Rate Structure. (2) Up to $1,312,000 in Schedule (1) of Item 5180-141-0001, Budget Act of 2024 (Chs. 22, 35, and 994, Stats. 2024) as reappropriated by Item 5180-491, Budget Act of 2025 (Chs. 4 and 5, Stats. 2025) for automation in the California Statewide Automated Welfare System to support implementation of the foster care Tiered Rate Structure. (3) Up to $419,000 in Schedule (1) of Item 5180-001-0001, Budget Act of 2025 (Chs. 4 and 5, Stats. 2025) for automation to support implementation of the Summer Electronic Benefits Transfer for Children program. (4) Up to $7,500,000 in Schedule (1) of Item 5180-001-0001, Budget Act of 2025 (Chs. 4 and 5, Stats. 2025) for CalFresh Payment Error Rate Mitigation and automation for implementation of Public Law 119-21. (5) Up to $20,100,000 in Schedule (1) of Item 5180-141-0001, Budget Act of 2025 (Chs. 4 and 5, Stats. 2025) for CalFresh Payment Error Rate Mitigation and automation for implementation of Public Law 119-21. (6) Up to $4,800,000 in Schedule (1) of Item 5180-101-0001, Budget Act of 2025 (Chs. 4 and 5, Stats. 2025) for the CalFresh Fruit and Vegetable Demonstration Pilot. (7) Up to $10,000,000 in Schedule (1) of Item 5180-101-0001, Budget Act of 2024 (Chs. 22, 35, and 994, Stats. 2024) as reappropriated by Item 5180-491, Budget Act of 2025 (Chs. 4 and 5, Stats. 2025) for the State Supplemental Grant Program. (8) Up to $20,000,000 in unspent funds available in Schedule (1) of Item 5180-101-0001, Budget Act of 2024 (Chs. 22, 35, and 994, Stats. 2024) for CalWORKs Mental Health and Substance Abuse Services. 0890—Federal Trust Fund (1) Up to $420,000 in Schedule (1) of Item 5180-001-0890, Budget Act of 2025 (Chs. 4 and 5, Stats. 2025) for automation to support implementation of the Summer Electronic Benefits Transfer for Children program. (2) Up to $7,500,000 Schedule (1) of Item 5180-001-0890, Budget Act of 2025 (Chs. 4 and 5, Stats. 2025) for CalFresh Payment Error Rate Mitigation and automation for implementation of Public Law 119-21. (3) Up to $19,800,000 in Schedule (1) of Item 5180-141-0890, Budget Act of 2025 (Chs. 4 and 5, Stats. 2025) for CalFresh Payment Error Rate Mitigation and automation for implementation of Public Law 119-21. 5180-492—Reappropriation, State Department of Social Services. Notwithstanding any other law, the period to liquidate encumbrances of the following citations is extended to June 30, 2030. 0001—General Fund (1) Up to $2,500,000 in Schedule (1) of Item 5180-151-0001 of the Budget Act of 2021 (Chs. 21, 69, and 240, Stats. 2021) for the Home Safe Program as reappropriated by Item 5180-494 of the Budget Act of 2024 (Chs. 22, 35, and 994, Stats. 2024). (2) Up to $5,900,000 in Schedule (2) of Item 5180-151-0001 of the Budget Act of 2021 (Chs. 21, 69, and 240, Stats. 2021) for the Housing and Disability Advocacy Program as reappropriated by Item 5180-494 of the Budget Act of 2024 (Chs. 22, 35, and 994, Stats. 2024). (3) Up to $2,400,000 of the amount appropriated in Schedule (1) of Item 5180-151-0001 of the Budget Act of 2021 (Chs. 21, 69, and 240, Stats. 2021) for the Bringing Families Home Program as reappropriated by Item 5180-494 of the Budget Act of 2024 (Chs. 22, 35, and 994, Stats. 2024). 5180-493—Reappropriation, State Department of Social Services. The balances of the appropriations provided in the following citations are reappropriated for the purposes provided for in those appropriations and shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2028, and may be used to support enhanced care planning and service navigation to access care in the least restrictive setting for adoptive children and their families to prevent reentry into the foster care system. Upon departmental approval of all final invoices and claims for the respective county allocation, including any claiming reconciliation as part of the closeout process, unspent balances available for this purpose shall be reported to the appropriate subcommittees in each house of the Legislature that consider the state budget. In the event the unspent balances do not reach a minimum of $5,000,000, the remainder shall be appropriated from this item. 0001—General Fund (1) Subprovision (a) of Provision 32 of Item 5180-151-0001, Budget Act of 2021 (Chs. 21, 69, and 240, Stats. 2021). (2) Provision 13 of Item 5180-151-0001, Budget Act of 2023 (Chs. 12, 38, and 189, Stats. 2023). (3) Provision 10 of Item 5180-151-0001, Budget Act of 2024 (Chs. 22, 35, and 994, Stats. 2024). 5180-495—Reversion, State Department of Social Services. As of June 30, 2026, the balances specified below of the appropriations provided in the following citations shall revert to the balances in the funds from which the appropriations were made: 0001—General Fund (1) Up to $65,000,000 in Item 5180-101-0001, Budget Act of 2024 (Chs. 22, 35, and 994, Stats. 2024) appropriated for the State Supplemental Grant Program. (2) Up to $30,091,000 in Item 5180-101-0001, Budget Act of 2025 (Chs. 4 and 5, Stats. 2025) appropriated for implementation of prospective pay. (3) Up to $582,000 in Item 5180-001-0001, Budget Act of 2025 (Chs. 4 and 5, Stats. 2025) appropriated for resources to support the implementation of prospective pay. CORRECTIONS AND REHABILITATION 5225-001-0001—For support of Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation ........................ 8,550,479,0008,469,301,000 Schedule: (1) 4500-Corrections and Rehabilitation Administration ........................ 720,629,000645,629,000 (2) 4505-Peace Officer Selection and Employee Development ........................ 132,609,000 (3) 4510-Department of Justice Legal Services ........................ 74,032,000 (4) 4530-Adult Corrections and Rehabilitation Operations—​General Security ........................ 5,175,556,000 (5) 4540-Adult Corrections and Rehabilitation Operations—​Inmate Support ........................ 1,417,619,000 (6) 4550-Adult Corrections and Rehabilitation Operations—​Institution Administration ........................ 647,436,000 (7) 4555-Parole Operations—​Adult Supervision ........................ 354,274,000348,096,000 (8) 4560-Parole Operations—​Adult Community-Based Programs ........................ 102,862,000 (9) 4565-Parole Operations—​Adult Administration ........................ 85,348,000 (10) 4570-Sex Offender Management Board and SARATSO Review Committee ........................ 1,419,000 (11) Reimbursements to 4500-Corrections and Rehabilitation Administration ........................ −4,812,000 (12) Reimbursements to 4505-Peace Officer Selection and Employee Development ........................ −150,000 (13) Reimbursements to 4530-Adult Corrections and Rehabilitation Operations—​General Security ........................ −65,918,000 (14) Reimbursements to 4540-Adult Corrections and Rehabilitation Operations—​Inmate Support ........................ −68,911,000 (15) Reimbursements to 4550-Adult Corrections and Rehabilitation Operations—​Institution Administration ........................ −19,999,000 (16) Reimbursements to 4555-Parole Operations—​Adult Supervision ........................ −515,000 (17) Reimbursements to 4560-Parole Operations—​Adult Community-Based Programs ........................ −500,000 (18) Reimbursements to 4565-Parole Operations—​Adult Administration ........................ −500,000 Provisions: 1. The Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation shall store all audio and video obtained through the statewide correctional video surveillance program for a period of no less than 90 days from the date recorded. Additionally, the following events shall require the department to preserve the recorded data for a longer period as potential evidence in an investigation, or an administrative, civil, or criminal proceeding: (a) Any use-of-force incident. (b) Riots. (c) Suspected felonious criminal activity. (d) Any incident resulting in serious bodily injury, great bodily injury, or a suspicious death. (e) Sexual assault allegations. (f) Allegations of staff misconduct by an incarcerated person, employee, visitor, or other person. (g) Incidents that may be potentially referred to the district attorney’s office. (h) An employee report to a supervisor of injury. The following events shall require staff to preserve the recorded data for a longer period if filed or reported within 90 days of the event: (1) Incarcerated person claims with the California Victim Compensation Board. (2) The Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation’s Office of Internal Affairs may request to review audio and video recordings when conducting an inquiry as it relates to a submitted third-level appeal. An audio or video recording that becomes evidence in a Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation’s Office of Internal Affairs investigation shall be stored until resolution of any investigation and written release by the Office of Internal Affairs, Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation’s Office of Legal Affairs, the Attorney General, or the Employment Advocacy and Prosecution Team of the Office of Legal Affairs. An audio or video recording that the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation has reason to believe may become evidence in an administrative, civil, or criminal proceeding shall be stored indefinitely unless other direction is given by the Office of Legal Affairs or, in the event of a criminal proceeding, the district attorney’s office. 2. The Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation shall utilize video obtained through the statewide correctional video surveillance program during the review of staff complaints and other serious appeals and complaints. 3. Of the amount appropriated in Schedules (4) and (5), $20,147,000 and $1,525,000 is available for the Integrated Substance Use Disorder Treatment Program, respectively. Any unencumbered balances of the amounts identified in this provision shall revert to the General Fund on June 30, 2027. 4. The Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation shall report spending on class action lawsuits against the department to the budget committees of both houses of the Legislature and the Legislative Analyst’s Office by January 31 of each year. At a minimum, this report shall include spending for each lawsuit in the most recently completed fiscal year on all litigation activities, including, but not limited to, the costs of the department’s legal staff time, payments to outside counsel for legal services, and payments to plaintiffs, monitors, and court experts. 5. The Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation shall submit an updated report to the chairpersons of the budget committees of both houses of the Legislature and the Joint Legislative Budget Committee by January 10 of each year until 2030, of the status of state-owned deactivated adult and juvenile correctional facility properties for evaluation. The report shall include an inventory of all deactivated facilities, a discussion of any functions the properties are currently serving, and projected timelines for declaring properties as surplus to the Department of General Services. 6. Of the amount specified in Schedule (6) of this item, up to $19,999,000 is specified for the purpose of the Air Cooling Pilot Program and shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2029. (a) On or before January 10, 2027, the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation shall submit to the budget committees of each house, the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, and the Legislative Analyst’s Office a report on the following: (1) The department’s current capabilities and plans to collect statewide data on temperature in housing units as well as other areas of prisons that may also require cooling, such as kitchens. (2) For the Air Cooling Pilot Program housing units, the design type, existing air cooling infrastructure, if any, and number of days with indoor temperatures exceeding 90 degrees between November 1, 2025 and October 31, 2026. (3) The number of days in Stage 1, 2, and 3 heat alerts in the prior calendar year during the reporting period of November 1, 2025 through October 31, 2026, by institution. (4) A discussion of the steps taken or planned steps, such as conducting additional engineering studies, to identify cooling options for housing units not included in the pilot. (5) A discussion of policies or practices adopted or under consideration to mitigate the effects of indoor heat in the near term. (b) On or before January 10, 2031, the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation shall submit to the budget committees of each house, the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, and the Legislative Analyst’s Office a report on the results of the pilot program and recommended statewide strategy for scaling air cooling in a timely and efficient manner. To the extent the strategy would involve deactivating housing units while air cooling is being installed, the report should discuss how the department would manage the impact to the prison population and employees. In addition, the report should include consideration of options to expedite installation. 7. Schedule (1) of this item reflects an unallocated reduction of $250,000,000 for 2026–27 $75,000,000 for the 2026–27 fiscal year for the purposes of effectuating planned savings from various operational efficiencies across the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation. To implement this plan, upon order of the Department of Finance, up to $250,000,000 $75,000,000 may be transferred between schedules in this item and the Department of Finance may order that funds be transferred between this item and schedules within other items of appropriation for the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation as follows: Items 5225-001-0001, 5225-002-0001, 5225-008-0001, 5225-009-0001, 5225-012-0001, 5225-014-0001, 5225-016-0001, 5225-025-0001, 5225-093-0001, 5225-094-0001, and 5225-101-0001. The aggregate appropriation adjustments allocated under this provision shall balance to $0. The Department of Finance shall notify the Joint Legislative Budget Committee 30 days prior to implementing any adjustments authorized under this provision. It is the intent of the Legislature that in effectuating these planned savings, no reductions shall be made, to the extent possible, to the level, quantity, or quality of rehabilitative and reentry programming, especially programs provided by community-based non-profit organizations, or of programs related to family connection, including phone calls and the frequency and duration of visitation. The administration shall first consider other reductions that do not otherwise violate a court order or jeopardize the health and safety of the staff, incarcerated persons, or the public. The Integrated Substance Use Disorder Treatment Program is not included in the category of rehabilitative or reentry programming for the purposes of this provision. 8. The Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation shall provide copies of its regular status updates on implementing the Office of the Inspector General’s Natural Disaster Emergency Preparedness and Mitigation Efforts audits to the budget and policy committees of each house, the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, and the Legislative Analyst’s Office at the same intervals the updates are provided to the Office of the Inspector General. 9. Up to $4,623,000 of the amount appropriated in Schedule (1) and up to $536,000 of the amount appropriated in Schedule (6) is available for the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation to implement the provisions of Chapter 681 of the Statutes of 2025 (AB 247). On a quarterly basis in 2026–27, the department shall submit implementation progress reports to the Department of Finance and to the relevant budget subcommittees of the Legislature in each house, the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, and the Legislative Analyst’s Office that describe, at a minimum, what steps the department took in the past quarter to implement the bill’s provisions, what steps the department plans to take in the upcoming quarter, and what obstacles remain for full implementation. 10. On or before January 10, 2027, the California Sex Offender Management Board and the State Authorized Risk Assessment Tools for Sex Offenders Review Committee shall provide a report to the relevant budget subcommittees of the Legislature in each house, the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, and the Legislative Analyst’s Office that describes how the board and committee could restructure their operations and fees, including by increasing fees above current statutory limits. The report shall, at a minimum, consider three funding plan options that, after accounting for any additional grant funds that could be obtained and cost reductions stemming from recently completed information technology projects, restructure fees so that the board and committee (1) require no ongoing General Fund support, (2) generate at least $450,000 in additional revenue annually, and (3) generate more revenue than the existing fee structure. The report shall also discuss what the effects on service levels or broader outcomes would be, if any, under each of the options considered. 11. In addition to prisons already identified for closure prior to the enactment of this act, the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation shall select a prison for closure and notify the chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee of its choice no later than November 1, 2026. The department shall close the selected prison by the end of the 2027–28 fiscal year. The department shall not undertake facility improvements at any prison that is a candidate for closure. Notwithstanding the foregoing, the department may undertake facility improvements at prisons that are candidates for closure if either (1) those improvements are minor and necessary to continue operating the prison through 2027–28 or (2) are necessary to respond to serious health, life, or safety concerns and cannot be delayed until after November 1, 2026. 12. Beginning in 2027, the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation shall submit an annual report on or before January 10 of each year to the budget committees of each house and the Legislative Analyst’s Office on midyear spending, vacancies, and salary savings. The report shall include the following: (a) An estimated projection of the amount of salary savings expected to materialize within the department in the current and upcoming fiscal years. (b) An estimated spending plan for how these projected salary savings are expected to be used. (c) For each collective bargaining unit representing its employees, the following information: (1) the number of vacant and filled authorized civil service positions, (2) the number of vacant and filled authorized temporary positions, converted to full-time equivalents (FTEs), (3) contracted staff used to backfill positions in FTEs, and (4) overtime used to backfill positions in FTEs. (d) A midyear expenditure update comparing projected and authorized spending by program for the current fiscal year. (e) Actual data on the amount of salary savings accrued in the previous fiscal year and how it was spent. (f) A discussion of the assumptions and methodology that the department used to make its projections. 13. The Department of Finance and the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation shall provide quarterly written updates to the Legislature on the contract authorized by Provision 5 of Item 8860-001-0001, Budget Act of 2025 (Chs. 4 and 5, Stats. 2025), as they relate to the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation. These updates shall be submitted in writing no later than 15 calendar days after the end of each quarter of the fiscal year to the chairpersons of the committees and appropriate subcommittees of each house of the Legislature that consider the State Budget, the chairpersons of the committees in each house of the Legislature that consider appropriations, and the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee. Updates shall be provided on both the work of the contractor itself and on any projects in affected programs or departments initiated as a result of the contract. For each workstream designated in the contract, updates shall include: (1) the primary activities accomplished in the most recent quarter, (2) any significant changes in activities or timelines relative to the last quarterly report, and (3) an overview of planned activities and time lines for the upcoming quarter. The updates shall also include plans to achieve $100,000,000 in assumed future savings and a summary of all recommendations and areas explored as part of the contract, including recommendations not taken by the department. These quarterly updates shall continue throughout implementation of any projects initiated as a result of the contract. 5225-001-0890—For support of Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, payable from the Federal Trust Fund ........................ 1,647,000 Schedule: (1) 4500-Corrections and Rehabilitation Administration ........................ 45,000 (2) 4530-Adult Corrections and Rehabilitation Operations—​General Security ........................ 26,000 (3) 4540-Adult Corrections and Rehabilitation Operations—​Inmate Support ........................ 500,000 (4) 4550-Adult Corrections and Rehabilitation Operations—​Institution Administration ........................ 436,000 (5) 4555-Parole Operations—​Adult Supervision ........................ 41,000 (6) 4565-Parole Operations—​Adult Administration ........................ 599,000 5225-001-0917—For support of Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, payable from the Inmate Welfare Fund of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation ........................ 114,349,000 Schedule: (1) 4500-Corrections and Rehabilitation Administration ........................ 1,000,000 (2) 4595-Rehabilitative Programs—​Adult Inmate Activities ........................ 113,349,000 Provisions: 1. Upon approval of the Department of Finance, the amount available for expenditure in Schedule (2) may be increased by up to 5 percent of the total amount available for expenditure to allow the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation to provide for the benefit and welfare of incarcerated persons within prisons and institutions under its jurisdiction. 5225-002-0001—For support of Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation ........................ 4,205,602,000 Schedule: (1) 4650-Medical Services—​Adult ........................ 2,773,677,000 (2) 4655-Dental Services—​Adult ........................ 181,424,000 (3) 4660-Mental Health Services—​Adult ........................ 763,286,000 (4) 4665-Ancillary Health Care Services—​Adult ........................ 476,355,000 (5) 4670-Dental and Mental Health Services Administration—​Adult ........................ 80,454,000 (6) Reimbursements to 4650-Medical Services—​Adult ........................ −53,971,000 (6.5) Reimbursements to 4660-Mental Health Services—​Adult ........................ −1,232,000 (7) Reimbursements to 4665-Ancillary Health Care Services—​Adult ........................ −13,400,000 (8) Reimbursements to 4670-Dental and Mental Health Services Administration—​Adult ........................ −991,000 Provisions: 1. On February 14, 2006, the United States District Court in the case of Plata v. Newsom (No. C01-1351-JST) suspended the exercise by the Secretary of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation of all powers related to the administration, control, management, operation, and financing of the California prison medical health care system. The court ordered that all such powers vested in the Secretary of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation were to be performed by a Receiver appointed by the court commencing April 17, 2006, until further order of the court. The Undersecretary of Health Care Services of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation is to administer this item to the extent directed by the Receiver. 2. Notwithstanding any other law, the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation is not required to competitively bid for health services contracts in cases in which contracting experience or history indicates that only one qualified bid will be received. 3. Notwithstanding Section 13324 of the Government Code or Section 32.00 of this act, a state employee shall not be held personally liable for any expenditure or the creation of any indebtedness in excess of the amounts appropriated therefor as a result of complying with the directions of the Receiver or orders of the United States District Court in Plata v. Newsom. 4. The amounts appropriated in Schedules (1) and (4) are available for expenditure by the Receiver appointed by the Plata v. Newsom court to carry out its mission to deliver constitutionally adequate medical care to the incarcerated population. 5. The amount appropriated in Schedule (2) is available for expenditure by the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation to provide dental services. The amount appropriated in Schedule (5) is available for expenditure by the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, only to the extent related to the provision of dental services. 6. Of the amounts appropriated in Schedules (1) and (4), $138,057,000 and $70,241,000 are available for the Integrated Substance Use Disorder Treatment Program, respectively. Any unencumbered balances of the amounts identified in this provision shall revert to the General Fund on June 30, 2027. 7. The amount appropriated in Schedule (4) reflects a reduction of $13,923,000 $10,315,000 based on estimated abatement amounts that will be received by the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation from the Pharmaceutical Fiscal Intermediary. Notwithstanding any other law, upon order of the Department of Finance, the amount in Schedule (4) may be adjusted to align with actual or estimated abatement amounts that are received or projected to be received from the Pharmaceutical Fiscal Intermediary and to meet cashflow needs resulting from the delay in receipt of abatement amounts. To the extent an adjustment is made pursuant to this provision related to cashflow needs, the Department of Finance may order subsequent adjustments to the amount in Schedule (4) of this item consistent with receipt of abatement amounts. 8. The Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation shall provide biannual reporting to the Legislature on abatements received and adjustments made pursuant to Provision 7 by July 31 and January 31 of each year, beginning July 31, 2025, through January 1, 2028. 9. The Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation shall work in collaboration with other state agencies, community-based service providers, and other stakeholders as determined by the department, to develop a report focused on alternatives to incarceration for individuals who are advanced in age, disabled, or have significant medical needs. Alternatives may include identifying community correctional reentry centers, Medi-Cal offset possibilities, and the development of new community-based programs, among other alternatives as determined by the department. The report may also identify potential changes the department has or is considering to existing programs, such as the compassionate release, medical parole, and elderly parole programs, to the extent any changes are considered, and any limitations to changes considered. The alternatives shall address the growing number of incarcerated individuals who are advanced in age, disabled, or have significant medical needs. In evaluating the alternatives, the department shall assess the potential to reduce departmental costs, provide the appropriate treatment settings required, challenges faced, and recommendations for accompanying statutory or policy changes that would facilitate the alternatives explored. The department shall provide the report to the Legislature on or before March 1, 2026. 10. The reports required by Provision 9 of this item shall be submitted to the Legislature pursuant to Section 9795 of the Government Code. 11. The amount appropriated in Schedules (1) and (4) incorporates General Fund offsets of $5,000,000 and $6,000,000, respectively, based on anticipated federal reimbursements for the California Advancing and Innovating Medi-Cal Justice Involved Initiative (CalAIM). Notwithstanding any other law, upon order of the Department of Finance, the amounts available in Schedules (1) and (4) of this item may be adjusted to align with actual or estimated reimbursement amounts under CalAIM. 12. On August 27, 2025, the United States District Court in the case of Coleman v. Newsom (No. 2:90-cv-00520-KJM-SCR) suspended the exercise by the Secretary of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation of all powers related to the administration, control, management, operation, and financing of the California prison Mental Health Services Delivery System. The court ordered that all such powers vested in the Secretary of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation were to be performed by a Receiver appointed by the court commencing September 1, 2025, until further order of the court. The Undersecretary of Health Care Services of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation is to administer this item to the extent directed by the Receiver. 13. Notwithstanding any other law, the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation is not required to competitively bid for mental health care contracts in cases in which contracting experience or history indicates that only one qualified bid will be received. 14. Notwithstanding Section 13324 of the Government Code or Section 32.00 of this act, a state employee shall not be held personally liable for any expenditure or the creation of any indebtedness in excess of the amounts appropriated therefor as a result of complying with the directions of the Receiver or orders of the United States District Court in Coleman v. Newsom. 15. The amount appropriated in Schedule (3) is available for expenditure by the Receiver appointed by the Coleman v. Newsom court to carry out its mission to deliver constitutionally adequate mental health services to the incarcerated population, in accordance with the Amended Order Setting Out Powers and Duties of Receiver issued September 5, 2025 and as may be amended by the court. 16. The amount appropriated in Schedule (5) is available, only to the extent related to the provision of mental health services, for expenditure by the Receiver appointed by the Coleman v. Newsom court to carry out its mission to deliver constitutionally adequate mental health services to the incarcerated population, in accordance with the Amended Order Setting Out Powers and Duties of Receiver issued September 5, 2025, and as may be amended by the court. 17. The Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation shall provide a report to the relevant budget subcommittees of the Legislature in each house, the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, and Legislative Analyst’s Office by January 10, 2028, on the impact of tele-mental health programs at state prisons. The report shall include (1) the impact of tele-mental health expansion on the recruitment of on-site staff; (2) an evaluation on whether the tele-mental health program has affected the department’s use of contract registry positions; (3) an evaluation of the overall fiscal impacts of tele-mental health programs, including, but not limited to, the costs of additional equipment and staff positions; (4) a description of how the department allocates tele-mental health positions, including, but not limited to, what criteria or thresholds it uses to expand tele-mental health at a particular prison; and (5) a plan on how to more efficiently allocate tele-mental health positions. 18. By November 1, 2026, the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation and the Office of the Coleman Receiver shall provide a report annually to the relevant budget subcommittees of the Legislature in each house, the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, and Legislative Analyst’s Office on progress made towards implementing the Receiver’s Action Plan in the Coleman v. Newsom case, any challenges to implementation, and newly identified substantive deficiencies or changes to the plan. The report shall include a summary of the new resources made available to serve the mental health prison population, a summary of new initiatives, and outcomes and data on the effectiveness of new programs or resources. This report shall cover additional resources provided in this act, including, but not limited to: crisis intervention teams, resource teams, pay differentials and bonuses, and additional mental health staffing. For each of these new resources or programs, the department shall report relevant outcome data including, but not limited to, changes in vacancy rates; number of avoided referrals to higher levels of care; estimates of the savings generated; changes in violence, rules violation, suicide watch hours, rates of self-harm, or rates of suicide; and additional outcome data determined by the department and the Receiver to be relevant. 19. The Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation shall provide a report no later than January 10, 2027, to the relevant budget subcommittees of the Legislature in each house, the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, and Legislative Analyst’s Office on the feasibility of consolidating high-need populations in order to consolidate and streamline service delivery and improve the ability to recruit and retain necessary civil service staff. This report shall focus on individuals who are advanced in age, disabled, or have significant medical or mental health needs. This report shall (1) identify trends in civil service medical and mental health vacancy rates by prison in the past 5 years; (2) consider whether the civil service medical and mental health care vacancy rates at each prison are temporary or affected by unique factors; (3) determine which facilities are consistently the easiest to recruit and retain civil service medical and mental health care staff; (4) provide feasible options as to how the state could consolidate the specified populations at prisons where it is easiest to recruit and retain civil service medical and mental health care staff; (5) consider what the security, rehabilitation, or other challenges would be of consolidating the specified populations at these prisons: prisons; (6) provide additional options for consolidating the specified populations that assume patients requiring in-person care are consolidated at prisons where it is easiest to recruit and retain in-person civil service providers while patients who can be treated by tele-health providers are housed elsewhere; and (7) estimate the cost of consolidating the specified populations and include any construction projects that may be necessary for each option. The report may include additional relevant information as determined by the department. 20. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (1) of Item 5225-002-0001, up to $2,200,000 is available for the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation to implement artificial intelligence notetaking capabilities for the department’s electronic health record system. On a quarterly basis in the 2026–27 fiscal year, the department shall submit implementation progress reports to the Department of Finance and to the relevant budget subcommittees of the Legislature in each house, the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, and Legislative Analyst’s Office, describing, at a minimum, what steps the department took in the past quarter to implement this change, what steps the department plans to take in the upcoming quarter, and what obstacles remain for full implementation. The department shall also report, by January 10, 2028, on (1) how often this new technology is being used; (2) efficiencies or improvements from this deployment, including estimated cost savings; (3) estimates of staff time saved from its use; and (4) policies in place to ensure that patients have consented to the use of artificial intelligence technology and to ensure the accuracy of the medical record. 5225-008-0001—For support of Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation ........................ 633,974,000 Schedule: (1) 4560-Parole Operations—​Adult Community-Based Programs ........................ 173,591,000 (2) 4585-Rehabilitative Programs—​Adult Education ........................ 270,322,000 (3) 4590-Rehabilitative Programs—​Cognitive Behavioral Therapy and Reentry Services ........................ 212,763,000 (4) 4600-Rehabilitative Programs—​Adult Administration ........................ 30,085,000 (5) Reimbursements to 4560-Parole Operations—​Adult Community-Based Programs ........................ −44,583,000 (6) Reimbursements to 4585-Rehabilitative Programs—​Adult Education ........................ −8,204,000 Provisions: 1. The funds appropriated in this item shall be used only to support rehabilitation programs for incarcerated and supervised individuals. Any unencumbered funds at the end of the 2026–27 fiscal year shall revert to the General Fund on June 30, 2027. 2. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (3), $5,000,000 shall be provided for the California Reentry and Enrichment Grant Program to provide grants to community-based organizations that provide rehabilitative services to incarcerated individuals. 3. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (1) of this item, $12,900,000 is for support of the Returning Home Well program. The funding for this program shall not supplant existing funding for Specialized Treatment for Optimized Programming. Notwithstanding any other law, contracts or grants awarded or amended to support the Returning Home Well program are exempt from the Public Contract Code and the State Contracting Manual, and are not subject to the approval of the Department of General Services. Consistent with Provision 3 of Item 5225-008-0001, Budget Act of 2022 (Chs. 43, 45, and 249, Stats. 2022), on or before March 1, 2026, the department shall provide the Legislature a report on the Returning Home Well program. The report shall include, for each quarter the program is in operation, a description of how the housing need was determined, how many individuals were released from prison to parole with an identified housing need, the number of unique participants served, the average number of days spent in the program, and the actual costs of the program. The report shall also include, for program participants, data on housing status after leaving the program, return to prison rates, reconviction rates, and arrest rates. The report may include additional relevant outcomes, metrics, or information as determined by the department. 4. Of the amounts appropriated in Schedules (3) and (4), $54,633,000 and $738,000 are available for the Integrated Substance Use Disorder Treatment Program, respectively. Any unencumbered balances of the amounts identified in this provision shall revert to the General Fund on June 30, 2027. 5. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (3) of this item, $1,950,000 shall be available to transform and expand the Pine Grove Youth Conservation Camp in the County of Amador into a camp that also promotes rehabilitation and life skills. The amount identified in this provision shall be available to expand the Pine Grove Youth Conservation Camp in the County of Amador for additional qualifying participants, and for providing mental health care services, life skills support, peer-to-peer mentorship, life coaches, support groups based on cognitive-behavioral principles, prosocial peer support, and robust reentry preparation support, which includes, but is not limited to, connecting reentering members of society to housing, GED programs, higher education, and career development programs that lead to meaningful employment. The amount identified in this provision shall only be available to nongovernmental organizations that have experience working with formerly or currently incarcerated youth and young adults as well as reentry populations. These organizations shall also have experience providing career development services to formerly or currently incarcerated youth or young adults. 6. The Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation shall provide an annual report to the Legislature, on or before January 10 of each year, related to expansion of community correctional reentry centers as defined in Chapter 9.5 (commencing with Section 6250) of Title 7 of Part 3 of the Penal Code, including funds expended, additional capacity planned and achieved, and challenges to expansion. The report shall also include a plan to introduce annual cost-of-living adjustments into future contracts to operationally and financially sustain existing community correctional reentry facilities. 7. It is the intent of the Legislature that the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation maximize Medi-Cal reimbursements whenever possible. On or before January 10, 2027, the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation shall submit a report on the status and steps taken pursuant to the plan submitted to the Legislature in response to Provision 10 of Item 5225-008-0001 of the Budget Act of 2024 (Chs. 22, 35, and 994, Stats. 2024), to leverage Medi-Cal, where possible, for Specialized Treatment for Optimized Programming (STOP) services. The report shall provide a status update on the approach outlined in the plan, including monitoring direct referrals to Medi-Cal services for STOP participants. This report shall be submitted to the budget committees of each house, the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, and the Legislative Analyst’s Office. 5225-009-0001—For support of Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation ........................ 75,908,000 Schedule: (1) 4575-Board of Parole Hearings—​Adult Hearings ........................ 63,746,000 (2) 4580-Board of Parole Hearings—​Administration ........................ 12,254,000 (3) Reimbursements to 4575-Board of Parole Hearings—​Adult Hearings ........................ −92,000 5225-012-0001—For support of Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, for Institution Maintenance and Plant Operations ........................ 70,393,000 Schedule: (1) 4540-Adult Corrections and Rehabilitation Operations—​Inmate Support ........................ 70,393,000 5225-014-0001—For support of Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation ........................ 27,299,000 Schedule: (1) 4500-Corrections and Rehabilitation Administration ........................ 27,299,000 Provisions: 1. These funds are available for the purpose of providing free voice calling to incarcerated individuals consistent with Chapter 827 of the Statutes of 2022 (SB 1008). Notwithstanding any other law, upon order of the Department of Finance, this item may be augmented or reduced based on actual or estimated expenditure data to support free voice calling for incarcerated persons. 5225-016-0001—For support of Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation ........................ 5,000,000 Schedule: (1) 4590-Rehabilitative Programs - Cognitive Behavioral Therapy and Reentry Services ........................ 5,000,000 Provisions: 1. The amount appropriated in this item shall be available for the Anti-Recidivism Coalition to support operation of the Hope and Redemption Team program to provide rehabilitative programming and reentry support to incarcerated people during and after incarceration. This amount shall be available for state operations or local assistance. 5225-017-0001—For support of Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation ........................ 20,000,000 Schedule: (1) 4590-Rehabilitative Programs-Cognitive Behavioral Therapy and Reentry Services ........................ 20,000,000 Provisions: 1. The funds appropriated in this item shall be available for state operations or local assistance, and shall be used to establish the Rehabilitative Investment Grants for Healing and Transformation (RIGHT) Grant 4.0 to support community-based, nonprofit organizations for the purpose of delivering trauma-informed, rehabilitative, and restorative justice programming in California prisons. RIGHT Grant 4.0 funds shall not be used for the provision of college educational programming. This funding may be used to sustain or expand currently existing programs. To the extent the organizations seek to utilize funds to provide a new program in institutions where the program is not currently offered, or to significantly expand a currently existing program, the organization must receive approval from the warden of the applicable institution. This funding shall be allocated by the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation to each organization that meets the following requirements: (1) the organization is in good standing as a 501(c)(3) nonprofit community-based organization or is a nonprofit community-based organization that is fiscally sponsored by a fiscal agent with nonprofit status, (2) the organization has a preexisting record of providing in-prison rehabilitative programming within the department during at least two of the five years preceding their application, and (3) the organization is providing an existing rehabilitative program. Fiscal agents may receive multiple full grants on behalf of multiple fiscally sponsored organizations. The department shall post the notice by October 1, 2026, and applications shall be submitted within 60 days from the date posted. Following receipt of applications, the department shall determine eligibility and provide notice to organizations regarding their eligibility determination within 90 days. In all cases where a program is determined to not meet the eligibility requirements, the department shall offer a 30-day window in which the organization may resubmit their proposed program for a possible later determination of eligibility. After this 30-day period, the department shall then issue grant funds to eligible grantees within 90 days. 2. Individual grant amounts shall be subject to the total number of qualifying applications that are received by the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation. 3. No more than 3 percent of the amount appropriated in this item may be used by the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation to administer this grant. 4. Qualifying organizations shall be awarded grants based on their current organizational budget, or the average budget of the last two years, whichever is greater, as follows: (a) Organizations with budgets under $250,000 shall be awarded one qualifying point. (b) Organizations with budgets between $250,000 and $500,000, inclusive, shall be awarded two qualifying points. (c) Organizations with budgets above $500,000 shall be awarded three qualifying points. 5. Priority shall be given in underserved institutions, including women’s institutions, as follows: organizations applying to provide existing programs in underserved institutions may be awarded an additional one-half point. The Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation shall provide a list of underserved institutions defined by a lack of community-based programming services available relative to other institutions. Priority shall also be given to programs serving special populations, including women’s prisons, restricted housing units, and enhanced outpatient programs/mental health crisis beds, and programs offered in languages other than English, as follows: organizations applying to provide programs to these special populations may be awarded an additional one-half point. The department shall provide a list of special population locations, which shall include women’s prisons, in the Request for Funding (RFP). No more than two half-points (totaling one additional point) may be awarded to an organization. 6. The total funding available shall be divided by the total points awarded to all applicants as specified above, resulting in a dollar amount for each point. Each qualifying organization shall then receive the value of the total points that organization was awarded based on the size of their annual budget and additional proposed programming options. All of the funds available shall be distributed based on this system. 7. The funds appropriated in this item are available for encumbrance and expenditure until December 1, 2029. Each grant recipient shall submit to the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation a report that details the expenditures of their grant, including a summary of how the resources enhanced their ability to deliver in-prison programming, by December 1, 2030. The department may require of all funded organizations an annual report detailing the use of the funds by each recipient. 8. The Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation shall submit a report to the budget committees of each house of the Legislature no later than April 1, 2029, detailing how the funds for the RIGHT Grant 4.0 program were distributed and how they were spent by recipients. The report shall include copies of all reports submitted by all organizations receiving RIGHT Grant 4.0 funds. 5225-025-0001—For support of Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation ........................ 538,000 Schedule: (1) 4530-Adult Corrections and Rehabilitation Operations—​General Security ........................ 538,000 5225-093-0001—For support of Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, for rental payments on lease-revenue bonds ........................ 290,817,000 Schedule: (1) 4540-Adult Corrections and Rehabilitation Operations—​Inmate Support ........................ 290,817,000 Provisions: 1. The Controller shall transfer funds appropriated in this item for base rental as and when provided for in the schedule submitted by the State Public Works Board. Notwithstanding the payment dates in any related Facility Lease or Indenture, the schedule may provide for an earlier transfer of funds to ensure debt requirements are met and pay base rental in full when due. 2. The Controller shall transfer for additional rental no later than 30 days after enactment of this budget, $3,109,000 of the amount appropriated in this item, to the Expense Account in the Public Buildings Construction Fund. 3. This item may be adjusted pursuant to Section 4.30. Any adjustments to this item shall be reported to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee pursuant to Section 4.30. 5225-094-0001—For support of Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, for rental payments on lease-revenue bonds ........................ 106,037,000 Schedule: (2) 4540-Adult Corrections and Rehabilitation Operations—​Inmate Support ........................ 106,037,000 Provisions: 1. The Controller shall transfer funds appropriated in this item for base rental as and when provided for in the schedule submitted by the State Public Works Board. Notwithstanding the payment dates in any related Facility Lease or Indenture, the schedule may provide for an earlier transfer of funds to ensure debt requirements are met and pay base rental in full when due. 2. The Controller shall transfer for additional rental no later than 30 days after enactment of this budget, $1,150,000 of the amount appropriated in this item, to the Expense Account in the Public Buildings Construction Fund. 3. This item may be adjusted pursuant to Section 4.30. Any adjustments to this item shall be reported to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee pursuant to Section 4.30. 5225-101-0001—For local assistance, Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation ........................ 51,282,000 Schedule: (1) 4550014-Transportation of Prisoners ........................ 278,000 (2) 4550018-Return of Fugitives from Justice ........................ 2,593,000 (3) 4550019-County Charges ........................ 48,311,000 (4) 4550020-Juvenile Charges ........................ 100,000 Provisions: 1. The amounts appropriated in Schedules (1), (2), (3), and (4) are provided for the following purposes: (a) To pay the transportation costs of prisoners to and between state prisons, including the return of parole violators to prison and for the conveying of persons under provisions of the Western Interstate Corrections Compact (Section 11190 of the Penal Code), in accordance with Section 26749 of the Government Code. Claims filed by local jurisdictions shall be filed within six months after the end of the month in which those transportation costs are incurred. Expenditures shall be charged to either the fiscal year in which the claim is received by the Controller or the fiscal year in which the warrant is issued by the Controller. Claims filed by local jurisdictions directly with the Controller may be paid by the Controller. (b) To pay the expenses of returning fugitives from justice from outside the state, in accordance with Sections 1389, 1549, and 1557 of the Penal Code. Claims filed by local jurisdictions shall be filed within six months after the end of the month in which expenses are incurred. Expenditures shall be charged to either the fiscal year in which the claim is received by the Controller or the fiscal year in which the warrant is issued by the Controller, and any restitution received by the state for those expenses shall be credited to the appropriation of the year in which the Controller’s receipt is issued. Claims filed by local jurisdictions directly with the Controller may be paid by the Controller. (c) To pay county charges, payable under Sections 4700.1, 4750 to 4758, inclusive, and 6005 of the Penal Code. Claims shall be filed by local jurisdictions within six months after the end of the month in which the costs were incurred for a service performed by the coroner, a hearing held on the return of a writ of habeas corpus, the district attorney declining to prosecute a case referred by the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, a judgment rendered for a court hearing or trial, an appeal ruling rendered for the trial judgment, or an activity performed as permitted by these sections. Expenditures shall be charged to either the fiscal year in which the claim is received by the Controller or the fiscal year in which the warrant is issued by the Controller. Claims filed by local jurisdictions directly with the Controller may be paid by the Controller. (d) To pay county charges associated with instances in which an individual who is under 18 years of age is convicted of an offense in superior court and sentenced to state prison, but remains in a county juvenile facility until the individual reaches 18 years of age and may be transferred to state prison, payable under Section 1955.2 of the Welfare and Institutions Code. Claims filed by local jurisdictions shall be filed within six months after the end of the month in which final expenses are incurred. Expenditures shall be charged to either the fiscal year in which the claim is received by the Controller or the fiscal year in which the warrant is issued by the Controller. Claims filed by local jurisdictions directly with the Controller may be paid by the Controller. Notwithstanding any other law, upon order of the Department of Finance, this amount may be augmented by an amount necessary to cover county charges associated with applicable individuals. 5225-301-0001—For capital outlay, Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation ........................ 9,210,000 Schedule: (1) 0012927-California Health Care Facility, Stockton: Potable Water Treatment System ........................ 6,570,000 (a) Construction ........................ 6,570,000 (2) 0014598-Valley State Prison, Chowchilla: New Potable Water Wells ........................ 1,561,000 (a) Working drawings ........................ 1,561,000 (3) 0016296-Correctional Training Facility, Soledad: New Potable Water Well ........................ 1,079,000 (a) Preliminary plans ........................ 1,079,000 5225-490—Reappropriation, Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation. The amounts specified in the following citations are reappropriated for the purposes provided for in those appropriations and shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2027: 0001—​General Fund (1) Up to $14,100,000 in Schedule (6) of Item 5225-001-0001, Budget Act of 2025 (Chs. 4 and 5, Stats. 2025) to complete fire alarm replacements at California State Prison, Solano and the California Substance Abuse Treatment Facility. (2) Up to $19,000,000 in Schedule (7) of Item 5225-001-0001, Budget Act of 2020 (Chs. 6 and 7, Stats. 2020), as reappropriated by Item 5225-490, Budget Act of 2021 (Chs. 21, 69, and 240, Stats. 2021) to complete fire alarm replacement and fire suppression system repair at Mule Creek State Prison and Richard J. Donovan Correctional Facility. 5225-493—Reappropriation, Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation. Notwithstanding any other law, the period to liquidate encumbrances of the following citations is extended to June 30, 2027: 0001—​General Fund (1) Up to $8,000,000 in Item 5225-001-0001, Budget Act of 2021 (Chs. 21, 69, and 240, Stats. 2021). 5225-494—Reappropriation, Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation. The amount specified in the following citation is reappropriated for the purpose provided for in that appropriation and shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2027: 0001—General Fund (1) Up to $2,000,000 in Item 5225-026-0001, Budget Act of 2025 (Chs. 4 and 5, Stats. 2025). 5227-001-0001—For support of Board of State and Community Corrections ........................ 23,165,000 Schedule: (1) 4940-Administration, Research and Program Support ........................ 8,003,000 (2) 4945-Corrections Planning and Grant Programs ........................ 2,471,000 (3) 4950-Local Facility Standards and Operations ........................ 6,185,000 (4) 4952-In-Custody Death Review Division ........................ 5,314,000 (5) 4965-County Facility Construction ........................ 1,192,000 5227-001-0890—For support of Board of State and Community Corrections, payable from the Federal Trust Fund ........................ 4,354,000 Schedule: (1) 4945-Corrections Planning and Grant Programs ........................ 4,354,000 5227-002-0001—For support of Board of State and Community Corrections ........................ 3,023,000 Schedule: (1) 4955-Standards and Training for Local Corrections ........................ 3,023,000 5227-004-0001—For support of Board of State and Community Corrections ........................ 86,000 Schedule: (1) 4945-Corrections Planning and Grant Programs ........................ 86,000 5227-093-0001—For support of Board of State and Community Corrections, for rental payments on lease-revenue bonds ........................ 51,097,000 Schedule: (1) 4940-Administration, Research and Program Support ........................ 51,097,000 Provisions: 1. The Controller shall transfer funds appropriated in this item for base rental as and when provided for in the schedule submitted by the State Public Works Board. Notwithstanding the payment dates in any related facility lease or indenture, the schedule may provide for an earlier transfer of funds to ensure debt requirements are met and pay base rental in full when due. 2. The Controller shall transfer for additional rental no later than 30 days after enactment of this budget, $509,000 of the amount appropriated in this item, to the Expense Account in the Public Buildings Construction Fund. 3. This item may be adjusted pursuant to Section 4.30. Any adjustments to this item shall be reported to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee pursuant to Section 4.30. 5227-101-0890—For local assistance, Board of State and Community Corrections, payable from the Federal Trust Fund ........................ 59,139,000 Schedule: (1) 4945-Corrections Planning and Grant Programs ........................ 59,139,000 5227-102-0001—For local assistance, Board of State and Community Corrections ........................ 20,970,000 Schedule: (1) 4955-Standards and Training for Local Corrections ........................ 20,970,000 Provisions: 1. Notwithstanding any other law, to receive state aid pursuant to this item, a city, county, or city and county shall apply to the Board of State and Community Corrections. The initial application shall be accompanied by a certified copy of an ordinance adopted by the governing body providing that, while receiving any state aid pursuant to this item, the city, county, or city and county shall adhere to the standards for selection and training established by the board. The application shall contain the information required by the board. 2. The Board of State and Community Corrections shall annually allocate and the Treasurer shall periodically pay from the General Fund, at intervals specified by the board, to each city, county, and city and county that has applied and qualified for aid pursuant to this item an amount determined by the board pursuant to standards set forth in its regulations. The board shall not make an allocation to a city, county, or city and county that does not comply with the selection and training standards established by the board as applicable to that city, county, or city and county. 5227-103-0001—For local assistance, Board of State and Community Corrections ........................ 37,000,000 Schedule: (1) 4945-Corrections Planning and Grant Programs ........................ 37,000,000 Provisions: 1. Funds appropriated in this item shall be awarded by the Board of State and Community Corrections as competitive grants to community-based organizations to support offenders formerly incarcerated in state prison. Of this amount: (a) $18,500,000 shall be available for rental assistance. Priority shall be given to individuals released to state parole. (b) $18,500,000 shall be available to support the warm handoff and reentry of offenders transitioning from state prison to communities. Priority shall be given to individuals released to state parole. (c) The Board of State and Community Corrections shall form an executive steering committee with members from relevant state agencies and departments with expertise in public health, housing, workforce development, and effective rehabilitative treatment for adult offenders, including, but not limited to, the Department of Housing and Community Development, the Office of Health Equity, county probation departments, representatives of reentry-focused community-based organizations, criminal justice impacted individuals, and representatives of housing focused community-based organizations to develop grant program criteria and make recommendations to the board regarding grant award decisions. 2. Of the amount appropriated in this item, up to 5 percent shall be available for transfer to Item 5227-001-0001 for administrative costs. Funds transferred pursuant to this provision are available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2031. 3. Funds appropriated in this item are available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2031. 5227-106-0001—For local assistance, Board of State and Community Corrections ........................ 1,100,000 Schedule: (1) 4945-Corrections Planning and Grant Programs ........................ 1,100,000 Provisions: 1. Of the amount appropriated in this item, $1,100,000 shall be available for the Board of State and Community Corrections to distribute to Impact Justice for the Menopause Project to improve access to menopause education and clinical care for aging incarcerated women. 2. Funds appropriated in this item are available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2028. 5227-107-0001—For local assistance, Board of State and Community Corrections ........................ 5,500,000 Schedule: (1) 4945-Corrections Planning and Grant Programs ........................ 5,500,000 Provisions: 1. The amount appropriated in this item shall be available to the Board of State and Community Corrections to distribute to Uncommon Law to implement its Home After Harm program at the California Institution for Women and the Central California Women’s Facility. 2. Funds appropriated in this item are available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2029. 5227-108-0001—For local assistance, Board of State and Community Corrections ........................ 6,000,000 Schedule: (1) 4945-Corrections Planning and Grant Programs ........................ 6,000,000 Provisions: 1. The amount appropriated in this item shall be available for the Board of State and Community Corrections to distribute to the Sister Warriors Freedom Coalition to support efforts to reduce sexual abuse, retaliation, and violence in Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation women’s prisons. 2. Of the total amount appropriated in this item, $2,500,000 may be subgranted by the Sister Warriors Freedom Coalition to relevant community-based organizations whose primary purpose is to support the rehabilitation and legal rights of incarcerated women in the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, in furtherance of the goals described in Provision 1. 3. Permissible uses of the funds appropriated in this item include, but are not limited to, staffing, legal visits, travel, and other activities related to the goals described in Provision 1. Up to 10 percent of the total funds may be used to support activities intended to promote wellness and reduce work-related stress and trauma for staff and volunteers of the Sister Warriors Freedom Coalition or its subgrantees. 4. A report on expenditures of the funds appropriated in this item, including a summary of outcomes and subgrants, shall be submitted to the Board of State and Community Corrections by December 31, 2030. 5. Funds appropriated in this item are available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2030. 5227-109-0001—For local assistance, Board of State and Community Corrections ........................ 20,000 Schedule: (1) 4945-Corrections Planning and Grant Programs ........................ 20,000 Provisions: 1. The amount appropriated in this item shall be available to the Board of State and Community Corrections to distribute to the Los Angeles County Sheriff’s Department for the Vital Intervention Directional Alternatives Program. 2. Funds appropriated in this item are available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2028. 5227-110-0001—For local assistance, Board of State and Community Corrections ........................ 3,000,000 Schedule: (1) 4945-Corrections Planning and Grants Programs ........................ 3,000,000 Provisions: 1. The amount appropriated in this item shall be available to the Board of State and Community Corrections to support the Broken by Violence program for community-based gun violence prevention strategies. 2. Funds appropriated in this item are available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2028. 5227-122-0001—For local assistance, Board of State and Community Corrections ........................ 10,000,00015,000,000 Schedule: (1) 4945-Corrections Planning and Grant Programs ........................ 10,000,00015,000,000 Provisions: 1. These funds shall be awarded by the Board of State and Community Corrections as competitive grants to federally recognized Indian tribes in California to support efforts to identify, collect case-level data, publicize, and investigate and solve cases involving missing and murdered indigenous people. The Board shall consult with and include stakeholders from the indigenous community to inform the grant outreach process and the process to select and administer grants. 2. Grants should focus on activities including, but not limited to, developing culturally based prevention strategies, strengthening responses to human trafficking, and improving cooperation and communication on jurisdictional issues between state, local, federal, and tribal law enforcement to investigate and solve cases involving missing and murdered indigenous people. Allowable expenditures may include reimbursement to eligible tribes for contracted services with local law enforcement agencies for staffing in support of eligible grant activities. 3. Of the amount identified in this item, up to 5 percent shall be available for transfer to Item 5227-001-0001 for administrative costs. Funds transferred pursuant to this provision are available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2032. 4. Funds appropriated in this item are available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2032. 5. The Board of State and Community Corrections shall provide a report to the relevant policy and fiscal committees of the Legislature by December 31, 2031, that includes, but is not limited to, information about the grant recipients, the allocation of funds, and applicable metrics and outcomes of the program. 5227-490—Reappropriation, Board of State and Community Corrections. Notwithstanding any other law, the period to liquidate encumbrances of the following citations is extended to June 30, 2028: 0001—​General Fund (1) Item 5227-110-0001, Budget Act of 2018 (Chs. 29 and 30, Stats. 2018), as reappropriated by Item 5227-492, Budget Act of 2023 (Chs. 12, 38, and 129, Stats. 2023), appropriated for building rehabilitation. EDUCATION 6100-001-0001—For support of State Department of Education ........................ 121,032,000 Schedule: (1) 5205010-Curriculum Services ........................ 86,600,000 (1.5) 5210048-After School Programs ........................ 1,604,000 (2) 5210066-Special Program Support ........................ 42,138,000 (3) 9900100-Administration ........................ 60,447,000 (4) 9900200-Administration—​Distributed ........................ −60,447,000 (5) Reimbursements to 5205010-Curriculum Services ........................ −8,341,000 (6) Reimbursements to 5210066-Special Program Support ........................ −969,000 Provisions: 1. Notwithstanding Section 33190 of the Education Code or any other law, the State Department of Education shall not expend funds to prepare a statewide summary of pupil performance on school district proficiency assessments or a compilation of information on private schools with five or fewer pupils. 2. Funds appropriated in this item may be expended or encumbered to make one or more payments under a personal services contract of a visiting educator pursuant to Section 19050.8 of the Government Code, a long-term special consultant services contract, or an employment contract between an entity that is not a state agency and a person who is under the direct or daily supervision of a state agency, only if all of the following conditions are met: (a) The person providing service under the contract provides full financial disclosure to the Fair Political Practices Commission in accordance with the rules and regulations of the commission. (b) The service provided under the contract does not result in the displacement of any represented civil service employee. (c) The rate of compensation for salary and health benefits for the person providing service under the contract does not exceed by more than 10 percent the current rate of compensation for salary and health benefits determined by the Department of Human Resources for civil service personnel in a comparable position. The payment of any other compensation or any reimbursement for travel or per diem expenses shall be in accordance with the State Administrative Manual and the rules and regulations of the California Victim Compensation Board. 3. The funds appropriated in this item shall not be expended for the development or dissemination of program advisories, including, but not limited to, program advisories on the subject areas of reading, writing, and mathematics, unless explicitly authorized by the State Board of Education. 4. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $206,000 shall be available as matching funds for the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation to provide coordinated services to disabled pupils. 5. By October 31 of each year, the State Department of Education shall provide to the Department of Finance a file of all charter school average daily attendance (ADA) and state and local revenue associated with charter school general purpose entitlements as part of the P2 Local Control Funding Formula File. By March 1 of each year, the State Department of Education shall provide to the Department of Finance a file of all charter school ADA and state and local revenue associated with charter school general purpose entitlements as part of the P1 Local Control Funding Formula File. It is the expectation that such reports will be provided annually. 6. On or before April 15 of each year, the State Department of Education shall provide to the Department of Finance an electronic file that includes complete district- and county-level state appropriations limit information reported to the State Department of Education. The State Department of Education shall make every effort to ensure that all districts have submitted the necessary information requested on the relevant reporting forms. 7. The State Department of Education shall make information available to the Department of Finance, the Legislative Analyst’s Office, and the budget committees of each house of the Legislature by October 31, March 31, and May 31 of each year regarding the amount of Proposition 98 savings estimated to be available for reversion by June 30 of that year. 8. Reimbursement expenditures pursuant to this item resulting from the imposition by the State Department of Education of a commercial copyright fee shall not be expended sooner than 30 days after the State Department of Education submits to the Department of Finance a legal opinion affirming the authority to impose such fees and the arguments supporting that position against any objections or legal challenges to the fee filed with the State Department of Education. Any funds received pursuant to imposition of a commercial copyright fee may only be expended as necessary for outside counsel contingent on a certification of the Superintendent of Public Instruction that sufficient expertise is not available within departmental legal staff. The State Department of Education shall not expend greater than $300,000 for such purposes without first notifying the Department of Finance of the necessity therefor, and upon receiving approval in writing. 9. Of the funds appropriated in this item, up to $1,011,000 is available for dispute resolution services, including mediation and fair hearing services, provided through contract for special education programs. 10. Of the reimbursement funds appropriated in this item, at least $612,000 is provided to the State Department of Education for the oversight of State Board of Education-authorized charter schools. The Department of Finance may administratively establish up to 2.0 positions for this purpose as workload materializes. 11. Of the funds appropriated in this item, at least $109,000 shall be for 1.0 position within the State Department of Education to support activities associated with the Clean Energy Job Creation Fund. 12. Of the amount appropriated in this item, at least $852,000 and 6.0 positions are provided to support the Local Control Funding Formula administration pursuant to Chapter 47 of the Statutes of 2013. These funds and positions shall be used by the State Department of Education to support the apportionment of, and fiscal oversight of, funding pursuant to the Local Control Funding Formula. 13. Of the funds appropriated in this item, at least $115,000 and 1.0 position shall be available for the State Department of Education to support activities associated with charter school appeals as required under subdivision (k) of Section 47605 of the Education Code. 14. Of the funds appropriated in this item, at least $1,140,000 and 8.0 positions are provided to support the implementation of the Local Control Funding Formula accountability system pursuant to Chapter 47 of the Statutes of 2013. 15. Of the funds appropriated in this item, at least $120,000 and 1.0 permanent position are provided to support implementation of the Local Control Funding Formula, such as providing unduplicated pupil counts, matching foster data received from the State Department of Social Services, and meeting foster youth reporting requirements. 16. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $271,000 and 2.0 positions are provided to continue the development and maintenance of the state and federal accountability systems. 17. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $129,000 is provided to support 1.0 existing position for workload associated with school district reorganizations. 18. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $108,000 is provided to support 1.0 existing position to assist local educational agencies applying for a universal meal service program, pursuant to Chapter 724 of the Statutes of 2017. 19. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $128,000 is provided to support 1.0 existing position to complete additional education equity compliance reviews, pursuant to Chapter 493 of the Statutes of 2017. 20. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (1), $252,000 shall be used to support the development and maintenance of a computer-based English Language Proficiency Assessment for California (ELPAC) and a computer-based alternative ELPAC for students with disabilities. 21. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $257,000 is provided to support 2.0 existing positions for the coordination of a centralized Uniform Complaint Procedures process and database to improve the administration and resolution of Uniform Complaint Procedures complaints and appeals received by the State Department of Education; to standardize Uniform Complaint Procedures policies, procedures, and templates departmentwide; and to provide a report by January 31 of each year with a summary of the number of days for completion of appeals by complaint type and program area, including the rationale for complaints that exceeded 60 days. 23. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $600,000 is provided to support 2.0 existing positions and workload related to school-based comprehensive sexual health education. 24. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $105,000 and 1.0 position are to support increases in emergency average daily attendance waiver requests. 25. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $452,000 is provided for 3.0 positions to support compliance workload within the State Department of Education’s Special Education Division. 26. Of the funds appropriated in this item, at least $275,000 and 2.0 positions are provided to support the Career Technical Education Incentive Grant Program and the K–12 component of the Strong Workforce Program. Availability of these funds is contingent upon the State Department of Education fully supporting no fewer than 6.0 full-time regional program consultants in agricultural career technical education in the Agricultural Education Unit of the Career and College Transition Division using federal Perkins V Act funding. If the State Department of Education is unable to support at least 6.0 full-time regional program consultants in agricultural career technical education with federal Perkins V Act funding, $142,000 and 1.0 position provided in this item to support the Career Technical Education Incentive Grant Program and the K–12 component of the Strong Workforce Program shall be redirected for that purpose. As a condition of receiving this funding, the State Department of Education shall make information available to the Department of Finance, the Legislative Analyst’s Office, and the budget committees of each house of the Legislature by October 31 of each fiscal year regarding the split of the federal Perkins V Act funding between the State Department of Education and the Chancellor’s Office of the California Community Colleges. This information shall include, but is not limited to, the maximum set-asides allowable for state administration and state leadership activities, the minimum amount required for local program distribution, as well as a breakdown of how the State Department of Education is utilizing the funds in each category. 27. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $303,000 is provided to support 2.0 positions for the joint interagency resolution team and foster youth coordinated services pursuant to Chapter 815 of the Statutes of 2018. 28. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $77,000 is provided to support 0.5 existing position to update existing, and develop new, resources and strategies, and in-service teacher training to support lesbian, gay, bisexual, transgender, queer, and questioning students, pursuant to Chapter 775 of the Statutes of 2019. 29. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $77,000 is provided to support 1.0 position to provide appropriate language access in American Sign Language. 30. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $696,000 and 3.0 positions are available for the department to collect data to track the implementation of the changes for charter school petitions and renewals, pursuant to Chapter 486 of the Statutes of 2019. 31. Of the amount provided in this item, $192,000 reimbursements are provided on an ongoing basis to support the administration of the California High School Proficiency Examination. 32. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $264,000 and 2.0 positions are provided to establish a state education disaster team to support activities related to disaster planning, preparedness, and response for schools as part of California’s Disaster Preparedness, Response, and Recovery efforts. 33. Of the amount appropriated in this item, $336,000 and 3.0 positions are available to support new ongoing workload for the School Fiscal Services Division related to deferrals and average daily attendance changes pursuant to Chapter 24 of the Statutes of 2020. 34. Of the amount appropriated in this item, $136,000 and 1.0 position are provided to support workload related to creating a school emergency reporting system. 35. Of the amount appropriated in this item, $12,598,000 is provided to support 52.8 existing positions in the Nutrition Services Division, and 30.0 positions in the Early Education Division to support remaining early learning workload after the transition of childcare programs to the State Department of Social Services. 36. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $376,000 and 3.0 positions are provided to support increased workload in the accounting office. 38. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (1), $3,403,000 is provided to support existing authorized administrative positions. 39. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (2), $2,960,000 is provided to support existing authorized administrative positions. 40. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (1), $700,000 is provided to support 5.0 new positions and 1.0 existing position for the State Department of Education to establish the Office of School-Based Health. 41. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $250,000 and 1.0 permanent position are provided to establish the California Computer Science Coordinator. The coordinator shall provide statewide coordination in implementing the computer science content standards developed pursuant to Section 60605.4 of the Education Code and lead the implementation of the computer science strategic implementation plan adopted by the State Board of Education. 42. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (2), $425,000 and 2.5 positions are available to support workload associated with expanded Transitional Kindergarten programs. 43. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (2), $437,000 and 3.0 positions are available to support early learning workload in the Child Development and Nutrition Fiscal Services Division. 44. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (2), $1,670,000 and 3.0 positions are available to support early learning workload in the Early Education Division. 45. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (2), $2,583,000 and 11.7 positions are provided to support early learning workload. 46. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (1), $143,000 and 1.0 position are available for a Medi-Cal billing coordinator to serve as a liaison with the State Department of Health Care Services, stakeholders, and others with respect to Medi-Cal billing options, the school-based Medi-Cal Administrative Activities Program, and medically necessary federal Early and Periodic Screening, Diagnostic, and Treatment Benefits. 47. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (1), $467,000 and 4.0 positions are provided for the School Fiscal Services Division to support workload related to state apportionment calculations, review of average daily attendance waivers, technical assistance, and implementation of grant programs. 48. Of the amount appropriated in this item, $1,653,000 and 14.0 positions are provided for the Expanded Learning Division to provide students in classroom-based instructional programs with access to comprehensive after school and intersessional expanded learning opportunities. 49. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $130,000 and 1.0 position are provided to support implementation of the Standardized Account Code Structure web-based application. 50. Of the amount appropriated in this item, at least $286,000 and 2.0 positions are provided to support professional development programs, including, but not limited to, the National Board Certification Incentive Grant, the Educator Effectiveness Block Grant, Professional Development on Social Emotional Learning and Trauma Informed Practices, Professional Development for Reading Instruction and Intervention, Training for Youth Mental and Behavioral Health, and other teacher professional development. 51. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $286,000 and 2.0 positions are provided to support the implementation of the universal school meals program. 52. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $561,000 and 4.0 positions are provided to the School Fiscal Services Division for work related to the Expanded Learning and Transitional Kindergarten Programs. 53. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $425,000 and 3.0 positions are provided for additional new formula-driven program implementation. 54. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $155,000 and 1.0 position are provided to the Technology Services Division for Transitional Kindergarten average daily attendance data collection. 55. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $742,000 and 5.0 positions are provided to support the Community Schools Partnership Grant Program. 56. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $143,000 and 1.0 position are provided to support the California Healthy Kids Survey and social-emotional learning professional development. 57. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $143,000 and 1.0 position are provided for the Early Education Division to address increased workload in the California State Preschool Program. 58. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $130,000 and 1.0 position are provided for the Fiscal and Administrative Services Division to address increased workload in the California State Preschool Program. 61. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (1), $201,000 is provided for 2.0 positions in the Office of School Transportation. 62. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (1), $161,000 and 1.0 position are provided to support the Supporting Inclusive Practices Grant. 63. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (1), $690,000 and 5.0 positions are provided to improve transitions from Part C Early Intervention Services to Part B Special Education Services. 64. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (1), $266,000 and 2.0 positions are available to support increased departmental information technology needs and workload. 65. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (1), $2,681,000 is provided in the 2025–26 fiscal year to continue supporting departmental information security infrastructure. Of this amount, $2,632,000 and 6.0 positions are provided on an ongoing basis to support replacement of aging hardware, maintaining already implemented cybersecurity technical capabilities, and implementing the remaining cybersecurity technical capabilities to achieve full compliance with the Department of Technology’s Cal-Secure Information Security Roadmap. 66. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (1), $1,702,000 and 9.0 positions are provided to support implementation and ongoing workload for the Cradle-to-Career Data System. 69. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (1), $383,000 and 3.0 positions are provided to the Budget Management Office to effectively support new and expanded programs and address increased workload due to FI$Cal implementation. 70. Of the amount appropriated in this item, $159,000 and 1.0 position are provided to coordinate improved access to early intervention services for children prior to entering kindergarten. 71. Of the amount appropriated in this item, $458,000 and 3.0 positions are provided to support the implementation of Chapter 498 of the Statutes of 2021 (AB 1363). 72. Of the amount appropriated in this item, $633,000 and 4.0 positions are provided for the programmatic monitoring of the California State Preschool Program. 73. Of the amount appropriated in this item, $119,000 and 1.0 position are appropriated for the fiscal monitoring of the California State Preschool Program. 74. Of the amount appropriated in this item, $436,000 and 2.5 positions are provided to support the implementation of Universal Transitional Kindergarten. 75. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $90,000 and 0.5 position are provided to support fiscal compliance monitoring reviews of program funds. 76. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $122,000 and 1.0 position are provided to support fund reconciliation workload. 77. Of the funds appropriated in this item, 1.0 position is provided to support an increase in legal workload related to new and expanded programs including Universal Transitional Kindergarten and the California State Preschool Program. 78. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $167,000 is provided for Zoom licenses to host webinars and online meetings. 81. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $350,000 and 2.0 positions are provided to support increased workload related to operating the information technology systems used by the State Department of Education’s early education programs. 82. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $276,000 and 2.0 positions are provided to incorporate early identification for learning disabilities into the State Department of Education’s preschool assessment tools, and to provide training for educators on effective use of those tools. 83. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $612,000 and 4.0 positions are provided to support increased workload related to administering the Inclusive Early Education Expansion Program. 84. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $769,000 and 5.0 positions are provided to support increased workload related to revising California State Preschool Program policies. 85. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $356,000 and 2.5 positions are provided to support workload associated with expanded Transitional Kindergarten programs. 87. Of the amount provided in this item, $75,000 reimbursements is provided through the 2026–27 fiscal year for state operations support of Fresno Unified School District in facilitation of grant funds from the Wallace Foundation. 88. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $161,000 and 1.0 position are provided to support the development and expansion of California Science Test (CAST) and the California Alternate Assessment (CAA) for Science within the Assessment Development and Administration Division. 89. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $161,000 and 1.0 position are provided to support the development and expansion of English Language Proficiency Assessments for California (ELPAC) and the California Spanish Assessment (CSA) within the Assessment Development and Administration Division. 90. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $140,000 is provided through June 30, 2027, to provide technical assistance and support to local educational agencies in hiring and training literacy coaches and reading specialists through the Literacy Coaches and Reading Specialists Grant Program, pursuant to Chapter 52 of the Statutes of 2022. 92. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (1), $1,069,000 and 8.0 positions are provided to the School Fiscal Services Division for workload related to the Local Control Funding Formula declining enrollment protection proposal, AB 602 Special Education formula changes, and other fiscal-related workload for new programs. 93. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (1), $250,000 is available to the Superintendent of Public Instruction for fiscal oversight of county offices of education and the seven school districts in the state that share the same governing board as their county office of education for the services of a fiscal expert or adviser pursuant to Section 1630 of the Education Code or to compensate members of a Budget Review Committee established pursuant to Education Code Sections 1623 or 42127.1. The State Department of Education shall notify and receive approval from the Director of Finance in advance of retaining the services of a fiscal expert or fiscal adviser. 94. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $150,000 and 1.0 position are provided to the School Health and Safety Office to support LGBTQ+ initiatives and best practices. 95. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (1), $160,000 is provided for Education Commission of the States membership dues. 96. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (1), $1,232,000 and 8.0 positions are provided to the Analysis, Measurement, and Accountability Reporting Division to establish a Data Science Office for the purposes of collecting new one-time or short-term data, providing contextual analysis to measure priority initiatives and programs, and providing timely data and information directly to policymakers including the State Board of Education and the Joint Legislative Budget Committee within 30 days. 97. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $910,000 is available on a one-time basis in the 2026–27 fiscal year, for the State Department of Education to contract with a vendor to provide direct deposit to State Preschool contractors, beginning November 1, 2023. Contracts awarded pursuant to this provision shall allow for advance payment, and the department is hereby authorized to provide advance payment in order to implement direct deposit to State Preschool contractors. Contracts awarded pursuant to this provision shall be exempt from the personal services contracting requirements of Article 4 (commencing with Section 19130) of Chapter 5 of Part 2 of Division 5 of Title 2 of the Government Code. For purposes of this provision, the department is exempt from the requirements of Part 2 (commencing with Section 10100) of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code and from the requirements of Article 6 (commencing with Section 999) of Chapter 6 of Division 4 of the Military and Veterans Code. 101. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (2), $152,000 and 1.0 position are provided to support workload associated with the Quality Rating and Improvement System (QRIS) Block Grant. 102. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (2), $645,000 and 3.0 positions are provided to support workload related to implementing Classroom Assessments Scoring System (CLASS) for all California State Preschool Program (CSPP) providers. 103. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (2), $740,000 and 5.0 positions are provided to support workload associated with implementing the requirements of Chapter 915 of the Statutes of 2022 which revised provisions related to the suspension and expulsion of children from the CSPP and increased the requirements for early childhood mental health consultation services. 104. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (2), $3,932,000 and 9.0 positions are provided to support workload associated with collecting student and teacher level data from California State Preschool Programs (CSPPs) that are operated by a local educational agency pursuant to Chapter 901 of the Statutes of 2022. 105. Of the funds provided in Schedule (2), $449,000 is provided in the 2024–25 fiscal year and 3.0 positions, and $164,000 ongoing to support the development of the Whole Child Equity Framework and the Whole Child Community Equity Screening Tool, pursuant to Chapter 699 of the Statutes of 2022. 106. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $138,000 and 1.0 position are provided to the Office of School Transportation for the data processing workload associated with the Home-to-School Transportation program. 107. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $164,000 General Fund and 1.0 position are provided to the School Fiscal Services Division for the additional data processing workload associated with the Home-to-School Transportation program. 108. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $1,316,000 and 7.0 positions are provided to support improved Teacher Assignment Monitoring Outcomes data collection and reporting through the California Longitudinal Pupil Achievement Data System and partnership with the Commission on Teacher Credentialing and the California Statewide Assignment Accountability System. 109. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $300,000 and 2.0 positions are provided to the Analysis, Measurement and Accountability Reporting Division for workload related to the California School Dashboard state indicator data and the timelines associated with the collection of data through the California Longitudinal Pupil Achievement Data System. 110. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (1), $524,000 and 3.0 positions are provided to the School Fiscal Services and Curriculum Frameworks and Instruction Resources Divisions, for workload related to the implementation of Proposition 28, and schoolsite level data collection workload related to the equity multiplier allocation. 111. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (1), $380,000 is available on an ongoing basis for warranty support for network equipment and to upgrade server software at the State Special Schools and Diagnostic Centers. 113. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (5), $152,000 is provided to support the State Department of Education’s Broadband Coordinator position. 114. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (1), $321,000 and 2.0 positions are available to support new ongoing workload associated with the implementation of Chapter 342 of the Statutes of 2023. 115. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (1), $392,000 and 2.0 positions are available to support new ongoing workload associated with the implementation of Chapter 229 of the Statutes of 2023. 116. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (2), 1.0 position, and $182,000 ongoing are provided to support new ongoing workload associated with the implementation of Chapter 435 of the Statutes of 2023. 117. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (1), $164,000 and 1.0 position is available to support the statewide implementation of the English Learner Roadmap Policy pursuant to Chapter 946 of the Statutes of 2024. 118. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (1), $538,000 and 3.0 positions are available to the School Fiscal Services Division to facilitate migration to the new Principal Apportionment Application, ongoing maintenance, operation, and programming updates. 119. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (1), $1,408,000 and 9.0 positions are available to support the development of an updated Form J-90 and associated data collection, pursuant to Chapter 345 of the Statutes of 2024, in the 2026–27 fiscal year. $1,239,000 and 8.0 positions shall be available for this purpose in the 2027–28 fiscal year, and ongoing. 120. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (1), $141,000 and 1.0 position are available to support ongoing workload associated with the District of Choice program. 121. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (2), $385,000 is available to support the Summer Electronic Benefits Transfer Program. 122. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (2), $967,000 and 7.0 $1,092,000 and 8.0 positions are available to support the California State Preschool Program in the 2025–26 fiscal year and ongoing. 123. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (2), $294,000 and 1.0 position are available in fiscal year 2026–27, $817,000 and 4.5 positions are available in 2027–28, $885,000 and 5.0 positions are available in 2028–29, and $1,017,000 and 6.0 positions are available in 2029–30 and ongoing to support the implementation of the Real Food, Healthy Kids Act of 2025 (Chapter 467, Statutes of 2025). 124. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (1), $316,000 and 1.0 position are available in fiscal year 2026–27 through 2028–29, and $184,000 and 1.0 position are available in 2029–30 and ongoing to support local educational agencies in identifying multilingual learners in transitional kindergarten by using a screening instrument as required by Section 48004 of the Education Code. 125. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (1), $251,000 is provided in fiscal year 2025–26 and $1,117,000 and 4.0 positions are provided in fiscal year 2026–27 and ongoing to support new workload associated with the implementation of Chapters 428 and 429 of the Statutes of 2025. 126. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (1), $1,264,000 is provided in fiscal year 2026–27 to support the replacement of the State Department of Education’s Computer Room Air Conditioning and Uninterruptible Power Supply systems. 127. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (2), $552,000 is available for the Technology Services Division to support implementation of the single reimbursement rate structure for the California State Preschool Program in the 2026–27 fiscal year and ongoing. 128. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (2), $910,000 is available each fiscal year beginning 2026–27 to 2028–29, inclusive, for the State Department of Education to obtain the services of the Office of State Audits and Evaluations within the Department of Finance to provide support for California State Preschool Program audits. Unexpended funds shall be made available in each of the following fiscal years by the Office of State Audits and Evaluations within the Department of Finance in support of California State Preschool Program audits. 129. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (1), $178,000 and 1.0 position is provided to support the State Department of Education’s increased oversight responsibilities of all county offices of education, including single-district counties. 130. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (1), $850,000 is provided in the 2026–27 fiscal year and ongoing to support increasing salary costs for state employees working on the federal Title I, Part A program. 6100-001-0044—For support of State Department of Education, as provided in Section 40080 of the Education Code, payable from the Motor Vehicle Account, State Transportation Fund ........................ 1,169,000 Schedule: (1) 5205068-Schoolbus Driver Instructor Training ........................ 1,550,000 (2) Reimbursements to 5205068-Schoolbus Driver Instructor Training ........................ −381,000 Provisions: 1. From this item, the State Department of Education shall not expend more than $1,550,000 in support of the Schoolbus Driver Instructor Training program. 2. Of the amount authorized for expenditure in Provision 1, up to $143,000 shall be funded from the existing reserves held in the Special Deposit Fund Account established to receive fees charged by the State Department of Education pursuant to Section 40090 of the Education Code. 3. The reimbursement amount in Schedule (2) reflects the amount of current year fees to be collected pursuant to Section 40090 of the Education Code. Any fees collected in excess of the reimbursement amount in this item, or those unencumbered or unspent, shall be deposited into the Special Deposit Fund Account currently established for this purpose. 6100-001-0140—For support of State Department of Education, payable from the California Environmental License Plate Fund, for purposes of Section 21190 of the Public Resources Code ........................ 53,000 Schedule: (1) 5205033-Environmental Education ........................ 53,000 6100-001-0231—For support of State Department of Education, payable from the Health Education Account, Cigarette and Tobacco Products Surtax Fund, pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with Section 104350) of Chapter 1 of Part 3 of Division 103 of the Health and Safety Code ........................ 942,000 Schedule: (1) 5205027-Curriculum Services—​Health and Physical Education—​Drug Free Schools ........................ 942,000 6100-001-0687—For support of State Department of Education, payable from the Donated Food Revolving Fund, pursuant to Article 7 (commencing with Section 12110) of Chapter 1 of Part 8 of Division 1 of Title 1 of the Education Code ........................ 6,712,000 Schedule: (1) 5210063-Donated Food Distribution ........................ 6,712,000 6100-001-0890—For support of State Department of Education, payable from the Federal Trust Fund ........................ 216,180,000 Schedule: (1) 5205010-Curriculum Services ........................ 169,474,000 (2) 5210066-Special Program Support ........................ 46,706,000 Provisions: 1. The funds appropriated in this item include federal Perkins V Act funds for the current fiscal year to be transferred to community colleges by means of interagency agreements. These funds shall be used by community colleges for the administration of career technical education programs. 2. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $96,000 is available to the Advisory Commission on Special Education for the in-state travel and operational expenses of the commissioners and the secretary to the commission. 3. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $318,000 shall be used to provide training in culturally nonbiased assessment and specialized language skills to special education teachers. 4. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $19,772,000 of federal Individuals with Disabilities Education Act funds are for dispute resolution services, including mediation and fair hearing services, provided through contract for the special education programs. The State Department of Education shall ensure the quarterly reports that the contractor submits on the results of its dispute resolution services reflect year-to-date data and final yearend data, includes the same information as required by Section 56504.5 of the Education Code, and includes the following information: (a) The total number of cases won by each side. (b) The number of issues decided in favor of each side in split decisions. (c) The number of cases in which schools and parents were represented by attorneys. (d) The number of requests for due process initiated by parents that were dismissed for insufficiency. (e) The number of pupils of color who accessed the system. (f) The number of non-English-speaking people who used the system. (g) The length of each hearing. (h) The number of hearing requests initiated by parents. (i) The number of hearing requests initiated by school districts. (j) The school district of each parent-initiated request for due process. (k) The issues, within special education, that generated due process hearing requests during the quarter. (l) The disabilities that generated due process hearing requests during the quarter. (m) The age groups (preschool, primary, junior high, and high school) that generated hearing requests. (n) The number of requests received during the quarter. (o) The number of hearing decisions that were appealed to a court during the quarter. (p) The number of cases that were completely resolved in mediation by agreement. (q) The number of cases that were completely resolved in a mandatory resolution session. 5. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $443,000 is for 3.0 positions within the State Department of Education for increased monitoring associated with educationally related mental health services, including out-of-home residential services for emotionally disturbed pupils, required by an individualized education program pursuant to the federal Individuals with Disabilities Education Improvement Act of 2004 (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1400 et seq.). 6. Of the funds appropriated in this item, at least $2,506,000 shall be available for the administration of 21st Century Community Learning Centers programs. 7. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $308,000 is available from federal Title II funds for an interagency agreement with the Commission on Teacher Credentialing to support teacher misassignment monitoring activities. 8. Of the funds appropriated in this item, up to $1,506,000 is available from federal Title II funds to support Title II-related priorities identified in the California State Plan adopted by the State Board of Education pursuant to the federal Elementary and Secondary Education Act of 1965, as amended by the federal Every Student Succeeds Act (P.L. 114-95). 9. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $6,636,000 is for the California Longitudinal Pupil Achievement Data System (CALPADS), which is to meet the requirements of the federal Elementary and Secondary Education Act of 1965 (ESEA), as amended by the federal Every Student Succeeds Act (P.L. 114-95) and Chapter 1002 of the Statutes of 2002. These funds are payable from the Federal Trust Fund to the State Department of Education. Of this amount, $5,641,000 is federal Title I, Part B funds and $995,000 is federal Title II funds. These funds are provided for the following purposes: $3,254,000 for systems housing and maintenance; $908,000 for costs associated with necessary system activities; $790,000 for State Department of Education staff; and $710,000 for various other costs, including hardware and software costs, indirect charges, Department of General Services charges, and operating expenses and equipment. As a further condition of receiving these funds, the State Department of Education shall not add additional data elements to CALPADS, require local educational agencies to use the data collected through the CALPADS for any purpose, or otherwise expand or enhance the system beyond the data elements and functionalities that are identified in the most current approved Feasibility Study and Special Project Reports and the CALPADS Data Guide v4.1. In addition, $974,000 is for State Department of Education data management staff responsible for fulfilling certain federal requirements not directly associated with CALPADS. 10. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $800,000 of the federal Individuals with Disabilities Education Act (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1400 et seq.) funds is available for the State Department of Education to provide oversight and technical assistance for local educational agencies as the responsibility for overseeing educationally related mental health services transitions from county mental health agencies to special education local plan areas and to develop resources and provide technical assistance to local educational agencies for implementation of the federally required State Systemic Improvement Plan. 11. Of the funds appropriated in this item, at least $501,000 federal Title I, Part C, Migrant Education funds and 3.0 positions are provided for oversight and coordination of the State Parent Advisory Council, identification of qualifying program participants, and collecting and linking student data. 12. Of the funds appropriated in this item, up to $790,000 in federal Individuals with Disabilities Education Act (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1400 et seq.) funds shall be available to the State Department of Education for warehouse costs related to providing accessible instructional materials to local educational agencies. 13. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $625,000 is available for 5.0 existing positions to establish and support a litigation unit within the State Department of Education’s Special Education Division. 14. Of the amount provided in Schedule (1), $439,000 is available for 2.0 existing positions in the Student Achievement and Support Division to support the work of the State Department of Education, the California Collaborative for Educational Excellence, lead county offices of education, and stakeholders to inform the work of agencies within the statewide system of support pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 52073 of the Education Code. 15. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $138,000 in federal Individuals with Disabilities Education Act (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1400 et seq.) funds is provided for 1.0 position to fulfill reporting requirements on the use of behavioral restraints and seclusion, pursuant to Chapter 998 of the Statutes of 2018. 16. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $226,000 in federal Title II funds and 1.0 position are available for the State Department of Education to administer the 21st Century California School Leadership Academy, in consultation with the State Board of Education and in collaboration with the California Collaborative for Educational Excellence. 17. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $1,666,000 shall be reserved for the professional development of private school teachers and administrators as required by Title II of the federal Every Student Succeeds Act (20 U.S.C. Sec. 6601 et seq.). This amount reflects the availability of $1,236,000 ongoing federal Title II funds and $430,000 ongoing federal Title IV funds. 18. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $207,000 and 1.5 positions are available for homeless student coordinators. 19. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $442,000 federal Title IV funds is available to support administration and compliance monitoring of the federal Title IV grant activities and review of local control accountability plan federal addenda. 20. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $116,000 and 1.0 position are available for the State Department of Education to collect the data necessary to fulfill the federal Every Student Succeeds Act (P.L. 114-95) requirement that local educational agencies annually report school-level, per-pupil expenditures. 21. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (1), $136,000 of federal Title I, Part C funds and 1.0 position are provided for the State Department of Education to develop enhancements for system-to-system interoperability between the Migrant Student Information Network and the California Longitudinal Pupil Achievement Data System. 22. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (1), $1,293,000 of federal Individuals with Disabilities Education Act (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1400 et seq.) funds and 6.0 positions shall be available to address special education complaints and perform court-ordered special education monitoring of local educational agencies. 23. Of the amount provided in Schedule (1), $282,000 is available to support 2.0 positions in the Rural Education and State Support Office to conduct federal program monitoring of, and to provide technical assistance to, local educational agency recipients of the Title IV, Student Support and Academic Enrichment Grant. 24. Of the amount provided in Schedule (1), $474,000 is available for 3.0 positions in the School Fiscal Services Division and $249,000 is available for 1.0 position in the Analysis, Measurement, and Accountability Reporting Division to support the identification of schools who are eligible for comprehensive support and improvement in the allocation of funding to local educational agencies that serve the identified schools pursuant to the federal Every Student Succeeds Act (P.L. 114-95). 25. Of the funds appropriated in this item, up to $1,617,000 federal Title I funds is available to support monitoring and evaluation of the use of funds by local educational agencies receiving an allotment pursuant to Section 1003 of the federal Elementary and Secondary Education Act of 1965, as amended by the federal Every Student Succeeds Act (P.L. 114-95). 26. On or before October 1, 2022, and annually thereafter, the Superintendent of Public Instruction shall provide a list to the appropriate fiscal and policy committees of the Legislature and the Department of Finance identifying the number and names of the Family Empowerment Centers on Disability that are subject to a continued funding eligibility assessment pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 56408 of the Education Code in the following fiscal year. Beginning in the 2023–24 fiscal year and annually thereafter, $10,000 federal Individuals with Disabilities Education Act (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1400 et seq.) funds shall be made available to assess each Family Empowerment Center on Disability that has been identified by the Superintendent as being subject to a continued funding eligibility assessment during the fiscal year. 27. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (1), $332,000 federal Title III, Part A funds and 2.0 positions are provided for the State Department of Education to conduct federal program monitoring reviews of local educational agency English Learner programs. 28. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (1), $242,000 of federal Individuals with Disabilities Education Act (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1400 et seq.) funds and 2.0 positions shall be available to address workload associated with allocating special education funds. 29. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (2) of this item, $3,900,000 and 29.5 positions are to support workload related to the universal school meals program. 30. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (1), $760,000 of the federal Individuals with Disabilities Education Act (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1400 et seq.) funds is available to support workload associated with special education complaint resolution. 31. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (1), $272,000 of the federal Individuals with Disabilities Education Act (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1400 et seq.) funds is available to support workload associated with disbursing federal Individuals with Disabilities Education Act mental health funds to local educational agencies. 32. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (1), $250,000 of the federal Individuals with Disabilities Education Act (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1400 et seq.) funds is available for licensing and maintenance of special education monitoring software. 33. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (2), $385,000 is available to support the Summer Electronic Benefits Transfer Program. 34. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (1), $676,000 in the 2026–27 fiscal year and $260,000 in the 2027–28 fiscal year is available to support the Stronger Connections Technical Assistance Grant Program. 35. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (1), $337,000 federal Individuals with Disabilities Education Act (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1400 et seq.) funds and 2.0 positions are available to support the federally required monitoring of small local educational agencies. 39. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (1), $146,000 Individuals with Disabilities Education Act (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1400 et seq.) funds and 1.0 position are available to support the federally required monitoring of individualized education program data. 40. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (1), $700,000 annually beginning in the 2025–26 fiscal year through the 2027–28 fiscal year, is available to support state-level mental health efforts under Project Cal-Well. 42. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (1), $420,000 is provided in the 2026–27 fiscal year, and $475,000 is provided annually in the 2027–28 and 2028–29 fiscal years, for the State Department of Education to support the Comprehensive Literacy State Development grant. 44. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (2), $1,990,000 is available annually through the 2028–29 fiscal year to support local Early Head Start services under the Early Head Start—​Child Care Partnership Grant. The funds appropriated in this provision shall not be used for indirect costs of the State Department of Education. 45. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (1), $1,208,000 in federal Individuals with Disabilities Education Act (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1400 et seq.) funds is available in the 2026–27 fiscal year and $757,000 is available in the 2027–28 fiscal year and in each fiscal year thereafter, and 3.0 positions, to support the increased state monitoring requirements for out-of-state nonpublic schools associated with Chapter 579 of the Statutes of 2025. Of these funds, project funding for the proposed integrated data system component is contingent upon the State Department of Education’s completion of the Department of Technology’s Project Approval Lifecycle process. 46. Of the amount appropriated m Schedule (1), $16,152,000 in federal Individuals with Disabilities Education Act (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1400 et seq.) funds is available on an ongoing basis to be allocated by the State Department of Education to the Student Aid Commission to support grants to special education teachers through the Golden State Teacher Grant Program. 47. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (1), $1,630,000 of the federal Title II, Part A (20 U.S.C. Sec. 6611 et seq.) funds shall be available to support grants through the Golden State Teacher Grant Program through an interagency agreement with the Student Aid Commission. 6100-001-3085—For support of State Department of Education, payable from the Behavioral Health Services Fund ........................ 199,000 Schedule: (1) 5210066-Special Program Support ........................ 199,000 6100-001-3170—For support of State Department of Education, payable from the Heritage Enrichment Resource Fund ........................ 42,000 Schedule: (1) 5205010-Curriculum Services ........................ 42,000 Provisions: 1. The funds appropriated in this item shall be available to the State Department of Education to process payments for the registration of heritage schools and to provide necessary technical assistance, pursuant to Chapter 286 of the Statutes of 2010. 2. The State Department of Education shall ensure that the registration fee for heritage schools does not exceed the costs of registering heritage schools pursuant to Section 33195.5 of the Education Code. 6100-001-6094—For support of State Department of Education, payable from the 2024 State School Facilities Fund ........................ 5,479,000 Schedule: (1) 5200157-School Facilities Program ........................ 1,803,000 (2) 5205064-Administrative Services to Local Educational Agencies ........................ 3,676,000 Provisions: 1. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (1) of this item, $1,108,000 is available in fiscal year 2026–27 through fiscal year 2029–30, to expand the objectives of the federal Supporting America’s School Infrastructure Grant Program for priority school districts associated with the implementation of Chapter 81 of the Statutes of 2024. Funds appropriated in this item shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2030. 2. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (1) of this item, $690,000 is available on a one-time basis in fiscal year 2026–27, and $190,000 is available on a one-time basis in fiscal year 2027–28, to replace the department’s Site Plan Review Tracking system. These funds shall be used for, but not limited to, solution integration services, user licenses and SaaS subscriptions, project oversight costs at the California Department of Technology, and staffing for a limited-term position. 6100-001-8141—For support of State Department of Education, payable from the Electronic Cigarette Settlements Fund ........................ 300,000 Schedule: (1) 5205026-Tobacco Use Prevention and Reduction Program ........................ 300,000 Provisions: 1. Funds appropriated in this item shall be available for expenditure or encumbrance until June 30, 2028. 6100-003-0001—For support of State Department of Education, Standardized Account Code Structure ........................ 1,535,000 Schedule: (1) 5205076-Standardized Account Code Structure ........................ 1,535,000 Provisions: 1. The funds appropriated in this item shall be available for the direct costs to administer the Standardized Account Code Structure program, to assist any school district or county office of education in financial distress or bankruptcy, to implement the provisions established by Chapter 52 of the Statutes of 2004, to make available standard fiscal, demographic, and performance data to policy decisionmakers, and for indirect costs for those programs at the rate approved by the United States Department of Education. 6100-004-0001—For support of State Department of Education, Instructional Quality Commission ........................ 98,000 Schedule: (1) 5205050-Instructional Quality Commission ........................ 98,000 Provisions: 1. The funds appropriated in this item shall be available to support the 2026–27 fiscal year activities of the Instructional Quality Commission, including any operational costs necessary for the Instructional Quality Commission to complete an English Language Arts/English Language Development adoption in the 2026–27 fiscal year. These funds are available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2027. 2. The funds appropriated in this item shall not be used for indirect department costs, and shall be allocated in accordance with the above provisions unless a revision to the allocations contained herein has been approved by the Department of Finance. The Department of Finance shall not authorize any such revision sooner than 30 days after notification in writing of the necessity to the chairpersons of the committees in each house of the Legislature that consider appropriations and the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, or not sooner than whatever lesser time the chairperson of the joint committee, or the chairperson’s designee, may in each instance determine. 6100-005-0001—For support of State Department of Education, as allocated by the State Department of Education to the State Special Schools ........................ 62,468,000 Schedule: (1) 5200191-School for the Blind, Fremont ........................ 10,353,000 (2) 5200193-School for the Deaf, Fremont ........................ 32,105,000 (3) 5200195-School for the Deaf, Riverside ........................ 27,773,000 (4) 5200197-Diagnostic Centers ........................ 0 (5) Reimbursements to 5200191-School for the Blind, Fremont ........................ −1,397,000 (6) Reimbursements to 5200193-School for the Deaf, Fremont ........................ −3,685,000 (7) Reimbursements to 5200195-School for the Deaf, Riverside ........................ −2,681,000 (8) Reimbursements to 5200197-Diagnostic Centers ........................ 0 Provisions: 1. On or before September 15 of each year, the superintendent of each state special school shall report to each school district the number of pupils from that district who are attending a state special school and the estimated payment due on behalf of the district for those pupils pursuant to Section 59300 of the Education Code. The Controller shall withhold from the State School Fund the amount due from each school district, as reported to the Controller by the Superintendent of Public Instruction. The amount withheld shall be transferred from the State School Fund to this item. The Superintendent of Public Instruction is authorized to adjust the estimated payments required after the close of the fiscal year by reporting to the Controller the information needed to make the adjustment. The payments by the Controller that result from this yearend adjustment shall be applied to the current year. 2. (a) Of the amount provided in this item, $5,800,000 shall be available to address deferred maintenance project and oversight costs with no less than $1,800,000 to be spent specifically to address deferred maintenance projects that represent critical infrastructure deficiencies and facility infrastructure and modernization. (b) Notwithstanding Section 26.00 or any other provision of law, if it is determined that there are projects at the Diagnostic Centers that represent critical infrastructure deficiencies and facility infrastructure and modernization, then the State Department of Education shall submit a request to the Department of Finance to transfer a specified amount of funds within Schedules (1), (2), or (3) to the Diagnostic Centers in Schedule (4) to address deferred maintenance needs, and, with Department of Finance approval, the State Department of Education may submit a letter to the Controller to transfer the specified funds. 6100-006-0001—For support of State Department of Education (Proposition 98), as allocated by the State Department of Education to the State Special Schools ........................ 86,256,000 Schedule: (1) 5200191-School for the Blind, Fremont ........................ 13,024,000 (2) 5200193-School for the Deaf, Fremont ........................ 31,086,000 (3) 5200195-School for the Deaf, Riverside ........................ 27,256,000 (4) 5200197-Diagnostic Centers ........................ 21,346,000 (5) Reimbursements to 5200191-School for the Blind, Fremont ........................ −1,773,000 (6) Reimbursements to 5200193-School for the Deaf, Fremont ........................ −3,168,000 (7) Reimbursements to 5200195-School for the Deaf, Riverside ........................ −1,477,000 (8) Reimbursements to 5200197-Diagnostic Centers ........................ −38,000 6100-009-0001—For support of State Department of Education ........................ 5,535,000 Schedule: (1) 5220-State Board of Education ........................ 5,535,000 Provisions: 1. The funds appropriated in this item shall be available for support of the State Board of Education and shall be directed to meet the policy priorities of its members. 2. Of the amount appropriated in this item, $572,000 and 3.0 positions are to support the continued implementation of the Local Control Funding Formula, as authorized by Section 115 of Chapter 47 of the Statutes of 2013 (Assembly Bill 97 of the 2013–14 Regular Session), including statewide system of support, accountability, special education reforms, support for English learners, professional development, educator preparation, and distance learning. 3. Of the amount appropriated in this item, $1,296,000 and 6.0 positions are provided to lead and coordinate efforts of the administration to respond to the impacts of health emergencies and other natural disasters on K–12 schools, provide guidance to the State Department of Education in the implementation of new and continuing legislative education initiatives, and act as a liaison between the administration and the public, other local, state, and federal agencies, and the Legislature on acute and ongoing issues in public education. 6100-093-0001—For support of State Department of Education, for rental payments on lease-revenue bonds ........................ 11,612,000 Schedule: (1) 5200189-State Special Schools ........................ 11,612,000 Provisions: 1. The Controller shall transfer funds appropriated in this item for base rental as and when provided for in the schedule submitted by the State Public Works Board. Notwithstanding the payment dates in any related Facility Lease or Indenture, the schedule may provide for an earlier transfer of funds to ensure debt requirements are met and pay base rental in full when due. 2. The Controller shall transfer for additional rental no later than 30 days after enactment of this budget, $59,000 of the amount appropriated in this item, to the Expense Account in the Public Buildings Construction Fund. 3. This item may be adjusted pursuant to Section 4.30. Any adjustments to this item shall be reported to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee pursuant to Section 4.30. 6100-101-0231—For local assistance, State Department of Education, for county offices of education, payable from the Health Education Account, Cigarette and Tobacco Products Surtax Fund, pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with Section 104350) of Chapter 1 of Part 3 of Division 103 of the Health and Safety Code ........................ 1,774,000 Schedule: (1) 5205027-Curriculum Services—​Health and Physical Education—​Drug Free Schools ........................ 1,774,000 6100-101-8141—For local assistance, State Department of Education, payable from the Electronic Cigarette Settlements Fund ........................ 2,700,000 Schedule: (1) 5205026-Tobacco Use Prevention and Reduction Program ........................ 2,700,000 Provisions: 1. Funds appropriated in this item shall be used to support youth education and outreach activities related to tobacco prevention including the Youth Vaping Alternative Prevention Education, the Stanford Tobacco Prevention Toolkit, mass mailings to families in California with student-aged children, and expansion of the Rural Initiative grant program. 2. Funds appropriated in this item shall be available for expenditure or encumbrance until June 30, 2028. 6100-102-0231—For local assistance, State Department of Education, payable from the Health Education Account, Cigarette and Tobacco Products Surtax Fund, pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with Section 104350) of Chapter 1 of Part 3 of Division 103 of the Health and Safety Code ........................ 5,678,000 Schedule: (1) 5205027-Curriculum Services—​Health and Physical Education—​Drug Free Schools ........................ 5,678,000 6100-104-0890—For local assistance, State Department of Education, payable from the Federal Trust Fund ........................ 1,100,000 Schedule: (1) 5205025-Project AWARE Grant ........................ 1,100,000 Provisions: 1. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (1), $1,100,000 is available to support Project Cal-Well. 6100-105-0001—For local assistance, State Department of Education, for purposes of Article 1 (commencing with Section 52300) of Chapter 9 of Part 28 of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Education Code ........................ 0 Schedule: (1) 5200024-Regional Occupational Centers and Programs ........................ 5,000,000 (2) Reimbursements to 5200024-Regional Occupational Centers and Programs ........................ −5,000,000 Provisions: 1. Notwithstanding any other law, funds appropriated in this item for average daily attendance (ADA) generated by participants in welfare-to-work activities under the CalWORKs program established in Article 3.2 (commencing with Section 11320) of Chapter 2 of Part 3 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code may be appropriated on an advance basis to local educational agencies based on anticipated units of ADA if a prior application for this additional ADA funding has been approved by the Superintendent of Public Instruction. 2. Of the amount appropriated in this item, $1,161,000 is for remedial educational services for participants in welfare-to-work activities under the CalWORKs program. 6100-106-0001—For local assistance, State Department of Education (Proposition 98), Marin County Office of Education, California Collaborative for Educational Excellence ........................ 12,470,000 Schedule: (1) 5205220-California Collaborative for Educational Excellence ........................ 5,970,000 (2) 5205222-State System of Support ........................ 7,000,000 (3) Reimbursements to 5205222-State System of Support ........................ −500,000 Provisions: 1. The agent selected pursuant to Section 52074 of the Education Code shall develop and administer the operating budget of the California Collaborative for Educational Excellence, with approval of the Department of Finance. Any changes to the approved operating budget shall be resubmitted to the Department of Finance for approval prior to execution. 2. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (1), $1,470,000 shall be allocated by the Controller directly to the agent selected pursuant to Section 52074 of the Education Code to oversee California Collaborative for Educational Excellence responsibilities with respect to these funds and to meet the costs of participation pursuant to Section 52074 of the Education Code. The funds appropriated to the agent shall be reassessed annually to consider changes in the cost of administering the collaborative. 3. Upon liquidation of funds by the administrative agent selected pursuant to Section 52074 of the Education Code, any interest earned by the administrative agent on funding provided through this item shall be used to support operational costs of the collaborative. 4. The amount appropriated in Schedule (2) shall be available for activities to build the capacity of local educational agencies consistent with subdivision (b) of Section 52059.5 of the Education Code and the approved operating budget developed pursuant to Provision 1, with activities focused on the following: (a) County offices of education providing technical assistance pursuant to Section 52071 of the Education Code. Activities may include, but are not limited to, facilitation of technical assistance between county offices of education and school districts and county office of education-focused professional learning networks. (b) Geographic lead agencies that are providing technical assistance pursuant to Sections 52073 and 52073.1 of the Education Code, and special education resource leads selected pursuant to Section 52073.2 of the Education Code. (c) Other activities pursuant to Sections 52073, 52073.1, and 52073.5 of the Education Code, as reflected in the approved operating budget developed pursuant to Provision 1. (d) Staff and resource development for local educational agency personnel to ensure timely delivery of technical assistance pursuant to Section 52071 of the Education Code. The California Collaborative for Educational Excellence shall use state professional associations, private organizations, and public agencies to provide guidance, support, and the delivery of training services. (e) Systemic reviews of school districts, pursuant to Section 52074 of the Education Code, that have received an emergency apportionment. 5. The agent shall provide the Department of Finance, the Legislative Analyst’s Office, and the appropriate legislative fiscal committees a detailed expenditure report upon request. This report shall include an accounting of all revenues, including funds not appropriated by the Legislature, revenue generated through fees charged to local educational agencies for services provided pursuant to Section 52074 of the Education Code, expenditures, and any anticipated revenues and proposed expenditures for the period specified in the request. 6. Notwithstanding any other law, funds appropriated in Schedules (1), (2), and (3), to an administrative agent selected pursuant to Section 52074 of the Education Code to oversee the California Collaborative for Educational Excellence, shall be allocated by the Controller directly to that administrative agent as soon as possible, but no later than 60 days after the enactment of this act. Funds appropriated in this item shall not be subject to grant allocation or review processes by the State Department of Education or the Superintendent of Public Instruction. 7. For the 2025–26 fiscal year to the 2026–27 fiscal year, the administrative agent selected pursuant to Section 52074 of the Education Code may use up to $1,150,000 in existing funds appropriated pursuant to Item 6100-106-0001 of the Budget Act of 2020 (Chs. 6 and 7, Stats. 2020) to support the implementation of the digitized individualized education program statewide template. 8. For the 2025–26 fiscal year, the administrative agent selected pursuant to Section 52074 of the Education Code may use up to $480,000 in existing funds appropriated pursuant to Item 6100-106-0001 of the Budget Act of 2021 (Chs. 21, 69, and 240, Stats. 2021) and up to $20,000 in existing funds appropriated pursuant to Item 6100-106-0001 of the Budget Act of 2020 (Chs. 6 and 7, Stats. 2020) to supplement funds appropriated pursuant to Schedule (2) for activities outlined in the operating budget developed pursuant to Provision 1 consistent with Section 52072, Section 52072.5, and paragraph (1) of subdivision (g) of Section 52074 of the Education Code. 6100-107-0001—For local assistance, State Department of Education (Proposition 98), County Offices of Education Fiscal Oversight ........................ 9,224,000 Schedule: (1) 5200028-School Apportionment—​County Office of Education ........................ 6,734,000 (2) 5200050-School Apportionment—​County Office of Education Fiscal Oversight: Education Audit Appeal Panel ........................ 42,000 (3) 5200054-School Apportionment—​County Office of Education Oversight: Interim Reporting ........................ 986,000 (4) 5200058-School Apportionment—​County Office of Education Oversight: Staff Development ........................ 1,462,000 Provisions: 1. Funds appropriated in this item shall be considered offsetting revenues within the meaning of subdivision (e) of Section 17556 of the Government Code for any reimbursable mandated cost claim for school district and county office of education fiscal accountability reporting. Local educational agencies accepting funding from this item shall reduce their estimated and actual mandate reimbursement claims by the amount of funding provided to them from this item. 2. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (1): (a) $5,851,000 shall be allocated by the Controller directly to a county office of education selected pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 42127.8 of the Education Code to oversee Fiscal Crisis and Management Assistance Team (FCMAT) responsibilities with respect to these funds and to meet the costs of participation under Section 42127.8 of the Education Code. (b) $500,000 shall be allocated to FCMAT to supplement the funds provided in subdivision (a) of this provision to support the performance of any responsibilities under Section 42127.8 of the Education Code. These funds shall only be made available for expenditure upon request of the Chief Financial Officer of FCMAT, subject to the approval of the Director of Finance. (c) $383,000 shall be allocated to FCMAT for the purpose of providing, through computer technology, financial and demographic information that is interactive and immediately accessible to all local educational agencies to assist them in their decisionmaking process. To ensure a completely integrated system, this computer information should be developed in collaboration with the State Department of Education, and should be compatible with the hardware and software of the department, so that this information may also assist state-level policymakers in making comparable standardized financial information available to the local educational agencies and the public. 3. Funds appropriated in Schedule (2) are for the additional staff and resources needed for FCMAT to ensure that timely resolution of audit findings is achieved pursuant to the directives of Section 41344 of the Education Code. 4. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (3): (a) $115,000 shall be available for no more than a 25-percent state reimbursement to county offices of education for fiscal oversight of school districts with audit exceptions, districts with qualified or negative interim reports, districts that may be unable to meet financial obligations for the current or subsequent fiscal years, or districts with disapproved budgets. (b) Up to $871,000 of the funds may be used to fully reimburse county offices of education activities for extraordinary costs of audits, examinations, or reviews of any school district or charter school in cases in which fraud, misappropriation of funds, or other illegal fiscal practices require review by the county offices of education, pursuant to Section 1241.5 of the Education Code. The State Board of Education may request any county superintendent of schools to initiate such an audit, examination, or review for any charter school or all-charter district for which the board has oversight responsibility. Allocation of the funds shall be administered by FCMAT on a reimbursement basis. All reimbursements shall be subject to the approval of both the Department of Finance and the State Department of Education. 5. The amount appropriated in Schedule (3) shall be available until July 30, 2027, for the following, in order of descending priority: (a) Any review or audit jointly requested by the State Department of Education and the Department of Finance, to be conducted by a county superintendent of schools in cases in which fraud, misappropriation of funds, or other illegal fiscal practices are suspected. (b) Staff development pursuant to Provision 7. (c) Regional assistance teams developed pursuant to subdivision (b) of Provision 2. 6. Notwithstanding Section 26.00, the funds appropriated in this item shall be allocated in accordance with the above schedule unless a revision to the allocations contained herein has been approved by the Department of Finance. The Department of Finance may not authorize any such revision sooner than 30 days after notification in writing of the necessity to the chairpersons of the committees in each house of the Legislature that consider appropriations and the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, or not sooner than whatever lesser time the chairperson of the joint committee, or the chairperson’s designee, may in each instance determine. 7. (a) The funds appropriated in Schedule (4) are for the purpose of providing staff development to local educational agency school finance and business personnel, as provided in Section 42127.8 of the Education Code. Funds appropriated in Schedule (4) shall be allocated by the Controller directly to a county office of education selected pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 42127.8 of the Education Code to oversee FCMAT’s responsibilities with respect to these funds. (b) Of the funds in Schedule (4), $150,000 of the funds shall be used to support professional learning opportunities offered to local educational agencies by FCMAT. 8. Notwithstanding any other law, funds appropriated in Schedules (1), (2), (3), and (4), to a county office of education selected pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 42127.8 of the Education Code to oversee FCMAT responsibilities shall be allocated by the Controller directly to that county office of education as soon as possible, but no later than 60 days after the enactment of this act. Funds appropriated in this item shall not be subject to grant allocation or review processes by the State Department of Education or the Superintendent of Public Instruction. The county office of education that receives these funds shall annually provide a report detailing past year expenditures, identifying the local educational agencies (LEAs) assisted with these funds, and a summary of progress for each. Additionally, the report shall identify a plan for the proposed uses of the allocations in this item, identifying estimated expenditures for each LEA anticipated to be served. This report shall be submitted to the State Department of Education and to the Department of Finance by October 1 of each year. 6100-110-0001—For local assistance, State Department of Education (Proposition 98), Expanded Learning Opportunities Program ........................ 4,669,186,000 Schedule: (1) 5200010-School Apportionment ........................ 4,669,186,000 Provisions: 1. The funds appropriated in this item shall be allocated to school districts and charter schools to increase access to comprehensive before school or after school and intersessional expanded learning opportunities, in addition to expanded learning opportunities on non-school days pursuant to Section 46120 of the Education Code. 2.It is the intent of the Legislature that local educational agencies that receive funding from this item pursuant to subparagraph (D) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (d) of Education Code Section 46120 have a per-unit rate of no less than $1,575. 6100-112-0890—For local assistance, State Department of Education, payable from the Federal Trust Fund ........................ 33,668,000 Schedule: (1) 5205110-Public Charter Schools ........................ 33,668,000 Provisions: 1. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (1), $16,515,000 in federal carryover is provided on a one-time basis to support the existing program. 6100-113-0001—For local assistance, State Department of Education (Proposition 98), for purposes of California’s pupil testing program ........................ 107,324,000 Schedule: (1) 5205200-Assessment Review and Reporting ........................ 1,539,000 (2) 5205204-English Language Development Assessment ........................ 9,221,000 (3) 5205208-California Student Assessment System ........................ 72,784,000 (4) 5205218-Assessment Apportionments ........................ 23,780,000 Provisions: 1. The funds appropriated in this item shall be for the pupil testing programs authorized by Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 48400) of Part 27 of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Education Code and Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 60600), Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 60800), and Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 60810) of Part 33 of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Education Code. 2. The funds appropriated in Schedule (3) are provided for contract costs for the implementation of the statewide pupil assessment system established pursuant to Chapter 489 of the Statutes of 2013, as approved by the State Board of Education, including funding for the Lexile® and Quantile® measures of learning and access to the Lexile® and Quantile® Hubs, and are contingent upon the Department of Finance’s review of the related contract, during contract negotiations, prior to its execution. 3. The funds appropriated in Schedule (2) shall be available for approved contract costs for the development of, transition to, and administration of the English Language Proficiency Assessments for California, which include initial identification and annual assessments aligned to the state English language development standards in accordance with Chapter 478 of the Statutes of 2013, and are contingent upon the submittal of the related contract by the State Department of Education and the Department of Finance. 4. Funds provided to local educational agencies from Schedules (2), (3), and (4) shall first be used to offset any state-mandated reimbursable costs within the meaning of Section 17556 of the Government Code that otherwise may be claimed through the state mandates reimbursement process for the California Assessment of Student Performance and Progress, the English Language Proficiency Assessments for California, and the statewide pupil assessment system established pursuant to Chapter 489 of the Statutes of 2013. Local educational agencies receiving funding from these schedules shall reduce their estimated and actual mandate reimbursement claims by the amount of funding provided to them from these schedules. 5. Notwithstanding Section 28.50, the Department of Finance may adjust Schedules (5) and (6) to reflect changes in actual reimbursements from the contractor for the California Proficiency Program. 6. Federal funds provided in Item 6100-113-0890 for statewide testing purposes shall be fully expended before General Fund resources provided in this item are expended for the same purposes. 7. The funds appropriated in Schedule (4) shall be used to pay approved apportionment costs from the current and prior test administrations for the California Assessment of Student Performance and Progress, the English Language Proficiency Assessments for California, and the statewide pupil assessment system established pursuant to Chapter 489 of the Statutes of 2013 and the grade 2 diagnostic assessments pursuant to Section 60644 of the Education Code. 8. The Department of Finance, State Department of Education, Legislative Analyst’s Office and legislative staff, and the vendor or vendors of the state’s California Assessment of Student Performance and Progress and English Language Proficiency Assessments for California contract shall meet on an annual basis every October and April to review detailed fiscal information regarding the current components and costs of the contract. The group also shall explore ways to make annual improvements to the state’s assessment system or achieve related savings. 6100-113-0890—For local assistance, State Department of Education—​Title I, Part B, State Assessment Grant, payable from the Federal Trust Fund ........................ 18,713,000 Schedule: (1) 5205200-Assessment Review and Reporting ........................ 898,000 (2) 5205204-English Language Development Assessment ........................ 14,333,000 (3) 5205208-California Student Assessment System ........................ 3,482,000 Provisions: 1. The funds appropriated in Schedule (3) are provided for contract costs for the implementation of the statewide pupil assessment system established pursuant to Chapter 489 of the Statutes of 2013, as approved by the State Board of Education, including funding for the Lexile® and Quantile® measures of learning and access to the Lexile® and Quantile® Hubs, and are contingent upon the Department of Finance’s review of the related contract during contract negotiations and prior to its execution. 2. The funds appropriated in Schedule (2) shall be available for approved contract costs for the development of, transition to, and administration of the English Language Proficiency Assessments for California, which include initial identification and annual assessments aligned to the state English language development standards in accordance with Chapter 478 of the Statutes of 2013, and are contingent upon the submittal of the related contract by the State Department of Education and the Department of Finance. Ongoing funding for the English Language Proficiency Assessments for California shall be contingent upon an appropriation in the annual Budget Act. 3. Funds appropriated in Schedule (1) are for providing local educational agencies information regarding federal requirements associated with assessments. 4. Funds provided to local educational agencies from Schedules (2) and (3) shall first be used to offset any state-mandated reimbursable costs, within the meaning of subdivision (e) of Section 17556 of the Government Code, that otherwise may be claimed through the state mandates reimbursement process for the statewide pupil assessment system established pursuant to Chapter 489 of the Statutes of 2013, the California Assessment of Student Performance and Progress, and the English Language Proficiency Assessments for California. Local educational agencies receiving funding from these schedules shall reduce their estimated and actual mandate reimbursement claims by the amount of funding provided to them from these schedules. 5. Federal funds provided in this item for statewide testing purposes shall be fully expended before General Fund resources provided in Item 6100-113-0001 are expended for the same purposes. 6. The Department of Finance, State Department of Education, Legislative Analyst’s Office and legislative staff, and the vendor or vendors of the state’s California Assessment of Student Performance and Progress and English Language Proficiency Assessments for California contract shall meet on an annual basis every October and April to review detailed fiscal information regarding the current components and costs of the contract. The group also shall explore ways to make annual improvements to the state’s assessment system or to achieve related savings. 6100-117-0890—For local assistance, State Department of Education, payable from the Federal Trust Fund ........................ 9,025,000 Schedule: (1) 5205011-Comprehensive Literacy Development Grant ........................ 9,025,000 Provisions: 1. The State Department of Education shall support the integration of the federal Comprehensive Literacy State Development Grant into the Literacy Roadmap from fiscal year 2025–26 through fiscal year 2028–29. 6100-119-0001—For local assistance, State Department of Education (Proposition 98), pursuant to Chapter 11.3 (commencing with Section 42920) of Part 24 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Education Code ........................ 34,103,000 Schedule: (1) 5205086-Educational Services for Foster Youth ........................ 34,103,000 Provisions: 1. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $952,000 is to reflect a cost-of-living adjustment. 6100-119-0890—For local assistance, State Department of Education, payable from the Federal Trust Fund ........................ 1,140,000 Schedule: (1) 5200137-Title I: Program for Neglected and Delinquent Children ........................ 1,140,000 6100-122-0001—For local assistance, State Department of Education (Proposition 98), pursuant to Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 58800) of Part 31 of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Education Code ........................ 4,892,000 Schedule: (1) 5205090-Specialized Secondary Program ........................ 4,892,000 Provisions: 1. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $1,500,000 shall be allocated to Specialized Secondary Programs established prior to the 1991–92 fiscal year that operate in conjunction with the California State University. 6100-125-0890—For local assistance, State Department of Education, payable from the Federal Trust Fund ........................ 281,680,000 Schedule: (1) 5200111-Title I, Elementary and Secondary Education Act, Migrant Education ........................ 119,415,000 (2) 5205015-ESEA Title I, Migrant Education State Level Activities ........................ 14,114,000 (3) 5205019-Title III, Language Acquisition ........................ 148,151,000 Provisions: 1. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (2), the State Department of Education shall use no less than $6,500,000 and up to $8,000,000 for the Mini-Corps Program. 2. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (1), $9,738,000 in federal carryover is provided on a one-time basis to support the existing program. 3. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (2), $205,000 in federal carryover is provided on a one-time basis to support the existing program. 4. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (3), $6,215,000 in federal carryover is provided on a one-time basis to support the existing program. 6100-134-0890—For local assistance, State Department of Education, payable from the Federal Trust Fund ........................ 2,471,293,000 Schedule: (1) 5200103-Statewide System of School Support ........................ 5,000,000 (2) 5200135-Title I, Elementary and Secondary Education Act ........................ 2,305,789,000 (3) 5200120-Title IV, Student Support and Academic Enrichment ........................ 160,504,000 Provisions: 1. In administering the accountability system required by this item, the State Department of Education shall align the forms, processes, and procedures required of local educational agencies so that duplication of effort is minimized at the local level. 2. The State Department of Education shall provide to the Legislature, the Legislative Analyst’s Office, and the Department of Finance a letter by April 15, of each year, reporting expenditures and anticipated savings for each schedule, based on available information. 3. The funds appropriated in this item shall be considered offsetting revenues within the meaning of subdivision (e) of Section 17556 of the Government Code for any reimbursable mandated cost claim for activities that result from implementation of the California State Plan for the federal Every Student Succeeds Act (P.L. 114-95). Local educational agencies accepting funding from this item shall reduce any estimated and actual mandate reimbursement claims by the amount of funding provided to them from this item. 4. The State Department of Education shall submit an expenditure plan prior to the expenditure of funds to the Department of Finance and the Joint Legislative Budget Committee that includes the use of federal funds pursuant to the California State Plan for the federal Every Student Succeeds Act (P.L. 114-95). 5. As a condition of receipt of funds appropriated in this item, the local educational agency’s plan for use of federal funds required pursuant to Section 1112 of Part A of Title I of the federal Elementary and Secondary Education Act of 1965 (20 U.S.C. Sec. 6312) shall be approved by the State Board of Education. Approval of such plans shall be contingent on the local educational agency’s demonstration that its planned use of the federal funds will supplement and enhance local priorities or initiatives funded with state funds, as reflected in the local educational agency’s local control and accountability plan. 6. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (2), no less than $150,123,000 is available for purposes of providing grants to local educational agencies with schools identified as requiring support, consistent with the California State Plan for the federal Every Student Succeeds Act (P.L. 114-95). The State Department of Education shall develop and administer a process for providing grants from these funds on a formula basis to local educational agencies with schools identified as requiring support. Local educational agencies shall use the funds for the development of strategies to improve pupil performance at schools identified as requiring support that are aligned to goals, actions, and services identified in the local educational agency’s local control and accountability plan. Such funds shall not be expended to hire additional permanent staff. 7. The funds appropriated in Schedule (1) shall be allocated to county offices of education for the purposes of supporting development and implementation of comprehensive support and improvement (CSI) plans in coordination with the statewide system support for local educational agencies established in the California State Plan for the federal Every Student Succeeds Act (P.L. 114-95). The State Department of Education shall develop, in consultation with the Executive Director of the State Board of Education and with the approval of the Department of Finance, the method of allocation for these funds, which shall be based on a formula that considers the number of schools within a county that are identified for additional support consistent with the California State Plan for the federal Every Student Succeeds Act (P.L. 114-95). 8. The funds appropriated in Schedule (3) are available on a one-time basis, and shall be used in accordance with Part A of Title IV of the federal Every Student Succeeds Act (P.L. 114-95). 9. The funds appropriated in Schedule (3) shall be allocated to local educational agencies pursuant to Section 4105 of the federal Elementary and Secondary Education Act of 1965 (20 U.S.C. Sec. 7115), as reauthorized by the federal Every Student Succeeds Act (P.L. 114-95). 10. For purposes of performing the calculation to ensure that no less than 95 percent of the state’s reserve is being allocated as grants to local educational agencies, pursuant to Section 1003 of the federal Every Student Succeeds Act (P.L. 114-95), the amount appropriated in Schedule (1) and the amount specified in Provision 6 shall be added together. 11. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (2), $5,000,000 shall be allocated to county offices of education for the purposes of review and approval of comprehensive support and improvement (CSI) plans through the CSI prompts in the local control and accountability plan. The method of allocation shall be the same as the one developed and approved pursuant to Provision 7. 12. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (2), $3,300,000 is provided in one-time federal Every Student Succeeds Act (P.L. 114-95), Title I, carryover to support the existing program. 6100-136-0001—For local assistance, State Department of Education (Proposition 98), for homeless education technical assistance centers ........................ 1,500,000 Schedule: (1) 5200139-McKinney-Vento Homeless Children Education ........................ 1,500,000 6100-136-0890—For local assistance, State Department of Education, payable from the Federal Trust Fund ........................ 15,609,000 Schedule: (1) 5200139-McKinney-Vento Homeless Children Education ........................ 15,609,000 Provisions: 1. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (1), $926,000 in federal carryover is provided on a one-time basis to support the existing program. 6100-137-0890—For local assistance, State Department of Education, payable from the Federal Trust Fund ........................ 5,507,000 Schedule: (1) 5205023-Rural and Low-Income Schools Grant ........................ 5,507,000 6100-140-0001—For local assistance, State Department of Education (Proposition 98), pursuant to Article 6 (commencing with Section 49080) of Chapter 6.5 of Part 27 of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Education Code ........................ 9,312,000 Schedule: (1) 5205243-California School Information Services ........................ 9,312,000 Provisions: 1. The funds appropriated in this item shall be allocated to the Fiscal Crisis and Management Assistance Team (FCMAT) for California School Information Services (CSIS), pursuant to the memorandum of understanding with the State Department of Education in support of the California Longitudinal Pupil Achievement Data System (CALPADS). As a condition of receiving funds appropriated in this item, CSIS shall submit an expenditure plan with workload justification to the Department of Finance and the Legislative Analyst’s Office by November 1 of each year. The expenditure plan shall include at a minimum: (a) positions filled and intended to be filled, (b) salaries and benefits, (c) external contracts, (d) other operating expenses, and (e) equipment expenses. The workload information shall include, at a minimum, activities performed by CSIS and by the State Department of Education to implement CALPADS, workload associated with maintenance of CALPADS, and assistance provided to local educational agencies in transmission of data to CALPADS. The expenditure plan and workload data shall provide information for the prior year, current year, and budget year. 6100-149-0001—For local assistance, State Department of Education (Proposition 98), for allocation by the Superintendent of Public Instruction to school districts, county offices of education, and other agencies for the purposes of the After School Education and Safety Program, pursuant to Article 22.5 (commencing with Section 8482) of Chapter 2 of Part 6 of Division 1 of Title 1 of the Education Code ........................ 248,689,000 Schedule: (1) 5210048-After School Programs ........................ 194,866,000 (2) 5210050-21st Century Community Learning Centers ........................ 53,823,000 Provisions: 1. The funds appropriated in this item shall be used for the After School Education and Safety Program as specified in Article 22.5 (commencing with Section 8482) of Chapter 2 of Part 6 of Division 1 of Title 1 of the Education Code. 2. This funding shall be used to increase the daily per-pupil rates and maximum grant amounts. The State Department of Education shall adjust the dollar amounts specified in Sections 8482.55, 8483.7, 8483.75, and 8483.76 of the Education Code in accordance with the amount provided. 3. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (1) of this item, $94,866,000 is provided to maintain 2021–22 rate increases for the After School Education and Safety Program in 2026–27. 4. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (2) of this item, $53,823,000 is provided to maintain 2021–22 rate increases for the 21st Century Community Learning Centers program in 2026–27. 6100-150-0001—For local assistance, State Department of Education (Proposition 98), pursuant to former Chapter 6.5 (commencing with Section 52060) of Part 28 of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Education Code ........................ 741,000 Schedule: (1) 5200131-American Indian Early Childhood Education Program ........................ 741,000 Provisions: 1. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $21,000 is to reflect a cost-of-living adjustment. 6100-151-0001—For local assistance, State Department of Education (Proposition 98), pursuant to Article 6 (commencing with Section 33380) of Chapter 3 of Part 20 of Division 2 of Title 2 of the Education Code ........................ 5,483,000 Schedule: (1) 5200127-California American Indian Education Centers ........................ 5,483,000 Provisions: 1. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $153,000 is to reflect a cost-of-living adjustment. 6100-156-0001—For local assistance, State Department of Education (Proposition 98) ........................ 0 Schedule: (1) 5200164-Adult Education: Remedial Education ........................ 8,739,000 (2) Reimbursements to 5200164-Adult Education: Remedial Education ........................ −8,739,000 (3) 5200162-Adult Education ........................ 0 (4) Reimbursements to 5200162-Adult Education ........................ 0 Provisions: 1. The funds appropriated in Schedule (1) are for the support of remedial adult education. (a) Credit for participating in adult education classes or programs may be generated by a special day class pupil only for days in which the pupil has met the minimum day requirements set forth in Section 46141 of the Education Code. (b) The funds appropriated in Schedule (1) constitute the funding for both remedial education and job training services for participants in the CalWORKs program (Article 3.2 (commencing with Section 11320) of Chapter 2 of Part 3 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code). Funds shall be apportioned by the Superintendent of Public Instruction for direct instructional costs only to school districts and regional occupational centers and programs (ROC/Ps) that certify that they are unable to provide educational services to CalWORKs recipients within their adult education block entitlement, or ROC/P block entitlement, or both. Allocations shall be distributed by the Superintendent of Public Instruction as equal statewide dollar amounts, based on the number of CalWORKs-eligible family members served in the county. (c) Providers receiving funds under this item for adult basic education, English as a Second Language, and English as a Second Language-Citizenship for legal permanent residents, shall, to the extent possible, grant priority for services to immigrants facing the loss of federal benefits under the federal Personal Responsibility and Work Opportunity Reconciliation Act of 1996 (P.L. 104-193). Citizenship and naturalization preparation services funded by this item shall include, to the extent consistent with applicable federal law, all of the following: (1) outreach services, (2) assessment of skills, (3) instruction and curriculum development, (4) professional development, (5) citizenship testing, (6) naturalization preparation and assistance, and (7) regional and state coordination and program evaluation. (d) The funds appropriated in Schedule (1) shall be subject to the following: (1) The funds shall be used only for educational activities for welfare recipient pupils and those in transition off of welfare. The educational activities shall be limited to those designed to increase self-sufficiency, job training, and work. These funds shall be used to supplement and not supplant existing funds and services provided for welfare recipient pupils and those in transition off of welfare. (2) Notwithstanding any other law, each local educational agency’s individual cap for the average daily attendance of adult education and regional occupational centers and programs (ROC/Ps) shall not be increased as a result of the appropriations made by this item. (3) Funds may be claimed by local educational agencies for services provided to welfare recipient pupils and those in transition off of welfare pursuant to this section only if all of the following occur: (A) Each local educational agency has met the terms of the interagency agreement between the State Department of Education and the State Department of Social Services pursuant to subdivision (b) of this provision. (B) Each local educational agency has fully claimed its respective adult education or ROC/Ps average daily attendance cap for the current year. (C) Each local educational agency has claimed the maximum allowable funds available under the interagency agreement pursuant to subdivision (b) of this provision. (4) Each local educational agency shall be reimbursed at the same rate as it would otherwise receive for services provided pursuant to this item, Item 6100-105-0001, or Section 1.80, and shall comply with the program requirements for adult education pursuant to Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 52500) of Part 28 of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Education Code, and ROC/Ps requirements pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with Section 52300) of, and Article 1.5 (commencing with Section 52335) of, Chapter 9 of Part 28 of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Education Code, respectively. (5) Notwithstanding any other law, funds appropriated in this section for average daily attendance (ADA) generated by participants in the CalWORKs program may be apportioned on an advance basis to local educational agencies based on anticipated units of ADA if a prior application for this additional ADA funding has been approved by the Superintendent of Public Instruction. (6) The State Department of Education shall maintain a data and accountability system to obtain information on education and job training services provided through state-funded adult education programs and regional occupational centers and programs. The system shall collect information on (A) program funding levels and sources, (B) characteristics of participants, and (C) pupil and program outcomes. The department shall meet all information technology reporting requirements of the Director of Technology. (7) As a condition of receiving funds provided in Schedule (1) or any General Fund appropriation made to the State Department of Education specifically for education and training services to welfare recipient pupils and those in transition off of welfare, local adult education programs and regional occupational centers and programs shall collect program and participant data as described in this item and as required by the State Department of Education. The State Department of Education shall require that local providers submit to the state aggregate data for the period July 1, 2026, to June 30, 2027, inclusive. 2. The funds appropriated in Schedule (3) are for the support of the Adult Education Program. 6100-156-0890—For local assistance, State Department of Education, payable from the Federal Trust Fund ........................ 130,299,000 Schedule: (1) 5200162-Adult Education ........................ 130,299,000 Provisions: 1. The State Department of Education shall reimburse claims on a quarterly basis from qualifying community-based organizations that provide adult basic education under this item. 2. Notwithstanding any other law, all nonlocal educational agencies (non-LEAs) expending greater than $1,000,000 in a fiscal year pursuant to this item shall submit an annual organizational audit, as specified, to the State Department of Education, Office of External Audits. All audits shall be performed by one of the following: (1) a certified public accountant possessing a valid license to practice within California, (2) a member of the department’s staff of auditors, or (3) in-house auditors, if the entity receiving funds pursuant to this item is a public agency, and if the public agency has internal staff that performs auditing functions and meets the tests of independence found in Government Auditing Standards issued by the Comptroller General of the United States. The audit shall be in accordance with State Department of Education audit guidelines and the Uniform Administrative Requirements, Cost Principles, and Audit Requirements for Federal Awards (2 C.F.R. Part 200). Non-LEA entities receiving funds pursuant to this item shall submit the annual audit no later than six months from the end of the agency fiscal year. If, for any reason, the contract is terminated during the contract period, the audit shall cover the period from the beginning of the contract through the date of termination. Non-LEA entities receiving funds pursuant to this item shall be held liable for all department costs incurred in obtaining an independent audit if the contractor fails to produce or submit an acceptable audit. 3. The State Department of Education shall continue to ensure that outcome measures for State Department of State Hospitals and State Department of Developmental Services clients are set at a level where these clients will continue to be eligible for adult education services in the current fiscal year and beyond to the full extent authorized under federal law. The State Department of Education shall also consult with the State Department of State Hospitals, State Department of Developmental Services, and Department of Finance for this purpose. 4. When the State Department of Education Request for Application (RFA) is publicly available, the RFA for these funds shall include the incorporation of core federal performance metrics, including placement in postsecondary education, transition into employment, and retention of employment included in the performance targets of participating agencies. The RFA shall also request information regarding the extent to which applicants are coordinating services as part of consortia established pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 84830) of Chapter 5 of Part 50 of Division 7 of Title 3 of the Education Code and indicate that priority will be given to applicants that provide evidence of demonstrated effectiveness through performance data on its record of improving skills of eligible individuals, particularly those who have low levels of literacy. The Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act California state plan shall serve as the source document of the RFA. 5. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $20,095,000 in a one-time federal carryover is available to support the existing program. limited-term, healthcare-focused vocational pathways, including bridge programs, for English language learners across all levels of English proficiency through the Adult Education Program. The Chancellor of the California Community Colleges, State Department of Education, Labor and Workforce Development Agency, and California Health and Human Services Agency shall collaborate to develop guidance to assist the Adult Education consortia in developing pathways focused on local programs intended to support healthcare and care economy workforce needs. 6100-158-0001—For local assistance, State Department of Education (Proposition 98), in lieu of the amount that otherwise would be appropriated pursuant to Section 41841.5 of the Education Code for adults in correctional facilities ........................ 9,701,000 Schedule: (1) 5200163-Adults in Correctional Facilities Program ........................ 9,701,000 Provisions: 1. Notwithstanding Section 41841.5 of the Education Code, or any other law, all of the following shall apply: (a) The amount appropriated in this item and any amount allocated for this program in this act shall be the only funds available for allocation by the Superintendent of Public Instruction to school districts or county offices of education for the Adults in Correctional Facilities Program. (b) The amount appropriated in this item shall be allocated based upon 2025–26 rather than 2026–27 expenditures. (c) Funding distributed to each LEA for reimbursement of services provided in the 2025–26 fiscal year for the Adults in Correctional Facilities Program shall be limited to the amount received by the agency for services provided in the 2024–25 fiscal year, increased by the percentage change determined and provided pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (d) of Section 42238.02 of the Education Code for the 2025–26 fiscal year. Funding shall be reduced or eliminated, as appropriate, for any LEA that reduces or eliminates services provided under this program in the 2025–26 fiscal year, as compared to the level of services provided in the 2024–25 fiscal year. Any funds remaining as a result of those decreased levels of service shall be allocated to provide support for new programs in accordance with Section 41841.8 of the Education Code. (d) Funding appropriated in this item for growth in ADA first shall be allocated to programs that are funded for 20 units or less of ADA, up to a maximum of 20 additional units of ADA per program. 6100-161-0001—For local assistance, State Department of Education (Proposition 98), Special Education Programs for Exceptional Children ........................ 7,810,787,0007,890,787,000 Schedule: (1) 5200201-Special Education Program for Individuals with Exceptional Needs ........................ 7,456,005,0007,536,005,000 (2) 5200206-Special Education Early Intervention Grant ........................ 260,000,000 (3) 5200217-Early Education Program for Individuals with Exceptional Needs ........................ 109,027,000 (4) Reimbursements to 5200217-Early Education Program for Individuals with Exceptional Needs ........................ −14,245,000 Provisions: 1. Funds appropriated in this item are for transfer by the Controller in lieu of the amount that otherwise would be appropriated for transfer from the General Fund in the State Treasury for the 2026–27 fiscal year pursuant to Sections 14002 and 41301 of the Education Code, for apportionment pursuant to Part 30 (commencing with Section 56000) of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Education Code, superseding all prior law. 2. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (1), up to $137,773,000 $177,773,000 shall be available to provide special education and related services to pupils with low-incidence disabilities pursuant to their individualized education program. The Superintendent of Public Instruction shall allocate these funds to special education local plan areas on an equal per-pupil rate using the methodology specified in Section 56836.22 of the Education Code. 3. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (1), up to $39,738,000 shall be available for the purposes of vocational training and job placement for special education pupils through Project Workability I pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 56470) of Chapter 4.5 of Part 30 of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Education Code. As a condition of receiving these funds, each local educational agency shall certify that the amount of nonfederal resources, exclusive of funds received pursuant to this provision, devoted to the provision of vocational education for special education pupils shall be maintained at or above the level provided in the 1984–85 fiscal year. The Superintendent of Public Instruction may waive this requirement for local educational agencies that demonstrate that the requirement would impose a severe hardship. 4. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (1), up to $166,104,000 is available to fund the costs of children placed in licensed children’s institutions who attend nonpublic schools based on the funding formula authorized in Chapter 44 of the Statutes of 2021. 5. Funds available for infant units shall be allocated with the following average number of pupils per unit: (a) For special classes and centers—​16. (b) For resource specialist programs—​24. (c) For designated instructional services—​16. 6. Notwithstanding any other law, early education programs for infants and toddlers shall be offered for 200 days. Funds appropriated in Schedule (3) shall be allocated by the State Department of Education for the 2026–27 fiscal year to those programs receiving allocations for instructional units pursuant to Section 56432 of the Education Code for the Early Education Program for Individuals with Exceptional Needs operated pursuant to Chapter 4.4 (commencing with Section 56425) of Part 30 of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Education Code, based on computing 200-day entitlements. 7. Notwithstanding any other law, state funds appropriated in Schedule (3) in excess of the amount necessary to fund the deficited entitlements pursuant to Section 56432 of the Education Code shall be available for allocation by the State Department of Education to local educational agencies for the operation of programs serving solely low-incidence infants and toddlers pursuant to Title 14 (commencing with Section 95000) of the Government Code. These funds shall be allocated to each local educational agency for each solely low-incidence child through two years of age in excess of the number of solely low-incidence children through two years of age served by the local educational agency during the 1992–93 fiscal year and reported on the April 1993 pupil count. These funds shall only be allocated if the amount of reimbursement received from the State Department of Developmental Services is insufficient to fully fund the costs of operating the Early Intervention Program, as authorized by Title 14 (commencing with Section 95000) of the Government Code. 8. Funds appropriated in this item, unless otherwise specified, are available for the sole purpose of funding 2026–27 fiscal year special education program costs and shall not be used to fund any prior year adjustments, claims, or costs. 9. Of the amount provided in Schedule (1), up to $207,000 shall be available to fully fund the declining enrollment of necessary small special education local plan areas pursuant to Chapter 551 of the Statutes of 2001. 10. Pursuant to Section 56427 of the Education Code, of the funds appropriated in Schedule (1), up to $2,324,000 may be used to provide funding for infant programs, and may be used for those programs that do not qualify for funding pursuant to Section 56432 of the Education Code. 11. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (1), up to $1,317,000 shall be used for a personnel development program. This program shall include state-sponsored staff development for special education personnel to have the necessary content knowledge and skills to serve children with disabilities. This funding may include training and services targeting special education teachers and related service personnel that teach core academic or multiple subjects to meet the applicable special education requirements of the federal Individuals with Disabilities Education Act (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1400 et seq.). 12. Notwithstanding any other law, state funds appropriated in Schedule (1) in excess of the amount necessary to fund the defined entitlement shall be to fulfill other shortages in entitlements budgeted in this schedule by the State Department of Education, upon Department of Finance approval, to any program funded under Schedule (1). 13. Of the amount specified in Schedule (1), $464,498,000 shall be available only to provide mental health related services to students with or without an individualized education program, including out-of-home residential services for emotionally disturbed pupils, pursuant to subdivision (f) of Section 56836.07 of the Education Code. The Superintendent of Public Instruction shall allocate these funds to local educational agencies based upon an equal rate per pupil using the methodology specified in Section 56836.07 of the Education Code. 14. The funds appropriated in this item reflect an adjustment to the base funding of −2.079 percent for the annual adjustment in statewide average daily attendance. 15. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (1), up to $20,000,000 $60,000,000 is available for extraordinary costs associated with single placements. Special education local plan areas are eligible to submit claims for costs exceeding the threshold amount calculated pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 56836.21 of the Education Code, on forms developed by the State Department of Education pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 56836.21 of the Education Code. Funds shall be first available to fully reimburse extraordinary costs associated with educationally related mental health services, including out-of-home residential services for necessary small special education local plan areas, as defined in Section 56212 of the Education Code. Remaining funds shall be available for reimbursements for placements in nonpublic, nonsectarian schools, pursuant to Section 56836.21 of the Education Code, and pupils residing in licensed children’s institutions. 16. The funds appropriated in Schedule (1) shall first be considered offsetting revenues within the meaning of subdivision (e) of Section 17556 of the Government Code for any reimbursable mandated cost claim for behavioral intervention plans (CSM 4464), inclusive of activities performed pursuant to Sections 56521.1 and 56521.2 of the Education Code. 17. Of the funds provided for in Schedule (1), $167,022,000 is to reflect a cost-of-living adjustment. 18. Of the funds provided for in Schedule (3), $3,042,000 is to reflect a cost-of-living adjustment. 19. Of the funds provided in Schedule (1), $12,000,000 shall be allocated by the Superintendent of Public Instruction to special education local plan areas, county offices of education or consortia of special education local plan areas, and county offices of education selected pursuant to Section 52073.2 of the Education Code to provide technical assistance to local educational agencies as provided in Section 52071 of the Education Code. 20. Of the funds provided in Schedule (1), the Superintendent of Public Instruction shall apportion the amount determined pursuant to Section 56836.24 of the Education Code for regionalized operations and services and the direct instructional support of program specialists to special education local plan areas that perform all functions pursuant to Section 56836.23 of the Education Code in accordance with the description set forth in its local plan adopted pursuant to Section 56205 of the Education Code. 21. Of the amount specified in Schedule (1), up to $3,846,000 shall be available for small special education local plan areas to conduct regionalized services, pursuant to Section 56836.31 of the Education Code. 22. The amount appropriated in Schedule (2) is available for the special education early intervention preschool grant pursuant to Section 56836.40 of the Education Code. 23. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (1), $2,120,000 is available for local assistance grants to monitor local educational agency compliance with state and federal statutes and regulations governing special education. This funding level is to be used to continue the facilitated reviews and, to the extent consistent with State Performance Plan/Annual Performance Report Indicators developed by the State Department of Education, these activities shall focus on local educational agencies identified by the United States Department of Education’s Office of Special Education Programs. Of this amount, no less than $1,400,000 shall be used for the Supporting Inclusive Practices Grant. 24. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (1), $14,032,000 shall be used for the purposes of the Family Empowerment Centers on Disability pursuant to Chapter 4.3 (commencing with Section 56400) of Part 30 of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Education Code. 6100-161-0890—For local assistance, State Department of Education, payable from the Federal Trust Fund, Special Education Programs for Exceptional Children ........................ 1,443,970,000 Schedule: (1) 5200203-Local Agency Entitlements, IDEA Special Education ........................ 1,320,685,000 (2) 5200209-State Level Activities, IDEA Special Education ........................ 79,747,000 (3) 5200211-Preschool Grant Program, IDEA Special Education ........................ 42,152,000 (4) 5200213-State Improvement Grant, IDEA Special Education ........................ 0 (5) 5200215-Family Empowerment Centers, IDEA Special Education ........................ 1,386,000 (6) 5205231-Supplemental Grants: Newborn Hearing Screening Grants ........................ 0 Provisions: 1. In accordance with federal law, the funds appropriated in Schedule (1) shall be distributed to local and state agencies on the basis of the federal Individuals with Disabilities Education Act (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1400 et seq.) permanent formula. 2. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (2), up to $1,950,000 shall be used to develop and test procedures, materials, and training for alternative dispute resolution in special education. 3. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (3) for the Preschool Grant Program, $1,228,000 shall be used for in-service training and shall include a parent training component and may, in addition, include a staff training program. These funds may be used to provide training in alternative dispute resolution and the local mediation of disputes. This program shall include state sponsored and local components. 4. The resources that were available for local assistance grants to monitor local educational agency compliance with state and federal laws and regulations governing special education and the Supporting Inclusive Practices Grant are in Schedule (1) of Item 6100-161-0001. 5. The resources available for the purposes of supporting Family Empowerment Centers on Disability pursuant to Chapter 4.3 (commencing with Section 56400) of Part 30 of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Education Code are in Schedule (1) of Item 6100-161-0001. 6. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (2), $69,000,000 shall be available only for the purpose of providing educationally related mental health services, including out-of-home residential services for emotionally disturbed pupils, required by an individualized education program pursuant to the federal Individuals with Disabilities Education Act (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1400 et seq.) and as described in Section 56363 of the Education Code. The Superintendent of Public Instruction shall allocate these funds to local educational agencies based upon an equal rate per pupil using the methodology specified in Section 56836.07 of the Education Code. 7. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (2), up to $3,894,000 shall be available for transfer to the state special schools for student transportation allowances. 8. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (2), up to $3,861,000 in federal Individuals with Disabilities Education Act (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1400 et seq.) funds shall be available for the State Department of Education to provide accessible instructional materials to local educational agencies. 9. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (2), up to $500,000 is provided to develop resources and provide technical assistance to local educational agencies for implementation of the State Systemic Improvement Plan. 10. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (3), no less than $500,000 shall be used for the Supporting Inclusive Practices Grant. 11. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (2), $542,000 is provided in fiscal year 2026–27 for the expansion of the California Technical Assistance Network servers and optimization of search capabilities. 12. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (3), $1,700,000 is available in one-time carryover funds. 13. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (5), $1,386,000 is available in one-time carryover funds. 6100-166-0001—For local assistance, State Department of Education (Proposition 98), for purposes of Article 5 (commencing with Section 54690) of Chapter 9 of Part 29 of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Education Code, Partnership Academies Program ........................ 21,428,000 Schedule: (1) 5200230-California Partnership Academies ........................ 18,831,000 (2) 5200232-Clean Technology Partnerships ........................ 2,597,000 Provisions: 1. If there are any funds in this item that are not allocated for planning or operational grants, the State Department of Education may allocate those remaining funds as one-time grants to state-funded partnership academies to be used for one-time purposes. 2. The State Department of Education shall not authorize new partnership academies without the approval of the Department of Finance and 30-day notification to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee. 3. Notwithstanding Provisions 1 and 2, the funds appropriated in Schedule (2) shall be available consistent with Article 5.5 (commencing with Section 54698) of Chapter 9 of Part 29 of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Education Code. 6100-166-0890—For local assistance, State Department of Education, payable from the Federal Trust Fund ........................ 163,725,000 Schedule: (1) 5200223-Vocational Education ........................ 163,725,000 Provisions: 1. The funds appropriated in this item include federal Perkins V Act funds for the current fiscal year to be transferred to the community colleges by means of interagency agreements for the purpose of funding career technical education programs in community colleges. 2. The State Board of Education and the Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges shall target funds appropriated in this item to provide services to persons participating in welfare-to-work activities under the CalWORKs program (Article 3.2 (commencing with Section 11320) of Chapter 2 of Part 3 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code). 3. The State Department of Education shall use its share of funds appropriated in this item to support no fewer than 6.0 full-time regional program consultants in agricultural career technical education within the State Department of Education, pursuant to Section 52452 of the Education Code. If the State Department of Education determines it is unable to support at least 6.0 full-time regional program consultants in agricultural career technical education with its share of federal Perkins V Act funding, the State Department of Education shall redirect $142,000 and 1.0 position provided in Provision 26 of Item 6100-001-0001 for this purpose. 4. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (1), $28,000,000 in federal carryover is provided on a one-time basis to support vocational education programs. 6100-167-0001—For local assistance, State Department of Education (Proposition 98), pursuant to Article 7.5 (commencing with Section 52460) of Chapter 9 of Part 28 of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Education Code ........................ 6,134,000 Schedule: (1) 5200233-Agricultural Career Technical Education Incentive Grant ........................ 6,134,000 Provisions: 1. As a condition of receiving funds appropriated in this item, a school district shall certify to the Superintendent of Public Instruction both of the following: (a) Agricultural Career Technical Education Incentive Program funds shall be expended for the items identified in its application, except that, in items of expenditure classification 4000, only the total cost of expenses shall be required and itemization shall not be required. (b) The school district shall provide at least 50 percent of the cost of the items and costs from expenditure classification 4000, as identified in its application, from other funding sources. This provision does not limit the authority of the Superintendent of Public Instruction to waive the local matching requirement established by subdivision (b) of Section 52461.5 of the Education Code. 6100-168-0001—For local assistance, State Department of Education (Proposition 98), pursuant to Chapter 16.5 (commencing with Section 53070) of Part 28 of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Education Code ........................ 300,000,000 Schedule: (1) 5205094-California Career Technical Education Incentive Grant Program ........................ 300,000,000 Provisions: 1. The funds appropriated in this item shall be used for the California Career Technical Education Incentive Grant Program as specified in Chapter 16.5 (commencing with Section 53070) of Part 28 of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Education Code. 6100-170-0001—For local assistance, State Department of Education (Proposition 98), pursuant to Section 88532 of the Education Code ........................ 15,360,000 Schedule: (1) 5205092-Career Technical Education Initiative ........................ 15,360,000 Provisions: 1. The funds appropriated in Schedule (1) are for improving linkages and career-technical education pathways between K–12 and community colleges in targeted industry-driven programs. Funds shall be used for purposes that align with the Strong Workforce Program and the recommendations of the Task Force on Workforce, Job Creation and a Strong Economy. 2. The Superintendent shall allocate the funds in this item for contracts and grants in accordance with Section 88532 of the Education Code as it read on January 1, 2017, including requiring outcome-based data from grant recipients and contractees. The expenditure plan required pursuant to Provision 3 shall list the outcome-based data metrics that will be used to evaluate applicants that are granted a contract or grant, and describe how the assistance provided by applicants that are granted a contract or grant will be assessed to determine its effectiveness in achieving the following goals: (a) Increasing the readiness of middle school and high school pupils for, and their access to, postsecondary education and careers in high-needed, high-growth, or emerging regional economic sectors. (b) Increasing student success in postsecondary education and training for careers in high-need, high-growth, or emerging regional economic sectors. 3. The Superintendent shall annually submit an expenditure plan for the funds in this item to the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the Legislature, to the Department of Finance, and to the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges at least 30 days before taking action to implement the expenditure plan. The expenditure plan shall contain, at a minimum, all of the following for each anticipated grant recipient and contractee: (a) Name of the grant recipient or contractee. (b) Name of the contract monitor, if applicable. (c) Grant award date or contract term. (d) Grant or contract amount. (e) Description of the project and purpose for which the grant or contract is awarded, including a description of how the project and purpose aligns with the Strong Workforce Program and the recommendations of the Task Force on Workforce, Job Creation and a Strong Economy as required pursuant to Provision 1. 4. The Superintendent shall submit a report to the Governor and the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the Legislature on or before October 1 of each year, including: (a) Outcome-based data and other assessment information submitted to the Superintendent pursuant to Provision 2. (b) Number of pupils and students served by programs funded through this item and information on expenditure of funding by type, industry, and region. 6100-172-0001—For local assistance, State Department of Education (Proposition 98), for college planning and preparation internet website ........................ 29,184,000 Schedule: (1) 5205227-Student Friendly Services ........................ 23,684,000 (2) 5205229-Online Educational Resources ........................ 5,500,000 Provisions: 1. The funds appropriated in this item shall be apportioned to the Riverside County Office of Education. 2. The funds appropriated in Schedule (1) shall be used to provide information regarding planning and preparation for postsecondary education and services related to matriculation to postsecondary educational institutions. 3. The Riverside County Office of Education shall report to the State Department of Education, the Director of Finance, and the Legislature, pursuant to Section 9795 of the Government Code, regarding the expenditures supported by this appropriation and the number and categories of students who accessed services through the program funded through Schedule (1). 4. (a) The funds appropriated in Schedule (2) shall be used for high-quality online instructional materials and educational resources, including resources for educators. Resources shall be available to local educational agencies at no cost. Up to 5 percent of the funds appropriated in Schedule (2) may be used for administrative costs by the Riverside County Office of Education. (b) No later November 15, 2026, the Riverside County Office of Education shall report to the State Department of Education, the Director of Finance, and the fiscal committees of the Legislature on the use of funds by fiscal year, beginning in the 2017–18 fiscal year, and include, at a minimum: (1) The total amount appropriated by fiscal year. (2) The contractors who were allocated funds, and the amount of funds that went to each contractor. The Riverside County Office of Education shall also include any increases in contract costs and the reason. (3) The total balance of carryover funds at the beginning of each fiscal year, and how much carryover funds are currently available. (4) The total amount reimbursed to the California State Library, by use of funds. (c) No later than November 15, 2026, the California State Library shall report to the State Department of Education. the Director of Finance. and the fiscal committees of the Legislature on its activities related to the implementation of the California Online Media Program for Access and Student Success program beginning in the 2017–18 fiscal year, including, but not limited to, all of the following: (1) Planning activities for the use of funds. (2) Vendor solicitation and selection. (3) After the vendors were selected. outreach and awareness of services with local educational agencies and local libraries. (4) Any efforts to collaborate with the State Department of Education, the California Collaborative for Educational Excellence, the State Board of Education, or the Kern County Office of Education to provide access to high-quality online instructional materials pursuant to Section 41 of Chapter 252 of the Statutes of 2021. 5. The funds appropriated in Schedule (2) shall be provided on a one-time basis in the 2026–27 fiscal year. 6100-181-0140—For local assistance, State Department of Education, payable from the California Environmental License Plate Fund, for purposes of Section 21190 of the Public Resources Code ........................ 360,000 Schedule: (1) 5205033-Environmental Education ........................ 548,000 (2) Reimbursements to 5205033-Environmental Education ........................ −188,000 6100-182-0001—For local assistance, State Department of Education (Proposition 98) ........................ 11,129,000 Schedule: (1) 5205060-Instructional Support: K–12 High-Speed Network ........................ 11,129,000 Provisions: 1. Expenditure authority of no greater than $6,541,000 is provided for the K–12 High-Speed Network. (a) Of the amount authorized for expenditure in this provision, $6,541,000 shall be funded by E-rate and California Teleconnect Fund moneys. The leading education agency or the Corporation for Education Network Initiatives in California (CENIC), or both, shall submit quarterly reports to the Department of Finance and the fiscal committees in each house of the Legislature on funds received from E-rate and the California Teleconnect Fund. (b) The expenditure limit pursuant to this provision does not apply to ongoing network connectivity infrastructure grant expenditures pursuant to Item 6110-182-0001, Budget Act of 2014 and Item 6100-182-0001, Budget Act of 2015 or to professional development and technical assistance funding expenditures pursuant to Section 58 of Chapter 13 of the Statutes of 2015. (c) All major subcontracts of the K–12 High-Speed Network program shall be excluded from both the eligible program costs on which indirect costs are charged and from the calculation of the indirect cost rate based on that year’s data. For purposes of this provision, a major subcontract is defined as a subcontract for services in an amount in excess of $25,000. (d) Of the amount authorized for expenditure in this provision, $0 shall be funded by the operational reserves maintained by the K–12 High-Speed Network. 2. As a condition of receipt of funding, the K–12 High-Speed Network shall submit an annual financial audit by December 15 of each year that includes an accounting of all funding sources and all uses of funds by funding source to the State Department of Education, the Department of Finance, the Legislative Analyst’s Office, and the Joint Legislative Budget Committee. 3. The K–12 High-Speed Network or CENIC, or both, shall submit quarterly reports to the Department of Finance and the fiscal committees in each house of the Legislature on E-rate and California Teleconnect Fund subsidies received as a result of network connectivity infrastructure grants issued pursuant to Item 6110-182-0001, Budget Act of 2014 and Item 6100-182-0001, Budget Act of 2015. 4. The K–12 High-Speed Network shall not expend any E-rate and California Teleconnect Fund subsidies received as a result of network connectivity infrastructure grants issued pursuant to Item 6110-182-0001, Budget Act of 2014 and Item 6100-182-0001, Budget Act of 2015 prior to receiving Department of Finance approval, and no sooner than 30 days after notification in writing is provided to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee. 6100-195-0890—For local assistance, State Department of Education, Part A of Title II of the federal Elementary and Secondary Education Act (20 U.S.C. Sec. 6621 et seq.; Preparing, Training, and Recruiting High Quality Teachers, Principals or Other School Leaders), payable from the Federal Trust Fund ........................ 233,959,000 Schedule: (1) 5205168-Supporting Effective Instruction Local Grants ........................ 219,157,000 (2) 5205150-California Subject Matter Projects ........................ 3,410,000 (3) 5205180-Supporting Effective Instruction State Level Activity Grants ........................ 11,392,000 Provisions: 1. The funds appropriated in Schedule (2) shall be transferred to the University of California, which shall use the funds for the subject matter projects pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with Section 99200) of Chapter 5 of Part 65 of Division 14 of Title 3 of the Education Code. 2. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (3), $12,822,000 in ongoing federal funds shall be used to support the 21st Century California School Leadership Academy pursuant to Section 44690 of the Education Code. Specifically, this amount reflects $7,517,000 in ongoing federal Title II funds, and $5,305,000 in ongoing federal Title IV funds, transferred to Title II, consistent with the California State Plan adopted by the State Board of Education pursuant to the Every Student Succeeds Act. This program shall be implemented pursuant to Title II of the federal Every Student Succeeds Act (20 U.S.C. Sec. 6601 et seq.) and consistent with the statewide system of support pursuant to Article 4.5 (commencing with Section 52059.5) of Chapter 6.1 of Part 28 of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Education Code. 3. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (3), $200,000 is available from federal Title II funds for the State Department of Education to provide funding to the California Collaborative for Educational Excellence to assist the State Department of Education in administering the 21st Century California School Leadership Academy. Of these funds, $25,000 shall be for the Marin County Office of Education and $175,000 shall be for the California Collaborative for Educational Excellence to assist the State Department of Education in administering the 21st Century California School Leadership Academy. The collaborative shall participate in selecting grantees, determining allocation of funding, and managing and directing grantees to ensure that grant activities are provided consistent with the statewide system of support pursuant to Article 4.5 (commencing with Section 52059.5) of Chapter 6.1 of Part 28 of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Education Code. Pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 52074 of the Education Code, the State Department of Education, with the support of the Department of General Services, shall provide funding to the Marin County Office of Education as the administrative agent no later than August 31, of each year, and complete the transfer of funds to the California Collaborative for Educational Excellence no later than December 15, of each year. 4. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (1), $5,963,000 is available as a one-time carryover. 6100-196-0001—For local assistance, State Department of Education (Proposition 98), for allocation by the Superintendent of Public Instruction to school districts, county offices of education, and other agencies for the purposes of California state preschool programs pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 8207) of Chapter 2 of Part 6 of Division 1 of Title 1 of the Education Code funded in this item, in lieu of the amount that otherwise would be appropriated pursuant to any other statute and the Inclusive Early Education Expansion Program pursuant to Article 16 (commencing with Section 8337) of Chapter 2 of Part 6 of Division 1 of Title 1 of the Education Code ........................ 2,693,730,0002,808,730,000 Schedule: (1) 5210020-State Preschool ........................ 2,623,730,0002,738,730,000 (2) 5210010-Child Development, Quality Rating Improvement System Grants ........................ 70,000,000 Provisions: 1. Nonfederal funds appropriated in this item that have been budgeted to meet the state’s Temporary Assistance for Needy Families maintenance-of-effort requirement established pursuant to the federal Personal Responsibility and Work Opportunity Reconciliation Act of 1996 (P.L. 104-193) shall not be expended in any way that would cause their disqualification as a federally allowable maintenance-of-effort expenditure. 2. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (1), up to $5,000,000 is available for the family literacy supplemental grant provided to California state preschool programs pursuant to Section 8221 of the Education Code. 3. The amount appropriated in Schedule (2) is available for Quality Rating and Improvement System grants provided to California state preschool programs pursuant to Section 8203.1 of the Education Code. 4. Funds appropriated in Schedule (1) shall be allocated to both the part-day and full-day California State Preschool Program. 5. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (1), $1,075,000 is available for funding a tool to strengthen teacher-child interactions and support quality improvement. 6. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (1), $29,874,000 is available for the family fee policy to reduce childcare fees to 1 percent of monthly income for families with adjusted monthly income at or above 75 percent of the state median family income pursuant to Section 8252 of the Education Code. 7. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (1), $98,610,000 is available for the State Department of Education to issue to California State Preschool Program contractors to augment their contracts due to projected increases in the number of three-year-old children served. 8. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (1), $29,468,000 is available for the State Department of Education to issue to California State Preschool Program contractors as an increase to their cost of care reimbursement rates. 9. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (1), $51,425,000 is available for the State Department of Education to issue to California State Preschool Program contractors as an increase to their cost of care reimbursement rates for 2026 –2027 the 2026–27 fiscal year and ongoing. 10. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (1), $115,000,000 is available for the State Department of Education to augment contracts projected to exceed maximum reimbursable amounts due to an anticipated increase in three-year-olds served as reported pursuant to Section 8215 of the Education Code. To the extent funding exceeds projected need, funding shall be distributed proportionally to demand. 6100-197-0890—For local assistance, State Department of Education, payable from the Federal Trust Fund, 21st Century Community Learning Centers Program ........................ 162,424,000 Schedule: (1) 5210050-21st Century Community Learning Centers ........................ 162,424,000 Provisions: 1. For the 2026–27 fiscal year, the daily per pupil funding provided to local educational agencies participating in the 21st Century Community Learning Centers Program shall be $10.18. 2. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (1), $6,004,000 $1,004,000 in federal carryover is provided on a one-time basis to support the existing program. 3. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (1), $5,000,000 in federal carryover is provided on a one-time basis for Save the Children to operate after school education and safety programs in rural districts. 6100-201-0001—For local assistance, State Department of Education (Proposition 98), pursuant to Article 11 (commencing with Section 49550.3) of Chapter 9 of Part 27 of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Education Code ........................ 22,946,000 Schedule: (1) 5210058-Child Nutrition Programs ........................ 22,946,000 Provisions: 1. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (1), $21,929,000 is available to support the Summer Electronic Benefits Transfer Program. 6100-201-0890—For local assistance, State Department of Education, payable from the Federal Trust Fund ........................ 2,846,244,000 Schedule: (1) 5210058-Child Nutrition Programs ........................ 2,846,244,000 Provisions: 1. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (1), $21,929,000 is available to support the Summer Electronic Benefits Transfer Program. 6100-203-0001—For local assistance, State Department of Education (Proposition 98), established pursuant to Sections 41311, 49501.5, 49536, 49552, and 49559 of the Education Code ........................ 1,871,705,000 Schedule: (1) 5210058-Child Nutrition Programs ........................ 1,871,705,000 Provisions: 1. Funds appropriated in this item shall be allocated pursuant to Section 41311 of the Education Code. Claims for reimbursement of meals pursuant to this allocation shall be submitted by school districts on or before September 30 of each year to be eligible for reimbursement. 2. Funds designated for child nutrition programs in this item shall be allocated in accordance with Section 49536 of the Education Code. 3. If the appropriation in this item is insufficient to fully fund all eligible reimbursement claims pursuant to the reimbursement rates specified in Provision 6, the State Department of Education shall reimburse eligible claims at a prorated share of the funds appropriated in this item. 4. The State Department of Education shall notify the Department of Finance in writing 30 days prior to paying prior year reimbursement claims from this item exceeding $10,000 pursuant to Section 16304.1 of the Government Code. No reimbursements shall be made prior to final approval of the Department of Finance. 5. The State Department of Education shall notify the Department of Finance in writing within 30 days of paying reimbursement claims pursuant to Section 49505 of the Education Code from this item. 6. The reimbursement a school receives for free and reduced-price meals served to pupils in elementary, middle, or high schools included within a school district, charter school, or county office of education shall be $1.0302 per meal. 7. The reimbursement a school receives for reduced-price and paid meals served to pupils in elementary, middle, or high schools included within a school district, charter school, or county office of education shall not exceed the difference between the combined federal and state reimbursement for free meals for breakfast and lunch and the actual combined federal and state reimbursement received by schools for reduced-price and paid meals, pursuant to Section 49501.5 of the Education Code. 8. To qualify for the reimbursements for meals provided to pupils in elementary, middle, or high schools, pursuant to Provisions 6 and 7 of this item, public school districts, county offices of education, and charter schools must participate in both the federal School Breakfast Program and National School Lunch Program and shall follow the United States Department of Agriculture meal patterns and comply with federal program requirements. 9. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $25,574,000 is to reflect a cost-of-living adjustment. 10. The funds appropriated in this item reflect a growth adjustment of −$90,662,000 to reflect the projected number of meals served under the Universal Meals program. 11. On or before January 20 of each year, the State Department of Education shall provide an estimate of the total state reimbursement claims submitted by schools in the current school year, beginning with the 2022–23 school year, for meals provided pursuant to Section 49501.5 to the Department of Finance and the Joint Legislative Budget Committee. 12. Notwithstanding any other provision of law or any other sections of this act, the Department of Finance shall augment the appropriation for reimbursements for child nutrition programs, pursuant to Section 49501.5 of the Education Code, if the estimate of expenditures, as determined by the State Department of Education, will exceed the expenditures authorized in Schedule (1). The Department of Finance shall report any augmentation pursuant to this provision to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee. At the time the report is made, the amount of the appropriation made in Schedule (1) shall be increased by the amount of the augmentation. 6100-209-0001—For local assistance, State Department of Education (Proposition 98), Teacher Dismissal Apportionments, for payment of claims received pursuant to Section 44944 of the Education Code ........................ 300,000 Schedule: (1) 5200068-Teacher Dismissal Apportionments ........................ 300,000 6100-220-0001—For local assistance, State Department of Education (Proposition 98), Classified School Employee Summer Assistance Program ........................ 90,000,000 Schedule: (1) 5205042-Summer Assistance Program ........................ 90,000,000 Provisions: 1. The funds appropriated in this item shall be used for the Classified School Employee Summer Assistance Program as specified in Section 45500 of the Education Code. 2. The funds appropriated in this item are available for encumbrance or expenditure through June 30, 2028. 6100-222-0001—For local assistance, State Department of Education, Save the Children5,000,000Schedule:(1)5210048-After School Programs5,000,000Provisions:1.Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (1), $5,000,000 shall be made available on a one-time basis for Save the Children to operate after school education and safety programs in rural school districts. 6100-294-0890—For local assistance, State Department of Education, payable from the Federal Trust Fund ........................ 4,368,000 Schedule: (1) 5210052-Early Head Start—​Child Care Partnership Grant ........................ 4,368,000 Provisions: 1. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (1), $3,701,000 is available annually through the 2028–29 fiscal year to support local Early Head Start services under the Early Head Start-Child Care Partnerships Grant. 2. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (1), $667,000 in federal carryover is provided on a one-time basis to support the existing program. 6100-295-0001—For local assistance, State Department of Education (Proposition 98), for reimbursement, in accordance with the provisions of Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution or Section 17561 of the Government Code, of the cost of any new program or increased level of service of an existing program mandated by statute or executive order, for disbursement by the Controller for claims for costs incurred during the 2024–25 fiscal year ........................ 51,000 Schedule: (1) 5240016-K–12 Mandated Cost Reimbursement Program: For payment of the following mandate claims for costs incurred during the 2023–24 fiscal year ........................ 51,000 (a) Consolidation of Annual Parent Notification/Schoolsite Discipline Rules/Alternative Schools (Ch. 36, Stats. 1977) (CSM 4445, 4453, 4461, 4462, 4474, 4488, 97-TC-24, 99-TC-09, and 00-TC-12) ........................ 1,000 (b) Caregiver Affidavits to Establish Residence for School Attendance (Ch. 98, Stats. 1994) (CSM 4497) ........................ 1,000 (c) School District Fiscal Accountability Reporting and Employee Benefits Disclosure (Consolidation) (Ch. 100, Stats. 1981) (97-TC-19) ........................ 1,000 (d) Intradistrict Attendance (Ch. 161, Stats. 1993) (CSM 4454) ........................ 1,000 (e) Interdistrict Attendance Permits (Ch. 172, Stats. 1986) ........................ 1,000 (f) Differential Pay and Reemployment (Ch. 30, Stats. 1998) (99-TC-02) ........................ 1,000 (g) Immunization Records—​Mumps, Rubella, and Hepatitis B (Ch. 325, Stats. 1978 and Ch. 435, Stats. 1979) (98-TC-05 and 14-MR-04) ........................ 1,000 (h) Notification of Truancy (Ch. 498, Stats. 1983) (CSM 4133) ........................ 1,000 (i) Criminal Background Checks I (Ch. 588, Stats. 1997) (97-TC-16) ........................ 1,000 (j) Criminal Background Checks II (Ch. 594, Stats. 1998 and Ch. 840, Stats. 1998; Ch. 78, Stats. 1999) (00-TC-05) ........................ 1,000 (k) California State Teachers’ Retirement System Service Credit (Ch. 603, Stats. 1994) (02-TC-19) ........................ 1,000 (l) Child Abuse and Neglect Reporting (Ch. 640, Stats. 1987) (01-TC-21) ........................ 1,000 (m) Comprehensive School Safety Plans I and II (Ch. 736, Stats. 1997) (98-TC-01 and 99-TC-10) ........................ 1,000 (n) Pupil Promotion and Retention (Ch. 100, Stats. 1981) (98-TC-19) ........................ 1,000 (o) Charter Schools I, II, and III (Ch. 781, Stats. 1992) (CSM 4437 et al., 99-TC-03, and 99-TC-14) ........................ 1,000 (p) AIDS Instruction and AIDS Prevention Instruction (Ch. 818, Stats. 1991 and Ch. 403, Stats. 1998) (CSM 4422, 99-TC-07, and 00-TC-01) ........................ 1,000 (q) Agency Fee Arrangements (Ch. 893, Stats. 2000 and Ch. 805, Stats. 2001) (00-TC-17 and 01-TC-14) ........................ 1,000 (r) County Office of Education Fiscal Accountability Reporting (Ch. 917, Stats. 1987) (97-TC-20) ........................ 1,000 (s) Collective Bargaining and Collective Bargaining Agreement Disclosure (Ch. 961, Stats. 1975) (CSM 4425 and 97-TC-08) ........................ 1,000 (t) Pupil Health Screenings (Ch. 1208, Stats. 1976) (CSM 4440) ........................ 1,000 (u) Physical Performance Tests (Ch. 975, Stats. 1995) (96-365-01) ........................ 1,000 (v) Juvenile Court Notices II (Ch. 1011, Stats. 1984 and Ch. 1423, Stats. 1984) (CSM 4475) ........................ 1,000 (w) Charter Schools IV (Ch. 1058, Stats. 2002) (03-TC-03) ........................ 1,000 (x) Public Contracts (Ch. 1073, Stats. 1985) (02-TC-35) ........................ 1,000 (y) Uniform Complaint Procedures (Ch. 1117, Stats. 1982) (03-TC-02) ........................ 1,000 (z) Consolidation of Law Enforcement Agency Notifications (LEAN) and Missing Children Reports (MCR) (Ch. 1117, Stats. 1989) (CSM 4505 and 4505-2) ........................ 1,000 (aa) Immunization Records (Ch. 1176, Stats. 1977) (SB 90-120) ........................ 1,000 (bb) Habitual Truant (Ch. 1184, Stats. 1975) (CSM 4487 and 4487-A) ........................ 1,000 (cc) School District Reorganization (Ch. 1192, Stats. 1980 and Ch. 1186, Stats. 1994) (98-TC-24) ........................ 1,000 (dd) Prevailing Wage Rate (Ch. 1249, Stats. 1978) (01-TC-28) ........................ 1,000 (ee) Threats Against Peace Officers (Ch. 1249, Stats. 1992) ........................ 1,000 (ff) Expulsion of Pupils: Transcript Cost for Appeals (Ch. 1253, Stats. 1975) ........................ 1,000 (gg) Consolidation of Notification to Teachers: Pupils Subject to Suspension or Expulsion I and II, and Pupil Discipline Records (Ch. 345, Stats. 2000) (00-TC-10 and 00-TC-11) ........................ 1,000 (hh) School Accountability Report Cards (Ch. 912, Stats. 1997) (00-TC-09, 00-TC-13, and 02-TC-32) ........................ 1,000 (ii) Financial and Compliance Audits (Ch. 36, Stats. 1977) (CSM 4498 and 4498-A) ........................ 1,000 (jj) The Stull Act (Ch. 498, Stats. 1983 and Ch. 4, Stats. 1999) (98-TC-25) ........................ 1,000 (kk) Pupil Safety Notices (Ch. 498, Stats. 1983) (02-TC-13) ........................ 1,000 (ll) Graduation Requirements (Ch. 498, Stats. 1983) (CSM 4181-A) ........................ 1,000 (mm) Student Records (Ch. 593, Stats. 1989) (02-TC-34) ........................ 1,000 (nn) Williams Case Implementation I, II, and III (Ch. 900, Stats. 2004) (05-TC-04, 07-TC-06, and 08-TC-01) ........................ 1,000 (oo) Parental Involvement Programs (Ch. 1400, Stats. 1990) (03-TC-16) ........................ 1,000 (pp) Developer Fees (Ch. 955, Stats. 1977) (02-TC-42) ........................ 1,000 (qq) Consolidated Suspensions, Expulsions, and Expulsion Appeals (Chs. 972 and 974, Stats. 1995) (96-358-03, 03A, 98-TC-22, 01-TC-18, 98-TC-23, 97-TC-09, CSM 4456, 4455, and 4463) ........................ 1,000 (rr) Immunization Records—​Pertussis (Ch. 434, Stats. 2010) (11-TC-02) ........................ 1,000 (ss) Race to the Top (Chs. 2 and 3, Stats. 2010, 5th Ex. Sess.) (10-TC-06) ........................ 1,000 (tt) Training for School Employee Mandated Reporters (Ch. 797, Stats. 2014) (14-TC-02) ........................ 1,000 (uu) California Assessment of Student Performance and Progress (CAASPP) (Ch. 489, Stats. 2013) (14-TC-01 and 14-TC-04) ........................ 1,000 (vv) Cal Grant: Opt-Out Notice and Grade Point Average Submission (Ch. 679, Stats. 2014 and Ch. 82, Stats. 2016) (16-TC-02) ........................ 1,000 (ww) Public School Restrooms: Feminine Hygiene Products (Ch. 687, Stats. 2017) (18-TC-01) ........................ 1,000 (xx) Free Application for Federal Student Aid (FAFSA) (Ch. 560, Stats. 2021) (22-TC-05) ........................ 1,000 (yy) Public School Restrooms: Menstrual Products (Ch. 664, Stats. 2021) (22-TC-04) ........................ 1,000 Provisions: 1. If the amount appropriated in this item is less than the amount required to fund eligible claims, the Controller shall prorate the payments accordingly. 6100-296-0001—For local assistance, State Department of Education (Proposition 98) Program 98—​K–12 Mandated Programs Block Grant ........................ 279,069,000 Schedule: (1) 5240010-K–12 Mandated Programs Block Grant ........................ 279,069,000 Provisions: 1. The Superintendent of Public Instruction shall apportion the funds appropriated in this item to all school districts, county offices of education, and charter schools that request funding during the 2026–27 fiscal year pursuant to Section 17581.6 of the Government Code using the following rates: (a) A school district shall receive $40.41 per unit of average daily attendance of pupils in kindergarten to grade 8, inclusive, and $79.27 per unit of average daily attendance of pupils in grades 9 to 12, inclusive. (b) A county office of education shall receive: (1) $40.41 per unit of average daily attendance of pupils in kindergarten to grade 8, inclusive, and $79.27 per unit of average daily attendance of pupils in grades 9 to 12, inclusive. (2) $1.35 per unit of countywide average daily attendance. For purposes of this item, “countywide average daily attendance” means the aggregate number of units of average daily attendance within the county attributable to all school districts for which the county superintendent of schools has jurisdiction pursuant to Section 1253 of the Education Code, charter schools within the county, and the schools operated by the county superintendent of schools. (c) A charter school shall receive $21.31 per unit of average daily attendance of pupils in kindergarten to grade 8, inclusive, and $60.48 per unit of average daily attendance of pupils in grades 9 to 12, inclusive. 2. The Superintendent of Public Instruction shall use average daily attendance calculated as of the second principal apportionment for the previous fiscal year. 3. If the funds appropriated in this item are insufficient for the Superintendent of Public Instruction to apportion funding using the rates listed in Provision 1 to all school districts, county offices of education, and charter schools that requested funding, the rates shall be reduced to apportion to each school district, county office of education, and charter school that requested funding a proportion of the funds appropriated in this item equal to the proportion of funding the school district, county office of education, or charter school otherwise would have received pursuant to the rates in Provision 1. 4. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $7,737,000 is to reflect a cost-of-living adjustment. 5. The funds appropriated in this item reflect a growth adjustment of −$3,394,000 due to revised average daily attendance. 6100-301-0001—For capital outlay, State Department of Education ........................ 14,710,000 Schedule: (1) 0008331-Fremont: Perimeter Security Fence ........................ 14,710,000 (a) Construction ........................ 14,710,000 6100-403—Pursuant to Section 17581.5 of the Government Code, mandates included in the language of this item are specifically identified by the Legislature for suspension during the 2026–27 fiscal year: (1) Removal of Chemicals (Ch. 1107, Stats. 1984) (CSM 4211 and 4298) (2) Scoliosis Screening (Ch. 1347, Stats. 1980) (CSM 4195) (3) Pupil Residency Verification and Appeals (Ch. 309, Stats. 1995) (96-384-01) (4) School Bus Safety I and II (Ch. 624, Stats. 1992; Ch. 831, Stats. 1994; and Ch. 739, Stats. 1997) (CSM 4433 and 97-TC-22) (5) Physical Education Reports (Ch. 640, Stats. 1997) (98-TC-08) (6) Health Benefits for Survivors of Peace Officers and Firefighters (Ch. 1120, Stats. 1996) (97-TC-25) (7) Law Enforcement Sexual Harassment Training (Ch. 126, Stats. 1993) (97-TC-07) (8) County Treasury Withdrawals (Ch. 784, Stats. 1995) (96-365-03) (9) Grand Jury Proceedings (Ch. 1170, Stats. 1996) (98-TC-27) (10) Absentee Ballots (Ch. 77, Stats. 1978) (CSM 3713) (11) Brendon Maguire Act (Ch. 391, Stats. 1988) (CSM 4357) (12) Mandate Reimbursement Process I and II (Ch. 486, Stats. 1975 and Ch. 890, Stats. 2004) (CSM 4204, CSM 4485, and 05-TC-05) 6100-485—Reappropriation (Proposition 98), State Department of Education. The sum of $7,480,000 is hereby reappropriated from the Proposition 98 Reversion Account for the following purpose: 0001—​General Fund (1) The sum of $7,480,000 is hereby appropriated to the Superintendent of Public Instruction for allocation to local educational agencies for the Student Support and Professional Development Discretionary Block Grant pursuant to provisions provided in the education finance omnibus trailer bill identified in Section 39.00 of this act for this purpose. 6100-488—Reappropriation, State Department of Education. Notwithstanding any other law, the balances from the following appropriations are available for reappropriation for the purposes specified in the provisions below: 0001—​General Fund (1) $656,000 or whatever greater or lesser amount of the unexpended balance of the amount appropriated for the Child Nutrition Programs in Chapter 52 of the Statutes of 2022. (2) $18,390,000 or whatever greater or lesser amount of the unexpended balance of the amount appropriated for the Child Nutrition Programs in Schedule (1) of Item 6100-203-0001, Budget Act of 2023 (Chs. 12, 38, and 189, Stats. 2023). (3) $140,000 or whatever greater or lesser amount of the unexpended balance of the amount appropriated for the Special Education Program for Individuals with Exceptional Needs in Schedule (1) of Item 6100-161-0001, Budget Act of 2023 (Chs. 12, 38, and 189, Stats. 2023). (4) $20,000,000 or whatever greater or lesser amount of the unexpended balance of the amount appropriated for the Child Nutrition Programs in Schedule (1) of Item 6100-203-0001, Budget Act of 2024 (Chs. 22, 35, and 994, Stats. 2024). (5) $65,480,000 or whatever greater or lesser amount of the unexpended balance of the amount appropriated for the California State Preschool Program in Item 6100-196-0001, Budget Act of 2024 (Chs. 22, 35, and 994, Stats. 2024). (6) $3,106,000 or whatever greater or lesser amount of the unexpended balance of the amount appropriated for After School Programs in Schedule (1) of Item 6100-149-0001, Budget Act of 2023 (Chs. 12, 38, and 189, Stats. 2023). (7) $13,623,000 or whatever greater or lesser amount of the unexpended balance of the amount appropriated for the 21st Century Community Learning Centers in Schedule (2) of Item 6100-149-0001, Budget Act of 2023 (Chs. 12, 38, and 189, Stats. 2023). (8) $35,000 or whatever greater or lesser amount of the unexpended balance of the amount appropriated for the Special Education Program for Individuals with Exceptional Needs in Schedule (1) of Item 6100-161-0001, Budget Act of 2024 (Chs. 22, 35, and 994, Stats. 2024). (9) $36,567,000 or whatever greater or lesser amount of the unexpended balance of the amount appropriated for the 21st Century Community Learning Centers in Schedule (2) of Item 6100-149-0001, Budget Act of 2024 (Chs. 22, 35, and 994, Stats. 2024). (10) $53,823,000 or whatever greater or lesser amount of the unexpended balance of the amount appropriated for the 21st Century Community Learning Centers in Schedule (2) of Item 6100-149-0001, Budget Act of 2025 (Chs. 4 and 5, Stats. 2025). (11) $2,629,000 or whatever greater or lesser amount of the unexpended balance of the amount appropriated for the California State Preschool Program in Item 6100-196-0001, Budget Act of 2025 (Chs. 4 and 5, Stats. 2025). (12) $1,296,000 or whatever greater or lesser amount of the unexpended balance of the amount appropriated for the Career Technical Education Initiative in Item 6100-170-0001, Budget Act of 2024 (Chs. 22, 35, and 994, Stats. 2024). (13) $3,021,000 $3,020,000 or whatever greater or lesser amount of the unexpended balance of the amount appropriated for the Career Technical Education Incentive Grant in Item 6100-168-0001, Budget Act of 2024 (Chs. 22, 35, and 994, Stats. 2024). (14) $10,003,000 or whatever greater or lesser amount of the unexpended balance of the amount appropriated for the Career Technical Education Incentive Grant in Item 6100-168- 0001, Budget Act of 2025 (Chs. 4 and 5, Stats. 2025). (15) $485,068,000 or whatever greater or lesser amount of the unexpended balance of the amount appropriated for the California Community Schools Partnership Program in Chapter 53 of the Statutes of 2022. (16) $354,000 or whatever greater or lesser amount of the unexpended balance of the amount appropriated for the Education Services for Foster Youth Program in Chapter 44 of the Statutes of 2021. (17) $189,708,000 or whatever greater or lesser amount of the unexpended balance of the amount appropriated for the Expanded Learning Opportunities Program in Item 6100-110-0001, Budget Act of 2023 (Chs. 12, 38, and 189, Stats. 2023). (18) $39,000 or whatever greater or lesser amount of the unexpended balance of the amount appropriated for the American Indian Early Childhood Education Program in Item 6100-150-0001, Budget Act of 2023 (Chs. 12, 38, and 189, Stats. 2023). (19) $413,000 or whatever greater or lesser amount of the unexpended balance of the amount appropriated for the California Partnership Academies in Schedule (1) of Item 6100-166-0001, Budget Act of 2023 (Chs. 12, 38, and 189, Stats. 2023). (20) $7,000 or whatever greater or lesser amount of the unexpended balance of the amount appropriated for the Clean Technology Partnerships in Schedule (2) of Item 6100-166-0001, Budget Act of 2023 (Chs. 12, 38, and 189, Stats. 2023). (21) $1,300,000 or whatever greater or lesser amount of the unexpended balance of the amount appropriated for the Career Technical Education Initiative in Item 6100-170-001. Budget Act of 2023 (Chs. 12, 38, and 189, Stats. 2023). (22) $35,021,000 or whatever greater or lesser amount of the unexpended balance of the amount appropriated for the California State Preschool Program in Item 6100-196-0001, Budget Act of 2023 (Chs. 12, 38, and 189, Stats. 2023). (23) $415,000 or whatever greater or lesser amount of the unexpended balance of the amount reappropriated for the Learning Recovery Emergency Block Grant in Provision 4 of Item 6100-488, Budget Act of 2023 (Chs. 12, 38, and 189, Stats. 2023). (24) $31,000 or whatever greater or lesser amount of the unexpended balance of the amount appropriated for the California Partnership Academies in Schedule (1) of Item 6100-166-0001, Budget Act of 2024 (Chs. 22, 35, and 994, Stats. 2024). (25) $139,000 or whatever greater or lesser amount of the unexpended balance of the amount appropriated for the Student Support and Professional Development Discretionary Block Grant in Chapter 8 of the Statutes of 2025. Provisions: 1. The sum of $73,769,000 $836,263,000 is hereby appropriated to the State Department of Education for allocation to local educational agencies for the Student Support and Professional Development Discretionary Block Grant pursuant to provisions provided in the education finance omnibus trailer bill identified in Section 39.00 of this act for this purpose. 2. The sum of $15,000,000 is hereby appropriated to the State Department of Education for the 21st Century California School Leadership Academy pursuant to Section 44690.1 of the Education Code. These funds shall be available for encumbrance through June 30, 2031. 3.The sum of $50,000,000 is hereby appropriated to the State Department of Education to support the Multi-Tiered Systems of Support framework pursuant to Section 41490.1 of the Education Code. These funds shall be available for encumbrance through June 30, 2031. 4.3. The sum of $25,000,000 is hereby appropriated to the State Department of Education to support inclusive programs for students with intellectual disabilities pursuant to Section 66032 of the Education Code. These funds shall be available for encumbrance through June 30, 2032. 5.4. The sum of $30,000,000 is hereby appropriated to the State Department of Education for grants to local educational agencies to support youth experiencing homelessness pursuant to provisions in the education finance omnibus trailer bill identified in Section 39.00 of this act for this purpose. 6.5. The sum of $30,000,000 is hereby appropriated to the State Department of Education for transfer to the Commission on Teacher Credentialing for Teacher Residency and National Board technical assistance pursuant to Section 44415.71 of the Education Code. These funds shall be available for encumbrance through June 30, 2034. 7.6. The sum of $5,000,000 is hereby appropriated to the State Department of Education for transfer to the Commission on Teacher Credentialing for the development of a teacher candidate transcript review platform, pursuant to Section 44259.8 of the Education Code. These funds shall be available for encumbrance through June 30, 2029. 8.The sum of $485,068,000 is hereby appropriated to the State Department of Education for the California Community Schools Apportionments Program pursuant to provisions provided in the education finance omnibus trailer bill identified in Section 39.00 of this act for this purpose. 6100-491—Reappropriation, State Department of Education. The amounts specified in the following citations are reappropriated for the purposes provided for in those appropriations and shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure as specified below: 0001—​General Fund (1) $1,190,000 or whatever greater or lesser amount of the unexpended balance of the amount appropriated for the State Department of Education to contract with a vendor to provide direct deposit to State Preschool contractors in the California State Preschool Program in Schedule (2) of Item 6100-001-0001, Budget Act of 2025 (Chs. 4 and 5, Stats. 2025). This amount shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2027. (2) $5,000,000 in Item 6100-001-0001, Budget Act of 2023 (Chs. 12, 38, and 189, Stats. 2023), for legal costs for the State Department of Education and State Board of Education related to federal litigation. The State Department of Education shall submit an expenditure plan before the expenditure of funds to the Department of Finance for approval. This amount shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2028. 6100-496—Reversion, State Department of Education. Provisions: 1. The Superintendent of Public Instruction is hereby authorized to initiate the reversion of appropriations in cases where the balance available for reversion is less than $50,000, and either of the following applies: (a) The program in question has expired. (b) The Superintendent of Public Instruction certifies that the original purpose of the appropriation would not be accomplished by further expenditure. 2. The State Department of Education may periodically review its accounts at the Controller’s office to identify appropriations that meet these criteria. Upon the request of the State Department of Education, the Director of Finance may issue an executive order to revert identified appropriations. The Controller shall timely revert appropriations identified in the executive order to the fund from which the appropriation was originally made (or a successor fund in the case of an expired fund), or to the Proposition 98 Reversion Account, whichever is appropriate. 6120-011-0001—For support of California State Library and California Library Services Board ........................ 28,863,000 Schedule: (1) 5310-State Library Services ........................ 23,373,000 (2) 5312-Library Development Services ........................ 2,244,000 (3) 5314-Information Technology Services ........................ 3,546,000 (4) Reimbursements to 5310-State Library Services ........................ −300,000 Provisions: 1. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (1), $500,000 shall continue to be provided to the Braille Institute of America in Los Angeles. 6120-011-0020—For support of California State Library, State Law Library, payable from the California State Law Library Special Account ........................ 199,000 Schedule: (1) 5310-State Library Services ........................ 199,000 Provisions: 1. The Director of Finance may authorize the augmentation of this item by any amount available in the California State Law Library Special Account not sooner than 30 days after notification in writing to the chairpersons of the fiscal committees of each house of the Legislature of the intent to do so. 6120-011-0890—For support of California State Library, payable from the Federal Trust Fund ........................ 8,580,000 Schedule: (1) 5310-State Library Services ........................ 5,169,000 (2) 5312-Library Development Services ........................ 3,120,000 (3) 5314-Information Technology Services ........................ 291,000 6120-011-9740—For support of California State Library, payable from the Central Service Cost Recovery Fund ........................ 2,057,000 Schedule: (1) 5310-State Library Services ........................ 2,057,000 6120-140-0001—For local assistance, California State Library, Lunch at the Library Program ........................ 3,000,000 Schedule: (1) 5312-Library Development Services ........................ 3,000,000 Provisions: 1. On January 15 of each fiscal year in which funding is appropriated, the California State Library shall submit a report to the Department of Finance and the Joint Legislative Budget Committee on the Lunch at the Library Program for the most recent summer where data are available. At a minimum, the report shall include the number of library jurisdictions and outlets providing summer meals, the number of library jurisdictions and outlets providing enrichment services at nonlibrary sites, the number of summer meals provided at library sites and nonlibrary sites receiving library enrichment services, details of in-kind and other matching funds provided, use of any federal funds, and grant allocations by library jurisdiction and function, including the amount of funds that were allocated for providing meals and the amount of funds provided for enrichment services. The report shall also include any other expenditures that were funded from this item, including funds used for State Library administration of this program. Additionally, the report shall measure the impact of the Lunch at the Library Program and identify learning outcomes of students receiving library enrichment services at summer meal sites, including what specific enrichment services were provided. The California State Library shall utilize streamlined reporting templates, as appropriate, to reduce the administrative burden for smaller or under-resourced library jurisdictions that are reporting data. 6120-151-0483—For local assistance, California State Library, for telephonic services, payable from the Deaf and Disabled Telecommunications Program Administrative Committee Fund ........................ 552,000 Schedule: (1) 5312-Library Development Services ........................ 552,000 6120-211-0001—For local assistance, California State Library, California Library Services Act, pursuant to Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 18700) of Part 11 of Division 1 of Title 1 of the Education Code ........................ 2,880,000 Schedule: (1) 5312-Library Development Services ........................ 2,880,000 Provisions: 1. The funds in Schedule (1) shall be allocated to library systems, as defined in Section 18740 of the Education Code, to support collaborative resource sharing, direct patron access services, and innovative regional service delivery models activities as defined in Sections 18745 and 18746 of the Education Code. The funds shall be allocated pursuant to the following distribution schedule: (a) Black Gold Cooperative Library System ........................ $110,219 (b) 49-99 Cooperative Library System ........................ $119,245 (c) Inland Library System ........................ $291,139 (d) NorthNet Library System ........................ $660,046 (e) Pacific Library Partnership ........................ $563,069 (f) San Joaquin Valley Library System ........................ $190,816 (g) Santiago Library System ........................ $182,483 (h) Serra Cooperative Library System ........................ $210,857 (i) Southern California Library Cooperative ........................ $552,124 2. On November 15 of each year, the California State Library shall submit a report to the Department of Finance and the fiscal committees of the Legislature on the allocation of funds to each library system and how each library system used funds in the prior fiscal year. Reporting requirements shall remain substantially consistent with prior reporting obligations, are reasonable and quantifiable in nature, and do not impose significant new administrative burdens on grant recipients. 6120-211-0890—For local assistance, California State Library, payable from the Federal Trust Fund ........................ 9,870,000 Schedule: (1) 5312-Library Development Services ........................ 9,870,000 6120-213-0001—For local assistance, California State Library, California Library Literacy and English Acquisition Services Program, pursuant to Section 18880 of the Education Code ........................ 7,320,000 Schedule: (1) 5312-Library Development Services ........................ 7,320,000 Provisions: 1. The funds in Schedule (1) shall be allocated pursuant to the California Library Literacy and English Acquisition Services Program pursuant to Chapter 4.6 (commencing with Section 18880) of Part 11 of Division 1 of Title 1 of the Education Code. (a) English as a Second Language literacy programs at public libraries shall also be eligible for these grant funds. (b) A local library shall ensure that funds received pursuant to Section 18883 of the Education Code are exclusively used for expenses resulting from providing English language and literacy services and English as a Second Language library literacy services and shall ensure that at least 90 percent of the funds received for the program are expended on direct services and related materials. 6120-215-0001—For local assistance, California State Library, Statewide Library Broadband Services ........................ 4,079,000 Schedule: (1) 5312-Library Development Services ........................ 4,079,000 Provisions: 1. The funds appropriated in this item shall be used to support access by public libraries to a high-speed internet network. It is the intent of the Legislature that public libraries secure additional resources to access the high-speed internet network. 6120-490—Reappropriation, California State Library. Notwithstanding any other law, the period to liquidate encumbrances of the following citations is extended to June 30, 2030. 0001—General Fund (1) Up to $94,300,000 in Provision 1, Item 6120-161-0001, Budget Act of 2021 (Chs. 21, 69, and 240, Stats. 2021), for an equity-focused infrastructure grant program to support local library maintenance, capital improvements, broadband and technology upgrades, and device acquisition. 6125-001-0001—For support of Education Audit Appeals Panel ........................ 1,171,000 Schedule: (1) 5320-Education Audit Appeals Panel ........................ 1,171,000 6255-001-0001—For support of California State Summer School for the Arts ........................ 2,870,000 Schedule: (1) 5340-California State Summer School for the Arts ........................ 2,870,000 6350-111-1027—For transfer by the Controller from the California Preschool, Transitional Kindergarten, and Full-Day Kindergarten Facilities Account to the General Fund ........................ 2,609,000 6360-001-0001—For support of Commission on Teacher Credentialing ........................ 11,560,000 Schedule: (1) 5381-Preparation and Licensing of Teachers ........................ 11,348,000 (2) 5399-Administration ........................ 212,000 Provisions: 1. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (1), $595,000 and 5.0 positions are available to support outreach, contracting, technical assistance, and administration of multiple grant programs, including, but not limited to, Teacher Residencies, Classified School Employee Credentialing Grants, Integrated Teacher Preparation Program Grants, and Computer Science Supplementary Authorization Grants. 2. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (1), $1,400,000 and 9.0 positions are available to support the Roadmap to Educational Careers initiative. Of the 9.0 positions, 8.0 positions shall serve as career guidance counselors, credential experts, subject matter experts, and resource specialists for individuals seeking to make the transition into a PK–12 educational career. To the extent that is absorbable, these 8.0 positions may also provide transcript review to assess basic skills requirements and subject matter competence for educator credential candidates. Of the 9.0 positions, 1.0 position shall be available to assist with development and maintenance of a multifaceted web portal on the Commission on Teacher Credentialing’s website and social media connection and presence. 3. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (1), $282,000 and 4.0 positions are available to support data gathering around California’s PK–12 educational workforce reporting and analysis for Cradle-to-Career data reporting, teacher grant program reporting, and the California Statewide Assignment Accountability System (CalSAAS), including how CalSAAS relates to the State Department of Education’s PK–12 educational workforce data reporting for the federal Every Student Succeeds Act (P.L. 114-95), the School Accountability Report Card, and data reporting for the Local Control Funding Formula and Local Control and Accountability Plan. 4. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (1), $946,000 and 7.0 positions are available to support early childhood education preparation and licensure activities. 5. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (2), $210,000 and 2.0 positions are available to support early childhood education preparation and licensure activities. 6. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (1), $3,400,000 shall be provided to backfill revenue shortfalls resulting from declining teacher credential fees. These funds shall be available to support activities pursuant to Schedule (1) of Item 6360-001-0407. 7. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (1), $182,000 and 2.0 positions are available to support educator professional fitness activities. 8. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (1) $179,000 and 1.0 position are available to support increased grant administration activities. 9. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (1), $2,352,000 and 15.0 positions are available to support the Division of Licensure Enforcement in addressing workload related to an increase of educator misconduct cases. 10. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (1), $298,000 and 2.0 positions are available to support workload related to the accreditation of Pupil Personnel Services (PPS) programs of professional preparation offered by local educational agencies and the development of a preliminary PPS Credential for out-of-State Applicants, pursuant to Chapter 375 of the Statutes of 2025. 11. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (1), $1,561,000 and 11.0 positions are available to support workload related to implementing the Safe Learning Environments Act, including the development of a statewide data system that includes information relating to investigations of allegations of egregious misconduct of individuals serving in a noncertificated position, pursuant to Chapter 460 of the Statutes of 2025. 6360-001-0407—For support of Commission on Teacher Credentialing, payable from the Teacher Credentials Fund ........................ 36,202,000 Schedule: (1) 5381-Preparation and Licensing of Teachers ........................ 22,232,000 (2) 5382-Attorney General Legal Services ........................ 5,400,000 (3) 5383-Accreditation Streamline Project ........................ 310,000 (4) 5399-Administration ........................ 8,695,000 (5) Reimbursements to 5381-Preparation and Licensing of Teachers ........................ −435,000 Provisions: 1. The amount appropriated in this item may be increased based on increases in credential applications, increases in first-time credential applications requiring fingerprint clearance, unanticipated costs associated with certificate discipline cases, or unanticipated costs of litigation, subject to approval of the Department of Finance, not sooner than 30 days after notification in writing to the chairpersons of the fiscal committees of each house of the Legislature and the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee. 2. The Commission on Teacher Credentialing shall submit biannual reports to the chairpersons and vice chairpersons of the budget committees of each house of the Legislature, the Legislative Analyst’s Office, and the Department of Finance on the minimum, maximum, and average number of days taken to process: (a) renewal and university-recommended credentials, (b) out-of-state and special education credentials, (c) service credentials and supplemental authorizations, (d) adult and career technical education certificates and child center permits, (e) temporary permits for statutory leave and 30-day substitute permits, (f) provisional intern permits, (g) short-term staff permits, and (h) the percentage of renewals and new applications completed online. The report should also include information on the total number of each type of application and the hours of staff time utilized to process the different types of credentials. The biannual reports shall be submitted on October 1 and March 1 of each year, and shall include historical data as well as data from the most recent six months. 3. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (1), $308,000 is provided from federal Title II funds through an interagency agreement with the State Department of Education to support Teacher Misassignment Monitoring, pursuant to Section 44258.9 of the Education Code. These funds shall be used to reimburse county offices of education for costs associated with monitoring public schools and school districts for teacher misassignments. Funds shall be allocated on a basis determined by the Commission on Teacher Credentialing. Districts and county offices receiving funds for credential monitoring will provide reasonable and necessary information to the commission as a condition of receiving these funds. 4. The Commission on Teacher Credentialing shall submit biannual reports to the chairpersons and vice chairpersons of the budget committees of each house of the Legislature, the Legislative Analyst’s Office, and the Department of Finance on the workload of the Division of Licensure Enforcement (DLE) and the status of the teacher misconduct caseload. The report shall include information on the DLE’s workload and the timeliness of completing key steps in reviewing teacher misconduct cases that are under the control of the commission. The workload report shall include the number of cases opened by case type and the average number of days and targets for each key step in the misconduct review process, including: (a) intake of new cases and documents, (b) assignment of cases to staff and gathering of needed documents for investigation, (c) investigation and notification of allegations to individuals charged with an offense, (d) review of cases by the commission, (e) implementation of final discipline decisions by the commission, (f) monitoring during the probationary period, and (g) response to violation of probationary period. The biannual reports shall be submitted by October 1 and March 1 of each year. All reports shall include historical data as well as data from the most recent six months. 5. (a) The Attorney General shall submit a biannual report to the chairpersons and vice chairpersons of the budget committees of each house of the Legislature, the Legislative Analyst’s Office, and the Department of Finance concerning the status of the teacher misconduct discipline caseload and other cases being handled by the Attorney General for the Commission on Teacher Credentialing. The biannual report shall be submitted by August 30 and February 28 of each year for the previous corresponding fiscal quarters. (b) Each report shall include, at a minimum, all of the following for teacher discipline matters: (1) The number of matters with the Attorney General at the beginning of the reporting period. (2) The number of matters for which further investigation was requested by the Attorney General. (3) The number of matters for which further investigation was received by the Attorney General. (4) The number of matters adjudicated by the Attorney General. (5) The number of matters with the Attorney General at the end of the reporting period. (6) The minimum, maximum, and median number of days from the date the Attorney General receives an accusation or statement of issues referral from the commission to the commencement of a hearing at the Office of Administrative Hearings for cases adjudicated during this period. (c) To determine the average cost of the Attorney General to adjudicate a case representing the commission, each report shall provide the following information for cases adjudicated in the reporting period specified in subdivision (a): (1) The average and median number of hours worked by the staff of the Attorney General to adjudicate accusation and statement of issues matters. (2) The average and median fees charged by the Attorney General to the commission to adjudicate accusation and statement of issues matters. (3) The average and median litigation costs to adjudicate accusation and statement of issues matters. (d) To determine the total activities conducted by the Attorney General to represent the commission for each period, the Attorney General shall report the following: (1) The total hours worked during the period by staff of the Attorney General for representation of the commission in teacher discipline matters. (2) The total fees charged during the period by the Attorney General to the commission for representation in teacher discipline matters. (3) The total hours worked during the period by staff of the Attorney General for representation of the commission unrelated to teacher discipline matters. (4) The total fees charged during the period by the Attorney General to the commission for representation unrelated to teacher discipline matters. (e) This information shall be provided with the intent that recipients shall be able to determine the caseload input and output of the Attorney General in relation to representation of the commission in teacher discipline cases, especially as it relates to determining the average case processing time for accusation and statement of issues representation and adjudication, and proper funding level for handling the teacher discipline caseload and other legal work for the commission. Staff from the Attorney General shall provide timely follow-up information to staff from the offices identified in subdivision (a) upon request if further explanation or information is required. 6. (a) The Commission on Teacher Credentialing and the State Department of Education (SDE) shall maintain a data-sharing agreement to provide the commission with certificated employee assignment data necessary to annually identify misassignments, as defined in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (5) of subdivision (b) of Section 33126 of the Education Code, at school districts and county offices of education. The data-sharing agreement shall also require the commission to make teacher credential, misassignment, and other relevant data available to the SDE to support federally required reporting consistent with the California State Plan for the federal Every Student Succeeds Act (P.L. 114-95) approved by the State Board of Education. (b) The commission shall use the nonpersonally identifiable educator identification number required by Section 44230.5 of the Education Code for the purpose of sharing data with local educational agencies and the SDE pursuant to this provision. 7. The Commission on Teacher Credentialing shall submit an annual report to the Department of Finance in September of each year detailing changes to contracts with examination providers, changes in examination fees, teacher examination validation, equating, or alignment studies, and teacher examination development conducted during the previous fiscal year. 8. Funds appropriated in Schedule (2) may be used to fund costs incurred from the administration and adjudication of cases, which include court reporter fees and representation from the Attorney General and the administrative hearing process through the Office of Administrative Hearings. 9. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (1), $583,000 and 3.0 positions are available to support Teacher Performance Assessment Workgroup activities, pursuant to Chapter 889 of the Statutes of 2024. 10. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (1), $1,145,000 is available on an ongoing basis to support the Commission on Teacher Credentialing’s leasing costs at the May Lee State Office Complex. 11. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (2), $253,000 and 2.0 positions are available to support administrative activities. 12. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (1), $671,000 and 5.0 positions are available to support workload related to increased teacher credential application volume. 13. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (1), $130,000 and 1.0 position is available to support workload related to adding supplementary and subject matter authorizations to a teaching credential, pursuant to Chapter 831 of the Statutes of 2024. 14. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (1), $322,000 is available for purposes of convening a workgroup, and 2.0 positions are to support the Professional Services Division with workload associated with updating and adding a non-teaching pathway to the Administrative Services Credential. 15. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (4), $717,000 and 4.0 positions are available to support the IT Branch with addressing various IT workload issues. 16. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (1), $422,000 and 2.0 positions are available to support legal staffing needs in the Division of Professional Practices. 17. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (1), $201,000 and 1.0 position are available to support workload associated with monitoring and supporting local educational agencies that consistently misassign educators. 18. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (4), $180,000 is available for ongoing IT security workload, including the implementation of a disaster recovery solution. 19. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (4), $156,000 and 1.0 position are available to support increased accounting workload from grant administration. 20. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (1), $2,000,000 and 7.0 positions are available for the Commission to develop and administer a statewide subject matter transcript review service to reduce the need for subject matter competency exams for teacher candidates. 6440-001-0001—For support of University of California ........................ 5,265,721,0005,298,771,000 Schedule: (1) 5440-Support ........................ 5,265,721,0005,298,771,000 Provisions: 1. This appropriation is exempt from Sections 6.00 and 31.00. 2. (a) The Regents of the University of California shall implement measures to reduce the university’s cost structure. (b) The Legislature finds and declares that many state employees hold positions with comparable scope of responsibilities, complexity, breadth of job functions, experience requirements, and other relevant factors to those employees designated to be in the Senior Management Group pursuant to existing Regents Policy. (c) (1) Therefore, at a minimum, the Regents shall, when considering compensation for any employee designated to be in the Senior Management Group, use a market reference zone that includes state employees. (2) At a minimum, the Regents shall include in a market reference zone all comparable positions from the lists included in subdivision (l) of Section 8 of Article III of the California Constitution and Article 1 (commencing with Section 11550) of Chapter 6 of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code. 2.1. Notwithstanding any other law, the Director of Finance may reduce funds appropriated in this item by an amount equal to the estimated Cal Grant and Middle Class Scholarship Program cost increases caused by a 2026–27 academic year increase in systemwide tuition. No reduction may be authorized pursuant to this provision sooner than 30 days after the Director of Finance provides notice of the intended reduction to the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee. 3. (a) The Controller shall transfer funds from this appropriation upon receipt of a report from the Department of Finance indicating the amount of debt service anticipated to become due and payable in the fiscal year associated with state general obligation bonds issued for university projects. (b) The Controller shall return funds to this appropriation upon receipt of a report from the Department of Finance. 4. Payments made by the state to the University of California for each month from July through April shall not exceed one-twelfth of the amount appropriated in this item, less the amount that is expected to be transferred pursuant to Provision 3. Transfers of funds pursuant to Provision 3 shall not be considered payments made by the state to the university. 5. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $15,800,000 shall be available to support meal donation programs, food pantries serving students, CalFresh enrollment, and other means of directly providing nutrition assistance to students. These funds shall be expended and reported as specified in Section 66023.9 of the Education Code. 6. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $21,300,000 shall be available to increase student mental health resources. These funds shall be expended and reported as specified in Section 66023.9 of the Education Code. 7. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $3,700,000 shall be available to support rapid rehousing efforts assisting homeless and housing-insecure students.These funds shall be expended and reported as specified in Section 66023.9 of the Education Code. 8. (a) Of the funds appropriated in this item, $12,900,000 shall be available to support and expand existing UC Programs in Medical Education and to establish a new UC Program in Medical Education focused on Native American communities. These funds may also be available to establish additional UC Programs in Medical Education that are state priorities. The University of California is encouraged to use these funds to support UC Programs in Medical Education that would serve underrepresented areas of the state. (b) One-third of the funds appropriated in this provision shall be used to augment need-based financial aid for UC Programs in Medical Education students. (c) The University of California shall report the following information about UC Programs in Medical Education program outcomes to the Department of Finance and the Legislature annually by March 1, until March 1, 2027: (1) Enrollment numbers and student demographics in each program. (2) A summary of each program’s current curriculum. (3) Graduation and residency placement rates for each program. (4) To the extent feasible, postgraduate data on where each program’s graduates currently practice and the extent to which they serve the populations and communities targeted by the program in which they participated. 9. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $1,823,000 shall be used for legal services for undocumented and immigrant students, faculty, and staff. 10. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $3,000,000 shall be used for the University of California Firearm Violence Research Center. It is the intent of the Legislature that these funds be directly allocated by the University of California to the University of California Firearm Violence Research Center, and that the University of California and the University of California, Davis, campus shall not assess administrative costs or charges against these funds. 11. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $1,000,000 shall be used for the Institute on Global Conflict and Cooperation. 12. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $4,000,000 shall be used by the University of California to provide summer-term financial aid to any student who is eligible for state financial aid and is a California resident, including students receiving an exemption for nonresident tuition pursuant to Section 68130.5 of the Education Code. These funds shall be used to supplement and not supplant existing funds provided by the University of California for summer-term financial aid. The Legislature finds and declares that this provision is a state law within the meaning of subsection (d) of Section 1621 of Title 8 of the United States Code. 13. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $6,000,000 shall be available to support foster youth programs pursuant to Section 92663 of the Education Code. 14. By November 1 each year, the University of California shall report key information regarding UCPath to the Department of Finance and the Joint Legislative Budget Committee. At a minimum, the report shall include UCPath’s staffing levels, funding by source, and spending by function. The funding source data shall summarize fund sources used by campuses to cover any campus assessment. The report shall include actual data for the prior fiscal year, budgeted data for the current fiscal year, and projected data for the coming fiscal year. The report shall include any cost savings resulting from the UCPath project at the campus level. 15. To provide for legislative oversight, the Office of the President of the University of California shall report to the Legislature and the Department of Finance, by September 30 each year, all of the following information for the preceding fiscal year and estimates of all of the following for the current fiscal year: (a) The amount of any campus assessments charged to support the Office of the President of the University of California, reflecting amounts contributed by each campus and the fund source or sources from which those amounts were paid. (b) The total budget of the Office of the President of the University of California. (c) A categorized list of actual and planned budgetary expenditures for the Office of the President of the University of California. (d) Factors contributing to any year-over-year change in the budget of the Office of the President of the University of California. (e) The amount of the budget of the Office of the President of the University of California that either passes through to recipients across the state or supports fee-for-service activities aligned with the university’s mission. (f) Information on reserves and fund balances held by the Office of the President of the University of California. 16. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $650,000 shall be available to support the integration of Association of Independent California Colleges and Universities members onto the ASSIST platform. 17. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $1,000,000 shall be available to support the California Vectorborne Disease Surveillance Gateway. 18. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $4,000,000 shall be available to the University of California for disbursement to all undergraduate-serving University of California campuses, after consultation with Underground Scholars directors and coordinators, to establish and sustain Underground Scholars programs as a centralized location on campus where incarcerated, formerly incarcerated, and system-impacted students can be provided with recruitment programs, retention services, advocacy, and wellness programs to support admission to the University of California system and timely program completion. Campuses shall share best practices for program operations annually with other University of California campuses for purposes of developing spending plans to serve incarcerated, formerly incarcerated, and system-impacted students. Each undergraduate-serving University of California campus shall have one or more dedicated Underground Scholars directors and coordinators who will serve as a point of contact for students. 19. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $5,000,000 shall be available for the University of California to establish and operate student services programs on each campus to serve undocumented students. 20. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $22,500,000 shall be available to support Student Academic Preparation and Educational Partnerships programs. 21. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $75,000 shall be available to support the University of California, Los Angeles Anderson School of Management to include climate change economic impacts by California region in the UCLA Anderson Forecast economic forecasting model for California. 22. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $21,000,000 shall be available to the University of California to support UC Medical School Projects at UC Merced and UC Riverside. 23. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $13,000,000 shall be available to support research, education, and public engagement on labor issues in California. The funds shall be allocated as follows: (a) $3,000,000 to the University of California, Berkeley Labor Center. (b) $3,000,000 to the University of California, Los Angeles Labor Center. (c) $3,000,000 to the University of California, Merced Community and Labor Center. (d) $500,000 to the University of California, Berkeley Labor Occupational Health Program. (e) $500,000 to the University of California, Los Angeles Labor Occupational Safety and Health Program. (f) $3,000,000 to be allocated to support a multicampus initiative as determined by a five-member committee comprising the directors of the centers specified in subprovisions (a), (b), and (c), or their designees, as well as two members appointed by the California Federation of Labor. The committee shall allocate these funds based on proposals submitted by the University of California’s Davis, Irvine, Riverside, San Diego, Santa Barbara, and Santa Cruz campuses. The committee shall determine the criteria and timeline to submit proposals, as well as how to allocate funds among eligible proposals. 24. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $41,601,000 shall be available to support approved UC Higher Education Student Housing Grant Program projects. 25. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $33,300,000 shall be available to support UC Merced and UC Riverside Campus Expansion Project and the UC Berkeley Clean Energy Campus Project. 26. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $2,000,000 shall be available to support the UC Riverside School of Medicine. 27. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $254,361,000 is provided as a five percent base funding increase and shall be available to support operational costs. 28. It is the intent of the Legislature to defer $129,692,000 one-time from the General Fund from the 2026–27 fiscal year until the 2027–28 fiscal year. 29. For the 2026–27 fiscal year, the Director of Finance may authorize a no-interest, short-term loan from General Fund resources, upon the request of the University of California, to assist cash flow resources for purposes of remediating state payment deferrals. (a) A loan may be authorized pursuant to this section no sooner than 30 days after notification in writing of the necessity therefor is provided to the chairpersons of the committees in each house of the Legislature that consider appropriations and the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, or not sooner than whatever lesser time that notification the chairperson of that joint committee, or the chairperson’s designee, may in each instance determine. 30. (a) Of the funds appropriated in this item, $153,000,000 is provided for the replacement of 4,510 nonresident undergraduate full-time equivalent students. As specified in Section 93000 of the Education Code, it is the intent of the Legislature that the University of California replace the 4,510 nonresident undergraduate full-time equivalent students by replacing 902 nonresident undergraduate full-time equivalent students annually from 2022–23 through 2026–27 with an equal number of resident undergraduate full-time equivalent students combined at the Berkeley, Los Angeles, and San Diego campuses. The total combined annual replacement of nonresident students should be 902 full-time equivalent students, with Berkeley, Los Angeles, and San Diego each contributing towards the 902 full-time equivalent student replacement total annually. If the University of California replaces more than 902 nonresident undergraduate full-time students in the 2025–26 enrollment target, those additional students can be counted towards the 2026–27 target. Nonresident undergraduate full-time equivalent student replacement above that annual 902 target from 2022–23, 2023–24, 2024–25, and 2025–26 can be counted towards the replacement of 902 nonresident undergraduate full-time equivalent students in 2026–27. If the actual reduction in nonresident undergraduate enrollment in 2026–27 at these campuses is fewer than 902 full-time equivalent students, the Director of Finance shall reduce funding for the University of California by the portion that is attributable to each student under the target reduction level, as specified in Section 93000 of the Education Code. (b) It is the intent of the Legislature to provide $31,000,000 one-time General Fund support for the purposes specified in subprovision (a) in 2027–28. 31. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $1,500,000 shall be available to support students with disabilities. This funding shall supplement, not supplant, core funds the University of California spends to support these students. The University of California shall allocate these funds to campuses based upon their number of students with disabilities. Campuses shall use these funds to improve services for these students, with a focus on increasing the number of professional staff serving them, thereby reducing their associated caseload. 32. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $3,000,000 shall be available to support the University of California, Los Angeles Ralph J. Bunche Center for African American Studies. 33. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $430,000 shall be available to support the California Newspaper Projects at the University of California, Riverside. 34. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $1,500,000 shall be available on a one-time basis to sustain and expand the support for students in foster care through the University of California First Star Program for postsecondary education success. Campuses shall be selected through a competitive grant process by the Office of the President of the University of California. When selecting the participating campuses, the Office of the President shall consider, at least, the following factors: the foster youth population density around each proposed campus location, possible partnerships with other organizations assisting the foster youth population, public transportation accessibility, and ability to leverage other funding sources or in-kind resources to support program implementation. 35. (a) It is the intent of the Legislature that the University of California also increase resident undergraduate enrollment by 2,968 full-time equivalent students in 2026–27, for a total level of 212,503 resident undergraduate full-time equivalent students in 2026–27. (b) The systemwide growth identified in this provision is inclusive of the additional 902 resident undergraduate full-time equivalent students resulting from the replacement of nonresident undergraduate full-time equivalent students identified in Provision 30 of this item. 36.Of the funds appropriated in this item, $3,000,000 is available on a one-time basis for the UC Menopause Centers of Excellence. 36. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $3,400,000 is available on a one-time basis to support perimenopause and menopause care coverage and statewide public awareness. The funds specified for education and public awareness shall be allocated to the University of California Menopause Centers of Excellence to advance statewide communication sciences, the sharing of evidence-based education, rural outreach, addressing care gaps, language access, and professional development and education for providers. Systemwide coordination, provider training, outreach activities, and implementation shall be led by the UCLA Comprehensive Menopause Program, which serves as the UC’s established infrastructure for menopause care delivery and program development. Remaining funds shall support the continued development of menopause services across the other UC campuses within the systemwide framework. 37. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $9,000,000 is available on a one-time basis for the Cal-Bridge program at the University of California. 38. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $750,000 is available on a one-time basis for the ENLACE program at the University of California. 39. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $5,000,000 is available on a one-time basis for UCLA, for the Center for Reproductive Health, Law, and Policy. 40. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $3,600,000 is available on a one-time basis for UC San Diego for Prime Rx. 41. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $1,800,000 is available on a one-time basis for UC Berkeley, for ACCESS (Optometry). 42. (a) Of the funds appropriated in this item, $6,500,000 is available on a one-time basis for the University of California Office of the President for UC voting rights programs. (b) Of the amount described in subprovision (a), $5,000,000 shall be used to support the Voting Rights Project and $1,500,000 shall be used to support the Center for Race and Democracy Studies. (c) The University of California Office of the President shall not retain or utilize any portion of the funds appropriated pursuant to this provision for administrative costs. 43. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $3,000,000 is available on a one-time basis for UC San Diego to develop and offer in South San Diego a bachelor’s degree program combining business principles with data science, or an additional STEM-related degree program, to address high regional workforce needs, strengthen the local talent pipeline, and support economic growth in the region. 44. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $3,000,000 shall be available on a one-time basis for the University of California, Los Angeles Ralph J. Bunche Center for African American Studies to support research, training, and community-engaged programs on the condition of Black life in California. 45. Funds appropriated in Provisions 34, 36, 37, 38, 39, 40, 41, 42, 43, and 44 of this item shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure without regard to fiscal years. 6440-001-0007—For support of University of California, payable from the Breast Cancer Research Account, Breast Cancer Fund ........................ 4,417,000 Schedule: (1) 5440-Support ........................ 4,417,000 Provisions: 1. Pursuant to Section 16304 of the Government Code, the funds appropriated in this item shall be available without regard to the fiscal years. 6440-001-0042—For support of University of California, payable from the State Highway Account, State Transportation Fund ........................ 1,000,000 Schedule: (1) 5440-Support ........................ 1,000,000 Provisions: 1. The funds appropriated in this item shall be used for the Pacific Earthquake Engineering Research Center. 2. Pursuant to Section 16304 of the Government Code, the funds appropriated in this item shall be available without regard to fiscal years. 6440-001-0046—For support of University of California, payable from the Public Transportation Account, State Transportation Fund ........................ 980,000 Schedule: (1) 5440-Support ........................ 980,000 Provisions: 1. The funds appropriated in this item shall be used for the institutes of transportation studies. 2. Pursuant to Section 16304 of the Government Code, the funds appropriated in this item shall be available without regard to fiscal years. 6440-001-0234—For support of University of California, payable from the Research Account, Cigarette and Tobacco Products Surtax Fund ........................ 5,329,000 Schedule: (1) 5440-Support ........................ 5,329,000 Provisions: 1. Pursuant to Section 16304 of the Government Code, the funds appropriated in this item shall be available without regard to fiscal years. 6440-001-0320—For support of University of California, payable from the Oil Spill Prevention and Administration Fund ........................ 3,250,000 Schedule: (1) 5440-Support ........................ 3,250,000 Provisions: 1. The funds appropriated in this item shall be used for the Oiled Wildlife Care Network. 2. Pursuant to Section 16304 of the Government Code, the funds appropriated in this item shall be available without regard to fiscal years. 6440-001-0890—For support of University of California, payable from the Federal Trust Fund ........................ 5,499,000 Schedule: (1) 5440-Support ........................ 5,499,000 Provisions: 1. The funds appropriated in this item shall be used for the federal Gaining Early Awareness and Readiness for Undergraduate Programs (GEAR UP) (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1070a–21 et seq.). 6440-001-0945—For support of University of California, payable from the California Breast Cancer Research Fund ........................ 363,000 Schedule: (1) 5440-Support ........................ 363,000 Provisions: 1. Pursuant to Section 16304 of the Government Code, the funds appropriated in this item shall be available without regard to fiscal years. 6440-001-1017—For support of University of California, payable from the Umbilical Cord Blood Collection Program Fund ........................ 2,500,000 Schedule: (1) 5440-Support ........................ 2,500,000 Provisions: 1. Pursuant to Section 16304 of the Government Code, the funds appropriated in this item shall be available without regard to fiscal years. 6440-001-3054—For support of University of California, payable from the Health Care Benefits Fund ........................ 3,200,000 Schedule: (1) 5440-Support ........................ 3,200,000 Provisions: 1. Pursuant to Section 16304 of the Government Code, the funds appropriated in this item shall be available without regard to fiscal years. 6440-001-3290—For support of University of California, payable from the Road Maintenance and Rehabilitation Account, State Transportation Fund ........................ 5,000,000 Schedule: (1) 5440-Support ........................ 5,000,000 Provisions: 1. Pursuant to Section 16304 of the Government Code, the funds appropriated in this item shall be available without regard to fiscal years. 6440-001-8054—For support of University of California, payable from the California Cancer Research Fund ........................ 425,000 Schedule: (1) 5440-Support ........................ 425,000 Provisions: 1. Pursuant to Section 16304 of the Government Code, the funds appropriated in this item shall be available without regard to fiscal years. 6440-001-8141—For support of University of California, payable from the Electronic Cigarette Settlements Fund ........................ 2,000,000 Schedule: (1) 5440-Support ........................ 2,000,000 Provisions: 1. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $1,000,000 shall support a project to investigate the biology and use of nicotine replacement therapies that could be used in youth and young adults. 2. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $1,000,000 shall expand community partnerships to develop additional culturally-tailored cessation interventions for California populations that are disproportionately impacted by tobacco products. 6440-005-0001—For support of University of California ........................ 125,111,000 Schedule: (1) 5440-Support ........................ 125,111,000 Provisions: 1. The funds appropriated in this item shall be for the University of California, Division of Agriculture and Natural Resources. These funds shall be used to supplement and not supplant other existing funds provided to the division by the University of California. 6440-490—Reappropriation, University of California. The balances of the appropriations provided in the following citations are reappropriated for the purposes provided for in those appropriations and, pursuant to Section 16304 of the Government Code, the funds appropriated in this item shall be available without regard to fiscal year: 0001—​General Fund (1) Provision 16 of Item 6440-001-0001, Budget Act of 2021 (Chs. 21, 69, and 240, Stats. 2021) (2) Provision 30 of Item 6440-001-0001, Budget Act of 2021 (Chs. 21, 69, and 240, Stats. 2021) (3) Provision 44 of Item 6440-001-0001, Budget Act of 2021 (Chs. 21, 69, and 240, Stats. 2021) (4) Subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (c) of Section 19.56, Budget Act of 2022 (Chs. 43, 45, and 249, Stats. 2022) (5) Subparagraph (E) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (c) of Section 19.56, Budget Act of 2022 (Chs. 43, 45, and 249, Stats. 2022) (6) Subparagraph (F) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (c) of Section 19.56, Budget Act of 2022 (Chs. 43, 45, and 249, Stats. 2022) 6445-001-1031—For support of California Institute for Regenerative Medicine, payable from the California Institute for Regenerative Medicine Licensing Revenues and Royalties Fund ........................ 5,000,000 Schedule: (1) 5520-California Institute for Regenerative Medicine ........................ 5,000,000 6600-001-0001—For support of University of California College of the Law, San Francisco ........................ 35,915,000 Schedule: (1) 5530-Support ........................ 35,915,000 Provisions: 1. This appropriation is exempt from Section 31.00. 2. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $10,079,000 shall be allocated to support the McAllister Tower building capital renovation project on the College of the Law, San Francisco campus. 3. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $1,000,000 shall be made available to support campus public safety and security programs. 6600-093-0001—For support of University of California College of the Law, San Francisco, for rental payments on lease-revenue bonds ........................ 3,109,000 Schedule: (1) 5530-Support ........................ 3,109,000 Provisions: 1. The Controller shall transfer funds appropriated in this item for base rental as and when provided for in the schedule submitted by the State Public Works Board. Notwithstanding the payment dates in any related Facility Lease or Indenture, the schedule may provide for an earlier transfer of funds to ensure debt requirements are met and pay base rental in full when due. 2. The Controller shall transfer for additional rental no later than 30 days after enactment of this budget, $39,000 of the amount appropriated in this item, to the Expense Account in the Public Buildings Construction Fund. 3. This item may be adjusted pursuant to Section 4.30. Any adjustments to this item shall be reported to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee pursuant to Section 4.30. 6610-001-0001—For support of California State University ........................ 5,581,362,0005,586,762,000 Schedule: (1) 5560-Support ........................ 5,581,362,0005,586,762,000 Provisions: 1. This appropriation is exempt from Sections 6.00 and 31.00. 2. (a) Of the funds appropriated in this item, $264,868,000 is provided as a five percent base funding increase and shall be available to support operational costs. 2.1. (a) Of the funds appropriated in this item, $15,800,000 shall be available to increase student mental health resources. These funds shall be expended and reported as specified in Section 66023.9 of the Education Code. (b) Of the funds appropriated in this item, $26,300,000 is available for the Graduation Initiative to sustain and expand the California State University Basic Needs Initiative. These funds shall be expended and reported as specified in Section 66023.9 of the Education Code. 2.2. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $25,000,000 shall be available to support the transition of Humboldt State University into a polytechnic university. 2.3. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $35,000,000 shall be available to support the Graduation Initiative 2025. This funding shall be used exclusively to support efforts to close equity gaps in graduation rates for low-income students and historically underrepresented students. California State University shall report on the activities it is undertaking to close equity gaps, how it is evaluating the result of these activities, the most important lessons it has learned to date, and what changes it needs to make moving forward to eliminate these gaps. The California State University also shall report systemwide and campus graduation rates for all students, low-income students, and historically underrepresented students, disaggregated by race. All of this information may be included in its annual report required by Section 89295 of the Education Code. 2.4. (a) Of the funds appropriated in this item, $11,300,000 shall be available to support Project Rebound programs for formerly incarcerated students at participating California State University campuses. Funds shall be distributed to campuses using a funding formula that provides campuses with (1) standard baseline operating funds, (2) augmented baseline funding based on matriculated student enrollment headcounts in individual campus programs, and (3) annually recurring equity allocations for student basic needs relative to the indices of student need among program participants in individual campus programs, such as number of Pell Grant recipients, students who have exhausted their lifetime Pell Grant eligibility, students eligible for tuition exemptions pursuant to Chapter 814 of the Statutes of 2001 (Assembly Bill 540 of the 2001–02 Regular Session), and student parents of minor children. Model programming shall incorporate the following program components: (1) Admissions supports, including, but not limited to: (I) permitting eligible students to apply after the application initial filing period, (II) utilizing general exceptions as an educational opportunity program pursuant to Section 40900 of Title 5 of the California Code of Regulations and subdivision (c) of Section 66022.5 of the Education Code; and (III) facilitating the seamless transfer from one California State University to another of students enrolled in California State University degree programs while incarcerated who are released from custody prior to degree completion. (2) Comprehensive support to assist students with the transition to on-campus higher education, including (I) wraparound student support services that address needs such as books and supplies, tuition, scholarships, housing, food, and transportation; and (II) collaboration with offices of financial aid to provide individualized cost of attendance adjustments to minimize the impacts of program basic needs supports on student financial aid eligibility. (3) Staffing and space commitments, including: (I) dedicated staffing of a program coordinator or director, dedicated academic adviser or retention specialist, and student peer navigators with preference for staff with lived experience in the criminal justice system; (II) dedicated space on the university campus for the program that allows for both privacy and community; (III) use of the Federal Work-Study Program to provide eligible students with employment and professional development opportunities; and (IV) formal partnerships with California Community Colleges to build transfer pathways, and with other key stakeholders, including, but not limited to, the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, probation departments, and community-based organizations. (b) As a condition of receiving the $11,300,000 specified in this provision, the California State University shall, no later than April 1, 2027, and annually each year thereafter, report to the Department of Finance and the relevant policy and fiscal committees of the Legislature regarding the California State University’s use of these funds, program enrollment, and student outcomes. The report shall include, but not be limited to, the following: (1) A description of educational and support services each Project Rebound campus provides to students and potential students. (2) A description of outreach, orientation, and transfer support services the Project Rebound Consortium provides to students and potential students in the custody of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation. (3) Student enrollment in Project Rebound, disaggregated by race, ethnicity, gender, and age, as well as first-time freshmen, transfer students, undergraduate students, and graduate students, as well as students with prior foster care system involvement, prior juvenile justice involvement, and students that are parents of minor children. (4) Outcomes associated with the program, disaggregated by campus, including, but not limited to, student retention, graduation, and recidivism rates. (5) Any plans to expand Project Rebound to other California State University campuses. 2.5. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $6,800,000 shall be available to support rapid rehousing efforts assisting homeless and housing-insecure students. These funds shall be expended and reported as specified in Section 66023.9 of the Education Code. 3. (a) The Controller shall transfer funds from this appropriation as follows: (1) For base rental as and when provided for in the schedule submitted by the Department of Finance. Notwithstanding the payment dates in any related facility lease or indenture, the schedule may provide for an earlier transfer of funds to ensure debt requirements are met and to pay base rental in full when due. (2) For additional rental no later than 30 days after enactment of this budget, $64,000 of the amount appropriated in this item to the Expense Account in the Public Buildings Construction Fund. (3) This item may be adjusted pursuant to Section 4.30. Any adjustments to this item shall be reported to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee pursuant to Section 4.30. (4) For debt service anticipated to become due and payable in the fiscal year associated with state general obligation bonds issued for university projects upon receipt of any report from the Department of Finance. (b) The Controller shall return funds to this appropriation if directed pursuant to a report from the Department of Finance. 3.1. Notwithstanding any other law, the Director of Finance may reduce funds appropriated in this item by an amount equal to the estimated Cal Grant and Middle Class Scholarship program cost increases caused by a 2026–27 academic year increase in systemwide tuition. A reduction shall not be authorized pursuant to this provision sooner than 30 days after the Director of Finance provides notice of the intended reduction to the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee. 3.5. Payments made by the state to the California State University for each month from July through April shall not exceed one-twelfth of the amount appropriated in this item, less than the amount that is expected to be transferred pursuant to Provision 3. Transfers of funds pursuant to Provision 3 shall not be considered payments made by the state to the university. 3.6. It is the intent of the Legislature that the California State University increase resident undergraduate enrollment in 2026–27. It is the expectation of the Legislature that the California State University increase resident undergraduate enrollment by an additional 10,161 full-time equivalent students (FTES) in 2026–27 for a total resident undergraduate enrollment of 360,160 FTES. 4. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $6,000,000 shall be used by the California State University to provide summer-term financial aid to any student who is eligible for state financial aid and who is a California resident, including students who receive an exemption from nonresident tuition pursuant to Section 68130.5 of the Education Code. These funds shall be used to supplement and not supplant existing funds provided by the California State University for summer-term financial aid. The Legislature finds and declares that this provision is a state law within the meaning of subsection (d) of Section 1621 of Title 8 of the United States Code. 5. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $5,500,000 shall be available to support the estimated costs of an expanded fee waiver for Medal of Honor recipients, children of Medal of Honor recipients, and dependents of service-injured veterans attending the California State University. 6. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $12,000,000 shall be available to support foster youth programs pursuant to Section 89348 of the Education Code. 7. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $8,000,000 shall be available to support the Asian American, Native Hawaiian, and Pacific Islander Student Achievement Program pursuant to Article 11 (commencing with Section 89297) of Chapter 2 of Part 55 of Division 8 of Title 3 of the Education Code. 8. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $1,000,000 shall be available to support students with disabilities. This funding shall supplement, not supplant, California State University core expenditures to support these students. The California State University shall allocate these funds to campuses based upon the number of students with disabilities. Campuses shall use these funds to improve services for these students, with a focus on increasing the number of professional staff serving them, thereby reducing their associated caseload. 9. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $1,000,000 shall be available to support the Mervyn M. Dymally African American Political and Economic Institute at the California State University, Dominguez Hills. 10. It is the intent of the Legislature to defer $143,839,000 one-time General Fund from the 2026–27 fiscal year to the 2027–28 fiscal year. 11. For the 2026–27 fiscal year, the Director of Finance may authorize a no-interest, short-term loan from General Fund resources, upon request of the university, to assist cash flow resources for purposes of remediating state payment deferrals. A loan may be authorized pursuant to this section not sooner than 30 days after notification in writing of the necessity therefor is provided to the chairpersons of the committees in each house of the Legislature that consider appropriations and the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee or not sooner than whatever lesser time after that notification the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, or the Chairperson’s designee, may in each instance determine. 12. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $52,000,000 shall be available to support approved the Higher Education Student Housing Grant Program projects of the California State University. 13. (a) It is the intent of the Legislature that the California State University system prioritize funding providing new enrollment growth funding to campuses that have met or exceeded enrollment funding targets over the last two years. 13. (a)(b) By December 31 of each year, beginning in 2026, each California State University campus that has experienced sustained enrollment declines and is not currently providing an annual progress report shall submit a turnaround plan to the Chancellor of the California State University. Campuses shall consult with the community and campus stakeholders as they prepare the plan. Each turnaround plan shall include, but not be limited to, the following information: (1) A list of strategies the campus has decided to implement to increase student demand and enrollment; the expected outcomes of each strategy, including any results to date; an implementation timeline for each strategy, including actions taken to date; and the cost of each strategy (one time, ongoing, and total). Comparable information shall also be provided for any other strategies that the campus is seriously considering to increase its enrollment, even if the campus has not yet finalized or begun implementing them. (2) Enrollment projections for each of the next five years. (3) A list of cost-saving strategies the campus has decided to implement; the amount of associated savings (one time, ongoing, and total) expected to be achieved as a result of each strategy, including any savings achieved to date; and an implementation timeline for each strategy, including actions taken to date. Comparable information shall also be provided for any other strategies that the campus is seriously considering to reduce its costs, even if the campus has not yet finalized or begun implementing them. (b)(c) Each campus with a turnaround plan, beginning with those submitted pursuant to the Budget Act of 2025 (Chs. 4 and 5, Stats. 2025), shall provide annual progress reports for the subsequent five years. Each of these reports shall track the progress made by the campus to increase enrollment and implement the strategies identified in its turnaround plan. These campuses shall submit their progress reports to the Chancellor of the California State University no later than December 31 of each year. (c)(d) Any California State University campus that meets its final enrollment growth target set forth in its turnaround plan prior to the end of the multi-year reporting period is no longer required to provide annual progress reports. (d)(e) The Chancellor of the California State University shall review and compile campus turnaround plans and progress reports into one consolidated report each year. The consolidated report also shall include strategies for increasing student demand and enrollment systemwide as well as strategies for reducing systemwide costs, particularly through management efficiencies and improved or innovative coordination. By March 1 each year, beginning in 2027, the Chancellor of the California State University shall submit the consolidated report to the Department of Finance and Joint Legislative Budget Committee. 14. (a) Of the funds appropriated in this item, $5,400,000 shall be available on a one-time basis to the California State University system. The California State University shall establish the California-Mexican Initiative for New Opportunities (CAMINO) program for the development and implementation of binational higher education initiatives benefiting California and the border region. (b) Funds appropriated in this provision shall be administered by San Diego State University and may be used, as determined by San Diego State University, for purposes including, but not limited to, all of the following: (1) Binational student and faculty mobility or exchange programs. (2) Cross-border workforce and economic development initiatives. (3) Joint degree or academic partnerships. (4) Border region research and innovation collaborations. (5) Student support services for border-region communities. (6) Conferences, convenings, summits, public forums, and related events that support or advance California-Mexico higher education, workforce, research, or economic collaboration. (c) The San Diego State University may award grant funding available to any California State University campus or community-based organization that applies for funding pursuant to this provision. Any participating California State University campus or community-based organization shall demonstrate substantial experience and success in California-Mexico educational, workforce, research, economic development, or binational collaboration activities. 6610-001-3290—For support of California State University, payable from the Road Maintenance and Rehabilitation Account, State Transportation Fund ........................ 2,000,000 Schedule: (1) 5560-Support ........................ 2,000,000 6610-002-0001—For support of California State University, for the Center for California Studies ........................ 7,072,000 Schedule: (1) 5560-Support ........................ 7,072,000 Provisions: 1. The funds appropriated in this item are for the following: (a) Assembly Fellows Program ........................ 1,799,000 (b) Senate Fellows Program ........................ 1,341,000 (c) Executive Fellows Program ........................ 1,252,000 (d) Judicial Fellows Program ........................ 805,000 (e) Sacramento Semester Program ........................ 200,000 (f) LegiSchool Project ........................ 130,000 (g) Faculty Research Fellows Program ........................ 96,000 (h) General Center Operations ........................ 1,349,000 (i) California Education Policy Fellowship Program ........................ 100,000 6610-003-0001—For support of California State University Student Success Network, administered by the Education Insights Center at California State University, Sacramento ........................ 1,100,000 Schedule: (1) 5560-Support ........................ 1,100,000 Provisions: 1. The funds appropriated in this item shall be used for the California State University Student Success Network. The Education Insights Center at California State University, Sacramento, shall administer these funds. 6610-490—Reappropriation, California State University. The balances of the appropriations provided in the following citations are reappropriated for the purposes provided for in those appropriations and shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2027: 3290—​Road Maintenance and Rehabilitation Account, State Transportation Fund (1) Item 6610-001-3290, Budget Act of 2023 (Chs. 12, 38, and 189, Stats. 2023) (2) Item 6610-001-3290, Budget Act of 2024 (Chs. 22, 35, and 994, Stats. 2024) 6645-001-0001—For support of Health Benefits for California State University Annuitants. For the state’s contribution for the cost of a health benefits plan for annuitants and other employees, in accordance with Sections 22820, 22879, 22881, 22883, and 22953 of the Government Code, the cost of which is not chargeable to any other appropriation ........................ 605,005,000 Schedule: (1) 5660-Health Benefits for CSU Retired Annuitants ........................ 605,005,000 Provisions: 1. The maximum transfer amounts specified in subdivision (c) of Section 26.00 do not apply to this item. 2. Notwithstanding Section 22844 of the Government Code or any other law, annuitants who were employed by the California State University who become eligible for Part A and Part B of Medicare during the 2026–27 fiscal year, and family members of these annuitants who become eligible for Part A and Part B of Medicare during the 2026–27 fiscal year, shall not be enrolled in a basic health benefits plan during the 2026–27 fiscal year. If the annuitant or family member is enrolled in Part A or Part B of Medicare, they may enroll in a supplement to the Medicare plan. This provision does not apply to employees and family members who are specifically excluded from enrollment in a supplement to the Medicare plan by federal law or regulation. 3. The maximum monthly contribution for an annuitant’s health benefits plan shall be $1,084 for a single enrollee, $2,057 for an enrollee and one dependent, and $2,638 for an enrollee and two or more dependents for the 2026 calendar year. The maximum monthly contribution shall be adjusted based on Section 22871 of the Government Code to reflect the health benefit plan premium rates approved by the Board of Administration of the Public Employees’ Retirement System for the 2027 calendar year. 4. Notwithstanding any other law, upon approval of the Director of Finance, expenditure authority may be transferred between Item 9650-001-0001 and this item as necessary to fund costs for health benefits. 5. The Director of Finance may adjust this appropriation to reflect the health benefit premiums approved by the Board of Administration of the Public Employees’ Retirement System for the 2027 calendar year. Within 30 days of making any adjustment pursuant to this provision, the Director of Finance shall report the adjustment in writing to the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee and the chairpersons of the committees in each house of the Legislature that consider appropriations. 6645-495—Reversion, Health Benefits for California State University Annuitants. As of June 30, 2026, the unencumbered balances of the appropriations in Item 6645-001-0001, Budget Act of 2024, shall revert to the General Fund. 6870-001-0001—For support of Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges ........................ 26,968,000 Schedule: (1) 5675-Special Services and Operations ........................ 36,213,000 (2) Reimbursements to 5675-Special Services and Operations ........................ −9,245,000 Provisions: 1. Funds appropriated in this item may be expended or encumbered to make one or more payments under a personal services contract of a visiting educator pursuant to Section 19050.8 of the Government Code, a long-term special consultant services contract, or an employment contract between an entity that is not a state agency and a person who is under the direct or daily supervision of a state agency, only if all of the following conditions are met: (a) The person providing service under the contract provides full financial disclosure to the Fair Political Practices Commission in accordance with the rules and regulations of the commission. (b) The service provided under the contract does not result in the displacement of any represented civil service employee. (c) The rate of compensation for salary and health benefits for the person providing service under the contract does not exceed by more than 10 percent of the current rate of compensation for salary and health benefits determined by the Department of Human Resources for civil service personnel in a comparable position. The payment of any other compensation or any reimbursement for travel or per diem expenses shall be in accordance with the State Administrative Manual and the rules and regulations of the Department of Human Resources. 6870-001-0925—For support of Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges, payable from the California Community Colleges Business Resource Assistance and Innovation Network Trust Fund ........................ 10,000 Schedule: (1) 5675030-CCCCO State Operations Budget ........................ 10,000 6870-001-6087—For support of Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges, payable from the 2016 California Community College Capital Outlay Bond Fund ........................ 2,934,000 Schedule: (1) 5675030-CCCCO State Operations Budget ........................ 2,934,000 6870-003-3085—For support of Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges, payable from the Behavioral Health Services Fund ........................ 126,000 Schedule: (1) 5675030-CCCCO State Operations Budget ........................ 126,000 6870-101-0001—For local assistance, Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges (Proposition 98) ........................ 6,981,231,0006,960,978,000 Schedule: (1) 5670015-Apportionments ........................ 4,462,613,0004,510,270,000 (2) 5670019-Apprenticeship ........................ 66,623,00080,960,000 (3) 5670023-Apprenticeship Training and Instruction ........................ 64,241,000 (4) 5675040-Student Equity and Achievement Program ........................ 554,081,000 (5) 5675019-Student Financial Aid Administration ........................ 95,224,00095,602,000 (6) 5675027-Disabled Students ........................ 183,814,000 (7) 5675031-Student Services for CalWORKs Recipients ........................ 58,556,000 (8) 5675035-Foster Care Education Program ........................ 6,154,000 (9) 5675045-Legal Services ........................ 10,000,000 (10) 5675061-Academic Senate for the Community Colleges ........................ 1,796,000 (11) 5675069-Equal Employment Opportunity ........................ 12,767,000 (12) 5675073-Part-Time Faculty Health Insurance ........................ 200,490,000 (13) 5675077-Part-Time Faculty Compensation ........................ 26,542,000 (14) 5675081-Part-Time Faculty Office Hours ........................ 23,626,000 (15) 5670035-Expand the Delivery of Courses through Technology ........................ 23,000,000 (16) 5675119-Economic Development ........................ 323,029,000 (17) 5675123-Transfer Education and Articulation ........................ 2,079,000 (18) 5675023-Extended Opportunity Programs and Services ........................ 230,338,000 (19) 5675115-Fund for Student Success ........................ 450,330,000367,705,000 (20) 5675150-Campus Childcare Tax Bailout ........................ 4,547,000 (21) 5675156-Nursing Program Support ........................ 13,378,000 (22) 5675109-Institutional Effectiveness ........................ 27,500,000 (23) 5675098-Integrated Technology ........................ 130,503,000 (24) 5675042-Community College Summer Assistance Program ........................ 2,000,000 (25) 5675117-AANHPI Student Achievement Program ........................ 8,000,000 Provisions: 1. The funds appropriated in this item are for transfer by the Controller during the 2026–27 fiscal year to Section B of the State School Fund. 2. (a) The funds appropriated in Schedule (1) shall be allocated using the budget formula established pursuant to Section 84750.4 of the Education Code. The budget formula shall be adjusted to reflect the following: (1) Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (1), $166,009,000 shall be used to increase statewide growth of full-time equivalent students (FTES) by 3.5 2.55 percent. (2) Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (1), $438,307,000 $440,539,000 shall be used to reflect a cost-of-living adjustment of 4.31 percent. (3) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), the Chancellor’s Office of the California Community Colleges may allocate unused growth funding to backfill any unanticipated shortfalls in the total amount of funding appropriated and support the budget formula established pursuant to Section 84750.4 of the Education Code. (b) Funds allocated to a community college district from funds appropriated in Schedule (1) shall directly offset any mandated costs claimed for the Minimum Conditions for State Aid (02-TC-25 and 02-TC-31) program or any costs of complying with Section 84754.5 of the Education Code. (c) Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (1): (1) Up to $100,000 is for a maintenance allowance, pursuant to Section 54200 of Title 5 of the California Code of Regulations. (2) Up to $500,000 is to reimburse colleges for the costs of federal aid repayments related to assessed fees for fee waiver recipients. This reimbursement only applies to students who completely withdraw from college before the census date pursuant to Section 58508 of Title 5 of the California Code of Regulations. (d) Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (1), $91,207,000 shall be allocated to support the California College Promise pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 76396) of Chapter 2 of Part 47 of Division 7 of Title 3 of the Education Code. (e) (1) Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (1), $50,000,000 shall be used to hire new full-time faculty for community college districts to increase their percentage of full-time faculty toward meeting the 75 percent full-time faculty target. The Chancellor’s Office of the California Community Colleges shall consult with representatives from the Department of Finance, the Legislature, and the Legislative Analyst’s Office before distributing these funds to community college districts. (2) Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (1), $100,000,000 shall be used to hire new full-time faculty for participating community college districts to increase their percentage of full-time faculty toward meeting the 75 percent full-time faculty target. The Chancellor’s Office of the California Community Colleges shall consult with representatives from the Department of Finance, the Legislature, and the Legislative Analyst’s Office before distributing these funds to community college districts. It is the intent of the Legislature that the funding available pursuant to this paragraph be used to increase a district’s hiring of full-time faculty above the level that the district would have otherwise employed each year. 3. (a) (1) The funds appropriated in Schedule (2) shall be available pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 79140) of Chapter 9 of Part 48 of Division 7 of Title 3 of the Education Code. Funds appropriated pursuant to this subdivision shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2029. (2) Pursuant to Section 79149.3 of the Education Code, the reimbursement rate shall be $10.61 per hour. (b) Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (2), $30,000,000 shall be used for the California Apprenticeship Initiative pursuant to Section 79148.1 of the Education Code. Funds appropriated pursuant to this subdivision shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2032. (c) Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (2), $14,337,000 shall be available to support the California Healthy School Food Pathways program. Funds appropriated pursuant to this subprovision shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2029 (cd) TheBy February 1 of each year, beginning in 2027, the Chancellor’s Office of the California Community Colleges shall submit a report to the Department of Finance and relevant policy and fiscal committees of the Legislature by February 1, 2027, and annually thereafter until February 1, 2028, regarding the California Healthy School Food Pathways program. Contractors involved in administering the program shall provide any and all necessary information to the Chancellor’s Office to facilitate the report. The report shall include the following information for the pre-apprenticeship, apprenticeship, and fellowship components of the program: (1) The number of participants and their demographics. (2) The percentage of participants who completed the program component. (3) Of those participants who completed the pre-apprenticeship, the percentage who transitioned to the apprenticeship. (4) The following employment outcomes of completers in the 12 months after completion, compared when applicable to the 12 months before entry: (A) Percentage employed before entry and after completion. (B) Average wages before entry and after completion. (C) Percentage retained with original employer after completion. (D) Percentage promoted to a new position after completion. 4. (a) The funds appropriated in Schedule (3) shall be available pursuant to Article 8 (commencing with Section 8150) of Chapter 1 of Part 6 of Division 1 of Title 1 of the Education Code. Funds appropriated pursuant to this subdivision shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2029. (b) Pursuant to Section 8152 of the Education Code, the reimbursement rate shall be $10.61 per hour. 5. The funds appropriated in Schedule (4) shall be apportioned to community college districts pursuant to Section 78222 of the Education Code. 6. (a) Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (5): (1) Not less than			 $14,619,000 $14,807,000 is available to provide $0.91 per unit reimbursement to community college districts for the provision of California College Promise Grants pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (m) of Section 76300 of the Education Code. (2) Not less than $14,780,000 $14,970,000 is available for the Board Financial Assistance Program to provide reimbursement of 2 percent of total waiver value to community college districts for the provision of California College Promise Grants pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (m) of Section 76300 of the Education Code. (3) (A) $5,300,000 shall be allocated to a community college district to conduct a statewide outreach, marketing, and paid media campaign to promote the following messages: (i) many types of financial aid are available year-round to cover fees and help with college costs, such as books, housing, and other educational costs; (ii) students can contact their local community college financial aid office to get one-on-one assistance with completing and submitting financial aid applications and forms; and (iii) a community college education can improve the lives of students and their families by providing financial aid, as well as career training and guaranteed transfer opportunities to get into a rewarding, good-paying career. The campaign should target efforts to reach ethnically diverse, low-income students in primarily underresourced communities who must overcome barriers in accessing postsecondary education. The Chancellor’s Office of the California Community Colleges shall apprise the Student Aid Commission of ongoing outreach and marketing efforts. (B) Of the amount identified in subparagraph (A), $2,500,000 shall be allocated to: (i) expand outreach for students from non-English speaking households and bilingual households; (ii) tie financial aid messaging to enrollment messaging where applicable to encourage current and potential students to enroll or continue their education at a California Community College and apply for financial aid; and (iii) marketing and outreach aimed at increasing current and potential student awareness of the California College Promise Grant and other types of financial aid available for California Community College students. Bilingual efforts shall target areas of the state that meet at least one of the following conditions: (i) have concentrations of non-English speaking and bilingual households, or (ii) have underserved populations, a history of declining community college attendance, or both. (4) Not more than $45,200,000 shall be for direct contact with potential and current financial aid applicants. Each California Community College campus shall receive a minimum allocation of $50,000. The remainder of the funding shall be allocated to campuses based upon a formula reflecting full-time equivalent students (FTES) weighted by a measure of low-income populations demonstrated by the California College Promise Grant program participation within a district. (5) Funds allocated to a community college district pursuant to paragraphs (1) and (2) shall supplement, not supplant, the level of funds allocated for the administration of student financial aid programs during the 2001–02 or 2006–07 fiscal year, whichever is greater. (6) Funding allocated to a community college district pursuant to paragraphs (1) and (2) shall directly offset any costs claimed by that district for any of the following mandates: Enrollment Fee Collection (99-TC-13), Enrollment Fee Waivers (00-TC-15), Cal Grants (02-TC-28), and Tuition Fee Waivers (02-TC-21). (7) Notwithstanding subdivision (m) of Section 76300 of the Education Code or any other law, the amount of funds appropriated for the purpose of administering fee waivers for the 2026–27 fiscal year shall be determined in this act. (8) Not more than $5,000,000 shall be for ongoing maintenance, subscription, and training costs for financial aid technology advancements and innovations that streamline the financial aid verification process and enable colleges to more efficiently process state and federal financial aid grants. It is the intent of the Legislature that system improvements supported by this funding have the effect of reducing the manual processing of financial aid applications, thereby enabling financial aid program staff to provide additional technical assistance and guidance to students seeking financial aid. The Chancellor’s Office of the California Community Colleges shall determine the methodology for allocating these funds to community college districts. 7. (a) The funds appropriated in Schedule (6) shall be used to assist districts in funding the excess direct instructional cost of providing special support services or instruction, or both, to disabled students enrolled at community colleges and for state hospital programs, as mandated by federal law. (b) Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (6): (1) At least $3,945,000 shall be used to address deficiencies identified by the United States Department of Education Office for Civil Rights. (2) At least $943,000 shall be used to support the High Tech Centers for activities, including, but not limited to, training of district employees, staff, and students in the use of specialized computer equipment for the disabled. (3) At least $9,600,000 shall be allocated to community college districts for sign language interpreter services, real-time captioning equipment, or other communication accommodations for hearing-impaired students. A community college district is required to spend $1 from local or other resources for every $4 received pursuant to this paragraph. 8. (a) The funds appropriated in Schedule (7) shall be allocated pursuant to Article 5 (commencing with Section 79200) of Chapter 9 of Part 48 of Division 7 of Title 3 of the Education Code. (b) Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (7): (1) $11,834,000 shall be for childcare, except that a community college district may request that the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges approve the use of funds for other purposes. (2) No less than $6,311,000 shall be used to provide direct workstudy wage reimbursement for students served under this program, and $791,000 is available for campus job development and placement services. 9. The funds appropriated in Schedule (8) shall be allocated to community college districts to provide foster and relative or kinship care education and training pursuant to Article 8 (commencing with Section 79420) of Chapter 9 of Part 48 of Division 7 of Title 3 of the Education Code. A community college district shall ensure that education and training required pursuant to paragraphs (12) and (13) of subdivision (g) of Section 16519.5 of the Welfare and Institutions Code receive priority. 10. The funds appropriated in Schedule (9) shall be allocated to a community college district to contract with the State Department of Social Services in order to contract with organizations qualified pursuant to Chapter 5.6 (commencing with Section 13300) of Part 3 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code to provide services pursuant to that chapter to persons on California Community College campuses. Use of these funds shall be included in updates provided to the Legislature on the State Department of Social Services’ immigration programs. 11. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (10), $685,000 is available to support the Academic Senate for California Community Colleges course identification numbering system efforts and shall be subject to the requirements of subparagraph (B) of paragraph (5) of subdivision (b) of Section 70901 of the Education Code. 12. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (11), $10,000,000 shall be allocated to community college districts to support the continued implementation of equal employment opportunity plans and to enable campuses to engage in sustainable practices to diversify faculty, staff, and administrators, including the continued use of best practices and tools identified by office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges’ Equal Employment Opportunity and Diversity Advisory Committee. 13. The funds appropriated in Schedule (12) shall be allocated to community college districts for the purpose of providing a state incentive program to encourage community college districts to offer health insurance for part-time faculty pursuant to Article 9 (commencing with Section 87860) of Chapter 3 of Part 51 of Division 7 of Title 3 of the Education Code. 14. The funds in Schedule (13) shall be allocated to increase compensation for part-time faculty. Funds shall be allocated to districts based on the total actual number of full-time equivalent students (FTES) in the previous fiscal year, with an adjustment to the allocations provided to small districts. These funds shall be used to assist districts in making part-time faculty salaries more comparable to full-time salaries for similar work, as determined through collective bargaining in each community college district. If a community college district achieves parity between compensation for full-time faculty and part-time faculty, funds received pursuant to this provision may be used for any other educational purpose. 15. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (15): (a) $20,000,000 shall be allocated to the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges to increase the number of courses available through the use of technology, provide alternative methods for students to earn college credit, and support the California Virtual Campus Distance Education Program. These funds may be used to pay for a consistent learning management system to help implement this program. The chancellor shall ensure, to the extent possible, that the following conditions are satisfied: (1) These courses can be articulated across all community college districts. (2) These courses are made available to students systemwide, regardless of the campus at which a student is enrolled. (3) Students who complete these courses are granted degree-applicable credit across community colleges. (4) These funds shall be used for those courses that have the highest demand, fill quickly, and are prerequisites for many different degrees. (b) By September 1 of each fiscal year, up to $3,000,000 shall be disbursed by the Office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges to one or more community college districts to provide textbooks or digital course content to students incarcerated or detained in federal or state prison, county jail, juvenile facility, or other correctional institutions who are enrolled in one or more California Community College courses. The provision of this material is expected to enable community college districts to provide instruction to incarcerated or detained students. (1) To the extent possible, community college districts providing textbooks or digital course content pursuant to this subdivision are encouraged to first use open educational resources. (2) Notwithstanding any other law, a contract between the Office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges and a community college district for purposes of this subdivision is not subject to any competitive bidding requirements of Section 10340 of the Public Contract Code. 16. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (16): (a) $22,929,000 is available for the following purposes: (1) Up to 10 percent may be allocated for state-level technical assistance, including activities that support statewide network leadership; enhance technology-enabled labor market data and tools; provide professional development to improve program accountability and reporting; manage the statewide advisory body; support regional consortia coordination; and enhance information and support services. (2) All remaining funds shall be allocated for programs that target investments in priority and emergent sectors, including statewide or regional centers, hubs, collaborative communities, and advisory bodies. Priority shall be given to projects that place graduates into high-wage jobs. Funds may support curriculum modernization, work-based learning, and technology-enabled training aligned with regional labor-market demand, consistent with the goals of the Strong Workforce Program. (3) Funds applied to performance-based training shall be matched by a minimum of $1 contributed by private businesses or industry for each $1 of state funds. The Chancellor of the California Community Colleges shall consider the level of involvement and financial commitments of business and industry in making awards for performance-based training. (b) $290,400,000 shall be available to support the Strong Workforce Program pursuant to Part 54.5 (commencing with Section 88820) of Division 7 of Title 3 of the Education Code. Of this amount, $60,000,000 shall be available to support the Rebuilding Nursing Infrastructure Grant Program pursuant to Sections 88770, 88771, 88772, and 88773 of the Education Code. It is the intent of the Legislature to appropriate $60,000,000 each fiscal year between 2026–27 to 2028–29, inclusive, to support the Rebuilding Nursing Infrastructure Grant Program. (c) $9,700,000 shall be available on a one-time basis to support the Adult Learner Demonstration Project for low-income workers. The amount shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2029. 17. Of the funds provided in Schedule (17): (a) $1,381,000 shall be used to support the Historically Black Colleges and Universities (HBCU) Transfer Pathway program, which helps develop transfer guarantee agreements that help facilitate a smooth transition for students from the California Community Colleges to partnered HBCU institutions. (b) (1) $698,000 shall be used to support transfer and articulation projects and common course numbering projects. (2) Funding provided to community college districts shall directly offset any costs claimed by community college districts to be mandates pursuant to Chapter 737 of the Statutes of 2004. 18. (a) Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (18): (1) $194,731,000 shall be used pursuant to Article 8 (commencing with Section 69640) of Chapter 2 of Part 42 of Division 5 of Title 3 of the Education Code. Funds provided in this item for Community College Extended Opportunity Programs and Services shall be available to students on all campuses within the California Community Colleges system. (2) $35,607,000 shall be used for funding, at all colleges, the Cooperative Agencies Resources for Education program in accordance with Article 4 (commencing with Section 79150) of Chapter 9 of Part 48 of Division 7 of Title 3 of the Education Code. The Chancellor of the California Community Colleges shall allocate these funds to local programs on the basis of need for student services. (b) Of the amount allocated pursuant to subdivision (a), no less than $4,972,000 shall be available to support additional textbook assistance grants to community college students. 19. The funds appropriated in Schedule (19) shall be used for the following purposes: (a) $13,326,000 shall be used for the Puente Project to support up to 115 colleges. These funds are available if matched by $200,000 of private funds and if the participating community colleges and University of California campuses maintain their 1995–96 fiscal year support level for the Puente Project. (1) Of the funds provided in subdivision (a), $5,331,000 shall be allocated to a community college district to contract with the Puente Project to support the general operation of, and direct services delivered through, central administration which includes, but is not limited to, professional development, program data collection, program research and evaluation, and initiatives to improve student transfer rates. (2) Of the funds provided in subdivision (a), $7,995,000 shall be allocated directly to participating districts in accordance with their participation agreement. (3) (A) If the appropriation provided in this subdivision is increased from the funding level provided in the 2022–23 fiscal year, funding allocated to districts as described in paragraphs (1) and (2) shall be adjusted consistent with their percentage share of total funding in this subdivision. (B) Notwithstanding paragraphs (1) and (2), if the appropriation provided in this subdivision is reduced from the funding level provided in the 2022–23 fiscal year, the Puente Project, in consultation with the Chancellor’s Office of the California Community Colleges, will determine the funding allocation to support services and programs provided in paragraphs (1) and (2). (4) In any fiscal year in which districts have any unexpended or unencumbered funds allocated pursuant to paragraph (2) by June 30, the Puente Project will determine a reallocation of funds that may include, but not be limited to, maintaining the allocation level for a participating site or reallocating funds to another participating site. (b) (1) $39,423,000 is to allow all colleges to establish and support California Community College Mathematics, Engineering, Science Achievement (MESA) programs. Funds provided in this item for MESA programs shall be available to students on all campuses within the California Community Colleges system to enhance California’s STEM workforce, while aiding the state and nation in reducing equity and achievement gaps. (2) The Office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges shall award each MESA program ongoing annual funding to meet the program’s goals, at a minimum allocation of $280,000 per college. Colleges receiving an allocation shall use the funding to supplement, but not supplant, local sources of funding supporting MESA programs. (3) In any fiscal year in which districts have any unexpended or unencumbered funds allocated pursuant to subprovision (2) by June 30 of that year, MESA shall make a determination regarding the reallocation of funds that shall include maintaining the allocation level for a participating MESA program or reallocating funds to another participating MESA program. (c) No less than $1,836,000 is for the Middle College High School Program. With the exception of special part-time students at the community colleges pursuant to Sections 48802 and 76001 of the Education Code, student workload based on participation in the Middle College High School Program shall not be eligible for community college state apportionment. (d) (1) (A) No less than $9,178,000 is for the Umoja program. (B) Of funds provided in subparagraph (A), $3,671,000 shall be allocated to a community college district to contract with the Umoja Statewide program office to provide additional resources to facilitate the capacity building and development of the statewide office in an effort to expand the Umoja program, build a data support system, target the needs of special populations in the African American community, improve tutoring and mental health resources, enhance STEM/STEAM and career opportunities, and improve outcomes for students enrolled in Umoja campus programs. (C) Of the funds provided in subparagraph (A), $5,507,000 shall be allocated by the Office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges directly to participating districts in accordance with their Umoja Statewide participation agreement for campuses with Umoja programming. Umoja Statewide, in consultation with the Chancellor’s Office, shall determine the allocation of resources to campuses. The Umoja Statewide program shall annually report, by July 30, updates on the status of Umoja’s capacity building and expansion plan to the Office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges and the budget committees of the Senate and Assembly. Of the funds provided in this subparagraph, a negotiated amount, not to exceed 1 percent may be provided directly to the community college district contracting with the Umoja Statewide program office for purposes related to this subparagraph. (e) Consistent with the intent of Article 7 (commencing with Section 79220) of Chapter 9 of Part 48 of Division 7 of Title 3 of the Education Code, the chancellor shall enter into agreements with community college districts to provide additional services in support of postsecondary education for foster youth. Up to $54,110,000 of the funds appropriated in this item shall be prioritized for services pursuant to Article 7 (commencing with Section 79220) of Chapter 9 of Part 48 of Division 7 of Title 3 of the Education Code. Further, the chancellor shall ensure that the list of eligible expenditures developed pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 78221 of the Education Code includes expenditures that are consistent with the intent of Article 7 (commencing with Section 79220) of Chapter 9 of Part 48 of Division 7 of Title 3 of the Education Code. (f) $10,822,000 of the funds shall be for support of Veteran Resource Centers. To the extent funding is provided in the annual Budget Act, the chancellor shall only allocate funding to community colleges that commit to either meeting or making progress towards meeting the minimum standards developed by the Office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges. (g) (1) Colleges shall establish ongoing partnerships with community organizations that have a tradition of helping populations experiencing homelessness to provide wraparound services and rental subsidies for homeless and housing-insecure students. $20,562,000 of the funds appropriated in Schedule (19) may be used for, but are not limited to, the following authorized activities: (A) Connecting students with community case managers who have knowledge and expertise in accessing safety net resources. (B) Establishing ongoing emergency housing procedures, including on-campus and off-campus resources. (C) Providing emergency grants that are necessary to secure housing or to prevent the imminent loss of housing. (2) Funding shall be allocated to campuses based on demonstrated need. (3) “Homeless” and “housing-insecure” mean students who lack a fixed, regular, and adequate nighttime residence. This includes students who are: (A) Sharing the housing of other persons due to loss of housing, economic hardship, or a similar reason. (B) Living in motels, hotels, trailer parks, or camping grounds due to the lack of alternative adequate accommodations. (C) Living in emergency or transitional shelters. (D) Abandoned in hospitals. (E) Living in a primary nighttime residence that is a public or private place not designed for or ordinarily used as a regular sleeping accommodation for human beings. (F) Living in cars, parks, public spaces, abandoned buildings, substandard housing, bus or train stations, or similar settings. (4) By July 15 of each year, the Office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges shall submit a report to the Director of Finance and, in conformity with Section 9795 of the Government Code, to the Legislature regarding the prior year use of these funds, including the number of coordinators hired, the number of students served by campus, the distribution of funds by campus, a description of the types of programs funded, and other relevant outcomes, such as the number of students who were able to secure permanent housing, and whether students receiving support remained enrolled at the institution or graduated. (h) $139,219,000$41,994,000, of which $15,000,000 is ongoing, shall be allocated by the Chancellor’s Office of the California Community Colleges to community colleges to support Dreamer Resource Liaisons and student support services, including those related to career pathways and economic mobility, for immigrant students, pursuant to Section 66021.8 of the Education Code. (i) $83,754,000 shall be available to support the basic needs of community college students. (1) (A) Of the amount allocated for this subdivision, $32,466,000 shall be available to provide for student mental health resources. (B) The Chancellor’s Office of the California Community Colleges shall submit a report to the Department of Finance and relevant policy and fiscal committees of the Legislature by January 1, 2025, and every three years thereafter, regarding the use of funds specified in this paragraph. The report shall include, but not necessarily be limited to, all of the following information: (i) The amount of funds provided for each community college district. (ii) A description of how the funds were used for the purposes reflected in this paragraph. (iii) A description of the types of programs in which districts invested. (iv) The number of students receiving mental health services on campus disaggregated by race/ethnicity, gender, age group, and type of service received. (v) The average wait time for initial routine mental health counseling appointments. (vi) The average number of campus mental health counseling appointments per student. (vii) The number of students referred to off-campus providers for mental health services. (viii) Total spending on student mental health services, by fund source, including spending covered by insurance providers. (ix) Other findings and best practices implemented by districts. (2) Of the amount made available by this subdivision, $51,288,000 shall be allocated by the Chancellor’s Office of the California Community Colleges for colleges to establish and operate basic needs centers as a centralized location on campus where students experiencing basic needs insecurity can be identified, supported, and linked to on- and off-campus resources to support timely program completion pursuant to Section 66023.5 of the Education Code. Colleges shall also designate or hire dedicated basic needs coordinators for the basic needs centers who will serve as a single point of contact for students. It is the intent of the Legislature that an additional $8,000,000 be available for basic needs centers on a one-time basis in fiscal years 2026–27 and 2027–28, which includes, but is not limited to, providing classified employees with access to food pantry services offered by basic needs centers pursuant to paragraph (7) of subdivision (b) of Section 66023.5 of the Education Code. (j) (1) $35,000,000 shall be available to support the Rising Scholars Network pursuant to Article 6 (commencing with Section 78070) of Chapter 1 of Part 48 of Division 7 of Title 3 of the Education Code. (2) (A) Of the funds provided for in paragraph (1), 60 percent annually shall support ongoing implementation of model programming for juvenile justice-impacted students, as a grant program administered and supported by the Rising Scholars Network of the Chancellor’s Office of the California Community Colleges. Funds shall be used for model college programming with key components based on the Project Change model, to be offered both within juvenile facilities and on the community college campus, to establish a direct pathway to college for juvenile justice-impacted young people. (B) Of the funds provided for in subparagraph (A), at least 86.7 percent annually shall support a maximum of 45 community colleges on 5-year grant cycles to implement model programming to serve juvenile justice-impacted students, incorporating the three following core Project Change program components: (i) College programming that is: (I) offering University of California and California State University transferable courses and comprehensive student support programming; (II) provided by a California Community College through instruction; and (III) offered both on campus at a community college and in local juvenile detention facilities. (ii) Comprehensive support to assist students with the transition to on-campus higher education, including: (I) wraparound student support services that address basic needs such as books and supplies, tuition, fees, stipends, housing, food, and transportation; and (II) educational transition plans for students, outlining their multiyear framework from high school through college completion. (iii) Staffing and space commitments, including: (I) dedicated staffing of a program lead, counselor, and retention specialist; (II) dedicated space on the college campus for the program; and (III) formal partnerships with key stakeholders, including, but not limited to, the local county office of education, probation department, local high school districts, and community-based organizations. (C) Community colleges may implement model program components on a phased timeline. Model programs must utilize both Dual Enrollment and Guided Pathways frameworks. At the conclusion of the 5-year cohort, community colleges may reapply for continued funding support. (D) Colleges may be funded on a tiered model. Tiered model funding may consider the number of core program components a college can implement; student counts; whether the college already has an established or funded Rising Scholars program; and other metrics determined by the Rising Scholars Network of the Office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges. (E) Of the funds provided in subparagraph (A), 8.3 percent annually shall support technical assistance for successful implementation of model programming overseen by the Rising Scholars Network of the Office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges. Technical assistance includes contract staffing positions to oversee the project implementation, in-person trainings, and support. (k) (1) $1,100,000 shall be allocated by the Chancellor’s Office for the expansion of African American Male Education Network and Development (A2MEND) student charters at up to 50 colleges to improve academic success and develop a student support structure for African American male students attending community colleges. (2) In considering an allocation methodology to community colleges, the Office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges shall consider a factor that allocates funds to community colleges that have submitted work plans pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (c) of Section 88922 of the Education Code, including considering the community college’s guided pathways activities and practices. (l) $42,000,000, of which $7,000,000 is ongoing, shall be available to support the Credit for Prior Learning Initiative pursuant to Section 26 of Chapter 9 of the Statutes of 2025. (m) $3,000,000 in one-time funds shall be available for the Southwestern Community College District to reconstitute the Pharmacy Technician Associate Degree program, develop an Associate Degree in Data Science, support transfer pathway development in both disciplines, and request collaboration with the University of California, San Diego, to ensure seamless transfer pathways, including coordination on externship placements for pharmacy technician students and alignment with emerging bachelor’s degree programs at the University of California, San Diego. 20. The funds appropriated in Schedule (20) shall be allocated by the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges to community college districts that levied childcare permissive override taxes in the 1977–78 fiscal year pursuant to Sections 8272 and 8272.5 of the Education Code in an amount proportional to the property tax revenues, tax relief subventions, and state aid required to be made available by the district to its childcare and development program for the 1979–80 fiscal year pursuant to Section 30 of Chapter 1035 of the Statutes of 1979, increased or decreased by any cost-of-living adjustment granted in subsequent fiscal years. These funds shall be used only for the purpose of community college childcare and development programs. 21. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (21): (a) $8,475,000 shall be used to provide support for nursing programs. (b) $4,903,000 shall be used for diagnostic and support services, preentry coursework, alternative program delivery model development, and other services to reduce the incidence of student attrition in nursing programs. 22. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (22): (a) (1) $7,500,000 may be used by the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges to provide technical assistance to community college districts that demonstrate low performance in any area of operations. It is the intent of the Legislature that technical assistance providers be contracted in a cost-effective manner, that they primarily consist of experts who are current and former employees of the California Community Colleges, and that they provide technical assistance consistent with the vision for the California Community Colleges. (2) Technical assistance funded pursuant to this paragraph that is initiated by the chancellor may be provided at no cost to the community college district. If a community college district requests technical assistance, the district is required to spend at least $1 from local or other resources for every $2 received, as determined by the chancellor. (b) (1) $20,000,000 may be used by the chancellor to provide regional and online workshops and trainings to community college personnel to promote statewide priorities, including, but not limited to, strategies to improve student achievement; strategies to improve community college operations; and system leadership training to better coordinate planning and implementation of statewide initiatives in alignment with the Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges’ Vision for Success. To the extent possible, the chancellor shall partner with existing statewide initiatives with proven results of improving student success and institutional effectiveness. Each fiscal year, the chancellor shall submit a report on the use of funds appropriated pursuant to this provision in the prior year to the Department of Finance and the Joint Legislative Budget Committee no later than December 31 of each year and, beginning in the 2025–26 fiscal year and every three years thereafter, the chancellor shall submit a report on the use of the funds appropriated pursuant to this provision in the prior three years to the Department of Finance and the Joint Legislative Budget Committee no later than December 31 of that year. This report shall include information regarding California Community Colleges’ participation in the activities funded pursuant to this provision. (2) Funding available pursuant to this paragraph may be used by the chancellor to coordinate with community college districts to conduct policy research, and develop and disseminate effective practices through the establishment of an online clearinghouse of information. The development of effective practices shall include, but not be limited to, statewide priorities such as the development of educational programs or courses for the incarcerated adults in prisons and jails, and the formerly incarcerated, educational programs or courses for California Conservation Corps members, and other effective practices. The online clearinghouse of information shall also reflect effective practices, guidance, policies, curriculum, courses, and programs developed by local community colleges in support of the Strong Workforce Program established pursuant to Part 54.5 (commencing with Section 88820) of Division 7 of Title 3 of the Education Code. (3) It is the intent of the Legislature to encourage the chancellor to facilitate the development of local community college courses for the California Conservation Corps and the incarcerated adults in prisons and jails, and the formerly incarcerated. The Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation and the California Conservation Corps are encouraged to partner with the Chancellor’s Office in the development and dissemination of local community college courses and effective practices pursuant to this paragraph and paragraph (2). 23. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (23): (a) $10,613,000 shall be allocated to continue providing a systemwide and integrated online infrastructure that supports the continuity of education and quality distance learning across the community college system. These infrastructure investments may include, but are not limited to, access to online tutoring and counseling, ensuring available and accessible technical support, and providing mental health services and other student support services. (b) $8,000,000 shall be provided to cover increased administrative costs related to the Corporation for Education Network Initiatives in California. (c) $41,890,000 shall be allocated by the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges for the following purposes: (1) Procurement, development, evaluation, and upgrading of high-priority systemwide technology tools and infrastructure, including, but not limited to, e-transcript, e-planning, and other tools to assist colleges to implement multiple measures of assessment pursuant to Chapter 745 of the Statutes of 2017, and technologies that facilitate portability of education credentials. (2) Provision of access to statewide multimedia hosting and delivery services for colleges and districts. (3) Provision of systemwide internet, audio bridging, data security, and telephony. (4) Services related to technology use, including accessibility guidance and information security. (5) Technology product development and program management, technical assistance and planning, and cooperative purchase agreements. (6) Ongoing faculty and staff development related to technology use and adoption. (7) Ongoing support of the California Partnership for Achieving Student Success (Cal-PASS) program. (8) Ongoing support for programs designed to use technology in assisting accreditation and the alignment of curricula across K–20 segments in California, as well as to support integration and interoperability toward an improved student experience. (9) Support for technology pilots and ongoing technology programs and applications that serve to maximize the utility and economy of scale of the technology investments of the community college system toward improving learning outcomes. (10) Up to 5 percent of the funds may be allocated by the chancellor to a community college district for statewide activities, not limited to statewide technical assistance to evaluate, plan, and continuously improve the system’s data and technology roadmap and deployment. (d) Any funds not allocated pursuant to subdivision (c) shall be available for allocations to districts to maintain technology capabilities. (e) $4,000,000 shall be used to expand the implementation of the systemwide technology platform for library services to better manage and deliver digital information to support teaching and learning, including for students enrolled in distance education. (f) (1) $25,000,000 shall be provided for community college districts to implement local and systemwide technology and data security measures that support improved oversight of fraud mitigation, online learning quality, and cybersecurity efforts. Funds shall be used by community college districts to hire local cybersecurity staff, and funds shall also be used for systemwide measures, including, but not limited to, security upgrades for CCCApply and education technology platforms and the establishment of systemwide cybersecurity teams. (2) As a condition of receiving funds pursuant to this subdivision, a community college district shall do all of the following: (A) Complete an annual cybersecurity self-assessment of their information technology infrastructure to determine their National Institute of Standards and Technology (NIST) Computer Systems Laboratory (CSL) score and report their current phase in Cal-Secure standards. (B) Participate in the following regularly scheduled cybersecurity reporting: (i) Submit remediation updates twice per year, for the fall and spring semester terms, on vulnerability and other issues identified in the previous self-assessment or triennial assessment. (ii) Submit detailed after-action reports of all cybersecurity incidents that either lead to a breach of personally identifiable information or lead to the disruption of services, including, but not limited to, a breach of student identification numbers, distributed denial-of-service attacks, and ransomware. (iii) The total number of admission applications received from CCCApply that are determined to be fraudulent, including applications marked as “likely fraud” within CCCApply, on an annual basis. (iv) Information requested on suspected fraudulent enrollments, and fraudulent receipt of financial aid, on an annual basis. (C) Reporting required by this section shall not be duplicated by other reporting required by the Office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges. (3) If the reporting required pursuant to paragraph (2) is duplicative of other reports provided by a community college district, a community college district may submit those reports in lieu of the reporting required by paragraph (2). (g) Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (23), $41,000,000, of which $5,000,000 is ongoing, shall be provided for the Common Cloud Data Platform. This platform shall enhance statewide reporting, data sharing, and available analytical tools across community college districts and the Chancellor’s Office. The platform shall be designed to support community college student success initiatives, improve community college districts’ stewardship of resources and ability to use data-driven decision making, streamline community college administrative processes, and inform state budget and policy making. 24. The funds appropriated in Schedule (24) shall be allocated to support the Classified Community College Employee Summer Assistance Program established pursuant to Article 11 (commencing with Section 88280) of Chapter 4 of Part 51 of Division 7 of Title 3 of the Education Code. 25. The funds appropriated in Schedule (25) shall be allocated on an ongoing basis by the Office of the Chancellor to support the California Community Colleges Asian American, Native Hawaiian, and Pacific Islander Student Achievement Program pursuant to Article 10 (commencing with Section 79510) of Chapter 9 of Part 48 of Division 7 of Title 3 of the Education Code. 26. Beginning on October 1, 2022, and annually thereafter, the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges shall provide the Legislature and Department of Finance a list of all statewide or regional projects, initiatives, and services administered by districts in partnership with the Office of the Chancellor. The list shall include the amount of each agreement from the prior fiscal year, the categorical program funding source, the name of the fiscal agent, the contractor, and a brief description of the services provided by and the deliverables expected of the contractor to the Office of the Chancellor or other districts. The list shall be comprehensive, including all grants and contracts. 6870-101-0925—For local assistance, Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges, payable from California Community Colleges Business Resource Assistance and Innovation Network Trust Fund ........................ 15,000 Schedule: (1) 5675119-Economic Development ........................ 15,000 6870-101-3273—For local assistance, Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges, payable from the Employment Opportunity Fund ........................ 277,000 (1) 5675069-Equal Employment Opportunity ........................ 277,000 Provisions: 1. The funds appropriated in this item are provided to promote equal employment opportunities in hiring and promotion at community college districts and shall be spent pursuant to Section 87108 of the Education Code and associated regulations. 6870-105-0001—For local assistance, Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges (Proposition 98) ........................ 53,100,000 Schedule: (1) 5675100-California Statewide Community Colleges ........................ 53,100,000 Provisions: 1. The funds appropriated in this item are for transfer by the Controller to Section B of the State School Fund. 2. The funds appropriated in Schedule (1) shall be available pursuant to Part 46.5 (commencing with Section 75000) of Division 7 of Title 3 of the Education Code. 6870-107-0001—For local assistance, Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges (Proposition 98), for local district financial oversight and evaluation ........................ 770,000 Schedule: (1) 5670015-Apportionments ........................ 770,000 Provisions: 1. The funds appropriated in this item are for transfer by the Controller to Section B of the State School Fund. 2. (a) The funds appropriated in this item are available to reimburse the Fiscal Crisis and Management Assistance Team (FCMAT) for costs incurred by FCMAT for the following activities: (1) The performance of audits, examinations, or reviews of any community college district pursuant to Section 84041 of the Education Code. (2) The provision of technical assistance, training, and short-term institutional research necessary to address existing or potential accreditation deficiencies. (b) The Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges may request an unsolicited review of a community college district if the board of governors determines that there is an imminent threat to the fiscal integrity of the district as a result of fraud, misappropriation of funds, or other illegal fiscal practices. (c) All proposed contracts and reimbursements for FCMAT services shall be subject to the approval of the Department of Finance. 3. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $200,000 shall be allocated to a community college district to contract with FCMAT for the administration of professional learning opportunities through a cohort-based chief business officer mentorship and leadership program. 6870-108-0001—For local assistance, Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges (Proposition 98) ........................ 412,602,000 Schedule: (1) 5675022-Student Success Completion Grant ........................ 412,602,000 Provisions: 1. The funds appropriated in this item are for transfer by the Controller to Section B of the State School Fund. 2. Funds appropriated in this item shall be used to support the Community Colleges Student Success Completion Grant pursuant to Part 54.82 (commencing with Section 88930) of Division 7 of Title 3 of the Education Code. 6870-109-0001—For local assistance, Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges (Proposition 98) ........................ 14,200,000 Schedule: (1) 5670015-Apportionments ........................ 14,200,000 Provisions: 1. The funds appropriated in Schedule (1) shall be available to support the California Indian Nations College located in Palm Desert, California. 6870-111-0001—For local assistance, Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges ........................ 0 Schedule: (1) 5670036-CalWORKs Services ........................ 8,000,000 (2) 5675035-Foster Care Education Program ........................ 6,112,000 (3) 5675107-Vocational Education ........................ 65,322,000 (4) Reimbursements to 5670036-CalWORKs Services ........................ −8,000,000 (5) Reimbursements to 5675035-Foster Care Education Program ........................ −6,112,000 (6) Reimbursements to 5675107-Vocational Education ........................ −65,322,000 Provisions: 1. The funds appropriated in Schedules (1), (2), and (3) are for transfer by the Controller to Section B of the State School Fund. 2. The funds appropriated in Schedule (1) are to fund additional costs for providing support services and instruction for CalWORKs students that include, but are not limited to, job placement and coordination, curriculum development and redesign, childcare and workstudy, and instruction. As a condition of receiving funding, colleges are required to submit a plan to the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges describing how the funds will be used, which shall be based on collaboration with county welfare offices regarding the services and instruction that are needed for CalWORKs recipients. 3. Acceptance of funds from Schedule (1) constitute an agreement by the district to comply with such requirements, guidelines, and other conditions for receipt of funding that the Office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges, in collaboration with the State Department of Social Services, may establish. 6870-193-0001—For local assistance, Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges (Proposition 98), to allow selected community colleges to make payments on lease-revenue bonds ........................ 12,855,000 Schedule: (1) 5670015-Apportionments ........................ 12,855,000 Provisions: 1. The funds appropriated in this item are for transfer by the Controller to Section B of the State School Fund. The Controller shall transfer funds appropriated in this item for base rental as and when provided for in the schedule submitted by the State Public Works Board. Notwithstanding the payment dates in any related Facility Lease or Indenture, the schedule may provide for an earlier transfer of funds to ensure debt requirements are met and pay base rental in full when due. 2. The Controller shall transfer for additional rental no later than 30 days after enactment of this budget, $139,000 of the amount appropriated in this item, to the Expense Account in the Public Buildings Construction Fund. 3. This item may be adjusted pursuant to Section 4.30. Any adjustments to this item shall be reported to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee pursuant to Section 4.30. 6870-194-0001—For local assistance, Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges, to allow selected community colleges to make payments on lease-revenue bonds ........................ 11,062,000 Schedule: (1) 5675132-Student Housing ........................ 11,062,000 Provisions: 1. The funds appropriated in this item are for transfer by the Controller to Section B of the State School Fund. The Controller shall transfer funds appropriated in this item for base rental as and when provided for in the schedule submitted by the State Public Works Board. Notwithstanding the payment dates in any related facility lease or indenture, the schedule may provide for an earlier transfer of funds to ensure debt requirements are met and pay base rental in full when due. 2. The Controller shall transfer for additional rental no later than 30 days after enactment of this budget, $102,000 of the amount appropriated in this item, to the Expense Account in the Public Buildings Construction Fund. 3. This item may be adjusted pursuant to Section 4.30. Any adjustments to this item shall be reported to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee pursuant to Section 4.30. 6870-201-0001—For local assistance, Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges (Proposition 98), Adult Education Program ........................ 693,335,000 Schedule: (1) 5670015-Apportionments ........................ 693,335,000 Provisions: 1. The funds appropriated in this item are for transfer by the Controller to Section B of the State School Fund to support the Adult Education Program (Article 9 (commencing with Section 84900) of Chapter 5 of Part 50 of Division 7 of Title 3 of the Education Code). 2. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $19,176,000 is provided as a cost-of-living adjustment. 3. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $5,000,000 is to develop a unified dataset for adult learners participating in adult education courses and programs offered by local educational agencies and community college districts through the Adult Education Program. The dataset shall, at a minimum, include employment, wage, and transitions to postsecondary outcomes data. Additionally, these funds may be used to provide training on data collection and data analytics to enable adult education regional consortia to make data informed program improvements. 4. (a) Of the funds appropriated in this item, $1,000,000 shall support an external contract that provides statewide leadership for community college districts and local educational agencies participating in the Adult Education Program. Pursuant to a competitive process, the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges and the Superintendent of Public Instruction shall jointly select a community college district, county office of education, or adult education consortium for this purpose. (b) For purposes of this provision, statewide leadership activities include, but are not limited to: (1) Researching, developing, and disseminating effective practices and producing guidance documents. (2) Providing adult education consortia with technical assistance to enhance the effectiveness of their local adult education programs. (3) Providing professional development opportunities to adult education consortia. (4) Maintaining an internet website containing programmatic guidance. (5) Enhancing programmatic collaboration with other state and federal education and workforce development programs. (6) Evaluating and reporting on the effectiveness of the Adult Education Program pursuant to Section 84917 of the Education Code. (7) Supporting the implementation of systems, policies, and procedures for financial and data reporting, as necessary, to support the Adult Education Program. 5. The State Department of Education and the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges shall submit an allocation schedule to the Department of Finance by July 15 of every year. Upon order of the Director of Finance, the amount reflected on the allocation schedule, or any revised allocation schedules submitted by the State Department of Education and the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges, for local educational agencies may be transferred to the State Department of Education for allocation to the noted local educational agencies. 6870-203-0001—For local assistance, Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges (Proposition 98), Strong Workforce Program ........................ 163,500,000 Schedule: (1) 5675120-K–12 Strong Workforce Program ........................ 163,500,000 Provisions: 1. The funds appropriated in this item are for transfer by the Controller to Section B of the State School Fund. 2. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $150,000,000 shall be available to support a K–12 component of the Strong Workforce Program, pursuant to Section 88827 of the Education Code. In developing this component, the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges shall consult with the State Department of Education. 3. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $12,000,000 shall be provided for K–12 Workforce Pathway Coordinators and K–14 Technical Assistance Providers (TAPs) for the Strong Workforce Program, pursuant to Section 88827 of the Education Code. The Chancellor of the California Community Colleges shall consult with the State Department of Education in implementing this program component. 4. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $1,500,000 shall be provided to support the consortia administrative costs associated with the K–12 Strong Workforce Program. 6870-295-0001—For local assistance, Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges (Proposition 98), for reimbursement, in accordance with provisions of Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution or Section 17561 of the Government Code, of the costs of any new program or increased level of service of an existing program mandated by statute or executive order, for annual mandate claims collected as prescribed by Sections 17560 and 17568 of the Government Code for disbursement by the Controller ........................ 13,000 Schedule: (1) 5685010-Mandates: For payment of the following annual mandate claims collected as prescribed by Sections 17560 and 17568 of the Government Code for disbursement by the Controller ........................ 13,000 (a) Health Fee Elimination (Ch. 1, 1983–84 2nd Ex. Sess.) (CSM 4206) ........................ 1,000 (b) Collective Bargaining and Collective Bargaining Agreement Disclosure (Ch. 961, Stats. 1975) (CSM 4425, 97-TC-08) ........................ 1,000 (c) Enrollment Fee Collection and Waivers (Title 5) (99-TC-13) (00-TC-15) ........................ 1,000 (d) Threats Against Peace Officers (Ch. 1249, Stats. 1992) ........................ 1,000 (e) Agency Fee Arrangements (Ch. 893, Stats. 2000; Ch. 805, Stats. 2001) (00-TC-17) (01-TC-14) ........................ 1,000 (f) California State Teachers’ Retirement System Service Credit (Ch. 603, Stats. 1994) (02-TC-19) ........................ 1,000 (g) Reporting Improper Governmental Activities (Ch. 416, Stats. 2001) (02-TC-24) ........................ 1,000 (h) Public Contracts (Ch. 1073, Stats. 1985) (02-TC-35) ........................ 1,000 (i) Cal Grants (Ch. 403, Stats. 2000) (02-TC-28) ........................ 1,000 (j) Tuition Fee Waivers (Ch. 36, Stats. 1977) (02-TC-21) ........................ 1,000 (k) Prevailing Wage Rate (Ch. 1249, Stats. 1978) (01-TC-28) ........................ 1,000 (l) Minimum Conditions for State Aid (Ch. 973, Stats. 1988) (02-TC-25 and 02-TC-31) ........................ 1,000 (m) Discrimination Complaint Procedures (Ch. 973, Stats. 1988) (02-TC-46 and portions of 02-TC-25 and 02-TC-31) ........................ 1,000 Provisions: 1. The funds appropriated in this item are for transfer by the Controller to Section B of the State School Fund. Allocation of funds appropriated in this item to the appropriate local entities shall be made by the Controller in accordance with the provisions of each statute or executive order that mandates the reimbursement of the costs, and shall be audited to verify the actual amount of the mandated costs in accordance with subdivision (d) of Section 17561 of the Government Code. Audit adjustments to claims from prior years may be paid from this item. Funds appropriated in this item may be used to provide reimbursement pursuant to Article 5 (commencing with Section 17615) of Chapter 4 of Part 7 of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code. 6870-296-0001—For local assistance, Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges (Proposition 98), for transfer to Section B of the State School Fund, Program 98-Community College Mandated Programs Block Grant ........................ 40,899,000 Schedule: (1) 5685010-Mandates ........................ 40,899,000 Provisions: 1. The funds appropriated in this item are for transfer by the Controller to Section B of the State School Fund. Pursuant to Section 17581.7 of the Government Code, the funds appropriated in this item shall be distributed to community college districts that elect to participate in the block grant on the basis of funded full-time equivalent students (FTES) calculated as of the first principal apportionment for the 2025–26 fiscal year multiplied by $37.51 per FTES. 2. If total funding provided in this item is insufficient to fully fund the rate specified in Provision 1, the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges shall proportionately reduce the rate to conform to available funding. 6870-301-6095—For capital outlay, Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges, payable from the 2024 California Community College Capital Outlay Bond Fund ........................ 736,889,000 Schedule: (1) 0014645-Antelope Valley Community College District, Antelope Valley College: Gymnasium Replacement ........................ 22,562,000 (a) Construction ........................ 22,562,000 (2) 0016160-Chaffey Community College District, Chaffey College: Theater Renovation ........................ 1,489,000 (a) Preliminary plans ........................ 754,000 (b) Working drawings ........................ 735,000 (3) 0014748-Citrus Community College District, Citrus College: New Career Technical Education ........................ 43,784,000 (a) Construction ........................ 43,784,000 (4) 0014727-Coast Community College District, Golden West College: Gym Replacement ........................ 26,907,000 (a) Construction ........................ 26,907,000 (5) 0016161-Coast Community College District, Golden West College: Performing Arts Replacement ........................ 1,542,000 (a) Preliminary plans ........................ 783,000 (b) Working drawings ........................ 759,000 (6) 0014734-Coast Community College District, Orange Coast College: Skills Lab Replacement ........................ 12,086,000 (a) Construction ........................ 12,086,000 (7) 0014718-El Camino Community College District, El Camino College: Hydronic Line ........................ 8,530,000 (a) Construction ........................ 8,530,000 (8) 0016162-El Camino Community College District, El Camino College: Interdisciplinary Science Center ........................ 4,259,000 (a) Preliminary plans ........................ 2,121,000 (b) Working drawings ........................ 2,138,000 (9) 0014753-Foothill-De Anza Community College District, De Anza College: Physical Education ........................ 36,999,000 (a) Construction ........................ 36,999,000 (10) 0014724-Hartnell Community College District, Hartnell College: Buildings F, G, & H Renovation ........................ 17,501,000 (a) Construction ........................ 17,501,000 (11) 0014733-Imperial Community College District, Imperial Valley College: Gym Modernization ........................ 11,736,000 (a) Construction ........................ 11,736,000 (12) 0014728-Kern Community College District, Bakersfield College: Center for Student Success ........................ 26,363,000 (a) Construction ........................ 26,363,000 (13) 0016163-Kern Community College District, Bakersfield College: Fine Arts Replacement ........................ 1,861,000 (a) Preliminary plans ........................ 928,000 (b) Working drawings ........................ 933,000 (14) 0016164-Kern Community College District, Porterville College: Career Technology Building ........................ 2,250,000 (a) Preliminary plans ........................ 1,198,000 (b) Working drawings ........................ 1,052,000 (15) 0014747-Long Beach Community College District, Liberal Arts Campus: Building B Replacement ........................ 24,400,000 (a) Design-build ........................ 24,400,000 (16) 0016165-Los Angeles Community College District, Los Angeles City College: Communications Cinema Building ........................ 2,441,000 (a) Preliminary plans ........................ 1,223,000 (b) Working drawings ........................ 1,218,000 (17) 0014722-Los Angeles Community College District, Los Angeles City College: Kinesiology Replacement ........................ 16,008,000 (a) Construction ........................ 16,008,000 (18) 0014719-Los Angeles Community College District, Los Angeles Pierce College: Sewer Replacement ........................ 6,576,000 (a) Construction ........................ 6,576,000 (19) 0014750-Los Angeles Community College District, Los Angeles Trade-Technical College: Advanced Transportation & Manufacturing Replacement ........................ 83,567,000 (a) Construction ........................ 83,567,000 (20) 0014720-Los Angeles Community College District, Los Angeles Valley College: Sewer Replacement ........................ 5,203,000 (a) Construction ........................ 5,203,000 (21) 0015365-Los Rios Community College District, American River College: Davies Hall Replacement ........................ 55,655,000 (a) Construction ........................ 55,655,000 (22) 0014723-Mendocino-Lake Community College District, Willits Center: Willits Center Phase II ........................ 13,022,000 (a) Construction ........................ 13,022,000 (23) 0016166-Merced Community College District, Merced College: Gym Complex Replacement ........................ 2,461,000 (a) Preliminary plans ........................ 1,222,000 (b) Working drawings ........................ 1,239,000 (24) 0014721-Merced Community College District, Merced College: Music, Art, Theater Complex ........................ 22,604,000 (a) Construction ........................ 22,604,000 (25) 0014749-Mt. San Antonio Community College District, Mt. San Antonio College: Library Replacement ........................ 53,066,000 (a) Construction ........................ 53,066,000 (26) 0014729-North Orange Community College District, Fullerton College: STEM Vocational Center ........................ 25,092,000 (a) Construction ........................ 25,092,000 (27) 0014731-Peralta Community College District, Merritt College: Buildings E & F Replacement ........................ 20,769,000 (a) Construction ........................ 20,769,000 (28) 0014751-Rio Hondo Community College District, Rio Hondo College: Business and Art Building Replacement ........................ 21,133,000 (a) Construction ........................ 21,133,000 (29) 0014726-Riverside Community College District, Ben Clark Training Center: Education Building 2 Phase 1 ........................ 14,634,000 (a) Construction ........................ 14,634,000 (30) 0014732-Riverside Community College District, Moreno Valley College: Library Learning Resource Center ........................ 40,665,000 (a) Construction ........................ 40,665,000 (31) 0014752-Riverside Community College District, Norco College: Library Learning Resource Center & Student Services ........................ 31,247,000 (a) Construction ........................ 31,247,000 (32) 0016167-Riverside Community College District, Riverside City College: Advanced Technology (Applied Technology Building) ........................ 4,677,000 (a) Preliminary plans ........................ 2,356,000 (b) Working drawings ........................ 2,321,000 (33) 0014735-Riverside Community College District, Riverside City College: Cosmetology Building ........................ 18,240,000 (a) Construction ........................ 18,240,000 (34) 0014756-San Mateo County Community College District, Skyline College: Boiler Plant Replacement ........................ 5,519,000 (a) Construction ........................ 5,519,000 (35) 0016168-Sequoias Community College District, Hanford Educational Center: Science Building ........................ 4,182,000 (a) Preliminary plans ........................ 2,369,000 (b) Working drawings ........................ 1,813,000 (36) 0014754-Shasta-Tehama-Trinity Community College District, Shasta College: Life Sciences (Building 1600) Renovation ........................ 7,757,000 (a) Construction ........................ 7,757,000 (37) 0014755-State Center Community College District, Clovis College: Kinesiology & Wellness Center ........................ 22,251,000 (a) Construction ........................ 22,251,000 (38) 0014725-State Center Community College District, Reedley College: Agriculture Complex ........................ 15,204,000 (a) Construction ........................ 15,204,000 (39) 0016169-State Center Community College District, Reedley College: Modernize Voc-Tech Complex ........................ 2,647,000 (a) Preliminary plans ........................ 1,281,000 (b) Working drawings ........................ 1,366,000 6870-403—Pursuant to Section 17581.5 of the Government Code, mandates included in this item are specifically identified by the Legislature for suspension during the 2026–27 fiscal year: (1) Law Enforcement Jurisdiction Agreements (Ch. 284, Stats. 1998) (98-TC-20) (2) Integrated Waste Management (Ch. 1116, Stats. 1992) (00-TC-07) (3) Sexual Assault Response Procedures (Ch. 423, Stats. 1990) (99-TC-12) (4) Student Records (Ch. 593, Stats. 1989) (02-TC-34) (5) Health Benefits for Survivors of Peace Officers and Firefighters (Ch. 1120, Stats. 1996) (97-TC-25) (6) Law Enforcement Sexual Harassment Training (Ch. 126, Stats. 1993) (97-TC-07) (7) Grand Jury Proceedings (Ch. 1170, Stats. 1996) (98-TC-27) (8) County Treasury Withdrawals (Ch. 784, Stats. 1995) (96-365-03) (9) Absentee Ballots (Ch. 77, Stats. 1978) (CSM 3713) (10) Brendon Maguire Act (Ch. 391, Stats. 1988) (CSM 4357) (11) Mandate Reimbursement Process I and II (Ch. 486, Stats. 1975 and Ch. 890, Stats. 2004) (CSM 4204, CSM 4485, and 05-TC-05) (12) Sex Offenders: Disclosure by Law Enforcement Officers (Chs. 908 and 909, Stats. 1996) (97-TC-15) 6870-488—Reappropriation (Proposition 98), Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges. Notwithstanding any other law, the balances from the following appropriations are available for reappropriation for the purposes specified in Provision 1: 0001—General Fund (1) $10,000 or whatever greater or lesser amount of the unexpended balance of the amount appropriated for Student Success and Support in Schedule (9) of Item 6870-101-0001, Budget Act of 2017 (Chs. 14, 22, and 54, Stats. 2017). (2) $770,000 or whatever greater or lesser amount of the unexpended balance of the amount appropriated for California State Pathways in Technology in Section 45 of Chapter 33 of the Statutes of 2018. (3) $6,048,000 or whatever greater or lesser amount of the unexpended balance of the amount appropriated for repayment of deferred apportionments funding in Section 8 of Chapter 25 of the Statutes of 2020. (4) $63,000 or whatever greater or lesser amount of the unexpended balance of the amount appropriated for Workforce Investment Initiatives in Section 87 of Chapter 144 of the Statutes of 2021. (5) $42,000 or whatever greater or lesser amount of the unexpended balance of the amount appropriated for lease-revenue bond payments in Schedule (1) of Item 6870-103-0001, Budget Act of 2021 (Chs. 21, 69, and 240, Stats. 2021). (6) $4,000 or whatever greater or lesser amount of the unexpended balance of the amount appropriated for lease-revenue bond payments in Schedule (1) of Item 6870-103-0001, Budget Act of 2022 (Chs. 43, 45, and 249, Stats. 2022). (7) $9,588,000 or whatever greater or lesser amount of the unexpended balance of the amount appropriated for Community College Summer Assistance Program in Schedule (24) of Item 6870-101-0001, Budget Act of 2023 (Chs. 12, 38, and 189, Stats. 2023). (8) $10,000 or whatever greater or lesser amount of the unexpended balance of the amount appropriated for lease-revenue bond payments in Schedule (1) of Item 6870-103-0001, Budget Act of 2023 (Chs. 12, 38, and 189, Stats. 2023). (9) $13,000 or whatever greater or lesser amount of the unexpended balance of the amount appropriated for mandates in Item 6870-295-0001, Budget Act of 2023 (Chs. 12, 38, and 189, Stats. 2023). (10) $100,732,000 or whatever greater or lesser amount of the unexpended balance of the amount appropriated for apportionments in Schedule (1) of Item 6870-101-0001, Budget Act of 2024 (Chs. 22, 35, and 994, Stats. 2024), as amended by Chapter 9 of the Statutes of 2025 and Chapter 745 of the Statutes of 2025. (11) $47,000 or whatever greater or lesser amount of the unexpended balance of the amount appropriated for maintenance allowance in Schedule (1) of Item 6870-101-0001, Budget Act of 2024 (Chs. 22, 35, and 994, Stats. 2024) as amended by Chapter 9 of the Statutes of 2025 and Chapter 745 of the Statutes of 2025. (12) $18,000 or whatever greater or lesser amount of the unexpended balance of the amount appropriated for lease-revenue bond payments in Schedule (1) of Item 6870-103-0001, Budget Act of 2024 (Chs. 22, 35, and 994, Stats. 2024). (13) $13,000 or whatever greater or lesser amount of the unexpended balance of the amount appropriated for mandates in Item 6870-295-0001, Budget Act of 2024 (Chs. 22, 35, and 994, Stats. 2024). (14) $30,000 or whatever greater or lesser amount of the unexpended balance of the amount appropriated for mandates in Item 6870-296-0001, Budget Act of 2024 (Chs. 22, 35, and 994, Stats. 2024). Provisions: 1. The sum of $117,388,000 $78,253,000 is reappropriated for transfer by the Controller to Section B of the State School Fund to support deferred maintenance costs, pursuant to pending legislation. Funds appropriated pursuant to this provision shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2031. 2. The sum of $39,135,000 is reappropriated for transfer by the Controller to Section B of the State School Fund to support Student Support Block Grant costs, pursuant to pending legislation. Funds appropriated pursuant to this provision shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2030. 6870-493—Reappropriation, Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges, payable from the 2024 California Community College Capital Outlay Bond Fund. The balances of the appropriations provided in the following citations are reappropriated for the purposes provided for in those appropriations and shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2027: 6095—2024 California Community College Capital Outlay Bond Fund (1) Item 6870-301-6095, Budget Act of 2025 (Chs. 4 and 5, Stats. 2025) (1) 0014718-El Camino Community College District, El Camino College: Hydronic Line Replacement (b) Working drawings (2) 0014719-Los Angeles Community College District, Los Angeles Pierce College: Sewer Replacement (b) Working drawings (3) 0014720-Los Angeles Community College District, Los Angeles Valley College: Sewer Replacement (b) Working drawings (4) 0014721-Merced Community College District, Merced College: Music, Art, Theater Complex (b) Working drawings (5) 0014722-Los Angeles Community College District, Los Angeles City College: Kinesiology Replacement (b) Working drawings (6) 0014723-Mendocino-Lake Community College District, Willits Center: Willits Center Phase II (b) Working drawings (7) 0014724-Hartnell Community College District, Hartnell College: Buildings F, G &amp; H Renovation (b) Working drawings (8) 0014725-State Center Community College District, Reedley College: Agriculture Complex (b) Working drawings (9) 0014726-Riverside Community College District, Ben Clark Training Center: Education Building 2 Phase 1 (b) Working drawings (10) 0014727-Coast Community College District, Golden West College: Gym Replacement (b) Working drawings (11) 0014728-Kern Community College District, Bakersfield College: Center for Student Success (b) Working drawings (12) 0014729-North Orange Community College District, Fullerton College: STEM Vocational Center (b) Working drawings (14) 0014731-Peralta Community College District, Merritt College: Buildings E &amp; F Replacement (b) Working drawings (16) 0014733-Imperial Community College District, Imperial Valley College: Gym Modernization (b) Working drawings (17) 0014734-Coast Community College District, Orange Coast College: Skills Lab Replacement (b) Working drawings (19) 0014747-Long Beach Community College District, Liberal Arts Campus: Building B Replacement (a) Performance criteria (20) 0014748-Citrus Community College District, Citrus College: New Career Technical Education Building (b) Working drawings (21) 0014749-Mt. San Antonio Community College District, Mt. San Antonio College: Library Replacement (b) Working drawings (22) 0014750-Los Angeles Community College District, Los Angeles Trade-Technical College: Advanced Transportation &amp; Manufacturing Replacement (b) Working drawings (26) 0014754-Shasta-Tehama-Trinity Community College District, Shasta College: Life Sciences Building 1600 Renovation (b) Working drawings (27) 0014755-State Center Community College District, Clovis College: Kinesiology &amp; Wellness Center (b) Working drawings (28) 0014756-San Mateo Community College District, Skyline College: Boiler Plant Replacement (a) Performance criteria (29) 0014645-Antelope Valley Community College District, Antelope Valley College: Gymnasium Replacement (b) Working drawings (30) 0015365-Los Rios Community College District, American River College: Davies Hall Replacement (b) Working drawings 6980-001-0001—For support of Student Aid Commission ........................ 27,267,000 Schedule: (1) 5755-Financial Aid Grants Program ........................ 27,830,000 (2) Reimbursements to 5755-Financial Aid Grants Program ........................ −563,000 Provisions: 1. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (1), $230,000 shall be made available to assess the Student Aid Commission’s current information technology system, address high-risk cybersecurity issues, and fill staffing gaps. 2. Of the reimbursements identified in Schedule (2), $10,000 shall be available on a one-time basis to support a data sharing agreement with the Scholarshare Investment Board. The agreement and collaboration shall support CalKIDS program recipients and promote student financial aid. It is the intent of the Legislature to provide one-time annual augmentations of $10,000 for this purpose through fiscal year 2029-30. 3. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $664,000 is available on a one-time basis for state activities to implement and participate in the federal Workforce Pell Grant Program. Disbursement of these funds are contingent on Department of Finance approval of an expenditure plan for the use of these funds submitted by the department. 6980-001-8099—For support of, Student Aid Commission, payable from the Public Interest Attorney Loan Repayment Account ........................ 199,000 Schedule: (1) 5755-Financial Aid Grants Program ........................ 199,000 6980-101-0001—For local assistance, Student Aid Commission ........................ 3,790,899,000 Schedule: (1) 5755-Financial Aid Grants Program ........................ 4,228,147,000 (2) Reimbursements to 5755-Financial Aid Grants Program ........................ −437,248,000 Provisions: 1. The funds appropriated in this item are for costs of all of the following: (a) The Cal Grant Program, pursuant to Chapter 1.7 (commencing with Section 69430) of Part 42 of Division 5 of Title 3 of the Education Code. (b) The Law Enforcement Personnel Dependents Scholarship Program, pursuant to Section 4709 of the Labor Code. (c) The Assumption Program of Loans for Education, pursuant to Article 5 (commencing with Section 69612) of Chapter 2 of Part 42 of Division 5 of Title 3 of the Education Code. (d) The State Nursing Assumption Program of Loans for Education (SNAPLE), pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with Section 70100) of Chapter 3 of Part 42 of Division 5 of Title 3 of the Education Code. (f) The Cash for College Program, pursuant to Article 3.5 (commencing with Section 69551) of Chapter 2 of Part 42 of Division 5 of Title 3 of the Education Code. (g) The Student Opportunity and Access Program (Cal-SOAP), pursuant to Article 4 (commencing with Section 69560) of Chapter 2 of Part 42 of Division 5 of Title 3 of the Education Code. (h) Of the funds appropriated in this item, $2,400,000 is available on an ongoing basis to support the Inland Empire Cal-SOAP projects. 1.1. The Student Aid Commission shall report to the Department of Finance and the relevant policy and fiscal committees of the Legislature by December 1, 2027, regarding the use of funds specified in subprovision (f) of Provision 1. The report shall include, but not necessarily be limited to, all of the following information regarding the Cash for College Program in 2026–27: (a) A list of regional coordinating organizations specifying, for each organization, whether it was newly added to the program in 2026–27, and the areas of the state that it covers. (b) The services provided by the program, including the number of financial aid application workshops hosted. (c) The number of students participating in financial aid application workshops and the number of those students who completed a Free Application for Federal Student Aid or California Dream Act Application. (d) A description of the coordination between the program and other financial aid outreach efforts conducted by state agencies, local educational agencies, and other entities. 1.2. Of the reimbursements identified in Schedule (2) of this item, $1,630,000 is for Federal Title II, Part A support for the Golden State Teacher Grant Program, pursuant to Article 5.1 (commencing with Section 69617) of Chapter 2 of Part 42 of Division 5 of Title 3 of the Education Code and shall be available on a one-time basis for encumbrance and expenditure through June 30, 2030. 1.3. Of the reimbursements identified in Schedule (2) of this item, $16,152,000 is for the federal Individuals with Disabilities Act (IDEA) to support the Golden State Teacher Grant Program recipients who are pursuing a special education credential, pursuant to Article 5.1 (commencing with Section 69617) of Chapter 2 of Part 42 of Division 5 of Title 3 of the Education Code, and shall be available for encumbrance and expenditure through June 30, 2030. 1.4 It is the intent of the Legislature to appropriate $10,000,000 on a one-time basis in fiscal year 2027–28 for the 2027–28 Golden State Teacher Grant Program to support students earning a teaching credential in high-need fields of study pursuant to Article 5.1 (commencing with Section 69617) of Chapter 2 of Part 42 of Division 5 of Title 3 of the Education Code. 1.5. Of the amount appropriated in this item, $7,500,000 is to fund the California Dream Act Service Incentive Grant Program pursuant to Article 5.5 (commencing with Section 69438) of Chapter 1.7 of Part 42 of Division 5 of Title 3 of the Education Code. 2. Notwithstanding any other law, the maximum Cal Grant award for: (a) New recipients attending private, for-profit institutions that are not accredited by the Western Association of Schools and Colleges as of July 1, 2023, shall be $4,000. (b) New recipients attending private, for-profit institutions that are accredited by the Western Association of Schools and Colleges as of July 1, 2023, shall be $8,056. (c) All recipients attending private, nonprofit institutions shall be $9,358. (d) All recipients of Cal Grant B access awards shall be $1,648. (e) All recipients receiving Cal Grant C tuition and fee awards shall be $2,462. (f) All recipients attending community colleges receiving Cal Grant C book and supply awards shall be $1,094. (g) All recipients not attending community colleges receiving Cal Grant C book and supply awards shall be $547. (h) All University of California student recipients receiving Cal Grant awards shall be the amount approved for mandatory systemwide tuition and fees by the Regents of the University of California for the 2026–27 academic year. (i) All California State University student recipients receiving Cal Grant awards shall be the amount approved for mandatory systemwide tuition and fees by the Trustees of the California State University for the 2026–27 academic year. 3. Notwithstanding Provision 2 of this item and any other law: (a) All Cal Grant A award recipients attending a University of California, California State University, or a private nonprofit institution and who have a dependent child or dependent children shall also receive an access award. The maximum amount of this access award shall be $6,000. (b) All Cal Grant B access award recipients attending a University of California, California State University, California Community College, or a private nonprofit institution and who have a dependent child or dependent children shall have a maximum access award of $6,000. (c) All Cal Grant C book and supply award recipients attending a California Community College and who have a dependent child or dependent children shall have a maximum book and supply award of $4,000. 4. Notwithstanding Provision 2 of this item and any other law: (a) All Cal Grant A award recipients attending a University of California, California State University, California Community College, or a private nonprofit institution and who are former or current foster youth shall have a maximum access award of $6,000. (b) All Cal Grant B award recipients attending a University of California, California State University, California Community College, or a private nonprofit institution and who are former or current foster youth shall have a maximum access award of $6,000. (c) All Cal Grant C book and supply award recipients attending a California Community College and who are former or current foster youth shall have a maximum book and supply award of $4,000. 4.1 It is the intent of the Legislature to provide $9,800,000 on a one-time basis for a multiyear appropriation in fiscal years 2027–28 through 2031–32 to expand access to Cal Grant to students of up to 30 years of age pursuant to Article 4 (commencing with Section 69436) of Chapter 1.7 of Part 42 of Division 5 of Title 3 of the Education Code. 5. Notwithstanding any other law, the Department of Finance may authorize an augmentation, from the Special Fund for Economic Uncertainties established pursuant to Section 16418 of the Government Code, of the amount appropriated in this item to make Cal Grant awards, pursuant to Chapter 1.7 (commencing with Section 69430) of Part 42 of Division 5 of Title 3 of the Education Code. No augmentation may be authorized pursuant to this provision sooner than 30 days after the Department of Finance provides notice of the intended augmentation to the chairpersons of the committees in each house of the Legislature that consider appropriations. 6. Notwithstanding any other law, the Department of Finance may authorize a loan from the General Fund for cashflow purposes, in an amount not to exceed $125,000,000, provided that: (a) The loan is to meet cash needs resulting from a delay in the receipt of reimbursements from federal Temporary Assistance for Needy Families (TANF) funds. (b) The Student Aid Commission has received confirmation from the State Department of Social Services that there are no available TANF resources that could be advanced to them. (c) The loan is for a short-term need and shall be repaid within 90 days of the loan’s origination date. (d) Interest charges may be waived pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 16314 of the Government Code. 7. (a) For the 2026–27 award year, Middle Class Scholarship awards shall cover up to 35 17.5 percent of a student’s remaining financial need, as calculated pursuant to Section 70022 of the Education Code. It is the intent of the Legislature to appropriate an estimated $1,065,228,000 in fiscal year 2027–28 to pay for the cost of Middle Class Scholarship awards in fiscal year 2026–27. (b) It is the intent of the Legislature to appropriate funding in the succeeding state budget sufficient to retire the loan authorized pursuant to subdivision (c). (c) The Department of Finance shall authorize a loan from the General Fund for cashflow purposes to cover the cost of Middle Class Scholarship awards issued in 2026–2027. Interest charges shall be waived pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 16314 of the Government Code. 6980-101-3263—For local assistance, Student Aid Commission, payable from the College Access Tax Credit Fund ........................ 200,000 Schedule: (1) 5755-Financial Aid Grants Program ........................ 200,000 Provisions: 1. The amounts appropriated in this item are available without regard to fiscal year, pursuant to subdivisions (d) and (e) of Section 69840 of the Education Code. 6980-101-8099—For local assistance, Student Aid Commission, payable from the Public Interest Attorney Loan Repayment Account ........................ 814,000 Schedule: (1) 5755-Financial Aid Grants Program ........................ 814,000 Provisions: 1. The amount appropriated in this item shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2031, and liquidation through June 30, 2033, to align with the expenditure timeline pursuant to Article 12 (commencing with Section 69740) of Chapter 2 of Part 42 of Division 5 of Title 3 of the Education Code. 6980-401—The Student Aid Commission shall issue no new warrants for the purchase of loan assumptions pursuant to the following programs: (1) The Assumption Program of Loans for Education, pursuant to Article 5 (commencing with Section 69612) of Chapter 2 of Part 42 of Division 5 of Title 3 of the Education Code. (2) The Graduate Assumption Program of Loans for Education, pursuant to Article 5.5 (commencing with Section 69618) of Chapter 2 of Part 42 of Division 5 of Title 3 of the Education Code. (3) The State Nursing Assumption Program of Loans for Education, pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with Section 70100) of Chapter 3 of Part 42 of Division 5 of Title 3 of the Education Code. 6980-402—This item relates to the Competitive Cal Grant A and B award program established pursuant to Article 5 (commencing with Section 69437) of Chapter 1.7 of Part 42 of Division 5 of Title 3 of the Education Code. (1) In making initial award offers for the Competitive Cal Grant A and B award program for the 2026–27 award year, the Student Aid Commission may use a minimum score that results in 16,000 initial award offers. (2) This item does not change the total number of Cal Grant A and B awards. (3) This item does not limit the authority of the Student Aid Commission to make sufficient award offers to grant the total number of Cal Grant A and B awards. LABOR AND WORKFORCE DEVELOPMENT AGENCY 7100-001-0001—For support of Employment Development Department ........................ 200,605,000 Schedule: (1) 5900-Employment and Employment Related Services ........................ 193,000 (2) 5915-California Unemployment Insurance Appeals Board ........................ 9,891,000 (3) 5920-Unemployment Insurance Program ........................ 150,340,000 (4) 5930-Tax Program ........................ 39,261,000 (5) 5935-Employment Training Panel ........................ 920,000 Provisions: 1. (a) Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (3), $70,937,000 shall be available for the support of the EDDNext modernization projects and vendor services contracts. Up to $9,190,000 of this amount shall be available, upon order of the Department of Finance, for the Document Management System project following approval of a Special Project Report or equivalent document by the Department of Technology. (b) The Employment Development Department shall provide the Department of Finance with an expenditure plan by October 1, 2026, for utilization of available funds for the EDDNext modernization projects. The expenditure plan shall identify projected EDDNext expenditures and any changes the Employment Development Department has identified are necessary for implementation activities, including any shifts of amounts between project workstreams. To the extent the Employment Development Department identifies a need to shift amounts between project workstreams, the shift of any amounts between project workstreams is contingent upon approval of the expenditure plan by the Department of Finance and no sooner than 30 days after notification in writing to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee. (c) The Employment Development Department shall provide the Department of Finance and the Legislative Analyst’s Office with a quarterly report on EDDNext that includes the following: (1) Project approval documents and project delegation documents, and oversight reports from the Department of Technology. (2) Identification of vendors, equipment, subscription services, software licensing, and tools that align to priorities and technical needs for the following: transformation office, contact center enhancement, fraud and data analytics, forms redesign and research, document management system solution, shared customer portal enhancement, integration of claims management systems, and data platform implementation. (3) The amount of encumbrances and expenditures and unencumbered or unexpended funds available for each project workstream by fiscal year. 7100-001-0184—For support of Employment Development Department, payable from the Employment Development Department Benefit Audit Fund ........................ 23,539,000 Schedule: (1) 5920-Unemployment Insurance Program ........................ 23,539,000 Provisions: 1. The amount appropriated in this item includes revenues derived from the assessment of fines and penalties imposed as specified in Section 13332.18 of the Government Code. 2. Provision 1 of Item 7100-001-0588 also applies to funds appropriated in this item for the Unemployment Insurance program. 7100-001-0185—For support of Employment Development Department, payable from the Employment Development Department Contingent Fund ........................ 260,796,000 Schedule: (1) 5900-Employment and Employment Related Services ........................ 22,263,000 (2) 5920-Unemployment Insurance Program ........................ 189,706,000 (3) 5930-Tax Program ........................ 48,827,000 Provisions: 1. Funds appropriated in this item are in lieu of the amounts that otherwise would have been appropriated for administration pursuant to Section 1586 of the Unemployment Insurance Code. 2. The amount appropriated in this item includes revenues derived from the assessment of fines and penalties imposed as specified in Section 13332.18 of the Government Code. 3. Provision 1 of Item 7100-001-0588 also applies to funds appropriated in this item for the Unemployment Insurance program. 7100-001-0514—For support of Employment Development Department, payable from the Employment Training Fund ........................ 127,493,000 Schedule: (1) 5930-Tax Program ........................ 7,788,000 (2) 5935-Employment Training Panel ........................ 119,705,000 Provisions: 1. Upon order of the Director of Finance, funds disencumbered from Employment Training Fund training contracts during the 2026–27 fiscal year that have not reverted as of July 1, 2026, may be appropriated in augmentation of this item. 2. Notwithstanding subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 10206 of the Unemployment Insurance Code, the Employment Training Panel’s administrative costs may exceed 15 percent of the amount appropriated in this item. 7100-001-0588—For support of Employment Development Department, payable from the Unemployment Compensation Disability Fund ........................ 524,578,000 Schedule: (1) 5915-California Unemployment Insurance Appeals Board ........................ 8,097,000 (2) 5925-Disability Insurance Program ........................ 449,274,000 (3) 5930-Tax Program ........................ 67,207,000 Provisions: 1. On October 1, 2026, and April 1, 2027, the Employment Development Department shall submit to the Department of Finance, for its review and approval, an estimate of expenditures for both the current and budget year, including the assumptions and calculations underlying Employment Development Department projections for expenditures from this item. If the Director of Finance determines that the estimate of expenditures differs from the amount appropriated by this item, the director shall so report to the Legislature. At the time the report is made, the amount of this appropriation shall be adjusted by the difference between this appropriation and the approved estimate of the Director of Finance. Revisions reported pursuant to this provision are not subject to Section 28.00. 2. (a) Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (2), $94,583,000 shall be available for the support of the EDDNext modernization projects and vendor services contracts. Up to $9,190,000 of this amount shall be available, upon order of the Department of Finance, for the Document Management System project following approval of a Special Project Report or equivalent document by the Department of Technology. (b) The Employment Development Department shall provide the Department of Finance with an expenditure plan by October 1, 2026, for utilization of available funds for the EDDNext modernization projects. The expenditure plan shall identify projected EDDNext expenditures and any changes the Employment Development Department has identified are necessary for implementation activities, including any shifts of amounts between project workstreams. To the extent the Employment Development Department identifies a need to shift amounts between project workstreams, the shift of any amounts between project workstreams is contingent upon approval of the expenditure plan by the Department of Finance and no sooner than 30 days after notification in writing to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee. (c) The Employment Development Department shall provide the Department of Finance and the Legislative Analyst’s Office with a quarterly report on EDDNext that includes the following: (1) Project approval documents and project delegation documents, and oversight reports from the Department of Technology. (2) Identification of vendors, equipment, subscription services, software licensing, and tools that align to priorities and technical needs for the following: transformation office, contact center enhancement, fraud and data analytics, forms redesign and research, document management system solution, shared customer portal enhancement, integration of claims management systems, and data platform implementation. (3) The amount of encumbrances and expenditures and unencumbered or unexpended funds available for each project workstream by fiscal year. 7100-001-0869—For support of state programs under the Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act (WIOA), Employment Development Department, payable from the Consolidated Work Program Fund ........................ 219,215,000 Schedule: (1) 5940010-WIOA Administration and Program Services ........................ 30,164,000 (2) 5940019-WIOA Services to Bridge Education and Workforce Gaps for Targeted Populations ........................ 54,045,000 (3) 5940046-WIOA Rapid Response Activities ........................ 89,836,000 (4) 5940055-WIOA Special Grants ........................ 170,000 (5) 5945010-National Dislocated Worker Grants ........................ 45,000,000 Provisions: 1. Provision 1 of Item 7100-001-0588 also applies to Schedules (1) and (3) of this item. 2. For Schedule (2), on October 1, 2026, and April 20, 2027, the Employment Development Department (EDD) shall submit to the Department of Finance, for its review and approval, an estimate of expenditures for both the current and budget year, including the assumptions and calculations underlying the Employment Development Department’s projections for expenditures from this schedule. To the extent the Employment Development Department identifies unspent, or receives unanticipated additional, federal Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act (P.L. 113-128) (WIOA) discretionary funds, the Director of Finance may increase expenditure authority for Schedule (2) if the additional funding is consistent with the expenditure plan for WIOA discretionary funds in this item and meets the four requirements set forth in subdivision (b) of Section 28.00. Any such augmentation may be authorized not sooner than 30 days after written notification is provided to the chairpersons of the committees in each house of the Legislature that consider the State Budget and the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, or not sooner than whatever lesser time the chairperson of the joint committee, or the chairperson’s designee, may in each instance determine. 3. For Schedule (2), in the event that the Employment Development Department is notified of a reduction in federal Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act (P.L. 113-128) (WIOA) discretionary funds, the Director of Finance may decrease expenditure authority for Schedule (2). Any such decrease may be authorized not sooner than 30 days after notification in writing is provided to the chairpersons of the committees in each house of the Legislature that consider the State Budget and the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, or not sooner than whatever lesser time the chairperson of the joint committee, or the chairperson’s designee, may in each instance determine. 4. The Secretary of Labor and Workforce Development is authorized to transfer up to $500,000 of the funds appropriated in this item to Item 7120-001-0890, to facilitate the implementation and operation of the Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act (WIOA) program. Any transfer made pursuant to this provision shall be reported in writing to the Department of Finance, the chairpersons of the fiscal committees of each house of the Legislature, and the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee within 30 days of the date of the transfer. 7100-001-0870—For support of Employment Development Department, payable from the Unemployment Administration Fund ........................ 1,100,872,000 Schedule: (1) 5900-Employment and Employment Related Services ........................ 221,407,000 (2) 5915-California Unemployment Insurance Appeals Board ........................ 83,316,000 (3) 5920-Unemployment Insurance Program ........................ 631,140,000 (4) 5925-Disability Insurance Program ........................ 3,133,000 (5) 5930-Tax Program ........................ 192,958,000 (6) 5935-Employment Training Panel ........................ 3,092,000 (7) Reimbursements to 5900-Employ-ment and Employment Related Services ........................ −18,097,000 (8) Reimbursements to 5915-California Unemployment Insurance Appeals Board ........................ −289,000 (9) Reimbursements to 5920-Unemployment Insurance Program ........................ −6,079,000 (10) Reimbursements to 5925-Disability Insurance Program ........................ −3,133,000 (11) Reimbursements to 5930-Tax Program ........................ −3,484,000 (12) Reimbursements to 5935-Employment Training Panel ........................ −3,092,000 Provisions: 1. Funds appropriated in this item are in lieu of the amounts that otherwise would have been appropriated pursuant to Section 1555 of the Unemployment Insurance Code. 2. Provision 1 of Item 7100-001-0588 also applies to funds appropriated in this item for the Unemployment Insurance program. 7100-001-0908—For support of Employment Development Department, payable from the School Employees Fund ........................ 1,334,000 Schedule: (1) 5920-Unemployment Insurance Program ........................ 1,334,000 Provisions: 1. Funds appropriated in this item are in lieu of the amounts that otherwise would have been appropriated for administration pursuant to Section 822 of the Unemployment Insurance Code. 2. Provision 1 of Item 7100-001-0588 also applies to this item. 7100-002-0001—For support of Employment Development Department ........................ 668,291,000 Schedule: (1) 5920-Unemployment Insurance Program ........................ 668,291,000 Provisions: 1. The funds appropriated in this item may only be used for the payment of interest due for an Unemployment Fund loan secured to pay unemployment insurance benefits. 2. Notwithstanding any other law, the Department of Finance may augment this item based on the calculation of actual interest due to the federal government. The Employment Development Department shall notify the Department of Finance of the estimated interest payment by September 1, 2026. 3. Any augmentation pursuant to Provision 2 of this item shall be reported in writing to the chairpersons of the fiscal committees of each house of the Legislature and the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee within 30 days of the augmentation. 4. Any funds appropriated in excess of the amount required for this interest payment shall revert to the General Fund on October 15, 2026. 7100-011-0184—For transfer by the Controller, upon order of the Director of Finance, from the Employment Development Department Benefit Audit Fund, to the General Fund ........................ (1,000) Provisions: 1. The unencumbered balance in the Employment Development Department Benefit Audit Fund as of June 30, 2027, shall be transferred to the General Fund. 7100-011-0185—For transfer by the Controller, upon order of the Director of Finance, from the Employment Development Department Contingent Fund, to the General Fund ........................ (1,000) Provisions: 1. Notwithstanding any other law, the Controller shall transfer to the General Fund the unencumbered balance, as determined by the Director of Finance, in the Employment Development Department Contingent Fund as of June 30, 2027. 7100-011-0890—For support of Employment Development Department, payable from the Federal Trust Fund, for transfer to the Unemployment Administration Fund ........................ (1,102,535,000) Provisions: 1. Notwithstanding Section 28.00, the Department of Finance may adjust the amount transferred by this item to align with the approved Employment Development Department’s planned administrative expenditures from the Unemployment Administration Fund. 7100-021-0890—For support of Employment Development Department, payable from the Federal Trust Fund, for transfer to the Consolidated Work Program Fund ........................ (219,214,000) Provisions: 1. Notwithstanding Section 28.00, the Department of Finance may adjust the amount transferred by this item to align with the approved Employment Development Department’s planned expenditures from the Consolidated Work Program Fund. 7100-101-0001—For local assistance, Employment Development Department ........................ 50,000,000 Schedule: (1) 5900-Employment and Employment Related Services ........................ 50,000,000 Provisions: 1. The amount appropriated in this item shall be used to implement the program as described in Chapter 5.1 (commencing with Section 14531) of Division 7 of the Unemployment Insurance Code. These funds shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2030, for support or local assistance. 2. Up to 5 percent of the amount appropriated in this item may be used for administrative costs for the Employment Development Department, the Secretary of Labor and Workforce Development, the Governor’s Office of Business and Economic Development, or the Office of Planning and Research. 7100-101-0588—For local assistance, Employment Development Department, for Program 5925-Disability Insurance Program, payable from the Unemployment Compensation Disability Fund ........................ 18,074,617,000 Provisions: 1. Provision 1 of Item 7100-001-0588 also applies to this item. 2. Funds appropriated in this item are in lieu of the amounts that otherwise would have been appropriated pursuant to Section 3012 of the Unemployment Insurance Code. 3. Apart from the estimate of expenditures that the Employment Development Department provides to the Department of Finance on October 1 and April 1 of each year, the Director of Finance is authorized to approve requests for expenditure adjustments for this item in those amounts made necessary by changes in either workload or payments, any rule or regulation adopted as a result of the enactment of a federal or state law, the adoption of a federal regulation, or compliance with a court decision during the 2026–27 fiscal year that are within or in excess of amounts appropriated in this act for that year. The Director of Finance shall notify the Legislature of any modifications to expenditures made pursuant to this provision. 7100-101-0869—For local assistance under the federal Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act (WIOA), Employment Development Department, payable from the Consolidated Work Program Fund ........................ 405,718,000 Schedule: (1) 5940064-WIOA Local Assistance ........................ 405,718,000 Provisions: 1. Provision 1 of Item 7100-001-0588 also applies to this item. 2. Provision 3 of Item 7100-101-0588 also applies to this item. 7100-101-0871—For local assistance, Employment Development Department, payable from the Unemployment Fund—​Federal ........................ 7,082,251,000 Schedule: (1) 5920-Unemployment Insurance Program ........................ 7,082,251,000 Provisions: 1. Funds appropriated in this item are in lieu of the amounts that would have otherwise been appropriated pursuant to Section 1521 of the Unemployment Insurance Code. 2. Provision 1 of Item 7100-001-0588 also applies to this item. 3. Provision 3 of Item 7100-101-0588 also applies to this item. 7100-101-0890—For local assistance, Employment Development Department, payable from the Federal Trust Fund, for transfer to the Consolidated Work Program Fund ........................ (405,718,000) Provisions: 1. Notwithstanding Section 28.00, the Department of Finance may adjust the amount transferred by this item to align with the approved Employment Development Department’s planned benefit expenditures from the Unemployment Fund. 7100-101-0908—For local assistance, Employment Development Department, payable from the School Employees Fund ........................ 109,768,000 Schedule: (1) 5920-Unemployment Insurance Program ........................ 109,768,000 Provisions: 1. Provision 1 of Item 7100-001-0588 also applies to this item. 2. Funds appropriated in this item are in lieu of the amounts that otherwise would have been appropriated for benefits pursuant to Section 822 of the Unemployment Insurance Code. 3. Provision 3 of Item 7100-101-0588 also applies to this item. 7100-111-0890—For local assistance, Employment Development Department, payable from the Federal Trust Fund, for transfer to the Unemployment Fund ........................ (7,082,251,000) Provisions: 1. Notwithstanding Section 28.00, the Department of Finance may adjust the amount transferred by this item to align with the approved Employment Development Department’s planned benefit expenditures from the Unemployment Fund. 7100-490—Reappropriation, Employment Development Department. The balances of the appropriations provided in the following citations are reappropriated for the purposes provided for in those appropriations and shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure as specified below: 0001—​General Fund (1) The administrative dollars transferred per Provision 2 of Item 7100-101-0001, Budget Act of 2024 (Chs. 22, 35, and 994, Stats. 2024) to the Employment Development Department shall be extended to June 30, 2028. (2) The administrative dollars transferred per Provision 2 of Item 7100-101-0001, Budget Act of 2025 (Chs. 4 and 5, Stats. 2025) to the Employment Development Department shall be extended until June 30, 2029. 7100-491—Reappropriation, Employment Development Department. The amounts specified in the following citations are reappropriated for the purposes provided for in those appropriations and shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2027, and liquidation until June 30, 2029: 0001—General Fund (1) Up to $883,000 in Provision 8 of Item 7100-001-0001, Budget Act of 2022 (Chs. 43, 45, 249, Stats. 2022). 7100-495—Reversion, Employment Development Department. As of June 30, 2026, the balances specified below of the appropriations provided in the following citations shall revert to the balances in the funds from which the appropriations were made: 0001—General Fund (1) Item 7100-001-0001, Budget Act of 2025 (Chs. 4 and 5, Stats. 2025). Up to $70,570,000 appropriated in 5920-Unemployment Insurance Program for support of the EDDNext modernization projects. 7120-001-0001—For support of California Workforce Development Board ........................ 6,278,000 Schedule: (1) 6040-California Workforce Development Board ........................ 22,278,000 (2) Reimbursements to 6040-California Workforce Development Board ........................ −16,000,000 7120-001-0890—For support of California Workforce Development Board, payable from the Federal Trust Fund ........................ 11,059,000 Schedule: (1) 6040-California Workforce Development Board ........................ 11,059,000 Provisions: 1. The Secretary of Labor and Workforce Development, with the approvals of the California Workforce Development Board and the Director of Finance, and not sooner than 30 days after notification to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, is authorized to transfer funds appropriated in this item to the Employment Development Department, Consolidated Work Program Fund, Item 7100-001-0869, to facilitate the implementation and operation of the federal Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act. 2. For Schedule (1), the California Workforce Development Board shall submit on October 1, 2026, and April 1, 2027, to the Director of Finance for its review and approval an estimate of expenditures for both the current and budget years, including the assumptions and calculations underlying the California Workforce Development Board’s projections for expenditures from this schedule. To the extent the California Workforce Development Board identifies unspent, or receives unanticipated additional, federal Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act (WIOA) discretionary funds, the Director of Finance may increase expenditure authority for Schedule (1), if the additional funding is consistent with the expenditure plan for WIOA discretionary funds in this item. In the event that the California Workforce Development Board is notified of a reduction in WIOA discretionary funds, the Director of Finance may decrease expenditure authority for Schedule (1). Any such adjustment may be authorized not sooner than 30 days after written notification is provided to the chairpersons of the committees in each house of the Legislature that consider the State Budget, and the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, or not sooner than whatever lesser time the chairperson of the joint committee, or the chairperson’s designee, may in each instance determine. 7120-101-0001—For local assistance, California Workforce Development Board ........................ 20,000,000 Schedule: (1) 6040-California Workforce Development Board ........................ 20,000,000 Provisions: 1. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (1), $20,000,000 shall be available for support of a goods movement training campus in Southern California. Notwithstanding any other law, these funds shall be available and eligible for advance payment. 7120-101-3078—For support of California Workforce Development Board, payable from the Labor and Workforce Development Fund ........................ 5,000,000 Schedule: (1) 6040-California Workforce Development Board ........................ 5,000,000 Provisions: 1. The funds appropriated in this item shall be allocated as passthrough grants to the Los Angeles County Department of Economic Opportunity and the Los Angeles County Justice, Care, and Opportunities Department for the Jails 2 Jobs Program. The funds allocated pursuant to this provision shall be used to support outreach, education, training, and technical assistance activities designed to help employers, applicants, employees, and workforce professionals understand and navigate employment-related issues involving individuals with pending criminal cases. Eligible uses of funds shall include: (a) Employer outreach, education , and technical assistance on California labor laws, hiring practices, workplace retention strategies, and compliance requirements related to applicants and employees with pending criminal cases. (b) Development and distribution of educational materials, toolkits, and guidance documents for employers, applicants, and employees. (c) Outreach and education for applicants and employees with pending criminal cases regarding workplace rights and responsibilities, disclosure issues, employment requirements, and balancing employment with court obligations. 7120-102-0001—For support of California Workforce Development Board ........................ 8,000,000 Schedule: (1) 6040-California Workforce Development Board ........................ 8,000,000 Provisions: 1. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (1), $3,000,000 shall be available to the United Food and Commercial Workers Western States Council for the High Road Workforce Initiative for Regulated Industries. 2. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (1), $5,000,000 shall be provided to Creating Restorative Opportunities and Programs (CROP) to continue their Ready for Life program and shall be made available for encumbrance or expenditure through July 1, 2029. (a) Funding shall support reentry services, including, but not limited to, short-term and long-term housing (a minimum of 12 months), professional and personal leadership development, workforce development training, employment placement services, and other related services to participants who are defined as individuals who were formerly incarcerated in state prison and are currently on parole or post-release community supervision, or were released from state prison within the last five years. (b) CROP shall provide a summary report of expenditures, outcomes achieved, including the number of people served, and any data related to recidivism. In addition, the report shall include an assessment of overall program participation, including, but not limited to, employment and housing outcomes. This report shall be provided to the California Workforce Development Board on or before February 1, 2030. (c) Administrative expenses shall not exceed 15 percent of the appropriated resources, inclusive of salaries, benefits, and indirect costs. 7300-001-0001—For support of Agricultural Labor Relations Board ........................ 11,815,000 Schedule: (1) 6050-Board Administration ........................ 3,541,000 (2) 6055-General Counsel Administration ........................ 6,520,000 (3) 6060-Administration ........................ 1,754,000 7300-001-3078—For support of Agricultural Labor Relations Board, payable from the Labor and Workforce Development Fund ........................ 9,798,000 Schedule: (1) 6050-Board Administration ........................ 849,000 (2) 6055-General Counsel Administration ........................ 6,815,000 (3) 6060-Administration ........................ 2,134,000 Provisions: 1. The amount appropriated in this item includes revenues derived from the assessment of fines and penalties imposed as specified in Section 13332.18 of the Government Code. 2. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $4,361,000 shall be used for the Rural Strategic Engagement Program. For the duration of the program, ALRB will utilize vendors to assist with drafting, translation, design and printing of written materials, create social media content, and assess and evaluate the impact of the resources developed. 7320-001-0001—For support of Public Employment Relations Board ........................ 22,409,000 Schedule: (1) 6070-Public Employment Relations Board ........................ 22,529,000 (2) Reimbursements to 6070-Public Employment Relations Board ........................ −120,000 7350-001-0001—For support of Department of Industrial Relations ........................ 11,481,000 Schedule: (1) 6110-Division of Apprenticeship Standards ........................ 14,981,000 (2) Reimbursements to 6110-Division of Apprenticeship Standards ........................ −3,500,000 Provisions: 1. The funds appropriated in this item shall be used to support the Women in Construction Priority Unit established at the Department of Industrial Relations pursuant to Section 107.7.1 of the Labor Code. 7350-001-0023—For support of Department of Industrial Relations, payable from the Farmworker Remedial Account ........................ 291,000 Schedule: (1) 6120-Claims, Wages, and Contingencies ........................ 291,000 Provisions: 1. Upon approval by the Department of Finance, the Department of Industrial Relations may augment this item for the payment of valid claims against and up to the fund balance of the Farmworker Remedial Account. 7350-001-0132—For support of Department of Industrial Relations, payable from the Workers’ Compensation Managed Care Fund ........................ 77,000 Schedule: (1) 6090-Division of Workers’ Compensation ........................ 77,000 7350-001-0223—For support of Department of Industrial Relations, payable from the Workers’ Compensation Administration Revolving Fund ........................ 321,425,000 Schedule: (1) 6080-Self-Insurance Plans ........................ 1,747,000 (2) 6090-Division of Workers’ Compensation ........................ 330,138,000 (3) 6095-Commission on Health and Safety and Workers’ Compensation ........................ 2,758,000 (4) 6105-Division of Labor Standards Enforcement ........................ 1,055,000 (7) Reimbursements to 6090-Division of Workers’ Compensation ........................ −14,273,000 Provisions: 1. Notwithstanding any other law, the funds appropriated in this item may be used to pay workers’ compensation benefits for the Subsequent Injuries Program and the Uninsured Employers Program, if either or both of those funds’ reserves are insufficient to make the payments. Any expenditures made pursuant to this provision shall be credited to the Workers’ Compensation Administration Revolving Fund upon receipt of sufficient revenues. 7350-001-0396—For support of Department of Industrial Relations, payable from the Self-Insurance Plans Fund ........................ 4,623,000 Schedule: (1) 6080-Self-Insurance Plans ........................ 4,623,000 7350-001-0452—For support of Department of Industrial Relations, payable from the Elevator Safety Account ........................ 37,116,000 Schedule: (1) 6100-Division of Occupational Safety and Health ........................ 37,116,000 Provisions: 1. The amount appropriated in this item includes revenues derived from the assessment of fines and penalties imposed as specified in Section 13332.18 of the Government Code. 7350-001-0453—For support of Department of Industrial Relations, payable from the Pressure Vessel Account ........................ 5,786,000 Schedule: (1) 6100-Division of Occupational Safety and Health ........................ 5,786,000 Provisions: 1. The amount appropriated in this item includes revenues derived from the assessment of fines and penalties imposed as specified in Section 13332.18 of the Government Code. 7350-001-0481—For support of Department of Industrial Relations, payable from the Garment Manufacturers Special Account ........................ 500,000 Schedule: (1) 6120-Claims, Wages, and Contingencies ........................ 500,000 Provisions: 1. Upon approval by the Department of Finance and notification to the chairpersons of the fiscal committees of each house of the Legislature and the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, the Department of Industrial Relations may augment this item for the payment of valid claims against and up to the fund balance of the Garment Manufacturers Special Account. 7350-001-0514—For support of Department of Industrial Relations, payable from the Employment Training Fund ........................ 4,870,000 Schedule: (1) 6110-Division of Apprenticeship Standards ........................ 4,870,000 7350-001-0571—For support of Department of Industrial Relations, payable from the Uninsured Employers Benefits Trust Fund ........................ 6,455,000 Schedule: (1) 6100-Division of Occupational Safety and Health ........................ 2,998,000 (2) 6105-Division of Labor Standards Enforcement ........................ 3,457,000 Provisions: 1. Notwithstanding any other law, the amount available for expenditure in this appropriation may be used for labor law enforcement activities targeted at the underground economy and the enforcement responsibilities of the Division of Labor Standards Enforcement. 2. The amount appropriated in this item includes revenues derived from the assessment of fines and penalties imposed as specified in Section 13332.18 of the Government Code. 7350-001-0890—For support of Department of Industrial Relations, payable from the Federal Trust Fund ........................ 38,286,000 Schedule: (1) 6100-Division of Occupational Safety and Health ........................ 37,578,000 (2) 6105-Division of Labor Standards Enforcement ........................ 708,000 7350-001-3002—For support of Department of Industrial Relations, payable from the Electrician Certification Fund ........................ 2,889,000 Schedule: (1) 6105-Division of Labor Standards Enforcement ........................ 2,889,000 7350-001-3004—For support of Department of Industrial Relations, payable from the Garment Industry Regulations Fund ........................ 3,059,000 Schedule: (1) 6105-Division of Labor Standards Enforcement ........................ 3,059,000 7350-001-3022—For support of Department of Industrial Relations, payable from the Apprenticeship Training Contribution Fund ........................ 34,273,000 Schedule: (1) 6105-Division of Labor Standards Enforcement ........................ 1,164,000 (2) 6110-Division of Apprenticeship Standards ........................ 33,109,000 7350-001-3030—For support of Department of Industrial Relations, payable from the Workers’ Occupational Safety and Health Education Fund ........................ 1,058,000 Schedule: (1) 6095-Commission on Health and Safety and Workers’ Compensation ........................ 1,058,000 7350-001-3071—For support of Department of Industrial Relations, payable from the Car Wash Worker Restitution Fund ........................ 421,000 Schedule: (1) 6120-Claims, Wages, and Contingencies ........................ 421,000 Provisions: 1. Upon approval by the Department of Finance, the Department of Industrial Relations may augment this item for the payment of valid claims against and up to the fund balance of the Car Wash Worker Restitution Fund. 2. The amount appropriated in this item includes revenues derived from the assessment of fines and penalties imposed as specified in Section 13332.18 of the Government Code. 7350-001-3072—For support of Department of Industrial Relations, payable from the Car Wash Worker Fund ........................ 662,000 Schedule: (1) 6105-Division of Labor Standards Enforcement ........................ 662,000 Provisions: 1. The amount appropriated in this item includes revenues derived from the assessment of fines and penalties imposed as specified in Section 13332.18 of the Government Code. 7350-001-3078—For support of Department of Industrial Relations, payable from the Labor and Workforce Development Fund ........................ 93,476,000 Schedule: (1) 6090-Division of Workers’ Compensation ........................ 45,570,000 (2) 6100-Division of Occupational Safety and Health ........................ 30,771,000 (3) 6105-Division of Labor Standards Enforcement ........................ 17,135,000 Provisions: 1. The amount appropriated in this item includes revenues derived from the assessment of fines and penalties imposed pursuant to Section 13332.18 of the Government Code. 2. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $4,611,000 shall be used for the Rural Strategic Engagement Program. 3. For the duration of the Rural Strategic Engagement Program, $3,000,000 shall be used for grants to community-based organizations to conduct outreach and host walk-in clinics, and $2,000,000 shall be used for vendor contracts for drafting, translation, design, printing of written materials, and conducting social media campaigns. 4. Vendors selected to conduct evaluations of the program shall consult with community-based organizations when designing their evaluation about the criteria and guidelines that will be used to assess the success of clinics. 5. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (1) of this item, $44,096,000 is allocated for project activities associated with the Electronic Adjudication Management System Modernization Project. Of this amount, up to $16,000,000 shall be available upon order of the Department of Finance and contingent upon updated project approval or other project documents by the Department of Technology. 6. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (2) of this item, $2,442,000 is available for the Cal/OSHA Data Modernization Project. Of this amount, upon order of the Department of Finance, $3,000,0000 $3,000,000 shall be available upon approval of a Special Project Report or equivalent document by the Department of Technology. 7350-001-3121—For support of Department of Industrial Relations, payable from the Occupational Safety and Health Fund ........................ 160,235,000161,235,000 Schedule: (1) 6100-Division of Occupational Safety and Health ........................ 160,797,000161,797,000 (2) Reimbursements to 6100-Division of Occupational Safety and Health ........................ −562,000 Provisions: 1. The Department of Industrial Relations shall report to the Director of Finance and the Joint Legislative Budget Committee by March 1, 2013, and biennially thereafter, on the accomplishments of the Labor Enforcement Task Force and its enforcement activities regarding labor, tax, and licensing law violators operating in the underground economy. The report shall include the following information: (a) The “value added” by the task force, including the baseline accomplishments of each participating entity compared to the additional accomplishments achieved by virtue of its participation in the task force, and the efforts to increase collaboration and coordination of the interagency enforcement efforts of the task force. (b) Efforts by the task force to develop targeting and statistical reporting methods that facilitate empirical identification of noncompliant employers. (c) Any recommended changes to statutes that would improve the operation of the task force, including data sharing across participating agencies. (d) Detailed objectives of the task force for the next reporting period and a description of how the task force intends to achieve those objectives. 2. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (1) of this item, $1,000,000 shall be used by the Department of Industrial Relations to contract with the University of California, Berkeley Labor Occupational Health Program and the University of California, Los Angeles Labor Occupational Safety and Health Program to conduct a study of Cal/OSHA field inspector vacancy rates and develop recommendations for the design of a Compliance Safety and Health Officer recruitment and training pipeline program. Contracts awarded with the funding identified in this provision are exempt from the Public Contract Code and the State Contracting Manual, and are not subject to the approval of the Department of General Services. 7350-001-3150—For support of Department of Industrial Relations, payable from the State Public Works Enforcement Fund ........................ 21,337,000 Schedule: (1) 6105-Division of Labor Standards Enforcement ........................ 21,337,000 Provisions: 1. The amount appropriated in this item includes revenues derived from the assessment of fines and penalties imposed as specified in Section 13332.18 of the Government Code. 7350-001-3152—For support of Department of Industrial Relations, payable from the Labor Enforcement and Compliance Fund ........................ 131,000,000 Schedule: (1) 6105-Division of Labor Standards Enforcement ........................ 130,376,000 (2) 6107-Fast Food Council ........................ 1,129,000 (3) Reimbursements to 6105-Division of Labor Standards Enforcement ........................ −505,000 Provisions: 1. The amount appropriated in this item includes revenues derived from the assessment of fines and penalties imposed as specified in Section 13332.18 of the Government Code. 7350-011-0913—For transfer by the Controller, upon order of the Director of Finance, from the Industrial Relations Unpaid Wage Fund to the General Fund ........................ (1,000) Provisions: 1. Notwithstanding any other law, and upon approval by the Department of Finance, funds available in the Industrial Relations Unpaid Wage Fund may be transferred to the Garment Manufacturers Special Account, the Farmworker Remedial Account, and the Car Wash Worker Restitution Fund in the event of a cash shortage prior to any transfer from the Industrial Relations Unpaid Wage Fund to the General Fund. 2. The Department of Industrial Relations shall provide an estimate of the General Fund transfer amount to the Department of Finance no later than April 15, 2027. 3. Notwithstanding any other law, the Controller shall transfer to the General Fund the unencumbered balance, less than six months of expenditures, as determined by the Director of Finance, in the Industrial Relations Unpaid Wage Fund as of June 30, 2027. 7350-101-3078—For local assistance, Department of Industrial Relations, payable from the Labor and Workforce Development Fund ........................ 39,000,000 Schedule: (1) 6090-Division of Workers’ Compensation ........................ 6,000,000 (2) 6100-Division of Occupational Safety and Health ........................ 13,500,000 (3) 6105-Division of Labor Standards Enforcement ........................ 19,500,000 Provisions: 1. Of the amount appropriated in this item, $6,000,000 in Schedule (1), $13,500,000 in Schedule (2), and $10,500,000 in Schedule (3) shall be available to support the California Workplace Outreach Project to promote the awareness and education of labor protections for California workers. The amount identified in this provision shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2031, for support or local assistance. Up to 5 percent of the amount identified in this provision may be used for administrative costs. (a) It is the intent of the Legislature to appropriate $30,000,000 for the purpose described in this provision, on a one-time basis in each of the 2027–28, 2028–29, 2029–30, and 2030–31 fiscal years. 2. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (3) of this item, $9,000,000 shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2029, for the Workers’ Rights Enforcement Grant Program. Up to 5 percent of the amount identified in this provision may be used for administrative costs. This program will provide grants to eligible public prosecutors to defray costs expended on state labor law enforcement and serves the public purpose of enhancing labor law enforcement to assist workers in combating wage theft, prevent unfair competition, and protect state revenue. Grants under the program shall be awarded on a competitive basis by the Department of Industrial Relations. (a) Grant funding shall support activities related to the enforcement of state labor laws, and may be used to defray a portion of the cost or the entire cost associated with evidence gathering, investigations, coordination with other law enforcement entities, resolutions, appeals, and settlements. (b) For purposes of this program, “eligible public prosecutor” is defined as a district attorney, a city attorney, a county counsel, or any other city or county prosecutor who has established an office or division of workers’ rights enforcement. 7350-490—Reappropriation, Department of Industrial Relations. The balance of the appropriation provided in Schedule (1) of Item 7350-001-3078, Budget Act of 2025 (Chs. 4 and 5, Stats. 2025), is reappropriated for project activities associated with the Electronic Adjudication Management System Modernization project and shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2027. 7350-491—Reappropriation, Department of Industrial Relations. The amounts specified in the following citations are reappropriated for the purposes provided for in those appropriations and shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2028: 0001—General Fund (1) Up to $2,300,000 in Item 7350-001-0001, Budget Act of 2024 (Chs. 22, 35, and 994, Stats. 2024). GOVERNMENT OPERATIONS 7501-001-0001—For support of Department of Human Resources ........................ 30,847,000 Schedule: (1) 6200-Human Resources Management ........................ 53,988,000 (2) 6205-Local Government Services ........................ 2,367,000 (3) 6210-Benefits Administration ........................ 27,066,000 (4) 9900100-Administration ........................ 21,203,000 (5) 9900200-Administration—​Distributed ........................ −19,279,000 (6) Reimbursements to 6200-Human Resources Management ........................ −25,738,000 (7) Reimbursements to 6205-Local Government Services ........................ −2,367,000 (8) Reimbursements to 6210-Benefits Administration ........................ −24,992,000 (9) Reimbursements to 9900100-Administration ........................ −1,401,000 Provisions: 1. The Department of Human Resources may use funds appropriated in this item to complete comprehensive salary surveys that include private and public employers, geographical data, and total compensation. The department shall provide to the appropriate fiscal and policy committees of each house of the Legislature and the Legislative Analyst’s Office, within 30 days of completion, each completed salary survey report. 2. Notwithstanding any other law, the Director of Finance may authorize a loan from the General Fund, in an amount not to exceed 15 percent of reimbursements appropriated in this item to the Department of Human Resources, provided that: (a) The loan is to meet cash needs resulting from the delay in receipt of reimbursements for services provided. (b) The loan is for a short term and shall be repaid by September 30, 2027. (c) Interest charges may be waived pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 16314 of the Government Code. (d) The Director of Finance shall not approve the loan unless the approval is made in writing and filed with the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee and the chairpersons of the committees in each house of the Legislature that consider appropriations not later than 30 days prior to the effective date of the approval, or not sooner than whatever lesser time that the chairperson of the joint committee, or the chairperson’s designee, may determine. 3. Notwithstanding any other law, upon approval of the Director of Finance, expenditure authority may be transferred between schedules within or between the following items for the Department of Human Resources: Items 7501-001-0001, 7501-001-0821, 7501-001-0915, 7501-001-9740, 7503-001-0001, and 7503-001-9740 as necessary in order to correctly include positions or funding in the appropriate department or schedules. The Director of Finance shall notify the Joint Legislative Budget Committee 30 days prior to the transfer of any funds between items or schedules. The aggregate amount of General Fund appropriation increases provided under this item during the fiscal year may not exceed the aggregate amount of General Fund appropriation decreases. 7501-001-0367—For support of Department of Human Resources, payable from the Indian Gaming Special Distribution Fund ........................ 75,000 Schedule: (1) 6200-Human Resources Management ........................ 75,000 7501-001-0821—For support of Department of Human Resources, payable from the Flexelect Benefit Fund ........................ 1,545,000 Schedule: (1) 6210-Benefits Administration ........................ 1,545,000 Provisions: 1. Notwithstanding any other law, upon approval of the Director of Finance, expenditure authority may be transferred between schedules within or between the following items for the Department of Human Resources: Items 7501-001-0001, 7501-001-0821, 7501-001-0915, 7501-001-9740, 7503-001-0001, and 7503-001-9740 as necessary in order to correctly include positions or funding in the appropriate department or schedules. The Director of Finance shall notify the Joint Legislative Budget Committee 30 days prior to the transfer of any funds between items or schedules. The aggregate amount of General Fund appropriation increases provided under this item during the fiscal year may not exceed the aggregate amount of General Fund appropriation decreases. 7501-001-0915—For support of Department of Human Resources, payable from the Deferred Compensation Plan Fund ........................ 18,687,000 Schedule: (1) 6210-Benefits Administration ........................ 18,687,000 Provisions: 1. Notwithstanding any other law, upon approval of the Director of Finance, expenditure authority may be transferred between schedules within or between the following items for the Department of Human Resources: Items 7501-001-0001, 7501-001-0821, 7501-001-0915, 7501-001-9740, 7503-001-0001, and 7503-001-9740 as necessary in order to correctly include positions or funding in the appropriate department or schedules. The Director of Finance shall notify the Joint Legislative Budget Committee 30 days prior to the transfer of any funds between items or schedules. The aggregate amount of General Fund appropriation increases provided under this item during the fiscal year may not exceed the aggregate amount of General Fund appropriation decreases. 2. The Department of Human Resources may transfer funds from the Deferred Compensation Fund Main Plan to the Part-time, Seasonal, and Temporary Plan. 7501-001-9740—For support of Department of Human Resources, payable from the Central Service Cost Recovery Fund ........................ 11,160,000 Schedule: (1) 6200-Human Resources Management ........................ 11,160,000 Provisions: 1. Notwithstanding any other law, upon approval of the Director of Finance, expenditure authority may be transferred between schedules within or between the following items for the Department of Human Resources: Items 7501-001-0001, 7501-001-0821, 7501-001-0915, 7501-001-9740, 7503-001-0001, and 7503-001-9740 as necessary in order to correctly include positions or funding in the appropriate department or schedules. The Director of Finance shall notify the Joint Legislative Budget Committee 30 days prior to the transfer of any funds between items or schedules. The aggregate amount of General Fund appropriation increases provided under this item during the fiscal year may not exceed the aggregate amount of General Fund appropriation decreases. 7501-002-0001—For support of Department of Human Resources ........................ 0 Schedule: (1) 6200-Human Resources Management ........................ 25,000,000 (2) Reimbursements to 6200-Human Resources Management ........................ −25,000,000 Provisions: 1. The Department of Finance may adjust this appropriation to ensure sufficient authority for the Department of Human Resources to facilitate dues passthrough, as specified in Section 10426.5 of the Welfare and Institutions Code. 7502-001-0001—For support of Department of Technology ........................ 56,388,000 Schedule: (1) 6230-Department of Technology ........................ 56,388,000 Provisions: 1. On January 1, 2027, and every six months thereafter, the Department of Technology shall provide, to the extent that information is available, a report to the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, or their designee, that includes which agencies and departments are participating or are expected to participate in the Digital Identity Pilot Program and the status of the development and implementation of the Digital Identity Pilot Program. 2. Any individual data collected under the Digital Identity Pilot Program shall be treated as personal information, as defined in Section 1798.3 of the Civil Code. 3. The Department of Technology shall not operate the Digital Identity Pilot Program with departments that knowingly hold personal information on minors, educational records subject to the federal Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1232g) (FERPA), medical information subject to the federal Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act (Public Law 104-191), or information on an individual’s immigration status. 4. The Digital Identity Pilot Program shall not collect precise geolocation information, as defined in subdivision (w) of Section 1798.140 of the Civil Code, and may only use other location information for the purposes of preventing malicious fraudulent activity. 5. Any contract entered into with the Department of Technology to implement the Digital Identity Pilot Program shall include provisions identified in Section 5305-8 of the State Administrative Manual. 6. During the implementation of the Digital Identity Pilot Program, the Department of Technology may use de-identified data to conduct research to justify requests for resources should the department seek approval to expand the scope of the pilot program. 7. The Digital ID ecosystem will be architected to deliver program efficiencies and a seamless user experience for residents accessing government services, while prioritizing user consent and privacy, and ensuring the highest levels of security for the data involved. The ecosystem will be fully compliant with state and federal statutes and policies applicable to the type of personal information collected, including, but not limited to, the Information Practices Act (IPA) and the Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act (HIPAA). Privacy controls include the following: (a) Residents will be required to consent to and designate each service that is authorized to receive personal information provided for the creation of the digital ID. (b) Resident information required for authentication will be program specific and obtained incrementally on an as-needed basis. (c) Resident information will be provided to departments for designated purposes only. (d) Law enforcement will be required to obtain a subpoena, search warrant, or other legal process to access the information in the system. (e) Information collected from residents will be customized to the program requirements for authentication. (f) Resident information uploaded for authentication purposes will be deleted after their identity has been confirmed. (g) Security controls will be implemented to match the Impact Level of the information collected. Data will be further protected through encryption and tokenization. 7502-001-0890—For support of Department of Technology, payable from the Federal Trust Fund ........................ 0 Schedule: (1) 6230-Department of Technology ........................ 0 7502-001-9730—For support of Department of Technology, payable from the Technology Services Revolving Fund ........................ 941,128,000 Schedule: (1) 6230-Department of Technology ........................ 941,138,000 (4) Reimbursements to 6230-Department of Technology ........................ −10,000 Provisions: 1. Notwithstanding any other law, the Director of Finance may authorize expenditures for the Department of Technology in excess of the amount appropriated, but not sooner than 30 days after notification in writing of the necessity is provided to the chairpersons of the fiscal committees in each house of the Legislature and the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, or not sooner than whatever lesser time the chairperson of the joint committee, or the chairperson’s designee, may in each instance determine. 2. Expenditure authority provided in this item to support data center infrastructure projects shall not be utilized for items outside the approved project scope. Changes in project scope shall receive approval using the established administrative and legislative reporting requirements. 3. The Director of Finance may reduce this item of appropriation to reflect actual data center expenditures for final payments and purchase agreements that have been executed. 7502-001-9740—For support of Department of Technology, payable from the Central Service Cost Recovery Fund ........................ 4,167,000 Schedule: (1) 6230-Department of Technology ........................ 4,167,000 7502-093-9730—For support of Department of Technology, payable from the Technology Services Revolving Fund ........................ 3,018,000 Schedule: (1) 6230-Department of Technology ........................ 3,018,000 Provisions: 1. The Controller shall transfer funds appropriated in this item for base rental as and when provided for in the schedule submitted by the State Public Works Board. Notwithstanding the payment dates in any related Facility Lease or Indenture, the schedule may provide for an earlier transfer of funds to ensure debt requirements are met and pay base rental in full when due. 2. The Controller shall transfer for additional rental no later than 30 days after enactment of this budget, $30,000 of the amount appropriated in this item, to the Expense Account in the Public Buildings Construction Fund. 3. This item may be adjusted pursuant to Section 4.30. Any adjustments to this item shall be reported to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee pursuant to Section 4.30. 7502-490—Reappropriation, Department of Technology. The amounts specified in the following citations are reappropriated for the purposes provided for in those appropriations and shall be available for encumbrance, expenditure, or liquidation until December 31, 2028: 0001—​General Fund (1) Up to $300,000,000 in Provision 1 of Item 7502-001-0001, Budget Act of 2023 (Chs. 12, 38, and 189, Stats. 2023) for the Middle-Mile Broadband Initiative, consistent with Chapter 48, Statutes of 2022 (SB 189). (2) Up to $250,000,000 in Provision 1 of Item 7502-001-0001, Budget Act of 2024 (Chs. 22, 35, and 994, Stats. 2024) for the Middle-Mile Broadband Initiative, consistent with Chapter 48, Statutes of 2022 (SB 189). (3) $25,000,000 in Reimbursements to Item 7502-001-0001, Budget Act of 2023 (Chs. 12, 38, and 189, Stats. 2023). (4) $25,000,000 in Reimbursements to Item 7502-001-0001, Budget Act of 2024 (Chs. 22, 35, and 994, Stats. 2024). 7503-001-0001—For support of State Personnel Board ........................ 1,998,000 Schedule: (1) 6270010-Merit Oversight ........................ 2,356,000 (2) 6270019-Appeals ........................ 9,898,000 (3) Reimbursements to 6270010-Merit Oversight ........................ −358,000 (4) Reimbursements to 6270019-Appeals ........................ −9,898,000 Provisions: 1. Notwithstanding any other law, the Director of Finance may authorize a loan from the General Fund, in an amount not to exceed 25 percent of reimbursements appropriated in this item to the State Personnel Board, provided that: (a) The loan is to meet cash needs resulting from the delay in receipt of reimbursements for services provided. (b) The loan is for a short term and shall be repaid by September 30, 2027. (c) Interest charges may be waived pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 16314 of the Government Code. (d) The Director of Finance shall not approve the loan unless the approval is made in writing and filed with the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee and the chairpersons of the committees in each house of the Legislature that consider appropriations not later than 30 days prior to the effective date of the approval, or not sooner than whatever lesser time that the chairperson of the joint committee, or the chairperson’s designee, may determine. 2. Notwithstanding any other law, upon approval of the Director of Finance, expenditure and position authority may be transferred between schedules within or between the following items for the Department of Human Resources: Items 7501-001-0001, 7501-001-0821, 7501-001-0915, 7501-001-9740, 7503-001-0001, and 7503-001-9740. The Director of Finance shall notify the Joint Legislative Budget Committee 30 days prior to the transfer of any funds between items or schedules. The aggregate amount of General Fund appropriation increases provided under this provision during the fiscal year may not exceed the aggregate amount of General Fund appropriation decreases. 7503-001-9740—For support of State Personnel Board, payable from the Central Service Cost Recovery Fund ........................ 2,119,000 Schedule: (1) 6270010-Merit Oversight ........................ 2,119,000 Provisions: 1. Notwithstanding any other law, upon approval of the Director of Finance, expenditure and position authority may be transferred between schedules within or between the following items for the Department of Human Resources: Items 7501-001-0001, 7501-001-0821, 7501-001-0915, 7501-001-9740, 7503-001-0001, and 7503-001-9740. The Director of Finance shall notify the Joint Legislative Budget Committee 30 days prior to the transfer of any funds between items or schedules. The aggregate amount of General Fund appropriation increases provided under this item during the fiscal year may not exceed the aggregate amount of General Fund appropriation decreases. 7504-001-0001—For support of Office of Data and Innovation ........................ 16,146,000 Schedule: (1) 6271-Office of Data and Innovation ........................ 16,146,000 7504-001-9753—For support of Office of Data and Innovation, payable from the Data and Innovation Services Revolving Fund ........................ 5,200,000 Schedule: (1) 6271-Office of Data and Innovation ........................ 6,450,000 (2) Reimbursements to 6271-Office of Data and Innovation ........................ −1,250,000 Provisions: 1. The amount appropriated in this item shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2030. 2. Upon approval of the Department of Finance, the amount available for expenditure in this item may be augmented by the amount of resources available in the Data and Innovation Services Revolving Fund through June 30, 2030. 7600-001-0001—For support of California Department of Tax and Fee Administration ........................ 382,391,000381,941,000 Schedule: (1) 6275-Administration of the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration ........................ 612,891,000612,141,000 (2) 9900100-Administration ........................ 65,930,000 (3) 9900200-Administration—​Distributed ........................ −65,508,000 (4) Reimbursements to 6275-Administration of the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration ........................ −230,500,000−230,200,000 (5) Reimbursements to 9900100-Administration ........................ −422,000 Provisions: 1. It is the intent of the Legislature that all funds appropriated to the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration for processing tax returns, auditing, and collecting owed tax amounts shall be used in a manner consistent with the department’s authorized budget and with the documents that were presented to the Legislature for its review in support of that budget. The California Department of Tax and Fee Administration shall not reduce expenditures or redirect funding or personnel resources away from direct auditing or collection activities without prior approval of the Department of Finance. The Director of Finance shall not approve any such reduction or redirection sooner than 30 days after providing notification to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee. Such a position shall not be transferred from the organizational unit to which it was assigned in the 2026–27 Governor’s Budget and the Salaries and Wages Supplement, as revised by legislative actions, without the approval of the Director of Finance. Furthermore, the department shall expeditiously fill budgeted positions consistent with the funding provided in this act. 2. The California Department of Tax and Fee Administration shall not construct, lease, rent, acquire, or otherwise contract for any new or expanded office space and shall not relocate any of its offices unless such an action is approved in advance by the Director of Finance. The Director of Finance shall not approve such an action until 30 days or more after informing the Joint Legislative Budget Committee of the director’s intent to do so, provided that this 30-day notification period may be waived by the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee or the chairperson’s designee. 3.Of the amount in this item, $1,946,000 shall be transferred upon order of the Department of Finance to the Historic Venue Restoration and Resiliency Fund in the State Treasury pursuant to Section 7103 of the Revenue and Taxation Code. The transferred funds shall be allocated by the Controller’s Office within 30 days of the enactment of the 2026 Budget Act, as specified in the aforementioned code section. 4.3. (a) It is the intent of the Legislature that the appropriation from the General Fund for the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration be used only for the County Assessment Standards Program, the State-Assessed Properties Program, the Sales and Use Tax program, the Alcohol and Beverage Tax Program, the Cigarette and Tobacco Products Tax Program, the Insurance Tax Program, the County Revenue Property Tax Reimbursement Program, and the Small Business Hiring Credit program, including those programs’ pro rata share of the centralized administrative functions of the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration. (b) The California Department of Tax and Fee Administration shall not redirect General Fund funding or General Fund-supported personnel resources away from these programs without prior approval from the Department of Finance. The Director of Finance shall not approve any such redirection sooner than 30 days after providing notification to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee. The restrictions and requirements in this provision do not apply to de minimis redirections to a given program that total less than two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000) within a fiscal year. 7600-001-0004—For support of California Department of Tax and Fee Administration, payable from the Breast Cancer Fund ........................ 511,000 Schedule: (1) 6275-Administration of the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration ........................ 511,000 Provisions: 1. Notwithstanding Section 30461.6 of the Revenue and Taxation Code or any other provision of law, sufficient funds to cover the costs of the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration for the collection and enforcement of fees to be deposited in the Breast Cancer Fund shall be retained in the fund, and be available to be appropriated to the department. 7600-001-0022—For support of California Department of Tax and Fee Administration, payable from the State Emergency Telephone Number Account ........................ 1,810,000 Schedule: (1) 6275-Administration of the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration ........................ 1,810,000 7600-001-0061—For support of California Department of Tax and Fee Administration, payable from the Motor Vehicle Fuel Account, Transportation Tax Fund ........................ 35,779,000 Schedule: (1) 6275-Administration of the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration ........................ 35,779,000 7600-001-0070—For support of California Department of Tax and Fee Administration, payable from the Occupational Lead Poisoning Prevention Account ........................ 1,136,000 Schedule: (1) 6275-Administration of the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration ........................ 1,136,000 Provisions: 1. The amount appropriated in this item includes revenues derived from the assessment of fines and penalties imposed as specified by Section 13332.18 of the Government Code. 7600-001-0080—For support of California Department of Tax and Fee Administration, payable from the Childhood Lead Poisoning Prevention Fund ........................ 631,000 Schedule: (1) 6275-Administration of the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration ........................ 631,000 Provisions: 1. The amount appropriated in this item includes revenues derived from the assessment of fines and penalties imposed as specified by Section 13332.18 of the Government Code. 7600-001-0115—For support of California Department of Tax and Fee Administration, payable from the Air Pollution Control Fund ........................ 1,098,000 Schedule: (1) 6275-Administration of the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration ........................ 1,098,000 7600-001-0226—For support of California Department of Tax and Fee Administration, payable from the California Tire Recycling Management Fund ........................ 1,459,000 Schedule: (1) 6275-Administration of the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration ........................ 1,459,000 7600-001-0230—For support of California Department of Tax and Fee Administration, payable from the Cigarette and Tobacco Products Surtax Fund ........................ 6,274,000 Schedule: (1) 6275-Administration of the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration ........................ 6,274,000 7600-001-0320—For support of California Department of Tax and Fee Administration, payable from the Oil Spill Prevention and Administration Fund ........................ 395,000 Schedule: (1) 6275-Administration of the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration ........................ 395,000 7600-001-0387—For support of California Department of Tax and Fee Administration, payable from the Integrated Waste Management Account, Integrated Waste Management Fund ........................ 668,000 Schedule: (1) 6275-Administration of the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration ........................ 668,000 Provisions: 1. The amount appropriated in this item includes revenues derived from the assessment of fines and penalties imposed as specified by Section 13332.18 of the Government Code. 7600-001-0439—For support of California Department of Tax and Fee Administration, payable from the Underground Storage Tank Cleanup Fund ........................ 4,741,000 Schedule: (1) 6275-Administration of the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration ........................ 4,741,000 Provisions: 1. The amount appropriated in this item includes revenues derived from the assessment of fines and penalties imposed as specified in Section 13332.18 of the Government Code. 7600-001-0465—For support of California Department of Tax and Fee Administration, payable from the Energy Resources Programs Account ........................ 361,000 Schedule: (1) 6275-Administration of the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration ........................ 361,000 7600-001-0623—For support of California Department of Tax and Fee Administration, payable from the California Children and Families First Trust Fund ........................ 10,792,000 Schedule: (1) 6275-Administration of the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration ........................ 10,792,000 7600-001-0890—For support of California Department of Tax and Fee Administration, payable from the Federal Trust Fund ........................ 221,000 Schedule: (1) 6275-Administration of the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration ........................ 221,000 7600-001-0965—For support of California Department of Tax and Fee Administration, payable from the Timber Tax Fund ........................ 2,733,000 Schedule: (1) 6275-Administration of the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration ........................ 2,733,000 7600-001-3015—For support of California Department of Tax and Fee Administration, payable from the Gas Consumption Surcharge Fund ........................ 961,000 Schedule: (1) 6275-Administration of the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration ........................ 961,000 7600-001-3058—For support of California Department of Tax and Fee Administration, payable from the Water Rights Fund ........................ 864,000 Schedule: (1) 6275-Administration of the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration ........................ 864,000 7600-001-3065—For support of California Department of Tax and Fee Administration, payable from the Electronic Waste Recovery and Recycling Account, Integrated Waste Management Fund ........................ 5,527,000 Schedule: (1) 6275-Administration of the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration ........................ 5,527,000 7600-001-3067—For support of California Department of Tax and Fee Administration, payable from the Cigarette and Tobacco Products Compliance Fund ........................ 19,417,000 Schedule: (1) 6275-Administration of the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration ........................ 19,417,000 7600-001-3212—For support of California Department of Tax and Fee Administration, payable from the Timber Regulation and Forest Restoration Fund ........................ 1,404,000 Schedule: (1) 6275-Administration of the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration ........................ 1,404,000 7600-001-3270—For support of California Department of Tax and Fee Administration, payable from the Local Charges for Prepaid Mobile Telephony Services Fund ........................ 605,000 Schedule: (1) 6275-Administration of the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration ........................ 605,000 7600-001-3301—For support of California Department of Tax and Fee Administration, payable from the Lead-Acid Battery Cleanup Fund ........................ 1,697,000 Schedule: (1) 6275-Administration of the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration ........................ 1,697,000 7600-001-3366—For support of California Department of Tax and Fee Administration, payable from the California Electronic Cigarette Excise Tax Fund ........................ 1,439,000 Schedule: (1) 6275-Administration of the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration ........................ 1,439,000 7600-001-3407—For support of California Department of Tax and Fee Administration, payable from the California Plastic Pollution Mitigation Fund ........................ 628,000 Schedule: (1) 6275-Administration of the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration ........................ 628,000 7600-001-3410—For support of California Department of Tax and Fee Administration, payable from the Lithium Extraction Excise Tax Fund ........................ 153,000 Schedule: (1) 6275-Administration of the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration ........................ 153,000 7600-001-3414—For support of California Department of Tax and Fee Administration, payable from the 988 State Suicide and Behavioral Health Crisis Services Fund ........................ 610,000 Schedule: (1) 6275-Administration of the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration ........................ 610,000 7600-001-3418—For support of California Department of Tax and Fee Administration, payable from the Covered Battery-Embedded Waste Recycling Fee Subaccount, Electronic Waste Recovery and Recycling Account ........................ 889,000 Schedule: (1) 6275-Administration of the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration ........................ 889,000 7600-001-3437—For support of California Department of Tax and Fee Administration, payable from the Gun Violence Prevention and School Safety Fund ........................ 1,392,000 Schedule: (1) 6275-Administration of the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration ........................ 1,392,000 7600-490—Reappropriation, California Department of Tax and Fee Administration. The amount specified in the following citations are reappropriated for the purposes provided for in those appropriations and shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2027: 0001—​General Fund (1) $3,231,000 in Item 7600-001-0001, Budget Act of 2025 (Chs. 4 and 5, Stats. 2025) for vendor compensation payments related to the Centralized Revenue Opportunity System. (4) $1,208,000 in Schedule 4 of Item 7600-001-0001, Budget Act of 2025 (Chs. 4 and 5, Stats. 2025) for vendor compensation payments related to the Centralized Revenue Opportunity System. 0004—​Breast Cancer Fund (1) $3,000 in Item 7600-001-0004, Budget Act of 2025 (Chs. 4 and 5, Stats. 2025) for vendor compensation payments related to the Centralized Revenue Opportunity System. 0022—​State Emergency Telephone Number Account (1) $9,000 in Item 7600-001-0022, Budget Act of 2025 (Chs. 4 and 5, Stats. 2025) for vendor compensation payments related to the Centralized Revenue Opportunity System. 0061—​Motor Vehicle Fuel Account, Transportation Tax Fund (1) $182,000 in Item 7600-001-0061, Budget Act of 2025 (Chs. 4 and 5, Stats. 2025) for vendor compensation payments related to the Centralized Revenue Opportunity System. 0070—​Occupational Lead Poisoning Prevention Fee Account (1) $6,000 in Item 7600-001-0070, Budget Act of 2025 (Chs. 4 and 5, Stats. 2025) for vendor compensation payments related to the Centralized Revenue Opportunity System. 0080—​Childhood Lead Poisoning Prevention Fund (1) $3,000 in Item 7600-001-0080, Budget Act of 2025 (Chs. 4 and 5, Stats. 2025) for vendor compensation payments related to the Centralized Revenue Opportunity System. 0115—​Air Pollution Control Fund (1) $5,000 in Item 7600-001-0115, Budget Act of 2025 (Chs. 4 and 5, Stats. 2025) for vendor compensation payments related to the Centralized Revenue Opportunity System. 0226—​California Tire Recycling Management Fund (1) $7,000 in Item 7600-001-0226, Budget Act of 2025 (Chs. 4 and 5, Stats. 2025) for vendor compensation payments related to the Centralized Revenue Opportunity System. 0230—​Cigarette and Tobacco Products Surtax Fund (1) $36,000 in Item 7600-001-0230, Budget Act of 2025 (Chs. 4 and 5, Stats. 2025) for vendor compensation payments related to the Centralized Revenue Opportunity System. 0320—​Oil Spill Prevention and Administration Fund (1) $2,000 in Item 7600-001-0320, Budget Act of 2025 (Chs. 4 and 5, Stats. 2025) for vendor compensation payments related to the Centralized Revenue Opportunity System. 0387—​Integrated Waste Management Account, Integrated Waste Management Fund (1) $3,000 in Item 7600-001-0387, Budget Act of 2025 (Chs. 4 and 5, Stats. 2025) for vendor compensation payments related to the Centralized Revenue Opportunity System. 0439—​Underground Storage Tank Cleanup Fund (1) $24,000 in Item 7600-001-0439, Budget Act of 2025 (Chs. 4 and 5, Stats. 2025) for vendor compensation payments related to the Centralized Revenue Opportunity System. 0465—​Energy Resources Program Account (1) $2,000 in Item 7600-001-0465, Budget Act of 2025 (Chs. 4 and 5, Stats. 2025) for vendor compensation payments related to the Centralized Revenue Opportunity System. 0623—​California Children and Families First Trust Fund (1) $60,000 in Item 7600-001-0623, Budget Act of 2025 (Chs. 4 and 5, Stats. 2025) for vendor compensation payments related to the Centralized Revenue Opportunity System. 0965—​Timber Tax Fund (1) $13,000 in Item 7600-001-0965, Budget Act of 2025 (Chs. 4 and 5, Stats. 2025) for vendor compensation payments related to the Centralized Revenue Opportunity System. 3015—​Gas Consumption Surcharge Fund (1) $5,000 in Item 7600-001-3015, Budget Act of 2025 (Chs. 4 and 5, Stats. 2025) for vendor compensation payments related to the Centralized Revenue Opportunity System. 3058—​Water Rights Fund (1) $4,000 in Item 7600-001-3058, Budget Act of 2025 (Chs. 4 and 5, Stats. 2025) for vendor compensation payments related to the Centralized Revenue Opportunity System. 3065—​Electronic Waste Recovery and Recycling Account, Integrated Waste Management Fund (1) $29,000 in Item 7600-001-3065, Budget Act of 2025 (Chs. 4 and 5, Stats. 2025) for vendor compensation payments related to the Centralized Revenue Opportunity System. 3067—​Cigarette and Tobacco Products Compliance Fund (1) $64,000 in Item 7600-001-3067, Budget Act of 2025 (Chs. 4 and 5, Stats. 2025) for vendor compensation payments related to the Centralized Revenue Opportunity System. 3212—​Timber Regulation and Forest Restoration Fund (1) $7,000 in Item 7600-001-3212, Budget Act of 2025 (Chs. 4 and 5, Stats. 2025) for vendor compensation payments related to the Centralized Revenue Opportunity System. 3270—​Local Charges for Prepaid Mobile Telephony Services Fund (1) $3,000 in Item 7600-001-3270, Budget Act of 2025 (Chs. 4 and 5, Stats. 2025) for vendor compensation payments related to the Centralized Revenue Opportunity System. 3301—​Lead-Acid Battery Cleanup Fund (1) $9,000 in Item 7600-001-3301, Budget Act of 2025 (Chs. 4 and 5, Stats. 2025) for vendor compensation payments related to the Centralized Revenue Opportunity System. 3366—​California Electronic Cigarette Excise Tax Fund (1) $7,000 in Item 7600-001-3366, Budget Act of 2025 (Chs. 4 and 5, Stats. 2025) for vendor compensation payments related to the Centralized Revenue Opportunity System. 3414—​988 State Suicide and Behavioral Health Crisis Services Fund (1) $3,000 in Item 7600-001-3414, Budget Act of 2025 (Chs. 4 and 5, Stats. 2025) for vendor compensation payments related to the Centralized Revenue Opportunity System. 3437—​Gun Violence Prevention and School Safety Fund (1) $6,000 in Item 7600-001-3437, Budget Act of 2025 (Chs. 4 and 5, Stats. 2025) for vendor compensation payments related to the Centralized Revenue Opportunity System. 7730-001-0001—For support of Franchise Tax Board ........................ 1,145,171,000 Schedule: (1) 6280-Tax Programs ........................ 1,142,094,000 (2) 6285-Political Reform Audit (2,680,000) ........................ 0 (3) 6300-Legal Services Program ........................ 3,077,000 (4) 6305-Contract Work ........................ 14,633,000 (5) 9900100-Administration ........................ 47,542,000 (6) 9900200-Administration—​Distributed ........................ −47,542,000 (7) Reimbursements to 6305-Contract Work ........................ −14,633,000 Provisions: 1. It is the intent of the Legislature that all funds appropriated to the Franchise Tax Board for processing tax returns, auditing, and collecting owed tax amounts shall be used in a manner consistent with the board’s authorized budget and with the documents that were presented to the Legislature for its review in support of that budget. The Franchise Tax Board shall not reduce expenditures or redirect funding or personnel resources away from direct auditing or collection activities without prior approval of the Director of Finance. The Director of Finance shall not approve any such reduction or redirection sooner than 30 days after providing notification to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee. A position shall not be transferred from the organizational unit to which it was assigned in the 2026–27 Governor’s Budget and the Salaries and Wages Supplement, as revised by legislative actions, without the approval of the Director of Finance. The Franchise Tax Board shall expeditiously fill budgeted positions consistent with the funding provided in this act. 2. It is the intent of the Legislature that the Franchise Tax Board resolve tax controversies, without litigation, on a basis that is fair to both the state and the taxpayer and in a manner that will enhance voluntary compliance and public confidence in the integrity and efficiency of the board. 3. During the 2026–27 fiscal year, the collection cost recovery fee for purposes of subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 19254 of the Revenue and Taxation Code shall be $362, and the filing enforcement cost recovery fee for purposes of subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2) of that subdivision shall be $143. 4. During the 2026–27 fiscal year, the collection cost recovery fee for purposes of subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 19254 of the Revenue and Taxation Code shall be $292, and the filing enforcement cost recovery fee for purposes of subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2) of that subdivision shall be $122. 5. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (1) of this item, $36,259,000 is for implementation of the Earned Income Tax Credit, which, pursuant to Section 17052 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, shall have an adjustment factor at a rate of 85 percent for the 2026 tax year. Implementation of the Earned Income Tax Credit includes processing returns, auditing, and necessary system changes to support this program. To effectively administer this program, the Franchise Tax Board may pay the Social Security Administration for relevant data and related development work prior to receipt of data pursuant to Section 12425 of the Government Code. 6. Of the amount appropriated in this item, $3,864,000 is for implementation of the individual health care mandate and the associated penalty provisions. 7. Of the amount appropriated in this item, $10,000,000 is for outreach to create increased awareness of, and participation in, the Earned Income Tax Credit and the Volunteer Income Tax Assistance Program. These funds shall be allocated via contracts to nonprofit and community-based organizations. The participating nonprofit and community-based organizations shall particularly focus their outreach efforts on persons who file tax returns using Individual Taxpayer Identification Numbers. 7730-001-0044—For support of Franchise Tax Board, payable from the Motor Vehicle Account, State Transportation Fund ........................ 3,943,000 Schedule: (1) 6290-Department of Motor Vehicles Collections Program ........................ 3,943,000 7730-001-0064—For support of Franchise Tax Board, payable from the Motor Vehicle License Fee Account, Transportation Tax Fund ........................ 7,432,000 Schedule: (1) 6290-Department of Motor Vehicles Collections Program ........................ 7,432,000 7730-001-0122—For support of Franchise Tax Board, payable from the Emergency Food Assistance Program Fund ........................ 6,000 Schedule: (1) 6280-Tax Programs ........................ 6,000 7730-001-0200—For support of Franchise Tax Board, payable from the Fish and Game Preservation Fund (Endangered and Rare Fish, Wildlife, and Plant Species Conservation and Enhancement Account) ........................ 13,000 Schedule: (1) 6280-Tax Programs ........................ 13,000 7730-001-0242—For support of Franchise Tax Board, payable from the Court Collection Account ........................ 15,528,000 Schedule: (1) 6295-Court Collection Program ........................ 15,528,000 7730-001-0823—For support of Franchise Tax Board, payable from the California Alzheimer’s Disease and Related Disorders Research Fund ........................ 11,000 Schedule: (1) 6280-Tax Programs ........................ 11,000 7730-001-0847—For support of Franchise Tax Board, payable from the Asset Forfeiture Fund ........................ 740,000 Schedule: (1) 6280-Tax Programs ........................ 740,000 Provisions: 1. Upon approval of the Director of Finance, the amount available for expenditure in this item may be augmented by the amount of any additional resources available in the Asset Forfeiture Fund. Any such approval shall be accompanied by the approval of a spending plan submitted by the Franchise Tax Board providing a listing of intended purchases. Any augmentation shall be authorized no sooner than 30 days following the transmittal of the approval to the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee. 7730-001-0886—For support of Franchise Tax Board, payable from the California Seniors Special Fund ........................ 4,000 Schedule: (1) 6280-Tax Programs ........................ 4,000 7730-001-0945—For support of Franchise Tax Board, payable from the California Breast Cancer Research Fund ........................ 7,000 Schedule: (1) 6280-Tax Programs ........................ 7,000 7730-001-0974—For support of Franchise Tax Board, payable from the California Peace Officer Memorial Foundation Fund ........................ 5,000 Schedule: (1) 6280-Tax Programs ........................ 5,000 7730-001-0979—For support of Franchise Tax Board, payable from the California Firefighters’ Memorial Fund ........................ 7,000 Schedule: (1) 6280-Tax Programs ........................ 7,000 7730-001-8054—For support of Franchise Tax Board, payable from the California Cancer Research Fund ........................ 6,000 Schedule: (1) 6280-Tax Programs ........................ 6,000 7730-001-8075—For support of Franchise Tax Board, payable from the School Supplies for Homeless Children Fund ........................ 6,000 Schedule: (1) 6280-Tax Programs ........................ 6,000 7730-001-8076—For support of Franchise Tax Board, payable from the State Parks Protection Fund ........................ 14,000 Schedule: (1) 6280-Tax Programs ........................ 14,000 7730-001-8086—For support of Franchise Tax Board, payable from the Protect Our Coast and Oceans Fund ........................ 6,000 Schedule: (1) 6280-Tax Programs ........................ 6,000 7730-001-8097—For support of Franchise Tax Board, payable from the Prevention of Animal Homelessness and Cruelty Fund ........................ 6,000 Schedule: (1) 6280-Tax Programs ........................ 6,000 7730-001-8117—For support of Franchise Tax Board, payable from the Native California Wildlife Rehabilitation Voluntary Tax Contribution Fund ........................ 6,000 Schedule: (1) 6280-Tax Programs ........................ 6,000 7730-001-8131—For support of Franchise Tax Board, payable from the Mental Health Crisis Prevention Voluntary Tax Contribution Fund ........................ 6,000 Schedule: (1) 6280-Tax Programs ........................ 6,000 7730-001-8139—For support of Franchise Tax Board, payable from the California ALS Research Network Voluntary Tax Contribution Fund ........................ 6,000 Schedule: (1) 6280-Tax Programs ........................ 6,000 7730-001-8145—For support of Franchise Tax Board, payable from the California Pediatric Cancer Research Voluntary Tax Contribution Fund ........................ 6,000 Schedule: (1) 6280-Tax Programs ........................ 6,000 7730-001-8146—For support of Franchise Tax Board, payable from the Parkinson’s Disease Research Voluntary Tax Contribution Fund ........................ 6,000 Schedule: (1) 6280-Tax Programs ........................ 6,000 7730-001-8815—For support of Franchise Tax Board, payable from the California Senior Citizen Advocacy Voluntary Tax Contribution Fund ........................ 6,000 Schedule: (1) 6280-Tax Programs ........................ 6,000 7760-001-0001—For support of Department of General Services ........................ 16,408,000 Schedule: (1) 6324046-Facilities Management Division ........................ 7,079,000 (2) 6325010-Asset Management Branch ........................ 1,239,000 (3) 6330073-Contracted Fiscal Services ........................ 8,090,000 (4) 9900100-Administration ........................ 1,589,000 (5) 9900200-Administration—​Distributed ........................ −1,589,000 7760-001-0002—For support of Department of General Services, payable from the Property Acquisition Law Money Account ........................ 6,729,000 Schedule: (1) 6325010-Asset Management Branch ........................ 6,729,000 (2) 6335010-Program Overhead Interagency Support Division and RESD Executive ........................ 16,000 (3) 6335019-Distributed Program Overhead Interagency Support Division and RESD Executive ........................ −16,000 (4) 9900100-Administration ........................ 811,000 (5) 9900200-Administration—​Distributed ........................ −811,000 Provisions: 1. Of the amount appropriated in this item, $2,000,000 may be a loan from the General Fund, provided for the purposes of supporting the management of the state’s real property assets if it is determined that there will be insufficient revenue generated from the sale of surplus property. 2. Repayment of loans provided for the purposes of supporting the management of the state’s real property assets shall be repaid within 60 days of the close of escrow from the sale of surplus property, pursuant to Section 11011 of the Government Code. 3. To the extent that the workload changes related to the management of the state’s real property assets that have been identified as surplus property, the Director of Finance may adjust the amount of the General Fund loan and the total amount appropriated in this item not sooner than 30 days after notifying the Joint Legislative Budget Committee. The Director of Finance shall not use this provision to augment this item for costs that the Department of General Services had knowledge of in time to include in the May Revision. 4. The Department of Finance may increase the expenditure authority in this item by an amount equivalent to three years of operating costs required to continue redeveloping excess state properties as affordable housing, up to $4,500,000 in the 2026–27 fiscal year. 7760-001-0003—For support of Department of General Services, payable from the Motor Vehicle Parking Facilities Money Account ........................ 9,852,000 Schedule: (1) 6330019-Fleet Administration ........................ 9,852,000 (2) 9900100-Administration ........................ 263,000 (3) 9900200-Administration—​Distributed ........................ −263,000 7760-001-0006—For support of Department of General Services, payable from the Disability Access Account ........................ 14,821,000 Schedule: (1) 6320010-Division of the State Architect ........................ 13,176,000 (2) 6330084-CA Commission on Disability Access ........................ 1,645,000 (3) 9900100-Administration ........................ 2,089,000 (4) 9900200-Administration—​Distributed ........................ −2,089,000 Provisions: 1. Provisions 1, 2, and 3 of Item 7760-001-0328 also apply to this item. 7760-001-0026—For support of Department of General Services, payable from the State Motor Vehicle Insurance Account ........................ 2,804,000 Schedule: (1) 6330028-Risk and Insurance Management ........................ 2,804,000 (2) 9900100-Administration ........................ 429,000 (3) 9900200-Administration—​Distributed ........................ −429,000 Provisions: 1. Notwithstanding any other law, Section 16379 of the Government Code shall govern the payment of claims for the purposes of this item. 7760-001-0328—For support of Department of General Services, payable from the Public School Planning, Design, and Construction Review Revolving Fund ........................ 81,459,000 Schedule: (1) 6320010-Division of the State Architect ........................ 81,459,000 (2) 9900100-Administration ........................ 11,328,000 (3) 9900200-Administration—​Distributed ........................ −11,328,000 Provisions: 1. The Director of Finance may augment this item by up to an aggregate of 10 percent in cases where existing resources are insufficient for the Division of the State Architect (DSA) to provide statutorily required services to customers and the DSA has identified sufficient revenue. Upon augmentation of this item, the Department of Finance shall provide notification in writing to the chairpersons of the fiscal committees of each house of the Legislature and the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, including the amount and justification, within 30 days of approval of the augmentation. 2. If resources continue to be insufficient for the Division of the State Architect (DSA) to provide statutorily required services to customers and the DSA has identified sufficient revenue, the Director of Finance may further augment this item not sooner than 30 days after notification in writing is provided to the chairpersons of the fiscal committees of each house of the Legislature and the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee. Any augmentation that is deemed to be necessary on a permanent basis shall be submitted for review as part of the normal budget development process. 3. Notwithstanding any other law, including subdivision (d) of Section 1.80 of the annual Budget Act, in the absence of an enacted budget, Section 17301 of the Education Code, subdivision (d) of Section 4454 of the Government Code, and subdivision (c) of Section 4459.8 of the Government Code are deemed in effect. Expenditures shall be charged to non-Budget Act appropriations until they can be transferred to Budget Act appropriations. 4. Provisions 1, 2, and 3 of this item also apply to Items 7760-001-0006, 7760-001-3091, and 7760-001-3245. 7760-001-0666—For support of Department of General Services, payable from the Service Revolving Fund ........................ 722,314,000 Schedule: (1) 6320010-Division of the State Architect ........................ 55,000 (2) 6320028-Building Standards Commission ........................ 2,252,000 (3) 6324046-Facilities Management Division ........................ 374,390,000 (4) 6325010-Asset Management Branch ........................ 29,790,000 (5) 6325055-Construction Inspection and Management Branch ........................ 16,901,000 (6) 6325064-Project Management and Development Branch ........................ 46,772,000 (7) 6330010-Administrative Hearings ........................ 48,452,000 (8) 6330019-Fleet Administration ........................ 60,668,000 (9) 6330028-Risk and Insurance Management ........................ 3,391,000 (10) 6330037-Legal Services ........................ 2,793,000 (11) 6330046-Procurement ........................ 55,283,000 (12) 6330055-State Publishing ........................ 84,274,000 (13) 6330064-Contracted Human Resources Services ........................ 1,887,000 (14) 6330073-Contracted Fiscal Services ........................ 3,802,000 (15) 6330082-Office of Sustainability ........................ 5,638,000 (16) 6335010-Program Overhead Interagency Support Division and RESD Executive ........................ 1,968,000 (17) 6335019-Distributed Program Overhead Interagency Support Division and RESD Executive ........................ −1,968,000 (18) 9900100-Administration ........................ 100,684,000 (19) 9900200-Administration—​Distributed ........................ −96,554,000 (20) 9900300-Distributed Services ........................ −13,117,000 (21) Reimbursements to 6324046-Facilities Management Division ........................ −2,000 (22) Reimbursements to 6330010-Administrative Hearings ........................ −915,000 (23) Reimbursements to 9900100-Administration ........................ −4,130,000 Provisions: 1. Notwithstanding any other law, revenues from the legislative bills and publications received by the Legislative Bill Room shall be deposited in the Service Revolving Fund. 2. Notwithstanding any other law, if the Director of General Services determines in writing that there is insufficient cash in a special fund under the director’s authority to make one or more payments currently due and payable, the director may order the transfer of moneys to that special fund in the amount necessary to make the payment or payments, as a loan from the Service Revolving Fund. That loan shall be subject to all of the following conditions: (a) A loan shall not be made that would interfere with carrying out the object for which the Service Revolving Fund was created. (b) The loan shall be repaid as soon as there are sufficient moneys in the recipient fund to repay the amount loaned, except for a one-time $2,500,000 loan to the Natural Gas Services Program Fund made in the 2016–17 fiscal year. All loans under this provision shall be repaid no later than 18 months after the date of the loan. The amount loaned shall not exceed the amount for which the fund or program is authorized at the time of the loan to expend during the 2026–27 fiscal year from the recipient fund. (c) The terms and conditions of the loan are approved, prior to the transfer of funds, by the Department of Finance pursuant to appropriate fiscal standards. 3. The Director of General Services may augment this item or any of Items 7760-001-0002, 7760-001-0003, and 7760-001-0026 in cases in which (a) the Legislature has approved funds for a customer for the purchase of services or equipment through the Department of General Services and the corresponding expenditure authority has not been provided in this item or (b) a local government entity or the federal government has requested services from the Department of General Services. Any augmentation that is deemed to be necessary on a permanent basis shall be submitted for review as part of the normal budget development process. If the Director of General Services augments this item or Item 7760-001-0002, 7760-001-0003, or 7760-001-0026, the Department of General Services shall notify the Director of Finance as to the amount, justification, and the program augmented. Any augmentation made in accordance with this provision shall not result in an increase in any rate charged to other departments for services or the purchase of goods without the prior written consent of the Director of Finance. The Director of General Services shall not use this provision to augment this item or Item 7760-001-0002, 7760-001-0003, or 7760-001-0026 for costs of which the Department of General Services had knowledge in time to include in the May Revision. 4. A loan shall be made available from the General Fund to the Department of General Services not to exceed a cumulative total of $20,000,000. The loan funds shall be transferred to this item as needed to meet cashflow needs due to delays in collecting reimbursements from departments participating in the GS $Mart Program and are subject to the repayment provisions of Section 16351 of the Government Code. 5. The Director of General Services may approve intraschedule transfers within this item, or any of Items 7760-001-0001, 7760-001-0002, 7760-001-0003, 7760-001-0006, 7760-001-0026, 7760-001-0328, 7760-001-0956, 7760-001-3091, 7760-001-3144, 7760-001-3245, 7760-001-9740, and 7760-001-9746, to provide flexibility for the efficient and cost-effective delivery of program services. Any intraschedule transfer deemed to be necessary on a permanent basis shall be submitted for review as part of the normal budget development process. The Department of General Services shall notify the Director of Finance as to the amount, justification, and the programs involved in the transfer. Any transfer made in accordance with this provision shall not result in an increase in any rate charged to other departments for services or the purchase of goods without prior written consent from the Director of Finance. 6. Upon order of the Department of Finance, the amount available in Schedule (7) may be increased by up to $11,450,000 to fund increased workload in the Office of Administrative Hearings, including cannabis administrative hearings and Commission on Peace Officer Standards and Training hearings, should workload materialize in the 2025–26 fiscal year. 7760-001-0956—For support of Department of General Services, payable from the State School Site Utilization Fund ........................ 5,193,000 Schedule: (1) 6320019-Public School Construction ........................ 5,193,000 (2) 6335010-Program Overhead Interagency Support Division and RESD Executive ........................ 70,000 (3) 6335019-Distributed Program Overhead Interagency Support Division and RESD Executive ........................ −70,000 (4) 9900100-Administration ........................ 2,753,000 (5) 9900200-Administration—​Distributed ........................ −2,753,000 7760-001-3091—For support of Department of General Services, payable from the Certified Access Specialist Fund ........................ 412,000 Schedule: (1) 6320010-Division of the State Architect ........................ 412,000 (2) 9900100-Administration ........................ 34,000 (3) 9900200-Administration—​Distributed ........................ −34,000 Provisions: 1. Provisions 1, 2, and 3 of Item 7760-001-0328 also apply to this item. 7760-001-3144—For support of Department of General Services, payable from the Building Standards Administration Special Revolving Fund ........................ 2,274,000 Schedule: (1) 6320028-Building Standards Commission ........................ 2,274,000 (2) 9900100-Administration ........................ 325,000 (3) 9900200-Administration—​Distributed ........................ −325,000 7760-001-3245—For support of Department of General Services, payable from the Disability Access and Education Revolving Fund ........................ 798,000 Schedule: (1) 6320010-Division of the State Architect ........................ 798,000 (2) 9900100-Administration ........................ 126,000 (3) 9900200-Administration—​Distributed ........................ −126,000 Provisions: 1. Provisions 1, 2, and 3 of Item 7760-001-0328 also apply to this item. 7760-001-6094—For support of Department of General Services, payable from the 2024 State School Facilities Fund ........................ 11,051,000 Schedule: (1) 6320019-Public School Construction ........................ 11,051,000 (2) 9900100-Administration ........................ 260,000 (3) 9900200-Administration—​Distributed ........................ −260,000 7760-001-9740—For support of Department of General Services, payable from the Central Service Cost Recovery Fund ........................ 5,172,000 Schedule: (1) 6330073-Contracted Fiscal Services ........................ 5,172,000 (2) 9900100-Administration ........................ 574,000 (3) 9900200-Administration—​Distributed ........................ −574,000 7760-001-9746—For support of Department of General Services, payable from the Natural Gas Services Program Fund ........................ 1,222,000 Schedule: (1) 6330070-Office of Business and Acquisition Services ........................ 1,222,000 (2) 9900100-Administration ........................ 184,000 (3) 9900200-Administration—​Distributed ........................ −184,000 7760-002-0001—For support of Department of General Services ........................ 0 Schedule: (1) 6330084-CA Commission on Disability Access ........................ 0 (2) 9900100-Administration ........................ 0 (3) 9900200-Administration—​Distributed ........................ 0 Provisions: 1. Notwithstanding any other law, the funds appropriated in this item shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2028. 2. The Department of Finance may increase this item in the amount of any fee revenues collected during the 2025–26 fiscal year and identified for use by the California Commission on Disability Access pursuant to Section 68085.35 of the Government Code. Upon augmentation of this item, the Department of Finance shall provide notification in writing to the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee and the chairpersons of the fiscal committees in each house of the Legislature within 30 days of the approval of the augmentation. 7760-004-0001—For support of Department of General Services ........................ 1,000 Schedule: (1) 9900100-Administration ........................ 1,000 Provisions: 1. This item shall be used to receive and expend transfers from the Disaster Response-Emergency Operations Account for disaster-related costs incurred by the Department of General Services. 2. Funds in this item shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2028. 7760-015-0001—For transfer by the Controller from the General Fund to the Service Revolving Fund ........................ 225,150,000 Provisions: 1. The funds appropriated in this item are available for transfer to the Service Revolving Fund to make rental payments pursuant to Item 7760-092-0666. 7760-092-0666—For support of Department of General Services, for rental payments on lease-revenue bonds, payable from the Service Revolving Fund ........................ 276,809,000 Schedule: (1) 6324046-Facilities Management Division ........................ 276,809,000 Provisions: 1. The Controller shall transfer funds appropriated in this item for base rental as and when provided for in the schedule submitted by the State Public Works Board or the Department of Finance. Notwithstanding the payment dates in any related Facility Lease or Indenture, the schedule may provide for an earlier transfer of funds to ensure debt requirements are met and pay base rental in full when due. 2. The Controller shall transfer for additional rental no later than 30 days after enactment of this budget, $3,025,000 of the amount appropriated in this item, to the Expense Account in the Public Buildings Construction Fund. 3. This item may be adjusted pursuant to Section 4.30. Any adjustments to this item shall be reported to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee pursuant to Section 4.30. 7870-001-0001—For support of California Victim Compensation Board ........................ 1,328,000 Schedule: (1) 6380-Victim Compensation ........................ 1,328,000 Provisions: 1. The California Victim Compensation Board shall not routinely notify all local agencies and school districts regarding its proceedings. However, for each of its meetings, the board shall notify all parties whose claims or proposals are scheduled for consideration and any party requesting notice of the proceedings. 7870-001-0214—For support of California Victim Compensation Board, for support services pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 13950) of Part 4 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, payable from the Restitution Fund ........................ 47,570,000 Schedule: (1) 6380-Victim Compensation ........................ 39,397,000 (2) 6385-Restitution Program ........................ 8,173,000 (3) 9900100-Administration ........................ 16,035,000 (4) 9900200-Administration—​Distributed ........................ −16,035,000 7870-001-0890—For support of California Victim Compensation Board, payable from the Federal Trust Fund ........................ 1,812,000 Schedule: (1) 6380-Victim Compensation ........................ 1,812,000 7870-011-0903—For transfer by the Controller from the State Penalty Fund to the Restitution Fund ........................ (6,534,000) 7870-101-0001—For local assistance, California Victim Compensation Board ........................ 8,000,00020,500,000 Schedule: (1) 6380-Victim Compensation ........................ 8,000,00020,500,000 Provisions: 1. (a) Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (1), up to $8,000,000 shall be used for payment to victims pursuant to Sections 4900 and 4904 of the Penal Code. (b) Upon order of the Department of Finance, the amount specified in subprovision (a) may be increased by an amount not in excess of any total unpaid claim amounts pursuant to Sections 4900 and 4904 of the Penal Code. 2. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (1), $11,000,000 shall be allocated to the existing Trauma Recovery Centers awarded funding for the 2024–25 and 2025–26 fiscal years and that applied, but were not yet recommended, for funding awards for the 2026–27 and 2027–28 fiscal years. Each Trauma Recovery Center would receive up to $1,100,000, or its requested application amount, whichever is less, for each year of the 2026–27 and 2027–28 fiscal years project period, to serve victims of violent crime. 3. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (1), $875,000 shall be used for training and technical assistance, provided by the University of California Trauma Recovery Center Technical Assistance Program, for the California Victim Compensation Board, and California Trauma Recovery Centers. Administrative costs shall not exceed 5 percent of this amount. 4. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (1), $625,000 shall be allocated to the California Victims Compensation Board to cover administrative costs. 5. Any remaining funds should be disseminated in the following order of priority: (a) Trauma Recovery Centers that were previously recommended to be awarded funding by CalVCB for fiscal years 2026–27 and 2027–28 shall receive additional amounts up to their full agency-recommended amount, as previously determined by CalVCB. (b) All funded Trauma Recovery Centers may be awarded additional funds for the purpose of providing flexible emergency cash assistance to support victims of violent crime. Allowable uses include, but are not limited to: transportation, childcare, food, emergency shelter, and other urgent, reasonable expenses that support victims of violent crime. Each trauma recovery center shall have two years to encumber these funds. (c) Any remaining funds shall be distributed equally to increase Trauma Recovery Center grant awards over each of the next two years, prioritizing additional funding to Trauma Recovery Centers that were not fully funded per their requested amounts. 6. Funds described in Provisions 2 through 5, inclusive, shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until July 1, 2029. 7870-101-0214—For local assistance, California Victim Compensation Board, payable from the Restitution Fund ........................ 20,000 Schedule: (1) 6395-Good Samaritan ........................ 20,000 7870-101-0890—For local assistance, California Victim Compensation Board, payable from the Federal Trust Fund ........................ 34,196,000 Schedule: (1) 6380-Victim Compensation ........................ 34,196,000 7870-102-0214—For local assistance, California Victim Compensation Board, payable from the Restitution Fund ........................ 14,137,000 Schedule: (1) 6380-Victim Compensation ........................ 11,041,000 (2) 6385-Restitution Program ........................ 3,096,000 7870-103-0214—For local assistance, California Victim Compensation Board, for trauma recovery centers, payable from the Restitution Fund ........................ 2,000,000 Schedule: (1) 6380-Victim Compensation ........................ 2,000,000 7870-111-0001—For transfer by the Controller, upon order of the Department of Finance, to the Restitution Fund ........................ 39,500,000 Provisions: 1. Upon order of the Department of Finance, the amount available for transfer in this item may be increased by an amount sufficient to backfill the Restitution Fund if a determination is made that revenues are insufficient to support the California Victim Compensation Board. Any augmentation under this provision shall be authorized not sooner than either 30 days after notification in writing to the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee or not sooner than whatever lesser time the chairperson or the chairperson’s designee may determine. 7900-001-0652—For support of Board of Administration of the Public Employees’ Retirement System, payable from the Old Age and Survivors Insurance Revolving Fund ........................ 1,162,000 Schedule: (1) 6412-Social Security ........................ 1,162,000 Provisions: 1. Funds appropriated in this item are from reserves held in the Old Age and Survivors Insurance Revolving Fund or charges and assessments collected by the California Public Employees’ Retirement System, pursuant to Sections 22551, 22552, and 22560 of the Government Code, for support of the State Social Security Administrator Program in accordance with the fee structure approved by the Department of Finance and determined by the Board of Administration of the California Public Employees’ Retirement System. 2. Notwithstanding any other law, the Department of Finance may authorize a loan from the General Fund, not to exceed 50 percent of the amount appropriated in this item to the California Public Employees’ Retirement System State Social Security Administrator Program, provided that: (a) The loan is to meet cash needs resulting from the delay, absence, or insufficient receipt of charges and assessments from public agencies for services provided. (b) The loan is for a short term and shall be repaid to the General Fund within 30 days of receipt of sufficient collection of charges and assessments. (c) Interest charges may be waived pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 16314 of the Government Code. (d) Any approval shall be contingent upon approval by the Department of Finance of amended charges and assessments, as determined by the Board of Administration of the Public Employees’ Retirement System, pursuant to Sections 22551, 22552, and 22560 of the Government Code, to realign the charges and assessments with the budget in a manner that is consistent with the annual Budget Act and reserve policy. (e) Within 30 days of making any adjustment pursuant to this provision, the Department of Finance shall report the adjustment in writing to the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee and the chairpersons of the committees in each house of the Legislature that consider appropriations. 7900-001-0822—For support of Board of Administration of the Public Employees’ Retirement System, payable from the Public Employees’ Health Care Fund ........................ 51,894,000 Schedule: (1) 6415-Health Benefits ........................ 51,894,000 Provisions: 1. Notwithstanding any other law, the Board of Administration of the Public Employees’ Retirement System (PERS), in accordance with all applicable provisions of the California Constitution, shall submit to the Controller, the Director of Finance, the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, and the fiscal committees of the Legislature all of the following: (a) No later than April 30, 2027, a copy of the proposed budget for PERS for the 2027–28 fiscal year as approved by the Board of Administration. (b) No later than 10 business days before the revisions are considered by the Finance and Administration Committee of the Board of Administration, the proposed revisions to the 2026–27 fiscal year budget. The revisions shall be authorized no sooner than 30 days after submission to the Controller, the Director of Finance, the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, and the fiscal committees of each house of the Legislature. (c) No later than November 30, 2026, a final report that includes all 2025–26 fiscal year expenditure and performance workload data provided to the Board of Administration in sufficient detail to be useful for legislative oversight purposes and to sustain a thorough ongoing review of PERS expenditures. 7900-001-0950—For support of Board of Administration of the Public Employees’ Retirement System, payable from the Public Employees’ Contingency Reserve Fund ........................ 36,053,000 Schedule: (1) 6415-Health Benefits ........................ 36,053,000 Provisions: 1. The appropriation made in this item is for support of the Board of Administration of the Public Employees’ Retirement System pursuant to Section 22910 of the Government Code. 2. The Director of Finance may adjust this item of appropriation to reflect changes in Section 4.20 as a result of health insurance premiums approved by the Board of Administration of the Public Employees’ Retirement System. Within 30 days of making any adjustment pursuant to this provision, the Director of Finance shall report the adjustment in writing to the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee and the chairpersons of the committees in each house of the Legislature that consider appropriations. 7900-003-0830—For support of Board of Administration of the Public Employees’ Retirement System, payable from the Public Employees’ Retirement Fund ........................ (2,432,527,000) Schedule: (1) 6430-Benefit Payments ........................ (2,432,527,000) Provisions: 1. The amount displayed in this item is for informational purposes only and is based on the estimate by the Public Employees’ Retirement System of expenditures for external investment advisers and other investment-related expenses to be made during the 2026–27 fiscal year pursuant to Sections 20172, 20208, and 20210 of the Government Code. 7900-015-0815—For support of Board of Administration of the Public Employees’ Retirement System, payable from the Judges’ Retirement Fund ........................ 2,129,000(2,129,000) Schedule: (1) 6410-Retirement ........................ 2,129,000(2,129,000) Provisions: 1. Notwithstanding any other law, the Board of Administration of the Public Employees’ Retirement System (PERS), in accordance with all applicable provisions of the California Constitution, shall submit to the Controller, the Department of Finance, the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, and the fiscal committees of each house of the Legislature all of the following: (a) No later than April 30, 2027, a copy of the proposed budget for PERS for the 2027–28 fiscal year as approved by the Board of Administration. (b) No later than 10 business days before the revisions are considered by the Finance and Administration Committee of the Board of Administration, the proposed revisions to the 2026–27 fiscal year budget. The revisions shall be authorized no sooner than 30 days after submission to the Controller, the Director of Finance, the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, and the fiscal committees of each house of the Legislature. (c) No later than November 30, 2026, a final report that includes all 2025–26 fiscal year expenditure and performance workload data provided to the Board of Administration in sufficient detail to be useful for legislative oversight purposes and to sustain a thorough ongoing review of PERS expenditures. 7900-015-0820—For support of Board of Administration of the Public Employees’ Retirement System, payable from the Legislators’ Retirement Fund ........................ (715,000) Schedule: (1) 6410-Retirement ........................ (715,000) Provisions: 1. Notwithstanding any other law, the Board of Administration of the Public Employees’ Retirement System (PERS), in accordance with all applicable provisions of the California Constitution, shall submit to the Controller, the Director of Finance, the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, and the fiscal committees of each house of the Legislature all of the following: (a) No later than April 30, 2027, a copy of the proposed budget for PERS for the 2027–28 fiscal year as approved by the Board of Administration. (b) No later than 10 business days before the revisions are considered by the Finance and Administration Committee of the Board of Administration, the proposed revisions to the 2026–27 fiscal year budget. The revisions shall be authorized no sooner than 30 days after submission to the Controller, the Director of Finance, the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, and the fiscal committees of each house of the Legislature. (c) No later than November 30, 2026, a final report that includes all 2025–26 fiscal year expenditure and performance workload data provided to the Board of Administration in sufficient detail to be useful for legislative oversight purposes and to sustain a thorough ongoing review of PERS expenditures. 7900-015-0830—For support of Board of Administration of the Public Employees’ Retirement System, payable from the Public Employees’ Retirement Fund ........................ (517,995,000) Schedule: (1) 6410-Retirement ........................ (115,820,000) (2) 6420-Investment Operations ........................ (148,539,000) (3) 6425-Administration ........................ (253,636,000) Provisions: 1. Notwithstanding any other law, the Board of Administration of the Public Employees’ Retirement System (PERS), in accordance with all applicable provisions of the California Constitution, shall submit to the Controller, the Director of Finance, the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, and the fiscal committees of the Legislature, all of the following: (a) No later than April 30, 2027, a copy of the proposed budget for PERS for the 2027–28 fiscal year as approved by the Board of Administration. (b) No later than 10 business days before the revisions are considered by the Finance and Administration Committee of the Board of Administration, the proposed revisions to the 2026–27 fiscal year budget. The revisions shall be authorized no sooner than 30 days after submission to the Controller, the Director of Finance, the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, and the fiscal committees of each house of the Legislature. (c) No later than November 30, 2026, a final report that includes all 2025–26 fiscal year expenditure and performance workload data provided to the Board of Administration in sufficient detail to be useful for legislative oversight purposes and to sustain a thorough ongoing review of PERS expenditures. 2. No later than July 1, 2026, the quarterly reports on information technology projects that are submitted to the Board of Administration of the Public Employees’ Retirement System shall be submitted to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, the fiscal committees of the Legislature, and the Director of Finance on an informational basis. The quarterly update information submitted to the Director of Finance shall be in sufficient detail to be useful for Director of Finance informational project status reporting purposes. 7900-015-0833—For support of Board of Administration of the Public Employees’ Retirement System, payable from the Annuitants’ Health Care Coverage Fund ........................ (8,760,000) Schedule: (1) 6410-Retirement ........................ (8,760,000) Provisions: 1. Notwithstanding any other law, the Board of Administration of the Public Employees’ Retirement System (PERS), in accordance with all applicable provisions of the California Constitution, shall submit to the Controller, the Director of Finance, the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, and the fiscal committees of each house of the Legislature all of the following: (a) No later than April 30, 2027, a copy of the proposed budget for PERS for the 2027–28 fiscal year as approved by the Board of Administration. (b) No later than 10 business days before the revisions are considered by the Finance and Administration Committee of the Board of Administration, the proposed revisions to the 2026–27 fiscal year budget. The revisions shall be authorized no sooner than 30 days after submission to the Controller, the Director of Finance, the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, and the fiscal committees of each house of the Legislature. (c) No later than November 30, 2026, a final report that includes all 2025–26 fiscal year expenditure and performance workload data provided to the Board of Administration in sufficient detail to be useful for legislative oversight purposes and to sustain a thorough ongoing review of PERS expenditures. 7900-015-0849—For support of Board of Administration of the Public Employees’ Retirement System, payable from the Replacement Benefit Custodial Fund ........................ (691,000) Schedule: (1) 6410-Retirement ........................ (691,000) Provisions: 1. Notwithstanding any other law, the Board of Administration of the Public Employees’ Retirement System (PERS), in accordance with all applicable provisions of the California Constitution, shall submit to the Controller, the Department of Finance, the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, and the fiscal committees of each house of the Legislature, all of the following: (a) No later than April 30, 2027, a copy of the proposed budget for PERS for the 2027–28 fiscal year as approved by the Board of Administration. (b) No later than 10 business days before the revisions are considered by the Finance and Administration Committee of the Board of Administration, the proposed revisions to the 2026–27 fiscal year budget. The revisions shall be authorized no sooner than 30 days after submission to the Controller, the Director of Finance, the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, and the fiscal committees of each house of the Legislature. (c) No later than November 30, 2026, a final report that includes all 2025–26 fiscal year expenditure and performance workload data provided to the Board of Administration in sufficient detail to be useful for legislative oversight purposes and to sustain a thorough ongoing review of PERS expenditures. 7900-015-0884—For support of Board of Administration of the Public Employees’ Retirement System, payable from the Judges’ Retirement System II Fund ........................ (3,294,000) Schedule: (1) 6410-Retirement ........................ (3,294,000) Provisions: 1. Notwithstanding any other law, the Board of Administration of the Public Employees’ Retirement System (PERS), in accordance with all applicable provisions of the California Constitution, shall submit to the Controller, the Director of Finance, the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, and the fiscal committees of each house of the Legislature, all of the following: (a) No later than April 30, 2027, a copy of the proposed budget for PERS for the 2027–28 fiscal year as approved by the Board of Administration. (b) No later than 10 business days before the revisions are considered by the Finance and Administration Committee of the Board of Administration, the proposed revisions to the 2026–27 fiscal year budget. The revisions shall be authorized no sooner than 30 days after submission to the Controller, the Director of Finance, the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, and the fiscal committees of each house of the Legislature. (c) No later than November 30, 2026, a final report that includes all 2025–26 fiscal year expenditure and performance workload data provided to the Board of Administration in sufficient detail to be useful for legislative oversight purposes and to sustain a thorough ongoing review of PERS expenditures. 7900-015-9251—For support of Board of Administration of the Public Employees’ Retirement System, payable from the California Employers’ Pension Prefunding Trust Fund ........................ (333,000) Schedule: (1) 6410-Retirement ........................ (333,000) Provisions: 1. Notwithstanding any other law, the Board of Administration of the Public Employees’ Retirement System (PERS), in accordance with all applicable provisions of the California Constitution, shall submit to the Controller, the Department of Finance, the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, and the fiscal committees of each house of the Legislature, all of the following: (a) No later than April 30, 2027, a copy of the proposed budget for PERS for the 2027–28 fiscal year as approved by the Board of Administration. (b) No later than 10 business days before the revisions are considered by the Finance and Administration Committee of the Board of Administration, the proposed revisions to the 2026–27 fiscal year budget. The revisions shall be authorized no sooner than 30 days after submission to the Controller, the Director of Finance, the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, and the fiscal committees of each house of the Legislature. (c) No later than November 30, 2026, a final report that includes all 2025–26 fiscal year expenditure and performance workload data provided to the Board of Administration in sufficient detail to be useful for legislative oversight purposes and to sustain a thorough ongoing review of PERS expenditures. 7910-001-0001—For support of Office of Administrative Law ........................ 3,519,000 Schedule: (1) 6440-Regulatory Oversight ........................ 3,703,000 (2) Reimbursements to 6440-Regulatory Oversight ........................ −184,000 7910-001-9740—For support of Office of Administrative Law, payable from the Central Service Cost Recovery Fund ........................ 2,351,000 Schedule: (1) 6440-Regulatory Oversight ........................ 2,351,000 7920-001-0835—For support of State Teachers’ Retirement System, payable from the Teachers’ Retirement Fund ........................ 384,890,000 Schedule: (1) 6450-Service to Members and Employers ........................ 384,890,000 Provisions: 1. Of the amount appropriated in this item, up to $11,546,000 shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2029, and shall be available for liquidation until June 30, 2031, upon approval by the Teachers’ Retirement Board and written notification by the State Teachers’ Retirement System to the Controller. 7920-002-0835—For support of State Teachers’ Retirement System (external investment advisers), payable from the Teachers’ Retirement Fund ........................ (303,638,000) Schedule: (1) 6450-Service to Members and Employers ........................ (293,607,000) (2) 6455-Corporate Governance ........................ (10,031,000) Provisions: 1. The amount displayed in this item is for informational purposes only, and is based on the current estimate by the State Teachers’ Retirement System of expenditures for external investment advisers to be made during the 2026–27 fiscal year pursuant to Section 22353 of the Education Code. 7920-003-0835—For support of State Teachers’ Retirement System (Information Technology Project Funding), payable from the Teachers’ Retirement Fund ........................ 18,500,000 Schedule: (1) 6450-Service to Members and Employers ........................ 18,500,000 Provisions: 1. Commencing July 1, 2006, reports on information technology projects that are submitted to the Teachers’ Retirement Board shall be submitted to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, the fiscal committees of each house of the Legislature, and the Department of Technology on an informational basis. The information submitted to the Department of Technology shall be in sufficient detail to be useful to the Director of the Department of Technology for informational project status reporting purposes. 2. The amount appropriated in this item shall be for the support of Information Technology Projects. These funds shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2029, and shall be available for liquidation until June 30, 2031. 3. The California State Teachers’ Retirement System shall provide the Department of Finance with quarterly briefings on the post implementation activities of the pension solution project. 7920-011-0001—For transfer by the Controller to the Teachers’ Retirement Fund ........................ (4,783,192,000) Provisions: 1. The amount displayed is for informational purposes only. It reflects the state’s contribution pursuant to Sections 22954, 22955.1, and 24616.2 of the Education Code. GENERAL GOVERNMENT 8120-001-0903—For support of Commission on Peace Officer Standards and Training, payable from the State Penalty Fund ........................ 18,725,000 Schedule: (1) 6500-Standards ........................ 2,757,000 (2) 6505-Training ........................ 9,929,000 (3) 6510-Peace Officer Training ........................ 0 (4) 6515-POST Administration ........................ 7,998,000 (5) Reimbursements to 6505-Training ........................ −1,959,000 8120-002-0001—For support of Commission on Peace Officer Standards and Training ........................ 30,089,000 Schedule: (1) 6500-Standards ........................ 11,320,000 (2) 6505-Training ........................ 8,476,000 (3) 6515-POST Administration ........................ 10,293,000 Provisions: 1. Upon approval by the Department of Finance, funds may be transferred between this item and Item 8120-102-0001 to meet the needs of the local training programs. Upon requesting a transfer, the department shall provide justification for the increased expenditure in the item to which funds are transferred and the availability of excess funds in the item from which funds are transferred. 2. Of the amount appropriated in this item, $2,000,000 is available for expenditure for Office of Administrative Hearings and Department of Justice costs related to implementation of Chapter 409 of the Statutes of 2021. 8120-002-0903—For support of Commission on Peace Officer Standards and Training, payable from the State Penalty Fund ........................ 9,982,000 Schedule: (1) 6500-Standards ........................ 350,000 (2) 6505-Training ........................ 9,632,000 Provisions: 1. The funds appropriated in this item are to be used for contractual services in support of the local training programs pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 13503 of the Penal Code. 2. Upon approval by the Department of Finance, funds may be transferred between this item and Item 8120-102-0903 to meet the needs of the local training programs. Upon requesting a transfer, the department shall provide justification for the increased expenditure in the item to which funds are transferred and the availability of excess funds in the item from which funds are transferred. 3. Of the amount appropriated in this item, $1,556,000 shall be used for contractual services in support of the “Tools of Tolerance” training program for law enforcement personnel operated by the Simon Wiesenthal Center-Museum of Tolerance. These contractual services shall only be used to provide training services to Commission on Peace Officer Standards and Training-participating law enforcement agencies. Upon approval by the Department of Finance, funds may be transferred between this item and Item 8120-102-0903 to meet the needs of local training programs provided by the Simon Wiesenthal Center-Museum of Tolerance. The transfer shall not reduce the total amount spent on training programs provided by the Simon Wiesenthal Center-Museum of Tolerance by the Commission on Peace Officer Standards and Training. Upon requesting a transfer, the department shall provide justification for the increased expenditure in the item to which funds are transferred and the availability of excess funds in the item from which funds are transferred. 8120-102-0001—For local assistance, Commission on Peace Officer Standards and Training ........................ 20,000,000 Schedule: (1) 6510-Peace Officer Training ........................ 20,000,000 Provisions: 1. Upon approval by the Department of Finance, funds may be transferred between this item and Item 8120-002-0001 to meet the needs of the local training programs. Upon requesting a transfer, the department shall provide justification for the increased expenditure in the item to which funds are transferred and the availability of excess funds in the item from which funds are transferred. 8120-102-0903—For local assistance, Commission on Peace Officer Standards and Training, for allocation to cities, counties, and cities and counties pursuant to Section 13523 of the Penal Code, payable from the State Penalty Fund ........................ 13,428,000 Schedule: (1) 6510-Peace Officer Training ........................ 13,428,000 Provisions: 1. Upon approval by the Department of Finance, funds may be transferred between this item and Item 8120-002-0903 to meet the needs of the local training programs. Upon requesting a transfer, the department shall provide justification for the increased expenditure in the item to which funds are transferred and the availability of excess funds in the item from which funds are transferred. 2. Of the amount appropriated in this item, $444,000 shall be used for allocation to cities, counties, and cities and counties for the Tools of Tolerance training program for law enforcement personnel operated by the Simon Wiesenthal Center-Museum of Tolerance. Eligibility to receive funds appropriated for this purpose is limited to Commission on Peace Officer Standards and Training-participating law enforcement agencies. At the discretion of the head of the law enforcement agency seeking reimbursement for this purpose, both sworn and nonsworn personnel who have contact with the public shall be eligible for reimbursement; however, priority should be given to sworn officers. To the extent funds are available after reimbursing the aforementioned personnel, peace officers employed by state law enforcement or correctional agencies shall be eligible to attend this training and receive reimbursement. Upon approval by the Department of Finance, funds may be transferred between this item and Item 8120-002-0903 to meet the needs of local training programs provided by the Simon Wiesenthal Center-Museum of Tolerance. The transfer shall not reduce the total amount spent by the Commission on Peace Officer Standards and Training on training programs provided by the Simon Wiesenthal Center-Museum of Tolerance. Upon requesting a transfer, the department shall provide justification for the increased expenditure in the item to which funds are transferred and the availability of excess funds in the item from which funds are transferred. 8140-001-0001—For support of State Public Defender ........................ 24,006,000 Schedule: (1) 6530-State Public Defender ........................ 24,006,000 Provisions: 1. Any federal funds received by the office of the State Public Defender as reimbursements for legal services provided for capital cases shall revert to the unappropriated surplus of the General Fund. 2. Upon order of the Department of Finance, this item may be augmented by the amount transferred from Item 0250-101-0001 to provide legal training and technical assistance related to the implementation of the Community Assistance, Recovery, and Empowerment (CARE) Act. These funds shall be available for encumbrance and expenditure until January 1, 2028. 8140-101-0001—For local assistance, State Public Defender ........................ 5,000,000 Schedule: (1) 6530-State Public Defender ........................ 5,000,000 Provisions: 1. The funds appropriated in this item shall be available to the Counties of Del Norte, Mariposa, Mono, and San Benito (the “participating counties”) to improve the provision of their local indigent defense systems. The funds are allocated for start-up and implementation costs to establish an institutional public defender office, a regional public defender office, or a county-run structured, managed assigned counsel system. 2. Of the amounts appropriated in Provision 1: (a) $897,945 shall be provided to Del Norte County. (b) $700,000 shall be provided to Mariposa County. (c) $700,000 shall be provided to Mono County. (d) $1,702,055 shall be provided to San Benito County. (e) An additional $1,000,000 shall be available for the Office of the State Public Defender to provide grants to the above counties by application demonstrating the need for additional funds to implement indigent defense system improvements consistent with these Provisions. 3. Prior to receipt of funds, each participating county must provide a proposed budget and proposal for the use of the funds to the State Public Defender. Upon review and approval that the proposed budget and plan are for permissible uses, the State Public Defender shall disburse the allocated funds to the participating county on a schedule determined by the State Public Defender. 4. Allowable uses of the funds include: (a) Personnel for a county institutional public defender office or a regional public defender office, or both, including a chief defender, deputy public defenders, investigators, social workers, and other relevant positions. (b) Establishment of a regional public defender office, including contracting with an established public defender office in a neighboring county. (c) Personnel costs for a chief defense administrator, investigators, social workers, and other staff necessary for a county-run managed assigned counsel system. A managed assigned counsel system for purposes of these provisions is defined as a system consistent with the California Standards for Panel and Contract Defense Systems. (d) Technologies needed for the effective implementation of a public defense office, including, but not limited to, case management systems and legal databases. (e) Equipment necessary to the effective administration and oversight of indigent defense services. (f) Training, resources, and tools for attorneys and defense support staff engaged in the delivery of indigent defense services. (g) Other items directly related to improving the provision of public defense as approved by the Office of the State Public Defender. 5. As a condition of receiving funds pursuant to Provisions 1 and 2, participating counties shall collect and provide indigent defense data including, but not limited to, expenditure of funds, descriptions of how funding was used, and outcomes achieved, to the State Public Defender in a manner determined by the State Public Defender. 6. The funding provided in this item shall be used to supplement, and not supplant, existing funding levels for indigent defense services by each participating county. 7. If any funds remain unallocated or unclaimed after the distribution processes described in Provisions 2, 3, and 4, the State Public Defender shall reallocate and distribute the remaining funds to either the participating counties or other counties identified by the State Public Defender in order to support indigent defense improvement activities consistent with Provisions 1 and 4. 8. The funding allocated in this item shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2029. 8260-001-0001—For support of the Arts Council ........................ 10,707,00015,707,000 Schedule: (1) 6540-Arts Council ........................ 10,904,00015,904,000 (2) Reimbursements to 6540-Arts Council ........................ −197,000 Provisions: 1. The two positions funded through this item shall provide outreach and contract or grant management activities to further expand programs into communities and populations that continue to be underrepresented in the arts. 2. Of the amount appropriated in this item, $5,000,000 shall be available for cultural investments. 8260-001-0078—For support of California Arts Council, payable from the Graphic Design License Plate Account ........................ 879,000 Schedule: (1) 6540-Arts Council ........................ 879,000 8260-001-0890—For support of California Arts Council, payable from the Federal Trust Fund ........................ 986,000 Schedule: (1) 6540-Arts Council ........................ 986,000 8260-101-0001—For local assistance, Arts Council ........................ 24,300,000 Schedule: (1) 6540-Arts Council ........................ 24,300,000 Provisions: 2. Upon order of the Department of Finance, the Controller shall transfer up to $500,000 of the funding appropriated in Schedule (1) of this item to Schedule (1) of Item 8260-001-0001 for the administration of arts programming grants. 3. Of the amount appropriated in this item, at least $10,000,000 of the granted funds shall require a match from grantees. 8260-101-0078—For local assistance, California Arts Council, payable from the Graphic Design License Plate Account ........................ 251,000 Schedule: (1) 6540-Arts Council ........................ 251,000 Provisions: 1. The funds appropriated in this item are to be expended for the purposes identified in Chapter 393 of the Statutes of 2004, as amended by Chapter 221 of the Statutes of 2013. 8260-101-0890—For local assistance, California Arts Council, payable from the Federal Trust Fund ........................ 400,000 Schedule: (1) 6540-Arts Council ........................ 400,000 Provisions: 1. Upon order of the Department of Finance, the Controller shall transfer up to $400,000 of the funding appropriated in Schedule (1) of this item to Schedule (1) of Item 8260-001-0890 for the administration of arts programming. 8260-101-8085—For local assistance, California Arts Council, payable from the Keep Arts in Schools Fund ........................ 250,000 Schedule: (1) 6540-Arts Council ........................ 250,000 Provisions: 1. The funds appropriated in this item are to be expended for the purposes identified in Chapter 430 of the Statutes of 2013. 8270-001-8095—For support of Historic State Capitol Commission, payable from the Historic State Capitol Fund ........................ 0 Schedule: (1) 6545-Historic State Capitol Commission ........................ 1,000 (2) Reimbursements to 6545-Historic State Capitol Commission ........................ −1,000 Provisions: 1. Notwithstanding any other law, all moneys that are received by the Historic State Capitol Commission as donations or financial contributions from any source, public or private, or as revenue from any concession operated in the State Capitol, pursuant to subdivision (f) of Section 9149.7 of, or Section 9149.12 of, the Government Code, that have not been taken into consideration in the schedule of this item, or are in excess of the amount so taken into consideration, are to be credited to this item and are hereby appropriated in augmentation of this item for the same programs and purposes for which appropriations for this item have been made by this act. The balance of this item as well as the balance of prior year appropriations from the Historic State Capitol Fund may be carried over and expended in any following fiscal year. 8385-001-0001—For support of California Citizens Compensation Commission ........................ 9,000 Schedule: (1) 6550-California Citizens Compensation Commission ........................ 9,000 8570-001-0001—For support of Department of Food and Agriculture ........................ 186,261,000 Schedule: (1) 6570-Agricultural Plant and Animal Health; Pest Prevention; Food Safety Services ........................ 145,967,000 (2) 6575-Marketing; Commodities and Agricultural Services ........................ 23,167,000 (3) 6580-Assistance to Fair and County Agricultural Activities ........................ 3,254,000 (4) 6590-General Agricultural Activities ........................ 59,431,000 (5) 9900100-Administration ........................ 41,928,000 (6) 9900200-Administration—​Distributed ........................ −41,749,000 (7) Reimbursements to 6570-Agricultural Plant and Animal Health; Pest Prevention; Food Safety Services ........................ −5,644,000 (8) Reimbursements to 6575-Marketing; Commodities and Agricultural Services ........................ −12,573,000 (9) Reimbursements to 6590-General Agricultural Activities ........................ −27,341,000 (10) Reimbursements to 9900100-Administration ........................ −179,000 Provisions: 1. The amount appropriated in this item for an agreement with the Regents of the University of California to operate poultry and livestock disease laboratories shall be adjusted annually, as necessary, for University of California negotiated employee compensation and benefit adjustments. 2. $10,500,000 of the amount appropriated in this item is available contingent upon federal funds not being received from the federal government for the Invasive Fruit Fly program in the 2026–27 fiscal year. The Department of Finance may decrease the amount appropriated in this item by up to $10,500,000 if federal funds for these purposes are made available in the 2026–27 fiscal year. 8570-001-0044—For support of Department of Food and Agriculture, payable from the Motor Vehicle Account, State Transportation Fund ........................ 8,875,000 Schedule: (1) 6570-Agricultural Plant and Animal Health; Pest Prevention; Food Safety Services ........................ 8,875,000 8570-001-0111—For support of Department of Food and Agriculture, payable from the Department of Agriculture Account, Department of Food and Agriculture Fund ........................ 73,148,000 Schedule: (1) 6570-Agricultural Plant and Animal Health; Pest Prevention; Food Safety Services ........................ 54,695,000 (2) 6575-Marketing; Commodities and Agricultural Services ........................ 15,233,000 (3) 6590-General Agricultural Activities ........................ 4,038,000 (5) Reimbursements to 6575-Marketing; Commodities and Agricultural Services ........................ −818,000 Provisions: 1. The Director of Finance may augment this appropriation, after review of a request submitted by the Department of Food and Agriculture that demonstrates a need for additional resources for the Citrus Frost Inspection Program as a result of a citrus freeze in any season where freezing damage to citrus has occurred. Any augmentation shall be authorized not sooner than 30 days after notification in writing to the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, or not sooner than whatever lesser time the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, or the chairperson’s designee, may determine. 2. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (1), $8,336,000 shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2028. 3. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $19,774,000 is associated with information technology, legal services, human resources, and the Office of Civil Rights, and shall be excluded from the limits identified in Section 242 of the Food and Agricultural Code. The Department of Finance may adjust the amount identified in this provision annually, as necessary, for employee compensation and benefit adjustments. 8570-001-0516—For support of Department of Food and Agriculture, payable from the Harbors and Watercraft Revolving Fund ........................ 5,586,000 Schedule: (1) 6570-Agricultural Plant and Animal Health; Pest Prevention; Food Safety Services ........................ 5,586,000 8570-001-0601—For support of Department of Food and Agriculture, payable from the Department of Agriculture Building Fund ........................ 1,722,000 Schedule: (1) 6590-General Agricultural Activities ........................ 1,722,000 Provisions: 1. Funds appropriated in this item are in lieu of the appropriation made pursuant to Section 624 of the Food and Agricultural Code. 8570-001-0890—For support of Department of Food and Agriculture, payable from the Federal Trust Fund ........................ 113,505,000 Schedule: (1) 6570-Agricultural Plant and Animal Health; Pest Prevention; Food Safety Services ........................ 56,763,000 (2) 6575-Marketing; Commodities and Agricultural Services ........................ 18,700,000 (3) 6590-General Agricultural Activities ........................ 38,042,000 8570-001-3034—For support of Department of Food and Agriculture, payable from the Antiterrorism Fund ........................ 534,000 Schedule: (1) 6570-Agricultural Plant and Animal Health; Pest Prevention; Food Safety Services ........................ 534,000 8570-001-3101—For support of Department of Food and Agriculture, payable from the Analytical Laboratory Account, Department of Food and Agriculture Fund ........................ 440,000 Schedule: (1) 6575-Marketing; Commodities and Agricultural Services ........................ 440,000 8570-001-3139—For support of Department of Food and Agriculture, payable from the Specialized License Plate Fund ........................ 68,000 Schedule: (1) 6590-General Agricultural Activities ........................ 68,000 8570-001-3237—For support of Department of Food and Agriculture, payable from the Cost of Implementation Account, Air Pollution Control Fund ........................ 2,566,000 Schedule: (1) 6575-Marketing; Commodities and Agricultural Services ........................ 2,074,000 (2) 6590-General Agricultural Activities ........................ 492,000 8570-001-3288—For support of Department of Food and Agriculture, payable from the Cannabis Control Fund ........................ 1,886,000 Schedule: (1) 6575-Marketing; Commodities and Agricultural Services ........................ 1,100,000 (2) 6590-General Agricultural Activities ........................ 786,000 8570-001-8097—For support of Department of Food and Agriculture, payable from the Prevention of Animal Homelessness and Cruelty Fund ........................ 9,000 Schedule: (1) 6590-General Agricultural Activities ........................ 9,000 8570-011-0890—For transfer by the Controller from the Federal Trust Fund to the Pierce’s Disease Management Account ........................ 18,870,000 Provisions: 1. The funds appropriated in this item shall be deposited in the Pierce’s Disease Management Account in the Department of Food and Agriculture Fund and shall be available for expenditure for the purpose of combating Pierce’s disease and its vectors. 8570-012-0001—For transfer by the Controller to the Department of Food and Agriculture Fund ........................ 13,501,000 8570-093-0001—For support of Department of Food and Agriculture, for rental payments on lease-revenue bonds ........................ 8,124,000 Schedule: (1) 6590-General Agricultural Activities ........................ 8,124,000 Provisions: 1. The Controller shall transfer funds appropriated in this item for base rental as and when provided for in the schedule submitted by the State Public Works Board. Notwithstanding the payment dates in any related Facility Lease or Indenture, the schedule may provide for an earlier transfer of funds to ensure debt requirements are met and pay base rental in full when due. 2. No later than 30 days after enactment of this budget, the Controller shall transfer $79,000 of the amount appropriated in this item to the Expense Account in the Public Buildings Construction Fund for additional rental. 3. This item may be adjusted pursuant to Section 4.30. Any adjustments to this item shall be reported to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee pursuant to Section 4.30. 8570-093-0044—For support of Department of Food and Agriculture, for rental payments on lease-revenue bonds, payable from the Motor Vehicle Account, State Transportation Fund ........................ 466,000 Schedule: (1) 6590-General Agricultural Activities ........................ 466,000 Provisions: 1. The Controller shall transfer funds appropriated in this item for base rental as and when provided for in the schedule submitted by the State Public Works Board. Notwithstanding the payment dates in any related Facility Lease or Indenture, the schedule may provide for an earlier transfer of funds to ensure debt requirements are met and pay base rental in full when due. 2. No later than 30 days after enactment of this budget, the Controller shall transfer $3,000 of the amount appropriated in this item to the Expense Account in the Public Buildings Construction Fund for additional rental. 3. This item may be adjusted pursuant to Section 4.30. Any adjustments to this item shall be reported to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee pursuant to Section 4.30. 8570-093-0516—For support of Department of Food and Agriculture, for rental payments on lease-revenue bonds, payable from the Harbors and Watercraft Revolving Fund ........................ 4,000 Schedule: (1) 6590-General Agricultural Activities ........................ 4,000 Provisions: 1. The Controller shall transfer funds appropriated in this item for base rental as and when provided for in the schedule submitted by the State Public Works Board. Notwithstanding the payment dates in any related Facility Lease or Indenture, the schedule may provide for an earlier transfer of funds to ensure debt requirements are met and pay base rental in full when due. 2. The Controller shall transfer for additional rental no later than 30 days after enactment of this budget, $0 of the amount appropriated in this item, to the Expense Account in the Public Buildings Construction Fund. 3. This item may be adjusted pursuant to Section 4.30. Any adjustments to this item shall be reported to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee pursuant to Section 4.30. 8570-101-0001—For local assistance, Department of Food and Agriculture ........................ 9,010,000 Schedule: (1) 6570-Agricultural Plant and Animal Health; Pest Prevention; Food Safety Services ........................ 6,405,000 (2) 6580-Assistance to Fair and County Agricultural Activities ........................ 2,605,000 8570-101-3139—For local assistance, Department of Food and Agriculture, payable from the Specialized License Plate Fund ........................ 400,000 Schedule: (1) 6590-General Agricultural Activities ........................ 400,000 8570-101-8097—For local assistance, Department of Food and Agriculture, payable from the Prevention of Animal Homelessness and Cruelty Fund ........................ 184,000 Schedule: (1) 6590-General Agricultural Activities ........................ 184,000 Provisions: 1. Funds appropriated in this item are to be expended for the purposes identified in Chapter 557 of the Statutes of 2015 (Article 23 (commencing with Section 18901) of Chapter 3 of Part 10.2 of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code). 8570-102-0001—For local assistance, Department of Food and Agriculture ........................ 20,000,000 Schedule: (1) 6575-Marketing; Commodities and Agricultural Service ........................ 20,000,000 Provisions: 1. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (1), $20,000,000 shall be available for the Farm to School Incubator Grant Program. This amount shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2029. 8570-103-0001—For local assistance, Department of Food and Agriculture ........................ 15,000,000 Schedule: (1) 6590-General Agricultural Activities ........................ 15,000,000 Provisions: 1. The amount appropriated in this item shall be used for the California Nutrition Incentive Program. 8570-104-0001—For local assistance, Department of Food and Agriculture ........................ 15,000,000 Schedule: (1) 6590-General Agricultural Activities ........................ 15,000,000 Provisions: 1. The amount appropriated in this item shall be used for the Local Food Purchase Assistance Cooperative Agreement Program. 8570-111-0001—For transfer by the Controller to the Fair and Exposition Fund ........................ 4,774,000 Provisions: 1. The funds transferred in this item shall be used for purposes consistent with the requirements of Section 19620.2 of the Business and Professions Code. 2. Upon approval by the Department of Finance, the amount transferred by this item may be adjusted to reflect the requirements of Section 19620.15 of the Business and Professions Code. 8570-490—Reappropriation, Department of Food and Agriculture. The balances of the appropriations provided in the following citations are reappropriated for the purposes provided for in those appropriations and shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure as specified below: 0001—General Fund (1) Item 8570-002-0001, Budget Act of 2021 (Chs. 21, 69, and 240, Stats. 2021) for the California Underserved and Small Producers Program shall be extended until June 30, 2027. (2) Item 8570-002-0001, Budget Act of 2021 (Chs. 21, 69, and 240, Stats. 2021), as reappropriated by Item 8570-490, Budget Act of 2024 (Chs. 22, 35, and 994, Stats. 2024) and Item 8570-491, Budget Act of 2025 (Chs. 4 and 5, Stats. 2025) for Fairs and Expositions Resiliency Support shall be extended until June 30, 2028. (3) Item 8570-002-0001, Budget Act of 2021 (Chs. 21, 69, and 240, Stats. 2021), as reappropriated by Item 8570-490, Budget Act of 2024 (Chs. 22, 35, and 994, Stats. 2024) for Animal Blood Banks shall be extended until June 30, 2027. (4) Item 8570-101-0001, Budget Act of 2021 (Chs. 21, 69, and 240, Stats. 2021), as reappropriated by Item 8570-490, Budget Act of 2023 (Chs. 12, 38, and 189, Stats. 2023) and Item 8570-490, Budget Act of 2024 (Chs. 22, 35, and 994, Stats. 2024) for the State Water Efficiency and Enhancement Program shall be extended until June 30, 2027. (5) Provision 2 of Item 8570-101-0001, Budget Act of 2021 (Chs. 21, 69, and 240, Stats. 2021), (Technical Item 8570-588-0001), as reappropriated by Item 8570-490, Budget Act of 2024 (Chs. 22, 35, and 994, Stats. 2024) for the State Water Efficiency and Enhancement Program shall be extended until June 30, 2027. (6) Item 8570-102-0001, Budget Act of 2021 (Chs. 21, 69, and 240, Stats. 2021) for the Alternative Manure Management Program and Dairy Digester Research and Development Program shall be extended until June 30, 2028. (7) Provision 5 of Item 8570-102-0001, Budget Act of 2021 (Chs. 21, 69, and 240, Stats. 2021), (Technical Item 8570-589-0001), for the Alternative Manure Management Program and Dairy Digester Research and Development Program shall be extended until June 30, 2028. (8) Provision 1 of Item 8570-101-0001, Budget Act of 2022 (Chs. 43, 45, and 249, Stats. 2022), (Technical Item 8570-588-0001), for the State Water Efficiency and Enhancement Program shall be extended until June 30, 2027. (9) Item 8570-102-0001, Budget Act of 2022 (Chs. 43, 45, and 249, Stats. 2022), as reappropriated by Item 8570-490, Budget Act of 2025 (Chs. 4 and 5, Stats. 2025) for the California Underserved and Small Producers Program shall be extended to June 30, 2027. (10) Provision 5 of Item 8570-102-0001, Budget Act of 2022 (Chs. 43, 45, and 249, Stats. 2022), (Technical Item 8570-589-0001), as reappropriated by Item 8570-490, Budget Act of 2025 (Chs. 4 and 5, Stats. 2025) for the Alternative Manure Management Program and Dairy Digester Research and Development Program shall be extended until June 30, 2028. (11) Paragraph (1) of subdivision (d) of Section 35 of Chapter 574 of the Statutes of 2022, (Technical Item 8570-601-0001), as reappropriated by Item 8570-490, Budget Act of 2024 (Chs. 22, 35, and 994, Stats. 2024) for the State Water Efficiency and Enhancement Program shall be extended until June 30, 2027. (12) Item 8570-001-0001, Budget Act of 2023 (Chs. 12, 38, and 189, Stats. 2023), as reappropriated by Item 8570-490, Budget Act of 2024 (Chs. 22, 35, and 994, Stats. 2024) for the Emerging Threats 2 IT Project shall be extended until June 30, 2028. (13) Item 8570-102-0001, Budget Act of 2023 (Chs. 12, 38, and 189, Stats. 2023) for the California Nutrition Incentive Program shall be extended until June 30, 2028. (14) Provision 3 of Item 8570-102-0001, Budget Act of 2023 (Chs. 12, 38, and 189, Stats. 2023), (Technical Item 8570-589-0001), for the California Nutrition Incentive Program shall be extended until June 30, 2028. (15) Item 8570-001-0001, Budget Act of 2024 (Chs. 22, 35, and 994, Stats. 2024), as reappropriated by Item 8570-490, Budget Act of 2025 (Chs. 4 and 5, Stats. 2025) for the Emerging Threats 2 IT Project shall be extended until June 30, 2028. (16) Provision 1 of Item 8570-101-0001, Budget Act of 2024 (Chs. 22, 35, and 994, Stats. 2024), (Technical Item 8570-588-0001), for the California Underserved and Small Producers Program shall be extended until June 30, 2028. (17) Item 8570-001-0001, Budget Act of 2025 (Chs. 4 and 5, Stats. 2025) for the Emerging Threats 2 IT Project shall be extended until June 30, 2028. 3398—California Emergency Relief Fund (1) Subdivision (d) of Section 35 of Chapter 574 of the Statutes of 2022 for the Water Efficiency Technical Assistance Program shall be extended until June 30, 2027. (2) Subdivision (d) of Section 35 of Chapter 574 of the Statues of 2022, as transferred to Technical Item 8570-590-3398 for the Water Efficiency Technical Assistance Program shall be extended until June 30, 2028. (3) Subdivision (g) of Section 35 of Chapter 574 of the Statutes of 2022, as transferred to Technical Item 8570-509-3398, and as reappropriated by Item 8570-490, Budget Act of 2025 (Chs. 4 and 5, Stats. 2025) for the California Underserved and Small Producers Program shall be extended until June 30, 2028. 8570-491—Reappropriation, Department of Food and Agriculture. Notwithstanding any other law, the period to liquidate encumbrances of the following citations is extended as specified below: 0001—General Fund (1) Item 8570-101-0001, Budget Act of 2021 (Chs. 21, 69, and 240, Stats. 2021), for the State Water Efficiency and Enhancement Program shall be extended until June 30, 2029. (2) Item 8570-101-0001, Budget Act of 2024 (Chs. 22, 35, and 994, Stats. 2024), for the California Underserved and Small Producers Program shall be extended until June 30, 2030. 3398—California Emergency Relief Fund (1) Item 8570-101-3398, Budget Act of 2021 (Chs. 21, 69, and 240, Stats. 2021), as partially reverted by Item 8570-496, Budget Act of 2023 (Chs. 12, 38, and 189, Stats. 2023) and Item 8570-495, Budget Act of 2024 (Chs. 22, 35, and 994, Stats. 2024), for the Water Efficiency Technical Assistance Program shall be extended until June 30, 2029. (2) Subdivision (g) of Section 35 of Chapter 574 of the Statutes of 2022 for the California Underserved and Small Producers Program shall be extended until June 30, 2030. 8615-001-0001—For support of the California Privacy Protection Agency ........................ 12,629,000 Schedule: (1) 6600-Administration of the California Consumer Privacy Act ........................ 12,629,000 Provisions: 1. Pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 1798.199.95 of the Civil Code, the amount appropriated to the California Privacy Protection Agency is to be adjusted annually for cost-of-living changes to support its operations. To calculate the cost-of-living changes, the agency is to use the Consumer Price Index (CPI)—​California, All Items, All Urban Consumers, Percentage change from the previous year report, published by the California Department of Industrial Relations, Office of the Director—​Research, and determine the percentage change in the CPI from August of the current year to August of the previous year and apply it to the previous year’s final appropriation. The agency shall submit an expenditure plan to the Department of Finance that also includes the CPI calculation. 8615-001-1030—For support of California Privacy Protection Agency, payable from the Consumer Privacy Fund ........................ 1,328,000 Schedule: (1) 6600-Administration of the California Consumer Privacy Act ........................ 1,328,000 8615-001-3372—For support of the California Privacy Protection Agency, payable from the Data Brokers’ Registry Fund ........................ 5,737,000 Schedule: (1) 6600-Administration of the California Consumer Privacy Act ........................ 5,737,000 Provisions: 1. Upon order of the Department of Finance, the amount available in this item may be augmented by an amount necessary to cover information technology-related costs associated with system utilization of the Delete Request Opt-Out Platform, pursuant to Chapter 709 of the Statutes of 2023 (S.B. 362). 2. The Department of Finance may authorize one or more short-term cash loans, not to exceed a cumulative total of $1,000,000 from the Consumer Privacy Fund to the Data Brokers’ Registry Fund to support operational cashflow needs resulting from registration revenues collected mid fiscal year. The cash loans shall be repaid no later than 12 months after the loans are taken. Interest charges may be waived pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 16314 of the Government Code. For purposes of the budgetary and legal bases of accounting and budgeting, the principal amount of any loans made pursuant to this provision shall not be considered part of the balance of the fund that receives the loan, nor shall it be deducted from the balance of the fund from which the loan is made. These loans are considered cashflow loans for temporary cash shortages and shall not constitute budgetary loans, revenues, or expenditures. The Department of Finance shall make the final determination of the budgetary and accounting transactions and treatments to ensure proper implementation of this provision pursuant to Section 13344 of the Government Code. 8620-001-0001—For support of Fair Political Practices Commission ........................ 13,483,000 Schedule: (1) 6610010-Local Enforcement ........................ 6,437,000 (2) 6610019-Legal, Technical Assistance, and State Enforcement ........................ 7,787,000 (3) Reimbursements to 6610010-Local Enforcement ........................ −730,000 (4) Reimbursements to 6610019-Legal, Technical Assistance, and State Enforcement ........................ −11,000 Provisions: 1. Not later than January 10 of each year, the Fair Political Practices Commission shall report workload metrics to the fiscal committees of the Legislature, the Legislative Analyst’s Office, and the Department of Finance. When possible, the report shall provide data for the past five fiscal years and distinguish workload by division. The report shall include, but not be limited to, the following: (a) Data collected regarding enforcement of the Political Reform Act of 1974. These data shall include, but not be limited to, the number of complaints received, the number of referrals received, the number of cases opened, the number of cases with resolutions approved by the commission (distinguished by streamline, mainline, and default cases approved by the commission), total fines imposed by the commission, the number of warning letters issued, the number of administrative terminations, the number of cases closed with violations found, the number of advisory letters issued, the number of no action closure letters issued, and the average case pendency by category of violations under the act. (b) Data collected from the advice phone system. These data shall include, but not be limited to, the average amount of time people wait on the phone before their call is answered and the average length of accepted calls. (c) Data regarding informal advice issued by email. These data shall include, but not be limited to, the number of emails received, the number of advice emails responded to within 24 hours from receipt, and the number of advice emails responded to after more than 24 hours from receipt. (d) Data regarding responsiveness to public demand for information. These data shall include, but not be limited to, the number of workshops or presentations requested by the public or a public agency and the number of workshops or presentations performed. (e) Data regarding advice letters issued pursuant to Section 83114 of the Government Code. These data shall include, but not be limited to, the number of advice letters issued and the number of instances where it took the commission longer than 21 days to issue an advice letter. (f) Data regarding advice letters issued pursuant to Section 1090 of the Government Code. These data shall include, but not be limited to, the number of advice letters issued, the number of instances where it took the commission longer than 30 days to issue an advice letter, and the number of instances where it took the commission longer than 90 days to issue an advice letter. 2. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (2), $211,000 shall be available for expenditure only to support implementation of Chapter 245 of the Statutes of 2025 (S.B. 42), if that measure is approved by the voters at the November 3, 2026, statewide general election. 8640-001-0001—For support of Political Reform Act of 1974, the following sums are appropriated to, and in augmentation of, the following agencies and officers for the administration, investigation, and regulation of political campaigns, officials, and lobbyists ........................ 3,578,000 Schedule: (1) 6620-Secretary of State ........................ 711,000 For transfer by the Controller to Item 0890-001-0001 as follows: (2) 0705-Elections ........................ (711,000) (2) 6625-Franchise Tax Board ........................ 2,680,000 For transfer by the Controller to Item 7730-001-0001 as follows: (2) 6285-Political Reform Audit ........................ (2,680,000) (3) 6630-Department of Justice ........................ 195,000 For transfer by the Controller to Item 0820-001-0001 as follows: (3) 0435-Division of Legal Services ........................ (68,000) (4) 0440-Law Enforcement ........................ (127,000) (4) 6635-Fair Political Practices Commission ........................ (5,666,000) (5) Reimbursements to 6620-Secretary of State ........................ −8,000 Provisions: 1. The Controller shall transfer funds as specified above, including any allocations made by the Department of Finance, on January 1, 2027. 8660-001-0042—For support of Public Utilities Commission, payable from the State Highway Account, State Transportation Fund ........................ 9,515,000 Schedule: (1) 6690073-Crossing Safety ........................ 9,515,000 8660-001-0046—For support of Public Utilities Commission, payable from the Public Transportation Account, State Transportation Fund ........................ 8,860,000 Schedule: (1) 6690064-Rail Transit Safety ........................ 8,860,000 8660-001-0461—For support of Public Utilities Commission, payable from the Public Utilities Commission Transportation Reimbursement Account ........................ 32,394,000 Schedule: (1) 6690046-Transportation Licensing and Enforcement ........................ 17,598,000 (2) 6690055-Freight Safety ........................ 14,796,000 8660-001-0462—For support of Public Utilities Commission, payable from the Public Utilities Commission Utilities Reimbursement Account ........................ 254,901,000 Schedule: (1) 6680055-Energy ........................ 247,529,000 (2) 6680064-Water/Sewer ........................ 16,203,000 (3) 6680073-Communications ........................ 51,133,000 (4) 9900100-Administration ........................ 98,741,000 (5) 9900200-Administration—​Distributed ........................ −98,741,000 (6) Reimbursements to 6680055-Energy ........................ −57,844,000 (7) Reimbursements to 6680073-Communications ........................ −2,120,000 Provisions: 1. The Public Utilities Commission shall require any public utility requesting a merger to reimburse the commission for those necessary expenses that the commission incurs in its consideration of the proposed merger. 2. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (1), $3,000,000 shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2029, for legal services contracts. 8660-001-0464—For support of Public Utilities Commission, payable from the California High-Cost Fund-A Administrative Committee Fund ........................ 1,576,000 Schedule: (1) 6685010-California High-Cost Fund-A Program ........................ 1,576,000 8660-001-0470—For support of Public Utilities Commission, payable from the California High-Cost Fund-B Administrative Committee Fund ........................ 1,674,000 Schedule: (1) 6685019-California High-Cost Fund-B Program ........................ 1,674,000 8660-001-0471—For support of Public Utilities Commission, payable from the Universal Lifeline Telephone Service Trust Administrative Committee Fund ........................ 33,971,000 Schedule: (1) 6685028-Universal Service Telecommunications Programs ........................ 33,971,000 Provisions: 1. Notwithstanding any other law, upon request of the Public Utilities Commission, the Director of Finance may change the amount available for expenditure in this item to pay expenses related to printing and mailing costs chargeable to the Universal Lifeline Telephone Service Trust Administrative Committee Fund. No later than 10 days after the augmentation is made, notification in writing to the chairpersons of the committees in each house of the Legislature that consider appropriations and the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee. The amount of funds augmented pursuant to the authority of this provision shall be consistent with the amount approved by the Department of Finance based on its review of the printing, mailing, and expenses related to administration of the Universal Lifeline Telephone Service program. 8660-001-0483—For support of Public Utilities Commission, payable from the Deaf and Disabled Telecommunications Program Administrative Committee Fund ........................ 64,879,000 Schedule: (1) 6685037-Deaf and Disabled Telecommunications Program ........................ 64,879,000 8660-001-0493—For support of Public Utilities Commission, payable from the California Teleconnect Fund Administrative Committee Fund ........................ 3,431,000 Schedule: (1) 6685055-California Teleconnect Fund Program ........................ 3,431,000 8660-001-0890—For support of Public Utilities Commission, payable from the Federal Trust Fund ........................ 12,693,000 Schedule: (1) 6680055-Energy ........................ 6,098,000 (2) 6690064-Rail Transit Safety ........................ 6,595,000 Provisions: 1. The funds appropriated in this item shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2027. 8660-001-3089—For support of Public Utilities Commission, payable from the Public Utilities Commission Public Advocate’s Office Account ........................ 57,271,000 Schedule: (1) 6695-Public Advocate’s Office ........................ 60,271,000 (2) Reimbursements to 6695-Public Advocate’s Office ........................ −3,000,000 Provisions: 1. The funds appropriated in this item shall be used only for support of the activities of the Public Advocate’s Office of the Public Utilities Commission and shall not be redirected for any other use by the Public Utilities Commission. 8660-001-3141—For support of Public Utilities Commission, payable from the California Advanced Services Fund ........................ 9,812,000 Schedule: (1) 6685064-California Advanced Services Fund Program ........................ 9,812,000 8660-002-0461—For support of Public Utilities Commission, payable from the Public Utilities Commission Transportation Reimbursement Account ........................ 54,000 Schedule: (1) 6690046-Transportation Licensing and Enforcement ........................ 54,000 Provisions: 1. $54,000 is appropriated from the Public Utilities Commission Transportation Reimbursement Account to establish a memorandum of understanding to reimburse the San Diego Police Department for enforcement operations related to combating wildcatting, also known as unregulated transportation services. The Public Utilities Commission shall submit a report to the Legislature by January 10, 2029, on the status and outcomes of these enforcement actions, including number of operations, number of citations or arrests, costs reimbursed by the commission, and any revenue collected by the enforcement action and which entity received the revenue. 8660-011-0462—For transfer by the Controller from the Public Utilities Commission Utilities Reimbursement Account to the Public Utilities Commission Public Advocate’s Office Account, as prescribed by subdivision (f) of Section 309.5 of the Public Utilities Code ........................ (55,430,000)(60,271,000) Provisions: 1. The Department of Finance may adjust the amounts transferred by this item pursuant to statewide budget adjustments. 8660-101-0464—For local assistance, Public Utilities Commission, pursuant to Section 270 of the Public Utilities Code, payable from the California High-Cost Fund-A Administrative Committee Fund ........................ 47,913,000 Schedule: (1) 6685010-California High-Cost Fund-A Program ........................ 47,913,000 8660-101-0470—For local assistance, Public Utilities Commission, pursuant to Section 270 of the Public Utilities Code, payable from the California High-Cost Fund-B Administrative Committee Fund ........................ 20,777,000 Schedule: (1) 6685019-California High-Cost Fund-B Program ........................ 20,777,000 8660-101-0471—For local assistance, Public Utilities Commission, pursuant to Section 270 of the Public Utilities Code, payable from the Universal Lifeline Telephone Service Trust Administrative Committee Fund ........................ 539,243,000 Schedule: (1) 6685028-Universal Service Telecommunications Programs ........................ 539,243,000 Provisions: 1. Notwithstanding any other law, upon request of the Public Utilities Commission, the Director of Finance may change the amount available for expenditure in this item to pay claims made to the Universal Lifeline Telephone Service Trust Administrative Committee Fund. No later than 10 days after the augmentation is made, notification in writing shall be provided to the chairpersons of the committees in each house of the Legislature that consider appropriations and the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee. The amount of funds augmented pursuant to the authority of this provision shall be consistent with the amount approved by the Department of Finance based on its review of the amount of claims received by the Public Utilities Commission from telecommunications carriers. 8660-101-0483—For local assistance, Public Utilities Commission, pursuant to Section 270 of the Public Utilities Code, payable from the Deaf and Disabled Telecommunications Program Administrative Committee Fund ........................ 210,000 Schedule: (1) 6685037-Deaf and Disabled Telecommunications Program ........................ 210,000 8660-101-0493—For local assistance, Public Utilities Commission, pursuant to Section 270 of the Public Utilities Code, payable from the California Teleconnect Administrative Committee Fund ........................ 105,000,000 Schedule: (1) 6685055-California Teleconnect Fund Program ........................ 105,000,000 Provisions: 1. Notwithstanding any other law, upon request of the Public Utilities Commission, the Department of Finance may augment the amount available for expenditure in this item to pay claims made to the California Teleconnect Fund Administrative Committee Fund Program. The augmentation may be made no sooner than 30 days after notification in writing to the chairpersons of the committees in each house of the Legislature that consider appropriations and the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee. The amount of funds augmented pursuant to the authority of this provision shall be consistent with the amount approved by the Department of Finance based on its review of the amount of claims received by the Public Utilities Commission from telecommunications carriers. 8660-101-3141—For local assistance, Public Utilities Commission, pursuant to Section 270 of the Public Utilities Code, payable from the California Advanced Services Fund ........................ 136,211,000 Schedule: (1) 6685064-California Advanced Services Fund Program ........................ 136,211,000 Provisions: 1. Funds appropriated in this item shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2029. 2. The use of funds appropriated in this item shall be contingent on sufficient revenue being available in the California Advanced Services Fund to support budgeted expenditures. 8660-101-3409—For local assistance, Public Utilities Commission, payable from the Digital Divide Account, California Teleconnect Fund Administrative Committee Fund ........................ 200,000 Schedule: (1) 6685055-California Teleconnect Fund Program ........................ 200,000 8660-490—Reappropriation, Public Utilities Commission. The balances of the appropriations provided in the following citations are reappropriated for the purposes provided for in those appropriations and shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure to June 30, 2030: 0001—​General Fund (1) Up to $8,000,000 in Technical Item 8660-501-0001, Section 7 of Chapter 112, Statutes of 2021, as transferred from Item 8660-062-8506, Budget Act of 2021 (Chs. 21, 69, and 240, Stats. 2021) for administration of Broadband Infrastructure Grants. (2) Up to $67,868,000 from Technical Item 8660-601-0001, as transferred from Item 8660-162-8506, Budget Act of 2021 (Chs. 21, 69, and 240, Stats. 2021), created pursuant to Section 11.96, for Broadband Infrastructure Grants. 8660-491—Reappropriation, Public Utilities Commission. Notwithstanding any other law, the period to liquidate encumbrances of the following citations is extended until April 30, 2027: 0890—Federal Trust Fund (1) Item 8660-001-0890, Budget Act of 2021 (Chs. 21, 69, and 240, Stats. 2021), for Broadband Infrastructure Grants. 8780-001-0001—For support of Milton Marks “Little Hoover” Commission on California State Government Organization and Economy ........................ 1,400,000 Schedule: (1) 6710-Milton Marks “Little Hoover” Commission on California State Government Organization and Economy ........................ 1,400,000 8820-001-0001—For support of Commission on the Status of Women and Girls ........................ 2,194,000 Schedule: (1) 6730-Administration, Legislation, Research, and Information ........................ 2,194,000 8820-001-8079—For support of Commission on the Status of Women and Girls, payable from the Women and Girls Fund ........................ 0 Schedule: (1) 6730-Administration, Legislation, Research, and Information ........................ 2,000 (2) Reimbursements to 6730-Administration, Legislation, Research, and Information ........................ −2,000 8825-001-0001—For support of the California Commission on Asian and Pacific Islander American Affairs ........................ 971,000 Schedule: (1) 6735-Support ........................ 971,000 8830-001-0001—For support of California Law Revision Commission ........................ 0 Schedule: (1) 6740-California Law Revision Commission ........................ 2,577,0003,522,000 (2) Reimbursements to 6740-California Law Revision Commission ........................ −2,577,000−3,522,000 Provisions: 1. Of the reimbursements identified in Schedule (2), the amount of $2,577,000 $3,522,000 shall be paid from the amounts appropriated in Items 0160-001-0001 and 0160-001-9740. 8855-001-0001—For support of California State Auditor’s Office, for transfer to the State Audit Fund ........................ 29,531,000 Schedule: (1) 6760-California State Auditor ........................ 30,956,000 (2) Reimbursements to 6760-California State Auditor ........................ −1,425,000 8855-001-9740—For support of California State Auditor’s Office, for transfer to the State Audit Fund, payable from the Central Service Cost Recovery Fund ........................ 19,476,000 8860-001-0001—For support of Department of Finance ........................ 60,909,000 Schedule: (1) 6770-State Budget ........................ 46,334,000 (2) 6780-State Audits and Evaluations ........................ 17,704,000 (3) 6785-Statewide Accounting Policies, Consulting and Training ........................ 8,612,000 (4) 9900100-Administration ........................ 19,359,000 (5) 9900200-Administration—​Distributed ........................ −19,359,000 (6) Reimbursements to 6770-State Budget ........................ −3,100,000 (7) Reimbursements to 6780-State Audits and Evaluations ........................ −8,516,000 (8) Reimbursements to 6785-Statewide Accounting Policies, Consulting and Training ........................ −125,000 Provisions: 1. Notwithstanding any other law, the Director of Finance may authorize a loan from the General Fund to the Department of Finance for the purpose of meeting operational cashflow obligations for the 2026–27 fiscal year. The loan shall not exceed the estimated amount of uncollected reimbursements for the final quarter of the fiscal year. 2. For the purpose of evaluating and continuing development and enhancement of the Governor’s Budget Presentation System (GBPS), the following provision applies: (a) Notwithstanding any other law, the Department of Finance may amend its existing contract with the internet web development firm to augment and continue consulting services until June 30 of each year, for the purpose of providing continuity of services. 3. Notwithstanding any other law, the Director of Finance is authorized to select private firms or individuals for implementing the requirements of Chapter 496 of the Statutes of 2011. The resulting contracts for services shall not require the review, consent, or approval of the Department of General Services or any other state department or agency as they need not comply with requirements under the Public Contract Code or any other law that otherwise would apply. Such contracts for services may include those terms and conditions that the Director of Finance finds to be in the state’s best interest. 4. Notwithstanding any other law, the Director of Finance is authorized to contract with auditors, lawyers, and other types of advisers and consultants to assist, advise, and represent the director and the Department of Finance in any matter arising out of or contemplated by Parts 1.8 (commencing with Section 34161) and 1.85 (commencing with Section 34170) of Division 24 of the Health and Safety Code. The resulting contracts for services shall not require the review, consent, or approval of the Department of General Services or any other state department or agency as they need not comply with requirements under the Public Contract Code or any other law that otherwise would apply. Such contracts for services may include those terms and conditions that the director finds to be in the state’s best interest. 5. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (2), $625,000 shall be available for the Office of State Audits and Evaluations to perform an audit of the administration of the Statewide Imagination Library Program by the California State Library and Strong Reader Partnership. These funds may be used for costs already incurred to complete the audit. The scope and objectives of the audit shall be defined by the Department of Finance in consultation with the Legislature. A report shall be provided to the Chairperson of the California Senate Subcommittee 1 on Education and the chairpersons of the fiscal committees of each house of the Legislature and the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee by approximately December 31, 2026. 8860-001-9740—For support of Department of Finance, payable from the Central Service Cost Recovery Fund ........................ 37,833,000 Schedule: (1) 6770-State Budget ........................ 27,580,000 (2) 6780-State Audits and Evaluations ........................ 4,834,000 (3) 6785-Statewide Accounting Policies, Consulting and Training ........................ 5,419,000 8880-001-0001—For support of Financial Information System for California ........................ 84,680,000 Schedule: (1) 6890-Statewide Systems Development ........................ 84,680,000 Provisions: 1. It is the intent to continue funding for approved FI$Cal activities, that, due to schedule changes, may decrease costs in one fiscal year and increase costs in a subsequent fiscal year, resulting in a net-zero change to the total approved appropriation. Any unexpended funds from the appropriation in any prior fiscal year are hereby appropriated in augmentation of this item. 2. Funds appropriated in this item, including the funds available in Provision 1, are available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2028. 3. The Department of Finance may augment this item to fund one-time and ongoing increases in software license costs calculated during the current year. 4. Notwithstanding any other law, the Director of Finance may augment this item, but not sooner than 30 days after notification is provided to the chairpersons of the fiscal committees in each house of the Legislature that consider appropriations for this item, or their designees, and the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, or their designee, or not sooner than any lesser time the chairperson of the joint committee or their designee may in each instance determine. The augmentation may only be made to fund workload reported to the Legislature pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 11856) of Chapter 10 of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code and the augmentation amount associated with that workload. 5. Notwithstanding any other law, the Department of Finance may augment this item for costs associated with departmental migrations to the FI$Cal system that were either not anticipated or not funded during the current year. This augmentation may occur not sooner than 30 days after notifying the Joint Legislative Budget Committee. 8880-001-9737—For support of Financial Information System for California, payable from the FI$Cal Internal Services Fund ........................ 0 Schedule: (1) 6890-Statewide Systems Development ........................ 0 Provisions: 1. It is the intent to continue funding for approved FI$Cal Projects, that, due to schedule changes, may decrease costs in one fiscal year and increase costs in a subsequent fiscal year, resulting in a net-zero change to the total approved appropriation. Any unexpended funds from the appropriation in any prior fiscal year are hereby appropriated in augmentation of this item. 2. The Director of Finance may augment this item by an amount not to exceed $3,000,000 for unanticipated customer service costs and equipment purchases. Any increase due to an unanticipated customer service cost or equipment purchase shall not exceed the total estimated cost of the request, as provided in writing to, and approved by, the Department of Finance. Any augmentation of this item shall be reported in writing to the chairpersons of the fiscal committees in each house of the Legislature and the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee no later than 30 days after the date the augmentation is approved. 3. Funds appropriated in this item, including the funds available in Provisions 1 and 2 are available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2028. 8880-001-9740—For support of Financial Information System for California, payable from the Central Service Cost Recovery Fund ........................ 41,098,000 Schedule: (1) 6890-Statewide Systems Development ........................ 41,098,000 Provisions: 1. It is the intent to continue funding for approved FI$Cal activities, that, due to schedule changes, may decrease costs in one fiscal year and increase costs in a subsequent fiscal year, resulting in a net- zero change to the total approved appropriation. Any unexpended funds from the appropriation in any prior fiscal year are hereby appropriated in augmentation of this item. 2. Funds appropriated in this item, including the funds available in Provision 1, are available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2028. 3. The Department of Finance may augment this item to fund one-time and ongoing increases in software license costs calculated during the current year. 8885-001-0001—For support of Commission on State Mandates ........................ 3,259,000 Schedule: (1) 6900-Administration ........................ 3,259,000 Provisions: 1. In the case where the Commission on State Mandates receives one or more county applications for a finding of significant financial distress pursuant to Section 17000.6 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, notwithstanding the provisions of Section 17000.6 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, the time limit imposed on the commission to reach its preliminary and final decisions shall be tolled until such time as the commission has received an appropriation from the Legislature to carry out its duties as prescribed in Section 17000.6 of the Welfare and Institutions Code. 2. The Commission on State Mandates shall, on or before September 15, 2015, and annually thereafter, submit to the Director of Finance a report identifying the workload levels and any backlog for the staff of the commission. 8885-295-0001—For local assistance for reimbursement, in accordance with the provisions of Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution or Section 17561 of the Government Code, of the costs of any new program or increased level of service of an existing program mandated by statute or executive order, for disbursement by the Controller for claims for costs incurred during the specified periods ........................ 87,661,000 Schedule: (1) 6905-Funded Mandates: For payment of the following mandate claims for costs incurred through the 2024–25 fiscal year ........................ 87,661,000 (a) Accounting for Local Revenue Realignments (Ch. 162, Stats. 2003; Ch. 211, Stats. 2004; Ch. 610, Stats. 2004) (05-TC-01) ........................ 0 (b) Allocation of Property Tax Revenues (Ch. 697, Stats. 1992) (CSM 4448) ........................ 625,000 (c) California Public Records Act (Ch. 463, Stats. 1992; Ch. 982, Stats. 2000; Ch. 355, Stats. 2001) (02-TC-10 and 02-TC-51) ........................ 0 (d) Crime Victims’ Domestic Violence Incident Reports (Ch. 1022, Stats. 1999) (99-TC-08) ........................ 238,000 (e) Custody of Minors-Child Abduction and Recovery (Ch. 1399, Stats. 1976; Ch. 162, Stats. 1992; and Ch. 988, Stats. 1996) (CSM 4237) ........................ 8,372,000 (f) Domestic Violence Arrest Policies (Ch. 246, Stats. 1995) (CSM 96-362-02) ........................ 10,515,000 (g) Domestic Violence Arrests and Victims Assistance (Chs. 698 and 702, Stats. 1998) (98-TC-14) ........................ 2,917,000 (h) Domestic Violence Treatment Services (Ch. 183, Stats. 1992) (CSM 96-281-01) ........................ 1,781,000 (i) Health Benefits for Survivors of Peace Officers and Firefighters (Ch. 1120, Stats. 1996) (97-TC-25) ........................ 3,396,000 (j) Local Agency Ethics (Ch. 700, Stats. 2005) (07-TC-04) ........................ 9,000 (k) Medi-Cal Beneficiary Death Notices (Chs. 102 and 1163, Stats. 1981) (CSM 4032) ........................ 20,000 (l) Medi-Cal Eligibility of Juvenile Offenders (Ch. 657, Stats. 2006) (08-TC-04) ........................ 10,000 (m) Peace Officer Personnel Records: Unfounded Complaints and Discovery (Ch. 630, Stats. 1978; Ch. 741, Stats. 1994) (00-TC-24) ........................ 1,291,000 (n) Rape Victim Counseling (Ch. 999, Stats. 1991) (CSM 4426) ........................ 570,000 (o) Sexually Violent Predators (Chs. 762 and 763, Stats. 1995) (CSM 4509) ........................ 13,966,000 (p) State Authorized Risk Assessment Tool for Sex Offenders (Chs. 336, 337, and 886, Stats. 2006; Ch. 579, Stats. 2007) (08-TC-03) ........................ 596,000 (q) Threats Against Peace Officers (Ch. 1249, Stats. 1992; Ch. 666, Stats. 1995) (CSM 96-365-02) ........................ 39,000 (r) Tuberculosis Control (Ch. 676, Stats. 1993; Ch. 685, Stats. 1994; Ch. 116, Stats. 1997; and Ch. 763, Stats. 2002) (03-TC-14) ........................ 162,000 (s) Unitary Countywide Tax Rates (Ch. 921, Stats. 1987) (CSM 4317 and CSM 4355) ........................ 592,000 (t) Post Election Manual Tally (2 Cal. Code Regs., 20120 to 20127, incl.) (10-TC-08) ........................ 0 (u) Sheriffs Court-Security Services (Ch. 22, Stats. 2009) (09-TC-02) ........................ 0 (v) U Visa Form 918, Victims of Crime: Non-Immigrant Status (Ch. 721, Stats. 2015) ........................ 3,248,000 (w) Local Agency Employee Organizations, Impasse Procedures II (Ch. 314, Stats. 2012) ........................ 27,000 (x) Peace Officer Training: Mental Health/Crisis Intervention Mandate (Ch. 469, Stats. 2015) ........................ 423,000 (y) Municipal Storm Water and Urban Runoff Discharges Mandate (Los Angeles Regional Water Quality Control Board Order No. 01-182; Permit CAS004001; Part 4F5c3) ........................ 0 (z) Vote by Mail Ballots: Prepaid Postage (Ch. 120, Stats. 2018) ........................ 3,097,000 (aa) Sexual Assault Evidence Kits: Testing Mandate (Ch. 588, Stats. 2019) ........................ 10,377,000 (bb) Racial and Identity Profiling Mandate (Ch. 466, Stats. 2015; Ch. 328, Stats. 2017) ........................ 24,854,000 (cc) Juveniles: Custodial Interrogation Mandate (Ch. 335, Stats. 2020) ........................ 471,000 (dd) County of Los Angeles Citizens Redistricting Commission (Ch. 781, Stats. 2016) ........................ 38,000 (ee) Disclosure Requirements and Deferral of Property Taxation (Ch. 712, Stats. 2022) (22-TC-06) ........................ 27,000 (2) 6905050-Funded Mandates: For payment of mandate claims for the 2005–06 through 2021–22 fiscal years for the Peace Officers’ Procedural Bill of Rights Act (Ch. 675, Stats. 1990) (CSM 4499) ........................ 0 (3) 6905050-Funded Mandates: For payment of mandate claims for the 2002–03 through 2021–22 fiscal years for the Public Safety Officers Procedural Bill of Rights II (Ch. 465, Stats. 1976; Ch. 786, Stats. 1998; Ch. 209, Stats. 2000; Ch. 170, Stats. 2000) (03-TC-18) ........................ 0 (4) 6905050-Funded Mandates: For payment of mandate claims for the 2001–02 through 2021–22 fiscal years for the Local Government Employment Relations Mandate (Ch. 901, Stats. 2000) (01-TC-30) ........................ 0 (5) 6905050-Funded Mandates: Pursuant to the provisions of Section 17581 of the Government Code, the mandates identified in the following schedule are specifically identified by the Legislature for suspension during the 2026–27 fiscal year ........................ 0 (a) Absentee Ballots (Ch. 77, Stats. 1978 and Ch. 1032, Stats. 2002) (CSM 3713) (b) Absentee Ballots-Tabulation by Precinct (Ch. 697, Stats. 1999) (00-TC-08) (c) AIDS/Search Warrant (Ch. 1088, Stats. 1988) (CSM 4392) (d) Airport Land Use Commission/Plans (Ch. 644, Stats. 1994) (CSM 4507) (e) Animal Adoption (Ch. 752, Stats. 1998 and Ch. 313, Stats. 2004) (04-PGA-01 and 98-TC-11) (f) Brendon Maguire Act (Ch. 391, Stats. 1988) (CSM 4357) (g) Conservatorship: Developmentally Disabled Adults (Ch. 1304, Stats. 1980) (04-LM-13) (h) Coroners’ Costs (Ch. 498, Stats. 1977) (04-LM-07) (i) Crime Statistics Reports for the Department of Justice (Ch. 1172, Stats. 1989; Ch. 1338, Stats. 1992; Ch. 1230, Stats. 1993; Ch. 933, Stats. 1998; Ch. 571, Stats. 1999; and Ch. 626, Stats. 2000) (02-TC-04 and 02-TC-11) and Crime Statistics Reports for the Department of Justice Amended (Ch. 700, Stats. 2004) (07-TC-10) (j) Crime Victims’ Domestic Violence Incident Reports II (Ch. 483, Stats. 2001; Ch. 833, Stats. 2002) (02-TC-18) (k) Developmentally Disabled Attorneys’ Services (Ch. 694, Stats. 1975) (04-LM-03) (l) DNA Database & Amendments to Postmortem Examinations: Unidentified Bodies (Ch. 822, Stats. 2000; Ch. 467, Stats. 2001) (00-TC-27 and 02-TC-39) (m) Domestic Violence Background Checks (Ch. 713, Stats. 2001) (01-TC-29) (n) Domestic Violence Information (Ch. 1609, Stats. 1984 and Ch. 668, Stats. 1985) (CSM 4222) (o) Elder Abuse, Law Enforcement Training (Ch. 444, Stats. 1997) (98-TC-12) (p) Extended Commitment, Youth Authority (Ch. 267, Stats. 1998 and Ch. 546, Stats. 1984) (98-TC-13) (q) False Reports of Police Misconduct (Ch. 590, Stats. 1995 and Ch. 289, Stats. 2000) (00-TC-26) (r) Firearm Hearings for Discharged Inpatients (Ch. 578, Stats. 1999) (99-TC-11) (s) Grand Jury Proceedings (Ch. 1170, Stats. 1996; Ch. 443, Stats. 1997; and Ch. 230, Stats. 1998) (98-TC-27) (t) Interagency Child Abuse and Neglect (ICAN) Investigation Reports (Ch. 958, Stats. 1977; Ch. 1071, Stats. 1980; Ch. 435, Stats. 1981; Chs. 162 and 905, Stats. 1982; Chs. 1423 and 1613, Stats. 1984; Ch. 1598, Stats. 1985; Chs. 1289 and 1496, Stats. 1986; Chs. 82, 531, and 1459, Stats. 1987; Chs. 269, 1497, and 1580, Stats. 1988; Ch. 153, Stats. 1989; Chs. 650, 1330, 1363, and 1603, Stats. 1990; Chs. 163, 459, and 1338, Stats. 1992; Chs. 219 and 510, Stats. 1993; Chs. 1080 and 1081, Stats. 1996; Chs. 842, 843, and 844, Stats. 1997; Chs. 475 and 1012, Stats. 1999; and Ch. 916, Stats. 2000) (00-TC-22) (u) Identity Theft (Ch. 956, Stats. 2000) (03-TC-08) (v) In-Home Supportive Services II (Ch. 445, Stats. 2000 and Ch. 90, Stats. 1999) (00-TC-23) (w) Inmate AIDS Testing (Ch. 1579, Stats. 1988 and Ch. 768, Stats. 1991) (CSM 4369 and CSM 4429) (x) Judiciary Proceedings (Ch. 644, Stats. 1980) (CSM 4366) (y) Law Enforcement Sexual Harassment Training (Ch. 126, Stats. 1993) (97-TC-07) (z) Local Coastal Plans (Ch. 1330, Stats. 1976) (CSM 4431) (aa) Mandate Reimbursement Process (Ch. 486, Stats. 1975 and Ch. 1459, Stats. 1984) (CSM 4204 and CSM 4485) (bb) Mandate Reimbursement Process II (Ch. 890, Stats. 2004) (05-TC-05) (Suspension of Mandate Reimbursement Process and Mandate Reimbursement Process II includes suspension of the Consolidation of Mandate Reimbursement Processes I and II) (cc) Mentally Disordered Offenders: Treatment as a Condition of Parole (Ch. 228, Stats. 1989 and Ch. 706, Stats. 1994) (00-TC-28 and 05-TC-06) (dd) Mentally Disordered Offenders’ Extended Commitments Proceedings (Ch. 435, Stats. 1991; Ch. 1418, Stats. 1985; Ch. 858, Stats. 1986; Ch. 687, Stats. 1987; Chs. 657 and 658, Stats. 1988; Ch. 228, Stats. 1989; and Ch. 324, Stats. 2000) (98-TC-09) (ee) Mentally Disordered Sex Offenders’ Recommitments (Ch. 1036, Stats. 1978) (04-LM-09) (ff) Mentally Retarded Defendants Representation (Ch. 1253, Stats. 1980) (04-LM-12) (gg) Missing Persons Report (Ch. 1456, Stats. 1988 and Ch. 59, Stats. 1993) (CSM 4255, CSM 4368, and CSM 4484) (hh) Modified Primary Election (Ch. 898, Stats. 2000) (01-TC-13) (ii) Not Guilty by Reason of Insanity (Ch. 1114, Stats. 1979 and Ch. 650, Stats. 1982) (CSM 2753) (05-PGA-35) (jj) Open Meetings Act/Brown Act Reform (Ch. 641, Stats. 1986 and Chs. 1136, 1137, and 1138, Stats. 1993) (CSM 4257 and CSM 4469) (kk) Pacific Beach Safety: Water Quality and Closures (Ch. 961, Stats. 1992) (CSM 4432) (ll) Perinatal Services (Ch. 1603, Stats. 1990) (CSM 4397) (05-PGA-38) (mm) Permanent Absent Voters II (Ch. 922, Stats. 2001; Ch. 664, Stats. 2002; and Ch. 347, Stats. 2003) (03-TC-11) (nn) Personal Safety Alarm Devices (8 Cal. Code Regs. 3401 (c)) (CSM 4087) (oo) Photographic Record of Evidence (Ch. 875, Stats. 1985; Ch. 734, Stats. 1986; and Ch. 382, Stats. 1990) (98-TC-07) (pp) Pocket Masks (Ch. 1334, Stats. 1987) (CSM 4291) (qq) Post Conviction: DNA Court Proceedings (Ch. 821, Stats. 2000 and Ch. 943, Stats. 2001) (00-TC-21 and 01-TC-08) (rr) Postmortem Examinations: Unidentified Bodies, Human Remains (Ch. 284, Stats. 2000) (00-TC-18) (ss) Prisoner Parental Rights (Ch. 820, Stats. 1991) (CSM 4427) (tt) Senior Citizens Property Tax Postponement (Ch. 1242, Stats. 1977 and Ch. 43, Stats. 1978) (CSM 4359) (uu) Sex Crime Confidentiality (Ch. 502, Stats. 1992; Ch. 36, 1993–94 1st Ex. Sess.; and Ch. 555, Stats. 1993) (98-TC-21) (vv) Sex Offenders: Disclosure by Law Enforcement Officers (Chs. 908 and 909, Stats. 1996; Chs. 17, 80, 817, 818, 819, 820, and 822, Stats. 1997; and Chs. 485, 550, 927, 928, 929, and 930, Stats. 1998) (97-TC-15) (ww) SIDS Autopsies (Ch. 955, Stats. 1989) (CSM 4393) (xx) SIDS Contacts by Local Health Officers (Ch. 268, Stats. 1991) (CSM 4424) (yy) SIDS Training for Firefighters (Ch. 1111, Stats. 1989) (CSM 4412) (zz) Stolen Vehicle Notification (Ch. 337, Stats. 1990) (CSM 4403) (aaa) Structural and Wildland Firefighter Safety Clothing and Equipment (8 Cal. Code Regs., 3401 to 3410, incl.) (CSM 4261 and CSM 4281) (bbb) Very High Fire Hazard Severity Zones (Ch. 1188, Stats. 1992; Ch. 843, Stats. 1994; and Ch. 333, Stats. 1995) (97-TC-13) (ccc) Voter Identification Procedures (Ch. 260, Stats. 2000) (03-TC-23) (ddd) Voter Registration Procedures (Ch. 704, Stats. 1975) (04-LM-04) (eee) California Regional Water Quality Control Board, Santa Ana Region (Order No. R8-2009-0030) (09-TC-03) (For the period of June 1, 2009 to December 31, 2017) (fff) California Regional Water Quality Control Board, San Diego Region (Order No. R9-2010-0016) (11-TC-03) (For the period of November 10, 2010 to December 31, 2017) (ggg) California Regional Water Quality Control Board, San Diego Region (Order No. R9-2009-0002) (10-TC-11) (For the period of December 16, 2009 to December 31, 2017) (hhh) California Regional Water Quality Control Board, Santa Ana Region (Order No. R8-2010-0033) (10-TC-07) (For the period of January 29, 2010 to December 31, 2017) Provisions: 1. Allocations of funds provided in this item to the appropriate local entities shall be made by the Controller in accordance with the provisions of each statute or executive order that mandates the reimbursement of the costs, and shall be audited to verify the actual amount of the mandated costs in accordance with subdivision (d) of Section 17561 of the Government Code. Audit adjustments to prior-year claims may be paid from this item. The funds appropriated in this item shall be allocated only for the payment of claims as required by Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 17550) of Part 7 of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code, and that payment shall be made pursuant to Article 5 (commencing with Section 17615) of that chapter. Notwithstanding any other law, interest shall be paid from funds appropriated in this item only to the extent, and in the amount, authorized by Section 17561.5 of the Government Code. 2. The Controller shall offset payments made from the appropriation in this item to recoup the amount of any unallowable mandate claim costs determined by desk or field audits. 3. Notwithstanding any other law, accounts receivable for recoveries that result in savings as described in this item shall have no effect upon the positive balance of the General Fund. The savings may be used to pay claims for costs incurred to carry out the cited state mandates in this item. 8885-295-0044—For local assistance, Department of Motor Vehicles, payable from the Motor Vehicle Account, State Transportation Fund, for reimbursement, in accordance with the provisions of Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution or Section 17561 of the Government Code, of the costs of any new program or increased level of service of an existing program mandated by statute or executive order, for disbursement by the Controller for claims for costs incurred through the 2024–25 fiscal year ........................ 2,885,000 Schedule: (1) 6905005-Administrative License Suspension Mandates: Per Se (Ch. 1460, Stats. 1989) (98-TC-16) ........................ 2,885,000 Provisions: 1. Allocations of funds provided in this item to the appropriate local entities shall be made by the Controller in accordance with the provisions of each statute or executive order that mandates the reimbursement of the costs, and shall be audited to verify the actual amount of the mandated costs in accordance with subdivision (d) of Section 17561 of the Government Code. Audit adjustments to prior-year claims may be paid from this item. Funds appropriated in this item may be used to provide reimbursement pursuant to Article 5 (commencing with Section 17615) of Chapter 4 of Part 7 of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code. 8885-295-0106—For local assistance, Department of Pesticide Regulation, payable from the Department of Pesticide Regulation Fund for reimbursement, in accordance with the provisions of Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution or Section 17561 of the Government Code, of the costs of any new program or increased level of service of an existing program mandated by statute or executive order, for disbursement by the Controller for claims for costs incurred through the 2024–25 fiscal year ........................ 61,000 Schedule: (1) 6905014-Pesticide Use Reports: (Ch. 1200, Stats. 1989) (CSM 4420) ........................ 61,000 Provisions: 1. Allocations of funds provided in this item to the appropriate local entities shall be made by the Controller in accordance with the provisions of each statute or executive order that mandates the reimbursement of the costs, and shall be audited to verify the actual amount of the mandated costs in accordance with subdivision (d) of Section 17561 of the Government Code. Audit adjustments to prior-year claims may be paid from this item. Funds appropriated in this item may be used to provide reimbursement pursuant to Article 5 (commencing with Section 17615) of Chapter 4 of Part 7 of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code. 8940-001-0001—For support of Military Department ........................ 161,626,000 Schedule: (1) 6911-National Guard ........................ 154,735,000 (2) 6912-Youth & Community Programs ........................ 24,299,000 (3) Reimbursements to 6911-National Guard ........................ −17,298,000 (4) Reimbursements to 6912-Youth & Community Programs ........................ −110,000 Provisions: 1. Expenditures shall not be made from the funds appropriated in this item as a substitution for personnel, equipment, facilities, or other assistance, or for any portion thereof, that, in the absence of the expenditure, or of this appropriation, would be available to the Adjutant General, the California State Military, or the State Military Reserve from the federal government. 2. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (1), $480,000 shall be for military retirements, in accordance with Sections 228 and 256 of the Military and Veterans Code. 3. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $1,763,000 shall be used to provide mandatory employee compensation increases for state active duty employees. The funds provided in this provision shall be expended pursuant to Sections 320 and 321 of the Military and Veterans Code, which require state active duty employees to receive the same compensation increases as their counterparts on federal active duty. Any unspent funds subject to this provision shall revert to the General Fund. 4. Annually on March 1, the Military Department shall submit a report to the fiscal committees of each house of the Legislature for the Job Challenge Program with the following: (a) the program completion rate; (b) the rate of job placement in the field of study; and (c) the rate of continued employment 12 months after completion of the program based on responses from program graduates. 5. Of the amount appropriated in Schedules (1) and (2), $37,000,000 is available for payments made in advance of offsets from Federal Trust Fund recoveries. The Military Department shall separate this amount from its operating budget in its accounting system and provide quarterly reports to the Department of Finance that reflect the updated appropriation authority for operations. 6. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (1), up to $1,301,000 shall be used for the California Cybersecurity Integration Center. 7. Information sharing by the California Cybersecurity Integration Center shall be conducted in a manner that protects the privacy and civil liberties of individuals, safeguards sensitive information, preserves business confidentiality, and enables public officials to detect, investigate, respond to, and prevent cyberattacks that threaten public health and safety, economic stability, and national security. 8. Notwithstanding any other law, the Director of Finance may authorize a loan from the General Fund to the Military Department for cashflow purposes in an amount not to exceed $30,000,000, subject to the following conditions: (a) The loan is to meet cash needs resulting from a delay in reimbursements. (b) The loan is for a short term and shall be repaid upon order of the Director of Finance. (c) Interest charges may be waived pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 16314 of the Government Code. (d) Within 15 days of authorizing the loan, the Department of Finance shall provide written notification to the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee and the chairpersons of the committees in each house that consider appropriations. 9. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (1), $15,000,000 shall be available for Counterdrug Task Force drug interdiction activities supporting local, state, federal, and tribal law enforcement agencies. Priority shall be given to activities targeting heroin, fentanyl, methamphetamine, cocaine, and other illegal drugs that can cause overdose deaths. The Military Department shall submit a report on how this funding was used on an annual basis, beginning October 1, 2026, until all funds have been spent. For each request, the report shall provide, at minimum, the name of the requesting agency, the type of illicit substances targeted, the level and type of resources requested, reasons for denying or partially approving a request, and the outcomes achieved, including the amount of illicit substances seized. 10. Upon order of the Department of Finance, the amount available for expenditure in Schedules (1) and (2) may be augmented by an amount sufficient for the Military Department to cover cost increases for pay, basic allowances for housing and subsistence, cost-of-living, and salary driven benefit adjustments for state active duty employees following passage of a federal active duty compensation increase in the federal budget. Any augmentation shall be made no sooner than 30 days after notification in writing to the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee and the fiscal committees in each house of the Legislature, or no sooner than whatever lesser time the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, or the chairperson’s designee, may determine. Any notification made pursuant to this provision shall include the fiscal assumptions used to calculate the necessary augmentation, including, but not limited to, information on how the Military Department calculated the cost increases for the Basic Allowance for Housing and Cost of Living Adjustments for state active duty employees. 8940-001-0485—For support of Military Department, payable from the Armory Discretionary Improvement Account ........................ 136,000 Schedule: (1) 6911-National Guard ........................ 136,000 8940-001-0890—For support of Military Department, payable from the Federal Trust Fund ........................ 174,642,000 Schedule: (1) 6911-National Guard ........................ 143,861,000 (2) 6912-Youth & Community Programs ........................ 30,781,000 Provisions: 1. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $1,969,000 shall be used to provide mandatory employee compensation increases for state active duty employees and shall only be available for expenditure upon passage of a federal active duty compensation increase in the federal budget. The funds provided in this provision shall be expended pursuant to Sections 320 and 321 of the Military and Veterans Code, which require state active duty employees to receive the same compensation increases as their counterparts on federal active duty. 2. Upon order of the Department of Finance, the amount available for expenditure in Schedules (1) and (2) may be augmented by an amount sufficient for the Military Department to cover cost increases for pay, basic allowances for housing and subsistence, cost-of-living, and salary driven benefit adjustments for state active duty employees following passage of a federal active duty compensation increase in the federal budget. Any augmentation shall be made no sooner than 30 days after notification in writing to the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee and the fiscal committees in each house of the Legislature, or no sooner than whatever lesser time the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, or the chairperson’s designee, may determine. Any notification made pursuant to this provision shall include the fiscal assumptions used to calculate the necessary augmentation, including, but not limited to, information on how the Military Department calculated the cost increases for the basic allowance for housing and cost-of-living adjustments for state active duty employees. 3. Upon approval and order of the Department of Finance, for the period from July 1 to September 30 of each year, the amount available for expenditure in Schedule (1) and Schedule (2) may be augmented by an amount sufficient to cover the costs associated with the Military Department entering into unanticipated agreements made with the National Guard Bureau. The Director of Finance must notify the chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee in writing within 10 days of adjusting any amount under this provision. Any notification made pursuant to this provision shall include a spending plan listing the intended projects to be supported by the additional funds. 4. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (1), $20,000,000 is available for encumbrance or expenditure until September 30, 2027, to support activities related to the maintenance and repair of military facilities. 8940-001-3085—For support of Military Department, payable from the Behavioral Health Services Fund ........................ 1,977,000 Schedule: (1) 6911-National Guard ........................ 1,977,000 Provisions: 1. Upon order of the Department of Finance and subject to available resources, the amount available for expenditure in Schedule (1) may be augmented by an amount sufficient for the Military Department to cover cost increases for pay, basic allowances for housing and subsistence, cost-of-living, and salary driven benefit adjustments for state active duty employees following passage of a federal active duty compensation increase in the federal budget. Any augmentation shall be made no sooner than 30 days after notification in writing to the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee and the fiscal committees in each house of the Legislature, or no sooner than whatever lesser time the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, or the chairperson’s designee, may determine. Any notification made pursuant to this provision shall include the fiscal assumptions used to calculate the necessary augmentation, including, but not limited to, information on how the Military Department calculated the cost increases for the basic allowance for housing and cost-of-living adjustments for state active duty employees. 8940-001-3427—For support of Military Department, payable from the Army Facilities Program Agreement Income Fund ........................ 2,500,000 Schedule: (1) 6911-National Guard ........................ 2,500,000 8940-002-0001—For support of Military Department ........................ 50,714,000 Schedule: (1) 6911-National Guard ........................ 53,714,000 (2) Reimbursements to 6911-National Guard ........................ −3,000,000 Provisions: 1. The funds appropriated in this item shall be available for wildfire suppression and prevention activities, including fuel reduction efforts, performed by the Military Department in conjunction with the Department of Forestry and Fire Protection. 2. Upon order of the Department of Finance, the amount available for expenditure in Schedule (1) may be augmented by an amount sufficient for the Military Department to cover cost increases for pay, basic allowances for housing and subsistence, cost-of-living, and salary driven benefit adjustments for state active duty employees following passage of a federal active duty compensation increase in the federal budget. Any augmentation shall be made no sooner than 30 days after notification in writing to the chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee and the fiscal committees in each house of the Legislature, or no sooner than whatever lesser time the chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, or the chairperson’s designee, may determine. Any notification made pursuant to this provision shall include the fiscal assumptions used to calculate the necessary augmentation, including, but not limited to, information on how the Military Department calculated the cost increases for the basic allowance for housing and cost-of-living adjustments for state active duty employees. 8940-101-0001—For local assistance, Military Department ........................ 60,000 Schedule: (1) 6911-National Guard ........................ 60,000 Provisions: 1. Funds appropriated in this item are for benefit payments related to the California National Guard Surviving Spouses and Children Relief Act of 2004 pursuant to Section 850 of the Military and Veterans Code. 8940-101-8078—For local assistance, Military Department, payable from the California Military Department Support Fund ........................ 250,000 Schedule: (1) 6911-National Guard ........................ 250,000 Provisions: 1. The Director of Finance may authorize the augmentation of the total amount available for expenditure under this item in the amount of any donations from the private sector received by the Military Department that are in excess of the amount appropriated in this item. Any augmentation shall be accompanied by a spending plan submitted by the Military Department. The spending plan shall include, at a minimum, the source and level of donations received to date, a detailed description of activities already completed and those activities proposed, the source and amount of any additional donations expected to be received, and the identification of any impact of the spending plan on other state funds. An approval of augmentation of this item shall be effective not sooner than 30 days after the transmittal of the approval and spending plan to the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, or not sooner than whatever lesser time the chairperson of the joint committee, or the chairperson’s designee, may determine. 8940-301-0604—For capital outlay, Military Department, payable from the Armory Fund ........................ 7,808,000 Schedule: (1) 0014843-Los Alamitos: Battalion Headquarters Readiness Center ........................ 7,808,000 (a) Peliminary Preliminary plans ........................ 7,808,000 Provisions: 1. Notwithstanding Section 10107 of the Public Contract Code, the project identified in this item shall be under the sole charge and direct control of the Department of General Services. 8940-490—Reappropriation, Military Department. The amounts specified in the following citations are reappropriated for the purposes provided for in those appropriations and shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure as specified: 0001—​General Fund (1) Up to $4,750,000 appropriated in Provision 11, Item 8940-001-0001, Budget Act of 2025 (Chs. 4 and 5, Stats. 2025) shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2028. (2) $50,000 appropriated in Provision 9 of Item 8940-001-0001, Budget Act of 2021 (Chs. 21, 69, and 240, Stats. 2021) shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2028. 8955-001-0001—For support of Department of Veterans Affairs ........................ 512,028,000 Schedule: (1) 6995010-Claims Representation ........................ 17,238,000 (2) 6995028-Cemetery Operations ........................ 2,623,000 (3) 7000010-Headquarters ........................ 62,831,000 (4) 7000019-Veterans Home of California at Yountville ........................ 143,777,000 (5) 7000028-Veterans Home of California at Barstow ........................ 30,595,000 (6) 7000037-Veterans Home of California at Chula Vista ........................ 52,310,000 (7) 7000046-Veterans Home of California-Greater Los Angeles Ventura County—​GLAVC ........................ 100,464,000 (8) 7000055-Veterans Home of California at Redding ........................ 38,063,000 (9) 7000064-Veterans Home of California at Fresno ........................ 64,846,000 (10) 9900100-Administration ........................ 71,096,000 (11) 9900200-Administration—​Distributed ........................ −71,096,000 (12) Reimbursements to 6995010- Claims Representation ........................ −711,000 (13) Reimbursements to 6995028-Cemetery Operations ........................ −8,000 (14) Reimbursements to 7000010-Headquarters ........................ 0 Provisions: 1. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $892,000 shall be expended only for the replacement of equipment and furnishings directly related to the care of the members at Veterans’ Home of California. 2. Notwithstanding any other law, the Department of Veterans Affairs is not required to comply with Chapter 615 of the Statutes of 2006 during the 2026–27 fiscal year because no appropriation has been provided to support the activities required by Chapter 615 of the Statutes of 2006. 8955-001-0083—For support of Department of Veterans Affairs, payable from the Veterans Service Office Fund ........................ 46,000 Schedule: (1) 6995010-Claims Representation ........................ 46,000 8955-001-0238—For support of Department of Veterans Affairs, payable from the Northern California Veterans Cemetery Perpetual Maintenance Fund ........................ 60,000 Schedule: (1) 6995028-Cemetery Operations ........................ 60,000 8955-001-0592—For support of Department of Veterans Affairs, payable from the Veterans’ Farm and Home Building Fund of 1943 ........................ 3,781,000 Schedule: (1) 6990010-Property Acquisition ........................ 3,781,000 8955-001-0890—For support of Department of Veterans Affairs, payable from the Federal Trust Fund ........................ 3,551,000 Schedule: (1) 6995010-Claims Representation ........................ 3,023,000 (2) 6995028-Cemetery Operations ........................ 528,000 8955-001-3013—For support of Department of Veterans Affairs, payable from the California Central Coast State Veterans Cemetery at Fort Ord Operations Fund ........................ 65,000 Schedule: (1) 6995028-Cemetery Operations ........................ 65,000 8955-001-3085—For support of Department of Veterans Affairs, payable from the Behavioral Health Services Fund ........................ 320,000 Schedule: (1) 6995010-Claims Representation ........................ 320,000 8955-001-6082—For support of Department of Veterans Affairs, payable from the Housing for Veterans Fund ........................ 535,000 Schedule: (1) 6995010-Claims Representation ........................ 535,000 8955-011-8048—For transfer by the Controller, upon the order of the Director of Finance, from the California Central Coast State Veterans Cemetery at Fort Ord Endowment Fund to the California Central Coast State Veterans Cemetery at Fort Ord Operations Fund ........................ (90,000) 8955-017-0001—For support of Department of Veterans Affairs, for implementation of the federal Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996 ........................ 178,000 Schedule: (1) 7000010-Headquarters ........................ 178,000 8955-093-0001—For support of Department of Veterans Affairs, for rental payments on lease-revenue bonds ........................ 50,246,000 Schedule: (1) 7000019-Veterans Home of California at Yountville ........................ 29,879,000 (2) 7000046-Veterans Home of California—​Greater Los Angeles Ventura County—​GLAVC ........................ 8,848,000 (3) 7000055-Veterans Home of California at Redding ........................ 935,000 (4) 7000064-Veterans Home of California at Fresno ........................ 10,584,000 Provisions: 1. The Controller shall transfer funds appropriated in this item for base rental as and when provided for in the schedule submitted by the State Public Works Board. Notwithstanding the payment dates in any related Facility Lease or Indenture, the schedule may provide for an earlier transfer of funds to ensure debt requirements are met and pay base rental in full when due. 2. The Controller shall transfer for additional rental no later than 30 days after enactment of this budget, $505,000 of the amount appropriated in this item, to the Expense Account in the Public Buildings Construction Fund. 3. This item may be adjusted pursuant to Section 4.30. Any adjustments to this item shall be reported to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee pursuant to Section 4.30. 8955-101-0001—For local assistance, Department of Veterans Affairs, for contribution to counties toward compensation and expenses of county veterans services offices, to be expended in accordance with Section 972 and following of the Military and Veterans Code ........................ 11,000,00032,000,000 Schedule: (1) 6995019-County Subvention ........................ 11,838,00032,838,000 (2) Reimbursements to 6995019-County Subvention ........................ −838,000 Provisions: 1. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $7,000,000 shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2029, for the Veterans Support to Self-Reliance Program. 2. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $2,000,000 shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2029, for the Transgender Discharged Service Members Program. 3. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $6,000,000 shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2029, for County Veterans Services Offices. 4. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $6,000,000 shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2029, for the Southern California Veterans Cemetery. 8955-101-0083—For local assistance, Department of Veterans Affairs, county veterans services offices, payable from the Veterans Service Office Fund ........................ 1,000,000 Schedule: (1) 6995019-County Subvention ........................ 1,000,000 8955-101-3085—For local assistance, Department of Veterans Affairs, payable from the Behavioral Health Services Fund ........................ 1,270,000 Schedule: (1) 6995019-County Subvention ........................ 1,270,000 8955-301-0890—For capital outlay, Department of Veterans Affairs, payable from the Federal Trust Fund ........................ 209,342,000 Schedule: (1) 0000706-Veterans Home of California, Yountville: Skilled Nursing Facility ........................ 209,342,000 (a) Design-build ........................ 209,342,000 8955-301-3313—For capital outlay, Department of Veterans Affairs, payable from the Southern California Veterans Cemetery Master Development Fund ........................ 10,000,000 Schedule: (1) 0017230-Southern California Veterans Cemetery – Phase 1 ........................ 10,000,000 (a) Preliminary plans ........................ 4,309,000 (b) Working drawings ........................ 5,017,000 (c) Construction ........................ 674,000 Provisions: 1. The project identified in Schedule 1 of this item shall be located at Gypsum Canyon. 2. The funds appropriated in this item shall be available for encumbrance until June 30, 2029. 3. Funding provided in Schedule (1)(c) of this item is limited to the purposes described in Provision 4 of this item. 4. If the Department of Veterans Affairs finds that doing so is in the best interests of the state, notwithstanding any other law, the Department of General Services, on behalf of the Department of Veterans Affairs, may enter into agreements with the Orange County Cemetery District or other local governmental entities to undertake design or construction work on the site of the project identified in Schedule 1 of this item. An agreement described in this provision shall be exempt from Part 2 (commencing with Section 10100) of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code, and from the State Administrative Manual and State Contracting Manual. 5. Notwithstanding the selection process in Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 4525) of Division 5 of Title 1 of the Government Code, the Department of General Services may contract directly with any firm determined to be qualified to provide architectural, landscape architectural, engineering, environmental, construction management, or land surveying services for the development of the project identified in Schedule 1 of this item. 8955-491—Reappropriation, Department of Veterans Affairs. Notwithstanding any other law, the period to liquidate encumbrances of the following citations is extended to June 30, 2027: 0001—General Fund (1) Up to $2,390,000 in Item 8955-001-0001, Budget Act of 2023 (Chs. 12, 38, and 189, Stats. 2023), for the CalVet Electronic Health Record Project. 9100-101-0001—For local assistance, Tax Relief ........................ 400,001,000 Schedule: (1) 7500-Homeowners’ Property Tax Relief ........................ 400,000,000 (2) 7505-Subventions for Open Space ........................ 1,000 Provisions: 1. The amount appropriated in Schedule (1) is for reimbursement to local taxing authorities for revenue lost by reason of the homeowners’ property tax exemption granted pursuant to subdivision (k) of Section 3 of Article XIII of the California Constitution. The appropriation made in that schedule shall be in lieu of the appropriation required pursuant to Section 25 of Article XIII of the California Constitution and the appropriation for the same purposes contained in Section 16100 or 16120 of the Government Code. 2. Notwithstanding any other law, the Director of Finance may authorize expenditures for Schedule (1) in excess of or less than the amount appropriated not sooner than 30 days after notification in writing of the necessity therefor is provided to the chairpersons of the fiscal committees of each house of the Legislature and the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, or not sooner than whatever lesser time the chairperson of the joint committee, or the chairperson’s designee, may in each instance determine. 3. The amount appropriated in Schedule (2) is for providing reimbursement to local taxing authorities for revenue lost by reason of the assessment of open-space lands under Sections 423, 423.3, 423.4, and 423.5 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, and in accordance with Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 16140) of Part 1 of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code. The appropriation made in that schedule shall be in lieu of the appropriation for the same purpose contained in Section 16100 or 16140 of the Government Code. The Controller shall allocate these funds in accordance with Section 16144 of the Government Code. The Controller shall reduce all payments on a pro rata basis as necessary so that the total of all payments does not exceed the amount appropriated in Schedule (2). 9100-111-0001—For transfer by the Controller, upon order of the Director of Finance, to the Senior Citizens and Disabled Citizens Property Tax Postponement Fund ........................ 3,000,000 Provisions: 1. Upon approval of the Director of Finance, the amount appropriated in this item is available for transfer subject to a review of Property Tax Postponement Program expenditures and the related fund condition statement. 9210-101-3445—For local assistance, Local Government Financing, payable from the Historic Venue Restoration and Resiliency Fund ........................ 2,599,000 Schedule: (1) 7540-Aid to Local Government ........................ 2,599,000 9210-104-0001—For transfer by the Controller, upon order of the Department of Finance, to the Historic Venue Restoration and Resiliency Fund ........................ 2,599,000 Provisions: 1. The amount appropriated in this item shall be transferred upon order of the Department of Finance to the Historic Venue Restoration and Resiliency Fund in the State Treasury pursuant to Section 7103 of the Revenue and Taxation Code. The transferred funds shall be allocated by the Controller’s Office within 30 days of the enactment of the 2026 Budget Act, as specified in the aforementioned code section. 9210-110-0001—For local assistance, Local Government Financing, to be allocated by the Controller ........................ 80,000,000 Schedule: (1) 7540-Aid to Local Government ........................ 80,000,000 Provisions: 1. Upon receipt of an allocation schedule from the Director of Finance or their designee, the Controller shall remit the funds appropriated in this item to city and county governments for local purposes. 2. Of the amount appropriated in this item, $181,000 is to reimburse the County of Alpine for shortfalls incurred in the 2024–25 fiscal year, $2,869,000 is to reimburse the County of Mono for shortfalls incurred in the 2024–25 fiscal year, and $76,950,000 is to reimburse the County of San Mateo for shortfalls incurred in the 2024–25 fiscal year, for purposes related to the countywide adjustment amount authorized by Section 97.68 of the Revenue and Taxation Code and the vehicle license fee adjustment amount authorized by Section 97.70 of the Revenue and Taxation Code. 3. The Director of Finance may augment this item by up to $80,039,744 to reimburse shortfalls for the County of San Mateo that occurred in the 2023–24 and 2024–25 fiscal years. Any augmentation shall be authorized not sooner than 30 days after notification in writing to the chairpersons of the committees in each house of the Legislature that consider appropriations, the chairpersons of the committees and appropriate subcommittees that consider the State Budget, and the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, or not sooner than whatever lesser time the chairperson of the joint committee, or the chairperson’s designee, may determine. 9285-101-0001—For local assistance, payment to counties for Trial Court Security—​Court Construction, to be allocated by the Controller ........................ 20,000,000 Schedule: (1) 7580-Trial Court Security ........................ 20,000,000 Provisions: 1. The amount appropriated in this item is to provide payment to counties for increased trial court security staff as a result of court construction projects that had an occupancy date on or after October 9, 2011. 2. Counties may be eligible and may apply for funding from the Department of Finance if they demonstrate that, as a result of projects described in Provision 1, there is an overall effect of increasing costs to the county sheriff for court security. The Department of Finance may allocate funds upon a determination that additional funding is warranted under Section 69927 of the Government Code. 3. Funding requests may be submitted to the Department of Finance at any time, but requests shall be submitted by March 1, 2027, to be considered for funding in the 2026–27 fiscal year. Each county requesting additional trial court security staff as a result of the state’s construction of court facilities, as described in Provision 1, shall submit a request to the Department of Finance pursuant to Section 69927 of the Government Code. Requests will be considered by the Department of Finance on a case-by-case basis. Requests received after March 1, 2027, shall be considered for funding in the following fiscal year, subject to an appropriation. 4. Upon review and approval of requests, the Department of Finance shall submit an allocation schedule to the Controller and shall notify the county of its decision. The Controller shall make payments to counties within 30 days of receipt of the allocation schedule provided by the Department of Finance. 5. The amount provided to counties shall be based on a base rate of $100,000 for each additional staff that the Department of Finance determines is necessary to meet the increased trial court security workload. The base rate shall be adjusted annually commensurate with the overall growth in the Trial Court Security Growth Special Account since the 2014–15 fiscal year. 6. Pursuant to subdivision (i) of Section 69927 of the Government Code, the approved allocations shall be adjusted annually by a rate commensurate with the growth in the Trial Court Security Growth Special Account in the prior fiscal year. 9286-101-0001—For local assistance, payment to counties for Trial Court Security—​Judgeships, to be allocated by the Controller ........................ 7,420,000 Schedule: (1) 7590-Bailiffs ........................ 7,420,000 Provisions: 1. The amount appropriated in this item is to fund bailiffs for reallocated and newly authorized judgeships and shall be allocated by the Controller according to a schedule provided by the Department of Finance. 9300-101-0001—For local assistance, payment to counties for costs of homicide trials, for payment by the Controller ........................ 1,000 Schedule: (1) 7600-Payment to local government for costs of homicide trials ........................ 1,000 Provisions: 1. It is the intent of the Legislature that counties that qualify for reimbursement of homicide trial costs pursuant to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 15200) of Part 6 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code shall forward claims for payment to the Controller. Upon review and approval of those claims by the Controller, reimbursement for approved costs shall be provided to counties through the supplemental appropriation process. 2. By May 1, 2027, the Controller shall provide the Department of Finance and the committees in each house of the Legislature that consider the budget with copies of those claims approved for payment. Claims not approved for payment by that date shall be paid in the following fiscal year. 9612-001-0001—For allocation by the Department of Finance to the trustee of the Golden State Tobacco Securitization Corporation, for payment of debt service on the Enhanced Tobacco Settlement Asset-Backed Bonds and operating expenses of the Golden State Tobacco Securitization Corporation in accordance with Section 63049.1 of the Government Code ........................ 1,000 Schedule: (1) 7700-Enhanced Tobacco Settlement Asset-Backed Bonds ........................ 1,000 Provisions: 1. Notwithstanding any other law, upon certification by the Golden State Tobacco Securitization Corporation, the Department of Finance may authorize expenditures of up to $200,000,000 in excess of the amount appropriated in this item for the payment of debt service on the Enhanced Tobacco Settlement Asset-Backed Bonds and the payment of operating expenses of the Golden State Tobacco Securitization Corporation in the event tobacco settlement revenues and certain other available amounts are insufficient to pay the costs of debt service and operating costs for the 12 months following such certification. The Department of Finance shall provide notification in writing to the chairpersons of the fiscal committees of each house of the Legislature and the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee not more than 30 days after such authorization. 9620-001-0001—For Cash Management and Budgetary Loans, upon order of the Director of Finance, for payment of interest and other costs for cash management purposes ........................ 1,000,000 Schedule: (1) 7720-Cash Management ........................ 1,000,000 Provisions: 1. The Director of Finance, the Controller, and the Treasurer shall satisfy any need of the General Fund for borrowed funds in a manner consistent with the Legislature’s objective of conducting General Fund cashflow borrowing in a manner that best meets the state’s interest. The state fiscal officers may, among other factors, take into consideration the costs of external versus internal cashflow borrowings and the potential impact on other borrowings of the state including long-term borrowing. In conducting internal borrowing, the Controller shall ensure such borrowing is made in the most economical manner to the General Fund. Internal borrowable funds that require a higher rate of interest payments shall be borrowed only after other internal borrowable funds are fully utilized. 2. In the event that interest expenses and other costs related to internal borrowing exceed the amount appropriated in this item, there is hereby appropriated any amount necessary to pay such costs. Augmentation pursuant to this provision shall not be expended until 30 days after the Department of Finance notifies the Joint Legislative Budget Committee of the amounts necessary or until any lesser time after that notification as determined by the chairperson of the joint committee. 3. In the event that Revenue Anticipation Warrants (RAWs) or Registered Warrants (IOUs) are issued, or considered to be issued, there is hereby appropriated any amount necessary to pay the expenses incurred by the Controller, Treasurer, Attorney General, and the Department of Finance in providing for the preparation, sale, issuance, advertising, legal services, credit enhancement, liquidity facility, or any other act which, as approved by the Department of Finance, is necessary for such issuance. Augmentation pursuant to this provision shall not be expended or obligated prior to 30 days after the Department of Finance notifies the Joint Legislative Budget Committee of the amounts or potential costs necessary or prior to a shorter period of time as determined by the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee. 4. To ensure prompt and accurate General Fund cashflow projections for the state, all departments must provide information as requested by the Department of Finance in the timeframe and medium as specified by the Department of Finance. Information requested may include past actuals and future projection of disbursements, receipts, and cash balances. 9620-002-0001—For Cash Management and Budgetary Loans, upon order of the Department of Finance, for any General Fund budgetary loans repaid in the 2026–27 fiscal year from loans made previously ........................ 113,404,000 Schedule: (1) 7725-Budgetary Loans ........................ 113,404,000 Provisions: 1. In the event that interest expenses related to budgetary loans exceed the amount appropriated in this item, there is hereby appropriated any amount necessary to pay the interest. 9625-001-0001—For interest payments to the federal government ........................ 90,000,000 Schedule: (1) 7240-Interest Payments to Federal Government ........................ 90,000,000 Provisions: 1. Expenditures from the funds appropriated by this item shall be made by the Controller, subject to the approval of the Department of Finance, and shall be charged to the fiscal year in which the disbursement is issued. 2. In the event that expenditures for interest payments to the federal government arising from the federal Cash Management Improvement Act of 1990 (P.L. 101-453) exceed the amount appropriated by this item, the Director of Finance may allocate an additional amount over the amount appropriated by this item. This allocation shall be made no sooner than 30 days after notification to the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee and the chairpersons of the fiscal committees in each house of the Legislature. 9625-001-0042—For interest payments to the federal government, payable from the State Highway Account, State Transportation Fund ........................ 3,600,000 Schedule: (1) 7240-Interest Payments to Federal Government ........................ 3,600,000 Provisions: 1. Provisions 1 and 2 of Item 9625-001-0001 also apply to this item. 9625-001-0494—For interest payments to the federal government, payable from the appropriate special fund ........................ 1,000 Schedule: (1) 7240-Interest Payments to Federal Government ........................ 1,000 Provisions: 1. Provisions 1 and 2 of Item 9625-001-0001 also apply to this item. 9625-001-0988—For interest payments to the federal government, payable from the appropriate nongovernmental cost fund ........................ 1,000 Schedule: (1) 7240-Interest Payments to Federal Government ........................ 1,000 Provisions: 1. Provisions 1 and 2 of Item 9625-001-0001 also apply to this item. 9650-001-0001—For support of Health and Dental Benefits for Annuitants. For the state’s contribution for the cost of a health benefits plan and dental care premiums, for annuitants and other employees, in accordance with Sections 22820, 22879, 22881, 22883, and 22953 of the Government Code, which cost is not chargeable to any other appropriation ........................ 3,205,158,000 Schedule: (1) 7750-Health and Dental Benefits for Annuitants ........................ 3,205,158,000 Provisions: 1. The maximum transfer amounts specified in subdivision (c) of Section 26.00 do not apply to this item. 2. Notwithstanding Section 22844 of the Government Code or any other law, annuitants and their family members who were employed by the California State University, and who become eligible for Part A and Part B of Medicare during the 2026–27 fiscal year, shall not be enrolled in a basic health benefits plan during the 2026–27 fiscal year. If the annuitant or family member is enrolled in Part A and Part B of Medicare, the annuitant or family member may enroll in a supplement to the Medicare plan. This provision does not apply to employees and family members who are specifically excluded from enrollment in a supplement to the Medicare plan by federal law or regulation. 3. The maximum monthly contribution for an annuitant’s health benefits plan shall be $1,084 for a single enrollee, $2,057 for an enrollee and one dependent, and $2,638 for an enrollee and two or more dependents for the 2026 calendar year. The maximum monthly contribution shall be adjusted based on Section 22871 of the Government Code to reflect the health benefit plan premium rates approved by the Board of Administration of the Public Employees’ Retirement System for the 2027 calendar year. 4. Notwithstanding any other law, upon approval of the Director of Finance, expenditure authority may be transferred between Item 6645-001-0001 and this item as necessary to fund costs for health benefits. 5. The Director of Finance may adjust this item of appropriation to reflect the health benefit premiums approved by the Board of Administration of the Public Employees’ Retirement System or dental benefit premiums approved by the Department of Human Resources for the 2027 calendar year. Within 30 days of making any adjustment pursuant to this provision, the Director of Finance shall report the adjustment in writing to the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee and the chairpersons of the committees of each house of the Legislature that consider appropriations. 9650-495—Reversion, Health and Dental Benefits for Annuitants. As of June 30, 2026, the unencumbered balance of the appropriation in Item 9650-001-0001, Budget Act of 2024, shall revert to the fund balance from which the appropriation was made. 9670-001-0001—For Equity Claims by the Department of General Services and settlements and judgments by the Department of Justice for the administration and payment of tort liability claims, settlements, compromises, and judgments against the state, its officers, and servants and employees of state agencies, departments, boards, bureaus, or commissions supported from the General Fund, for expenditure by the Department of Justice, subject to approval of the Department of Finance in its discretion ........................ 0 Schedule: (1) 7765-Equity Claims ........................ 0 (2) 7770-Settlements and Judgments ........................ 0 Provisions: 1. There is hereby appropriated from each fund, other than the General Fund, an amount sufficient for payment of tort liability claims, settlements, compromises, and judgments against the state, its officers, and servants and employees of state agencies, departments, boards, bureaus, or commissions arising from activities supported from that fund. No expenditure from any appropriation from a fund other than the General Fund for payment of tort liability claims, settlements, compromises, and judgments shall be made unless approved by the Department of Finance in its discretion. 2. Expenditures made under this item shall be charged to the fiscal year in which the warrant is issued by the Controller. 3. Payment under this item is limited in amount to claims, settlements, compromises, and judgments which do not exceed $70,000, exclusive of interest, and no payment from this item exceeding that amount shall be approved by the Department of Finance or made by the Department of Justice. 4. No payment shall be approved by the Department of Finance or made by the Department of Justice from this item except in full and final satisfaction of the claim, settlement, compromise, or judgment upon which the payment is based. 5. Funding for the payment of tort liability claims, settlements, compromises, and judgments which require the approval of the Director of Finance shall first be considered from within the affected agency’s, department’s, board’s, bureau’s, or commission’s existing budgeted resources. Payment pursuant to this item (from funds other than the General Fund) shall be made only after the affected agency, department, board, bureau, or commission has demonstrated to the Department of Finance that insufficient funds are available for payment of all or a portion of the claim. 9670-401—For maintenance of accounting records by the Controller’s office or any other agency maintaining these records, appropriations made pursuant to this act for Organization Code 9670 (Equity Claims by the Department of General Services and settlements and judgments by the Department of Justice) are to be recorded under Organization Code 9671 (Equity Claims by the Department of General Services) and Organization Code 9672 (Settlements and Judgments by the Department of Justice). 9800-001-0001—For Augmentation for Employee Compensation ........................ 138,050,000 Schedule: (1) 7800-Employee Compensation Program ........................ 132,050,000 (2) 7801-Affordable Care Act Penalty Assessment ........................ 6,000,000 Provisions: 1. The amount appropriated in this item shall not be construed to control or influence collective bargaining between the state employer and employee representatives. 2. The funds appropriated in this item are for compensation increases and increases in benefits related thereto of employees whose compensation, or portion thereof, is chargeable to the General Fund, to be allocated by budget executive order by the Director of Finance to the several state offices, departments, boards, bureaus, commissions, and other state agencies, in augmentation of their respective appropriations or allocations, in accordance with approved memoranda of understanding or, for employees excluded from collective bargaining, in accordance with salary and benefit schedules established by the Department of Human Resources. 3. It is the intent of the Legislature that all proposed augmentations for increased employee compensation costs, including, but not limited to, base salary increases, pay increases to bring one group of employees into a pay equity position with another group of public employees, and recruitment and retention differentials, be budgeted and considered on a comprehensive, statewide basis. Therefore, the Legislature declares its intent to reject any proposed augmentations that are not included in Items 9800-001-0001, 9800-001-0494, and 9800-001-0988, given that these are the items where the funds to implement comprehensive statewide compensation policies, including those adopted pursuant to collective bargaining, are considered. This provision shall not apply to augmentations for increased employee compensation costs resulting from mandatory judicial orders to raise pay for any group of employees or augmentations for increased compensation costs, or approvals for departments to provide increased employee compensation levels, that are included in bills separate from the Budget Act. 4. This item contains funds estimated to be necessary to implement side letters, appendices, or other addenda to a memorandum of understanding (collectively “pending agreements”) that have been determined by the Joint Legislative Budget Committee to require legislative approval prior to their implementation, but which may not have been approved in separate legislation as of the date of the passage of this act. In the event that the Legislature does not approve separate legislation to authorize implementation of any of the pending agreements, the Director of Finance shall not allocate any funds related to those pending agreements pursuant to Provision 2, and the expenditure of funds for those pending agreements shall not be deemed to have been approved by the Legislature. 5. As of July 31, 2027, the unencumbered balances of the funds appropriated in this item shall revert to the General Fund. 6. The Director of Finance may adjust this item of appropriation to reflect the health benefit premiums approved by the Board of Administration of the Public Employees’ Retirement System or dental benefit premiums approved by the Department of Human Resources for the 2027 calendar year. Within 30 days of making any adjustment pursuant to this provision, the Director of Finance shall report the adjustment in writing to the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee and the chairpersons of the committees in each house of the Legislature that consider appropriations. 7. Notwithstanding Sections 3517.6 and 3517.63 of the Government Code, the Department of Finance shall provide written notification to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee regarding any expenditure of funds resulting from any side letter, appendix, or other addendum to a properly ratified memorandum of understanding which has not been proposed to the Legislature in a budget bill. 8. Notice provided pursuant to Provision 7 shall include a copy of the side letter, appendix, or other addendum (collectively, “addendum”) and a fiscal summary of any expenditure of funds resulting from the agreement in the 2026–27 fiscal year and future fiscal years. The notice shall indicate whether the Department of Finance determines that an agreement does or does not require legislative action to ratify the addendum before implementation, pursuant to subdivision (a), (b), or (c) of this provision. (a) An addendum to a properly ratified memorandum of understanding may be implemented without legislative action not less than 30 calendar days after notice has been provided to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, or not sooner than whatever lesser time after that notification the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, or the chairperson’s designee, may in each instance determine, if all of the following apply: (1) The agreement results in total net costs of less than $1,000,000 (all funds) associated with each bargaining unit affected by the agreement during the 2026–27 fiscal year. (2) Any cost resulting from the agreement can be absorbed within the 2026–27 fiscal year appropriation authority of impacted departments. (3) The addendum does not present substantial additions that are reasonably outside the parameters of the original memorandum of understanding. (b) An addendum to a properly ratified memorandum of understanding that results in any expenditure of funds may be implemented not less than 30 calendar days after notice has been provided to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, or not sooner than whatever lesser time after that notification the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, or the chairperson’s designee, may in each instance determine, if, during the legislative consideration of the 2026–27 Governor’s Budget, the Department of Finance identified to the Legislature both of the following: (1) The administration anticipated that the addendum would be signed during the 2026–27 fiscal year. (2) Any costs resulting from the addendum are included in the 2026–27 Governor’s Budget or another piece of legislation. (c) An addendum to a properly ratified memorandum of understanding that results in any expenditure of funds requires legislative action before implementation if any of the following apply: (1) The agreement results in total net costs greater than $1,000,000 (all funds) associated with each bargaining unit affected by the agreement during the 2026–27 fiscal year. (2) The agreement results in costs that cannot be absorbed within the 2026–27 fiscal year appropriation authority of impacted departments. (3) The addendum presents substantial additions that are not reasonably within the parameters of the original memorandum of understanding. 9. Notwithstanding Sections 3517.6 and 3517.63 of the Government Code, any addendum to a properly ratified memorandum of understanding that is implemented in the 2026–27 fiscal year, pursuant to subdivision (a) of Provision 8 and requires the expenditure of funds beyond the 2026–27 fiscal year that was not approved as part of the Budget Act of 2026, shall be approved by the Legislature as part of the Budget Act of 2027 or through another piece of legislation. 10. The Department of Human Resources shall promptly post on its public internet website all signed addenda. Each addendum shall be posted in its entirety, including any attachments or schedules that are part of the agreement, along with the fiscal summary documents of the agreement. 11. The amount appropriated in Schedule (2) of this item shall be available for penalties the state may be assessed under the federal Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act (P.L. 111-148) or by another government entity where an individual health care mandate has been enacted and the state has a reporting obligation. (a) The Director of Finance shall identify the specific amounts to be advanced and paid from the General Fund to the Internal Revenue Service, or another government entity, for payment of those penalties and notify the Controller of these amounts. Upon notification, the Controller shall make penalty assessment payments from this item. (b) Notwithstanding any other law, the Department of Finance may transfer from, and adjust amounts in any appropriation item, or in any category thereof, funds necessary to reimburse this item for costs directly related to each state agency’s, department’s, or board’s portion of employer reporting penalties that are attributable to those departments, as identified by the Controller. Additionally, notwithstanding any other law, the Department of Finance may direct a state agency, including those with funds and accounts held outside of the State Treasury including, but not limited to, district agricultural associations, to reimburse, and such state agency shall reimburse, this item for costs directly related to the state agency’s portion of employer reporting penalties that are attributable to the state agency, as identified by the Controller. Additionally, notwithstanding Section 22150 of the Government Code and Section 66606.2 of the Education Code, this provision shall also apply to the California State University. The authority granted to the Department of Finance under this provision may be used to reimburse this item for costs not reimbursed in prior fiscal years. Upon order of the Director of Finance, the Department of Finance shall provide the Controller a schedule of the timing and amounts to be transferred or adjusted for purposes of this provision. (c) Within 30 days after making any adjustment pursuant to this provision, the Director of Finance shall report the penalties assessed to the state in writing to the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee and the chairpersons of the committees in each house of the Legislature that consider appropriations. 12. The Director of Finance may augment this item by up to $1,000,000 to reconcile adjustments, changes, and clarifications to federal laws, regulations, or guidelines pursuant to Section 13332.01 of the Government Code. The Department of Finance shall identify the specific amounts to be paid from the General Fund to the United States Department of Treasury, or other federal government entity, and notify the Controller of these amounts. Upon notification, the Controller shall make payments from this item. 9800-001-0494—For Augmentation for Employee Compensation, payable from other unallocated special funds ........................ 113,311,000 Schedule: (1) 7800-Employee Compensation Program ........................ 113,311,000 Provisions: 1. The amount appropriated in this item shall not be construed to control or influence collective bargaining between the state employer and employee representatives. 2. The funds appropriated in this item are for compensation increases and increases in benefits related thereto of employees whose compensation, or portion thereof, is chargeable to special funds, to be allocated by budget executive order by the Director of Finance to the several state offices, departments, boards, bureaus, commissions, and other state agencies, in augmentation of their respective appropriations or allocations, in accordance with approved memoranda of understanding or, for employees excluded from collective bargaining, in accordance with salary and benefit schedules established by the Department of Human Resources. 3. Notwithstanding any other law, upon approval of the Director of Finance, expenditure authority may be transferred between this item and Item 9800-001-0988 as necessary to fund costs for approved memoranda of understanding or, for employees excluded from collective bargaining, in accordance with salary and benefit schedules established by the Department of Human Resources. 4. It is the intent of the Legislature that all proposed augmentations for increased employee compensation costs, including, but not limited to, base salary increases, pay increases to bring one group of employees into a pay equity position with another group of public employees, and recruitment and retention differentials, be budgeted and considered on a comprehensive, statewide basis. Therefore, the Legislature declares its intent to reject any proposed augmentations that are not included in Items 9800-001-0001, 9800-001-0494, and 9800-001-0988, given that these are the items where the funds to implement comprehensive statewide compensation policies, including those adopted pursuant to collective bargaining, are considered. This provision does not apply to augmentations for increased employee compensation costs resulting from mandatory judicial orders to raise pay for any group of employees or augmentations for increased compensation costs, or approvals for departments to provide increased employee compensation levels, that are included in bills separate from the Budget Act. 5. This item contains funds estimated to be necessary to implement side letters, appendices, or other addenda to a memorandum of understanding (collectively referred to as “pending agreements”) that have been determined by the Joint Legislative Budget Committee to require legislative approval prior to their implementation, but which may not have been approved in separate legislation as of the date of the passage of this act. In the event that the Legislature does not approve separate legislation to authorize implementation of any of the pending agreements, the Director of Finance shall not allocate any funds related to those pending agreements pursuant to Provision 2, and the expenditure of funds for those pending agreements shall not be deemed to have been approved by the Legislature. 6. As of July 31, 2027, the unencumbered balances of the above appropriation shall no longer be available for expenditure. 7. The Director of Finance may adjust this item of appropriation to reflect the health benefit premiums approved by the Board of Administration of the Public Employees’ Retirement System or dental benefit premiums approved by the Department of Human Resources for the 2027 calendar year. Within 30 days of making any adjustment pursuant to this provision, the Director of Finance shall report the adjustment in writing to the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee and the chairpersons of the committees in each house of the Legislature that consider appropriations. 8. Notwithstanding Sections 3517.6 and 3517.63 of the Government Code, the Department of Finance shall provide written notification to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee regarding any expenditure of funds resulting from any side letter, appendix, or other addendum to a properly ratified memorandum of understanding which has not been proposed to the Legislature in a budget bill. 9. Notice provided pursuant to Provision 8 shall include a copy of the side letter, appendix, or other addendum (collectively addendum) and a fiscal summary of any expenditure of funds resulting from the agreement in the 2026–27 fiscal year and future fiscal years. The notice shall indicate whether the Department of Finance determines that an agreement does or does not require legislative action to ratify the addendum before implementation, pursuant to subdivision (a), (b), or (c) of this provision. (a) An addendum to a properly ratified memorandum of understanding may be implemented without legislative action not less than 30 calendar days after notice has been provided to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, or not sooner than whatever lesser time after that notification the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, or the chairperson’s designee, may in each instance determine, if all of the following apply: (1) The agreement results in total net costs of less than $1,000,000 (all funds) associated with each bargaining unit affected by the agreement during the 2026–27 fiscal year. (2) Any cost resulting from the agreement can be absorbed within the 2026–27 fiscal year appropriation authority of impacted departments. (3) The addendum does not present substantial additions that are reasonably outside the parameters of the original memorandum of understanding. (b) An addendum to a properly ratified memorandum of understanding that results in any expenditure of funds may be implemented not less than 30 calendar days after notice has been provided to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, or not sooner than whatever lesser time after that notification the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, or the chairperson’s designee, may in each instance determine, if, during the legislative consideration of the 2026–27 Governor’s Budget, the Department of Finance identified to the Legislature both of the following: (1) The administration anticipated that the addendum would be signed during the 2026–27 fiscal year. (2) Any costs resulting from the addendum are included in the 2026–27 Governor’s Budget or another piece of legislation. (c) An addendum to a properly ratified memorandum of understanding that results in any expenditure of funds requires legislative action before implementation if any of the following apply: (1) The agreement results in total net costs greater than $1,000,000 (all funds) associated with each bargaining unit affected by the agreement during the 2026–27 fiscal year. (2) The agreement results in costs that cannot be absorbed within the 2026–27 fiscal year appropriation authority of impacted departments. (3) The addendum presents substantial additions that are not reasonably within the parameters of the original memorandum of understanding. 10. Notwithstanding Sections 3517.6 and 3517.63 of the Government Code, any addendum to a properly ratified memorandum of understanding that is implemented in the 2026–27 fiscal year, pursuant to subdivision (a) of Provision 9 and requires the expenditure of funds beyond the 2026–27 fiscal year that was not approved as part of the Budget Act of 2026, shall be approved by the Legislature as part of the Budget Act of 2027 or through another piece of legislation. 11. The Department of Human Resources shall promptly post on its public internet website all signed addenda. Each addendum shall be posted in its entirety, including any attachments or schedules that are part of the agreement, along with the fiscal summary documents of the agreement. 9800-001-0988—For Augmentation for Employee Compensation, payable from other unallocated nongovernmental cost funds ........................ 55,810,000 Schedule: (1) 7800-Employee Compensation Program ........................ 55,810,000 Provisions: 1. The amount appropriated in this item shall not be construed to control or influence collective bargaining between the state employer and employee representatives. 2. The funds appropriated in this item are for employee compensation increases, and increases in benefits related thereto, whose compensation or portion thereof is chargeable to nongovernmental cost funds, to be allocated by budget executive order by the Director of Finance to the several state offices, departments, boards, bureaus, commissions, and other state agencies, in augmentation of their respective appropriations or allocations, in accordance with approved memoranda of understanding or, for employees excluded from collective bargaining, in accordance with salary and benefit schedules established by the Department of Human Resources. 3. Notwithstanding any other law, upon approval of the Director of Finance, expenditure authority may be transferred between Item 9800-001-0494 and this item as necessary to fund costs for approved memoranda of understanding or, for employees excluded from collective bargaining, in accordance with salary and benefit schedules established by the Department of Human Resources. 4. It is the intent of the Legislature that all proposed augmentations for increased employee compensation costs, including, but not limited to, base salary increases, pay increases to bring one group of employees into a pay equity position with another group of public employees, and recruitment and retention differentials, be budgeted and considered on a comprehensive, statewide basis. Therefore, the Legislature declares its intent to reject any proposed augmentations that are not included in Items 9800-001-0001, 9800-001-0494, and 9800-001-0988, given that these are the items where the funds to implement comprehensive statewide compensation policies, including those adopted pursuant to collective bargaining, are considered. This provision shall not apply to augmentations for increased employee compensation costs resulting from mandatory judicial orders to raise pay for any group of employees or augmentations for increased compensation costs, or approvals for departments to provide increased employee compensation levels, that are included in bills separate from the Budget Act. 5. This item contains funds estimated to be necessary to implement side letters, appendices, or other addenda to a memorandum of understanding (collectively referred to as “pending agreements”) that have been determined by the Joint Legislative Budget Committee to require legislative approval prior to their implementation, but which may not have been approved in separate legislation as of the date of the passage of this act. In the event that the Legislature does not approve separate legislation to authorize implementation of any of the pending agreements, the Director of Finance shall not allocate any funds related to those pending agreements pursuant to Provision 2, and the expenditure of funds for those pending agreements shall not be deemed to have been approved by the Legislature. 6. As of July 31, 2027, the unencumbered balances of the above appropriation shall no longer be available for expenditure. 7. The Director of Finance may adjust this item of appropriation to reflect the health benefit premiums approved by the Board of Administration of the Public Employees’ Retirement System or dental benefit premiums approved by the Department of Human Resources for the 2027 calendar year. Within 30 days of making any adjustment pursuant to this provision, the Director of Finance shall report the adjustment in writing to the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee and the chairpersons of the committees in each house of the Legislature that consider appropriations. 8. Notwithstanding Sections 3517.6 and 3517.63 of the Government Code, the Department of Finance shall provide written notification to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee regarding any expenditure of funds resulting from any side letter, appendix, or other addendum to a properly ratified memorandum of understanding which has not been proposed to the Legislature in a budget bill. 9. Notice provided pursuant to Provision 8 shall include a copy of the side letter, appendix, or other addendum (collectively addendum) and a fiscal summary of any expenditure of funds resulting from the agreement in the 2026–27 fiscal year and future fiscal years. The notice shall indicate whether the Department of Finance determines that an agreement does or does not require legislative action to ratify the addendum before implementation, pursuant to subdivision (a), (b), or (c) of this provision. (a) An addendum to a properly ratified memorandum of understanding may be implemented without legislative action not less than 30 calendar days after notice has been provided to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, or not sooner than whatever lesser time after that notification the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, or the chairperson’s designee, may in each instance determine, if all of the following apply: (1) The agreement results in total net costs of less than $1,000,000 (all funds) associated with each bargaining unit affected by the agreement during the 2026–27 fiscal year. (2) Any cost resulting from the agreement can be absorbed within the 2026–27 fiscal year appropriation authority of impacted departments. (3) The addendum does not present substantial additions that are reasonably outside the parameters of the original memorandum of understanding. (b) An addendum to a properly ratified memorandum of understanding that results in any expenditure of funds may be implemented not less than 30 calendar days after notice has been provided to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, or not sooner than whatever lesser time after that notification the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, or the chairperson’s designee, may in each instance determine, if, during the legislative consideration of the 2026–27 Governor’s Budget, the Department of Finance identified to the Legislature both of the following: (1) The administration anticipated that the addendum would be signed during the 2026–27 fiscal year. (2) Any costs resulting from the addendum are included in the 2026–27 Governor’s Budget or another piece of legislation. (c) An addendum to a properly ratified memorandum of understanding that results in any expenditure of funds requires legislative action before implementation if any of the following apply: (1) The agreement results in total net costs greater than $1,000,000 (all funds) associated with each bargaining unit affected by the agreement during the 2026–27 fiscal year. (2) The agreement results in costs that cannot be absorbed within the 2026–27 fiscal year appropriation authority of impacted departments. (3) The addendum presents substantial additions that are not reasonably within the parameters of the original memorandum of understanding. 10. Notwithstanding Sections 3517.6 and 3517.63 of the Government Code, any addendum to a properly ratified memorandum of understanding that is implemented in the 2026–27 fiscal year, pursuant to subdivision (a) of Provision 9, and requires the expenditure of funds beyond the 2026–27 fiscal year that was not approved as part of the Budget Act of 2026, shall be approved by the Legislature as part of the Budget Act of 2027 or through another piece of legislation. 11. The Department of Human Resources shall promptly post on its public internet website all addenda. Each addendum shall be posted in its entirety, including any attachments or schedules that are part of the agreement, along with the fiscal summary documents of the agreement. 9840-001-0001—For Augmentation for Contingencies or Emergencies ........................ 40,000,000 Schedule: (1) 7806-Augmentation for Contingencies or Emergencies ........................ 40,000,000 Provisions: 1. Subject to the conditions set forth in this item, amounts appropriated by this item shall be transferred, upon approval by the Director of Finance, to augment any other General Fund item of appropriation that is made under this act to an agency, department, board, commission, or other state entity. Such a transfer may be made to fund unanticipated expenses to be incurred for the 2026–27 fiscal year under an existing program that is funded by that item of appropriation, but only in a case of actual necessity as determined by the Director of Finance. For purposes of this item, an “existing program” is one that is authorized by law. 2. The Director of Finance shall not approve a transfer under this item, nor may any funds appropriated in augmentation of this item be allocated, to fund any of the following: (a) capital outlay, (b) any expense attributable to a prior fiscal year, (c) any expense related to legislation enacted without an appropriation, (d) startup costs of programs not yet authorized by the Legislature, (e) costs that the administration had knowledge of in time to include in the May Revision, or (f) costs that the administration has the discretion to incur or not incur. 3. A transfer of funds approved by the Director of Finance under this item shall become effective no sooner than 30 days after the director files written notification thereof with the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, and the chairpersons of the fiscal committees in each house of the Legislature, or no sooner than any lesser time the chairperson of the joint committee, or the chairperson’s designee, may in each instance determine, except for an approval for an emergency expense as defined in Provision 5. 4. Each notification shall include all of the following: (a) the date the recipient state entity reported to the Director of Finance the need to increase its appropriation, (b) the reason for the expense, (c) the transfer amount approved by the Director of Finance, and (d) the basis of the director’s determination that the expense is actually needed. Each notification shall also include a determination by the director as to whether the expense was considered in a legislative budget committee and formal action was taken not to approve the expense for the 2026–27 fiscal year. Any increase in a department’s appropriation to fund unanticipated expenses shall be approved by the Director of Finance. 5. The Director of Finance may approve a transfer under this item for an emergency expense only if the approval is set forth in a written notification that is filed with the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, and the chairpersons of the fiscal committees in each house of the Legislature, no later than 10 days after the effective date of the approval. Each notification for an emergency expense shall state the reason for the expense, the transfer amount approved by the director, and the basis of the director’s determination that the expense is an emergency expense. For the purposes of this item, “emergency expense” means an expense incurred in response to conditions of disaster or extreme peril that threaten the immediate health or safety of persons or property in this state. 6. Within 15 days of receipt, the Director of Finance shall provide, to the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee and the chairpersons of the fiscal committees in each house of the Legislature, copies of all requests, including any supporting documentation, from any agency, department, board, commission, or other state entity for a transfer under this item. The submission to the Legislature of a copy of such a request does not constitute approval of the request by the Director of Finance. Within 15 days of receipt, the director shall also provide copies to these chairpersons of all other requests received by the Director of Finance from any state agency, department, board, commission, or other state entity to fund a contingency or emergency through a supplemental appropriations bill augmenting this item. 7. For any transfer of funds pursuant to this item, the augmentation of a General Fund item of appropriation shall not exceed the following during any fiscal year: (a) 30 percent of the amount appropriated, for those appropriations made by this act that are $4,000,000 or less. (b) 20 percent of the amount appropriated, for those appropriations made by this act that are more than $4,000,000. 8. The Director of Finance may withhold authorization for the expenditure of funds transferred pursuant to this item until such time as, and to the extent that, preliminary estimates of potential unanticipated expenses are verified. 9. The Director of Finance shall submit any requests for supplemental appropriations in augmentation of this item to the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee and the chairpersons of the fiscal committees in each house of the Legislature. Requests shall include the information and determinations required by Provision 4, excluding subdivision (c), and a determination that requests meet the requirements of Provision 2. 9840-001-0494—For Augmentation for Contingencies or Emergencies, payable from unallocated special funds ........................ 15,000,000 Schedule: (1) 7806-Augmentation for Contingencies or Emergencies ........................ 15,000,000 Provisions: 1. Provisions 1, 2, 3, 4, 5, 6, 7, 8, and 9 of Item 9840-001-0001 also apply to this item, except references to General Fund appropriations shall instead refer to special fund appropriations. 2. For Augmentation for Contingencies or Emergencies, payable from special funds, there are appropriated from each special fund sums necessary to meet contingencies or emergencies, to be expended only upon written authorization of the Director of Finance. 9840-001-0988—For Augmentation for Contingencies or Emergencies, payable from unallocated nongovernmental cost funds ........................ 15,000,000 Schedule: (1) 7806-Augmentation for Contingencies or Emergencies ........................ 15,000,000 Provisions: 1. Provisions 1, 2, 3, 4, 5, 6, 7, 8, and 9 of Item 9840-001-0001 also apply to this item, except references to General Fund appropriations shall instead refer to nongovernmental cost fund appropriations. 2. For Augmentation for Contingencies or Emergencies, payable from nongovernmental cost funds, there are appropriated from each nongovernmental cost fund that is subject to control or limited by this act, sums necessary to meet contingencies or emergencies, to be expended only upon written authorization of the Director of Finance. 9850-011-0001—For Augmentation for Contingencies or Emergencies (Loans) ........................ (25,000,000) Provisions: 1. This appropriation is for loans that may be made to state agencies which derive their support from the General Fund or from sources other than the General Fund, upon terms and conditions for repayment as may be prescribed by the Department of Finance. Any sum so loaned shall, if ordered by the Department of Finance, be transferred by the Controller to the fund from which the support of the agency is derived. 2. No loan shall be made which requires repayment from a future legislative appropriation. 3. Authorizations for loans shall become effective no sooner than 30 days after notification in writing to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, or not sooner than a lesser time which the joint committee, or its designee, may in each instance determine, except that this limit shall not apply if the Director of Finance states in writing to the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee the necessity and urgency for the loan which, in the judgment of the director, makes prior approval impractical. 4. Within 10 days after approval, the Director of Finance shall file with the Joint Legislative Budget Committee copies of all executive orders for loans stating the reasons for, and the amount of, all of these authorizations. GENERAL SECTIONSSTATEWIDE SEC. 3.00. Whenever herein an appropriation is made for support, it shall include salaries and all other proper expenses, including repairs and equipment, incurred in connection with the institution, department, board, bureau, commission, officer, employee, or other agency for which the appropriation is made. Each item appropriating funds for salaries and wages includes the additional funds necessary to continue the payment of the amount of salaries in effect on June 30, 2026, for the state officers whose salaries are specified by statute. Whenever herein an appropriation is made for capital outlay, it may include acquisition of land or other real property to be owned by the state. It may also include minor projects, studies, specifications, design, construction, and equipment necessary in connection with a construction, repair, or improvement project on state-owned or state-leased property. Whenever herein any item of appropriation contains provisions for acquisition of land or other real property, it shall include all necessary expenses in connection with the acquisition of the property. Whenever herein an appropriation is made in accordance with a schedule set forth after the appropriation, the expenditures from that item for each program or project included in the schedule shall be limited to the amount specified for that program or project, except as otherwise provided in this act. Each schedule is a restriction or limitation upon the expenditure of the respective appropriation made by this act, does not itself appropriate any moneys, and is not itself an item of appropriation. As used in this act in reference to the schedules, “program” or “project” means a class of expenditure. (a) “Programs” include all expenditures required to carry out the objectives of the named activity. (b) “Projects” include expenditures to carry out a particular phase, or multiple phases, of work attributed to a project. For capital outlay projects, phases are budgeted as subschedules under the “project” schedule within an item of appropriation. As used in this act in reference to the subschedules, the following means a class of expenditure such as, but not limited to: (1) “Studies,” when used in conjunction with a capital outlay project, are defined as budget package development, site studies and suitability reports, master planning, environmental studies and services, architectural programming, engineering assessments, and schematic design. (2) “Acquisition” is defined as the acquisition of land or other real property in fee simple or any lesser right or interest. (3) “Preliminary plans” are defined as a site plan, architectural floor plans, elevations, outline specifications, and a cost estimate. For each utility, site development, conversion, and remodeling project, the drawings shall be sufficiently descriptive to accurately convey the location, scope, cost, and the nature of the improvement being proposed. (4) “Working drawings” are defined as a complete set of plans and specifications showing and describing all phases of a project, architectural, structural, mechanical, electrical, civil engineering, and landscaping systems to the degree necessary for the purposes of accurate bidding by contractors and for the use of artisans in constructing the project. All necessary professional fees and administrative service costs are included in the preparation of these drawings. (5) “Construction,” when used in connection with a capital outlay project, shall include all such related things as fixtures, installed equipment, auxiliary facilities, contingencies, project construction, management, administration, and associated costs. (6) “Performance criteria” are defined as the information that fully describes the scope of the proposed project and includes, but is not limited to, the size, type, and design character of the buildings and site; the required form, fit, function, operational requirements, and quality of design, materials, equipment, and workmanship; and any other information deemed necessary to sufficiently describe the state’s needs. Performance criteria may include concept drawings, which include any schematic drawings or architectural renderings that are prepared in such detail as is necessary to sufficiently describe the state’s needs. (7) “Design-build” phase means the period following the award of a contract to a design-build entity in which the design-build entity completes the design and construction activities necessary to fully complete the project in compliance with the terms of the contract. (8) “Minor projects” include planning, working drawings, construction, improvements, and equipment projects not specifically set forth in the schedule. For the purpose of further interpreting the meaning of the words, terms and phrases, and uniform codes used in the schedules, reference is hereby made to those documents entitled, “State of California Governor’s Budget for 2026–27” submitted by the Governor to the Legislature at the 2026 portion of the 2025–26 Regular Session, the uniform accounting system prescribed by the Department of Finance under the provisions of Section 13300 and following of the Government Code, the Uniform Codes Manual, and the appropriate portions thereof. The Department of Finance shall establish interpretations necessary to carry out the provisions of this section and shall furnish the same to the Controller and to every state agency to which appropriations are made under this act. SEC. 3.10. (a) Notwithstanding any other law, and in accordance with legislative intent, the Department of Finance may authorize subschedule transfers, as defined in Section 3.00, within individual capital outlay items of appropriation in those instances where the transfers are necessary for the efficient and cost-effective implementation of the projects funded by this act. SEC. 3.50. Whenever an appropriation is made for support or other expenses for an institution, department, board, bureau, commission, officer, employee, or other agency, the following shall be charged to the appropriation from which salaries and wages are paid: workers’ compensation, compensation paid to employees on approved leave of absence on account of sickness, unemployment compensation benefits, industrial disability leave and payments, nonindustrial disability benefits and payments, the administrative costs of the Merit Award Program provided by Section 19823 of the Government Code, the state’s contribution to the Public Employees’ Retirement Fund as provided by Sections 20822 and 20824 of the Government Code, the state’s contribution to the Teachers’ Retirement Fund as provided by Sections 22950, 22951, and 23000 of the Education Code, the state’s contribution to the Old Age and Survivors’ Insurance Revolving Fund as provided by Sections 22601 and 22602 of the Government Code, the state’s contribution to the Old Age and Survivors’ Insurance Revolving Fund for payment of hospital insurance taxes imposed by the Internal Revenue Code, the state’s contribution to the Public Employees’ Contingency Reserve Fund, the state’s contribution for the cost of health benefits plans as provided by Sections 22871, 22881, and subdivision (b) of Section 22883 of the Government Code, and the state’s contribution for costs of other employee benefits and the administrative costs associated with the provision of benefits established by any state agency legally authorized to negotiate and set salary and benefit levels. As of the effective date of this act, the state’s contributions, as provided by Sections 22871, 22881, and subdivision (b) of Section 22883 of the Government Code, for costs of any other employee benefits and the administrative costs associated with the provisions of these benefits established by any state agency legally authorized to negotiate and set salary and benefit levels for any month shall be charged to the same appropriations used for payment of salaries and wages from which the employee premium contributions for such month are deducted. The appropriations made by Sections 20822, 20824, 22871, 22881, and subdivision (b) of Section 22883 of the Government Code, and by Sections 22950, 22951, and 23000 of the Education Code, shall continue to be available for expenditure and shall be charged for any expenditure that is not chargeable to an appropriation for support or other expenses as provided in this section. This transfer may be chargeable to such appropriation for a previous fiscal year if there are no funds available from that fiscal year. The Controller may transfer to the State Payroll Revolving Fund the contributions required by Sections 20822, 20824, 22871, 22881, and subdivision (b) of Section 22883 of the Government Code, contributions required for payment of the hospital insurance tax, and upon certification by the Board of Administration of the Public Employees’ Retirement System as required by Section 20826 of the Government Code, may transfer from the State Payroll Revolving Fund to the Public Employees’ Retirement Fund and the Old Age and Survivors’ Insurance Revolving Fund the amounts of contributions. SEC. 3.60. (a) Notwithstanding any other law, the employers’ retirement contributions for the 2026–27 fiscal year that are chargeable to any item with respect to each state officer and employee who is a member of the Public Employees’ Retirement System (PERS) or the Judges’ Retirement System II and who is in that employment or office shall be the percentage of salaries and wages by state member category, as follows: Miscellaneous, First Tier ........................ 31.60% California State University, Miscellaneous, First Tier ........................ 31.60% Miscellaneous, Second Tier ........................ 31.60% State Industrial ........................ 20.40% State Safety ........................ 21.60% Peace Officer/Firefighter ........................ 49.00% California State University, Peace Officer/Firefighter ........................ 49.00% Highway Patrol ........................ 63.81% Judges’ Retirement System II ........................ 22.81% The Director of Finance may adjust amounts in any appropriation item, or in any category thereof, as a result of changes from amounts budgeted for employer contributions for 2026–27 fiscal year retirement benefits to achieve the percentages specified in this subdivision. Beginning in the 2013–14 fiscal year, adjustments to the California State University (CSU) rates are applied to the actual pensionable 2013–14 fiscal year payroll, which is $2,307,876,000, as identified by the Controller. This process establishes pension funding adjustments through this section for CSU. This results in pension funding for CSU of $737,376,000 from the General Fund for the 2026–27 fiscal year. This amount will be included in the total appropriation for Item 6610-001-0001 in the 2026–27 fiscal year. (b) Notwithstanding any other law, the Director of Finance shall require retirement contributions computed pursuant to subdivision (a) to be offset by the Controller with surplus funds in the Public Employees’ Retirement Fund, employer surplus asset accounts. (c) Notwithstanding any other law, for purposes of calculating the “appropriations subject to limitation” as defined in Section 8 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution, the appropriations shall be deemed to be the amounts remaining after the adjustments required by subdivisions (a) and (b) are made. (d) Of the percentage of salaries and wages by state member categories identified in subdivision (a), the following percentages are estimated to be the result of the increased employee contributions pursuant to Chapter 296 of the Statutes of 2012 (Assembly Bill 340 of the 2011–12 Regular Session) known as the California Public Employees’ Pension Reform Act of 2013, and will be directed toward the state’s unfunded pension liability: Miscellaneous, First Tier ........................ 0.10% California State University, Miscellaneous, First Tier ........................ 0.10% Miscellaneous, Second Tier ........................ 0.10% State Industrial ........................ 0.88% State Safety ........................ 1.18% Peace Officer/Firefighter ........................ 1.65% California State University, Peace Officer/Firefighter ........................ 1.65% Highway Patrol ........................ 1.32% The contributions to the unfunded liability, as a result of the percentages of salaries and wages in this subdivision, are estimated to be $151,790,000 ($103,907,000 General Fund) for the 2026–27 fiscal year. (e) The Director of Finance may adjust the percentage levels of the employers’ retirement contributions listed in subdivisions (a) and (d) as a result of rates provided by the Board of Administration of the Public Employees’ Retirement System. The Director of Finance shall notify the Controller by executive order of adjustments made pursuant to this subdivision. Within 30 days of making an adjustment pursuant to this subdivision, the Director of Finance shall report the adjustment in writing to the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee and the chairpersons of the committees in each house of the Legislature that consider appropriations. (f) (1) In addition to the employers’ retirement contributions listed in subdivisions (a) and (d), the Department of Finance may direct the Controller to transfer up to the amount identified for appropriation pursuant to subclause (IV) of clause (ii) of subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) of Section 20 of Article XVI of the California Constitution equivalent to the amount described in paragraph (3) of subdivision (d) of Section 35.50 to supplement the state’s retirement contributions for the 2026–27 fiscal year. (2) The Director of Finance shall direct the Controller to transfer the amount specified in paragraph (1) to either of the following: (A) The Public Employees’ Retirement Fund. (B) The Surplus Money Investment Fund and other funds in the Pooled Money Investment Account that accrue interest to the General Fund, for repayment of principal and interest of a cash loan that was made to supplement the state’s retirement contributions. (3) The supplemental payment described in this subdivision is for unfunded liabilities for state-level pension plans in excess of current base amounts for the 2026–27 fiscal year. Therefore, any amount transferred to a fund identified in paragraph (2) constitutes an obligation pursuant to subclause (IV) of clause (ii) of subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) of Section 20 of Article XVI of the California Constitution. (4) The Director of Finance shall provide the Controller a schedule of the timing and amounts to be used for purposes of this subdivision. SEC. 3.61. Contribution to Prefund Other Postemployment Benefits. (a) Notwithstanding any other law, the employers’ contribution for prefunding other postemployment benefits for the 2026–27 fiscal year that are chargeable to any item with respect to each state officer and employee who is a member of the Public Employees’ Retirement System, the Judges’ Retirement System, the Judges’ Retirement System II, or the Legislators’ Retirement System and who is in that employment or office shall be the monthly dollar amount or the percentage of pensionable compensation by bargaining unit, retirement category, fund source, or state office, department, division, board, bureau, commission, organization, or agency, as follows: Bargaining Units 1, 3, 4, 11, 14, 15, 17, 20, and 21, Service Employees International Union ........................ 0.0% of pensionable compensation. Bargaining Unit 2, California Attorneys, Administrative Law Judges, and Hearing Officers in State Employment ........................ 0.0% of pensionable compensation. Bargaining Unit 5, California Association of Highway Patrolmen ........................ 0.0% of pensionable compensation. Bargaining Unit 6, California Correctional Peace Officers Association ........................ 0.0% of pensionable compensation. Bargaining Unit 7, California Statewide Law Enforcement Association ........................ 0.0% of pensionable compensation. Bargaining Unit 8, California Department of Forestry Firefighters ........................ 0.0% of pensionable compensation. Bargaining Unit 9, Professional Engineers in California Government ........................ 0.0% of pensionable compensation. Bargaining Unit 10, California Association of Professional Scientists ........................ 0.0% of pensionable compensation. Bargaining Unit 12, International Union of Operating Engineers ........................ 0.0% of pensionable compensation. Bargaining Unit 13, International Union of Operating Engineers ........................ 0.0% of pensionable compensation. Bargaining Unit 16, Union of American Physicians and Dentists ........................ 0.0% of pensionable compensation. Bargaining Unit 18, California Association of Psychiatric Technicians ........................ 0.0% of pensionable compensation. Bargaining Unit 19, American Federation of State, County, and Municipal Employees ........................ 0.0% of pensionable compensation. Exempt and excluded employees with a collective bargaining identification designation of “E” ........................ 0.0% of pensionable compensation. State employees of the Judicial Branch (excluding justices) ........................ 0.0% of pensionable compensation. The Director of Finance may adjust amounts in any appropriation item, or in any category thereof, as a result of changes from amounts budgeted for the employers’ contributions for prefunding other postemployment benefits for the 2026–27 fiscal year to achieve the percentages specified in this subdivision. (b) Notwithstanding any other law, for purposes of calculating the “appropriations subject to limitation” as defined in Section 8 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution, the appropriations shall be deemed to be the amounts remaining after the adjustments required by subdivision (a) are made. (c) The Director of Finance may adjust the percentage levels of the employers’ contribution for prefunding other postemployment benefits listed in subdivision (a) in accordance with either of the following: (1) Labor agreements or other legislation approved by the Legislature. (2) For employees excluded from collective bargaining, in accordance with salary and benefit schedules established by the Department of Human Resources. (d) The Director of Finance shall notify the Controller by executive order of adjustments made pursuant to subdivision (c). The executive order shall be submitted not sooner than 30 days after notification of the adjustments in writing to the chairpersons of the fiscal committees in each house of the Legislature and the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, or not sooner than whatever lesser time the chairperson of the joint committee, or the chairperson’s designee, may in each instance determine. (e) (1) In addition to the employers’ prefunding of other postemployment benefits listed in subdivision (a), the Department of Finance may direct the Controller to transfer up to the amount identified for appropriation pursuant to subclause (IV) of clause (ii) of subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) of Section 20 of Article XVI of the California Constitution equivalent to the amount described in paragraph (3) of subdivision (d) of Section 35.50 for the prior fiscal year or the current fiscal year. (2) The Director of Finance shall direct the Controller to transfer the amount specified in paragraph (1) to the California Employers’ Retiree Benefit Trust Fund. The Director of Finance shall provide the Controller a schedule of the timing and amounts to be used for purposes of this subdivision. SEC. 4.05. (a) Notwithstanding any other law, each item of appropriation provided in this act or other spending authority provided outside of this act, with the exception of those for the Legislature and the Legislative Counsel Bureau, shall be adjusted, as appropriate, to reflect the net savings achieved through operational efficiencies, elimination of excess positions, and other cost-reduction measures. The Director of Finance shall allocate the necessary adjustments to each item of appropriation or other spending or position authority to reflect net savings achieved. The Director of Finance may authorize an augmentation to any item of appropriation provided in this act or outside of this act to reflect the costs related to implementing operational efficiencies, elimination of excess positions, and other cost-reduction measures. The Department of Finance shall make the final determination of the budgetary and accounting transactions to ensure proper implementation of this section. (b) Within 30 days of making any adjustments pursuant to this section, the Department of Finance shall report the adjustments in writing to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee. SEC. 4.11. To promote greater transparency in how departments use position authority, the Department of Finance shall report to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee and Legislative Analyst by January 10 of each year the past year actual numbers for each of the following: (1) percentage of vacant positions for each department, by month; (2) total authorized positions for each department; and (3) average percentage of vacant positions throughout the year for each department. This report shall be posted on the Department of Finance’s internet website and easily accessible by the public from the department’s eBudget internet website. SEC. 4.13. Notwithstanding any other law, the Department of Finance may adjust General Fund expenditures resulting from the final redirection calculation and appeals pursuant to Chapter 24 of the Statutes of 2013 (AB 85). Upon order of the Department of Finance, any payment to a county based on the AB 85 final reconciliation shall be transferred by the Controller to the health account within the county’s local health and welfare trust fund. SEC. 4.20. Notwithstanding any other law, the employer’s contributions to the Public Employees’ Contingency Reserve Fund, as required by Section 22885 of the Government Code, shall be 0.08 percent of the gross health insurance premiums paid by the employer and employee for administrative expenses. The Director of Finance may, not sooner than 30 days after notification to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, adjust the rate to ensure a two-month reserve in the Public Employees’ Contingency Reserve Fund. SEC. 4.30. (a) Notwithstanding any other law, the Director of Finance may adjust amounts in appropriation items, including funds transferred to the Expense Account in the Public Buildings Construction Fund, for rental payments on lease-purchase and lease-revenue bonds in this act as a result of changes from amounts budgeted for the costs for the 2026–27 fiscal year. (b) Notwithstanding any other law, the adjustments for rental payments and insurance may be made from funds appropriated for this purpose or from any other funds legally available. (c) Within 30 days of making any adjustments pursuant to this section, the Department of Finance shall report the adjustments in writing to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee. SEC. 4.72. Upon presentation of project cost information by the Department of General Services, the Department of Finance may augment any non-General Fund item of appropriation of any department by an amount sufficient to reimburse the Department of General Services for activities related to engineering assessments and electric vehicle charging infrastructure at state facilities. SEC. 4.75. The Director of Finance may adjust any item of appropriation for departmental support for the purpose of reimbursing the Department of General Services for centralized costs billed through the statewide surcharge. SEC. 4.80. In the event bonds authorized for issuance by the State Public Works Board are not sold and interim financing costs have been incurred, departments that have incurred those costs shall commit a sufficient portion of their support appropriations to repay the interim financing costs. SEC. 4.90. Notwithstanding any other law, the Department of Finance may transfer any funds previously transferred to the Architecture Revolving Fund back to the original fund source. A transfer shall not be authorized sooner than 30 days after notification in writing of the necessity therefor is provided to the chairpersons of the committees in each house of the Legislature that consider appropriations, the chairpersons of the committees and the appropriate subcommittees in each house of the Legislature that consider the State Budget, and the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, or sooner than whatever lesser time the chairperson of the joint committee, or the chairperson’s designee, may in each instance determine. SEC. 4.95. Notwithstanding any other law, the Department of Finance may transfer any funds previously transferred from the General Fund to the Inmate Construction Revolving Account back to the General Fund. SEC. 5.25. (a) Payment of the attorney’s fees specified in paragraphs (1) and (2) arising from actions in state courts against the state, its officers, and officers and employees of state agencies, departments, boards, bureaus, or commissions shall be paid from items of appropriation that support the state operations of the affected agency, department, board, bureau, or commission: (1) State court actions filed pursuant to Section 1021.5 of the Code of Civil Procedure, the “private attorney general” doctrine, or the “substantial benefit” doctrine. (2) Writ of mandate actions filed pursuant to Section 10962 of the Welfare and Institutions Code. (b) Expenditures pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be made by the Controller, subject to the approval of the Director of Finance, and shall be charged to the fiscal year in which the disbursement is issued. (c) A payment shall not be made by the Controller for expenditures pursuant to subdivision (a) except in full and final satisfaction of the claim, settlement, compromise, or judgment for attorney’s fees incurred in connection with a single action. (d) The Director of Finance shall notify the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, the Chairperson of the Senate Committee on Budget and Fiscal Review, and the Chairperson of the Assembly Committee on Budget pursuant to Items 9840-001-0001, 9840-001-0494, and 9840-001-0988 of Section 2.00 when there are insufficient funds appropriated in support of the state operations of the affected agency, department, board, bureau, or commission to satisfy the claim completely. SEC. 5.27. (a) Up to $7,350,000 of the amount appropriated in paragraph (1) of subdivision (e) of Section 5.25 of the Budget Act of 2024 (Chs. 22, 35, and 994, Stats. 2024) is hereby reappropriated for the purposes provided for in that subdivision, and funds reappropriated pursuant to this subdivision shall be available for encumbrance until June 30, 2027, and expenditure until June 30, 2029. (b) Notwithstanding any other law, the Department of Finance, upon providing advance notice of at least 10 days to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, may augment any item of appropriation in Section 2.00 for the purpose of defending the state against enforcement and legal actions taken by the federal government, filing affirmative litigation challenging actions taken by the federal government, and taking administrative action authorized under state law to mitigate the impacts of actions taken by the federal government. Total augmentations authorized by this subdivision shall not exceed the amount reappropriated in subdivision (a). SEC. 6.00. The Department of Finance may, pursuant to a request by a department to which an appropriation is made by this act, authorize the use of up to $3,000,000 appropriated for support purposes for one or more of the acquisition, preliminary plans, working drawings, construction, performance criteria, or design-build phases of any project for the improvement of a state facility, provided that overall project costs do not exceed $3,000,000. A request of more than $500,000 shall be reported to the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, or the chairperson’s designee, not less than 30 days prior to Department of Finance approval. SEC. 6.40. (a) Notwithstanding any other law, any funds of the state, including, but not limited to, funds from the General Fund, the Trade Corridor Enhancement Account, or the Greenhouse Gas Reduction Fund, with the exemption of the Safe Drinking Water, Wildfire Prevention, Drought Preparedness, and Clean Air Fund, that are allocated for programs including, but not limited to, the Carl Moyer Memorial Air Quality Standards Attainment Program, the Port and Freight Infrastructure Program, the Solutions for Congested Corridors Program, the Clean Off-Road Equipment program, the Commercial Harbor Craft program, and the Clean Transportation Program, shall not be allocated for the purchase of fully automated cargo handling equipment or infrastructure that is used to support fully automated cargo handling equipment. (b) For purposes of this section, “fully automated” means equipment that is remotely operated, remotely controlled, or remotely monitored, with or without the exercise of human intervention or control. This section does not prohibit the use of the funds specified in subdivision (a) for a project that includes the purchase of human-operated zero-emission equipment, human-operated near-zero-emission equipment, and infrastructure supporting that human-operated equipment. Furthermore, this section does not prohibit the purchase of devices that support that human-operated equipment, including equipment to evaluate the utilization and environmental benefits of that human-operated equipment. SEC. 8.00. (a) Notwithstanding Section 28.00, any amounts received from the federal government for the purposes of funding antiterrorism costs in the state that exceed the current appropriation of federal funds for that purpose, are hereby appropriated. These federal funds shall be allocated upon order of the Director of Finance to state departments for state or local assistance purposes or directly to local governments to address high-priority needs for costs of funding antiterrorism incurred in the 2025–26 fiscal year and ongoing or new costs for the 2026–27 fiscal year. (b) Allocations made to state departments may be used to offset expenditures paid or to be paid from other funding sources. Allocations made for the purpose of an offset shall be applied as a negative expenditure to the appropriation where the expenditure has been or will be charged. (c) Allocations pursuant to this section may be authorized not sooner than 30 days after notification to the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, or not sooner than whatever lesser time the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, or the chairperson’s designee, may in each instance determine. SEC. 8.50. (a) In making appropriations to state agencies that are eligible for federal programs, it is the intent and understanding of the Legislature that applications made by the agencies for federal funds under federal programs shall be for the maximum amount allowable under federal law. Therefore, any amounts received from the federal government are hereby appropriated from federal funds for expenditure or for transfer to, and disbursement from, the State Treasury fund established for the purpose of receiving the federal assistance subject to any provisions of this act that apply to the expenditure of these funds, including Section 28.00. (b) However, if federal funds for block grant programs assumed by the state or for any item receiving federal funds are reduced by more than 5 percent of the amount appropriated in this act, the Director of Finance shall notify the chairpersons of the committees in each house of the Legislature that consider appropriations, and the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, in writing within 30 days after notification by the federal government that federal funds have been reduced, and shall include an estimate of the amount of the available or anticipated federal funds, the 2026–27 fiscal year expenditures of each program affected by the reduction, the effect of reduced funding on service levels authorized by this act, and a plan of reduced expenditures for each program affected by the reduction. The plan shall be operational on an interim basis for up to 45 days pending legislative review, after which time the plan shall become permanent. (c) Any expenditure of federal Temporary Assistance for Needy Families (TANF) block grant funds in excess of the amounts specified and appropriated in this act are subject to the notification procedures and requirements set forth in Section 28.00, or Provision 4 of Item 5180-101-0001 of Section 2.00, whichever is applicable. The notification and other requirements of Section 28.00 also shall apply to any proposed substitution of TANF block grant funds for other state or federal funds. SEC. 8.51. Each state agency shall, by certification to the Controller, identify the account within the Federal Trust Fund when charges are made against any appropriation made herein from the Federal Trust Fund. SEC. 8.52. (a) The Director of Finance may reduce items of appropriation upon receipt or expenditure of federal trust funds in lieu of the amount appropriated for the same purpose and may make allocations for the purpose of offsetting expenditures. Allocations made for the purpose of offsetting existing expenditures shall be applied as a negative expenditure to the appropriation where the expenditure was charged. (b) The director shall notify in writing the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee and the chairpersons of the fiscal committees in each house of the Legislature not less than 30 days prior to the effective date of any adjustments to items of appropriations made pursuant to this section or not sooner than whatever lesser time the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, or the chairperson’s designee, may in each instance determine. The notification shall include, but not be limited to, the basis for the proposed appropriation adjustments, a description of the fiscal assumptions used in making the appropriation adjustments, and any necessary background information regarding the programs to be adjusted. Any expenditure of federal funds for purposes other than offsetting other fund appropriations shall continue to be subject to the provisions of Section 28.00. SEC. 8.53. It is the intent of the Legislature that reductions to federal funds appropriated in the Budget Bill enacted for each fiscal year, resulting from federal audits, be communicated to the Legislature in a timely manner. Therefore, notwithstanding any other law, an agency, department, or other state entity receiving a final federal audit or deferral letter shall provide a copy of it to the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee within 30 days. SEC. 8.54. (a) It is the intent of the Legislature that the State of California collect federally allowable statewide indirect costs, except where prohibited by federal statutes. If the Department of Finance determines a state agency is not recovering allowable statewide indirect costs from the federal government as required by Sections 13332.01 and 13332.02 of the Government Code, the Department of Finance may reduce any appropriation for state operations for the state agency by an amount not to exceed 1 percent and transfer that amount to the Central Service Cost Recovery Fund, the General Fund, or both, as allocated by the Department of Finance. (b) The Department of Finance shall notify in writing the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee not less than 30 days prior to the effective date of any reductions to items of appropriation made pursuant to this section or not sooner than whatever lesser time the chairperson of the joint committee, or the chairperson’s designee, may in each instance determine. The notification shall contain the following: (1) the state agency name, (2) the amount of central services costs that was not recovered, (3) the item of appropriation that will be reduced, and (4) the amount of the reduction to the appropriation and the amount of the transfer to the Central Service Cost Recovery Fund, the General Fund, or both. SEC. 8.75. (a) In order to maximize the state’s receipt of federal funds, it is the intent of the Legislature in enacting this section to provide flexibility and streamline the administrative approval process for providing funds, including funds from the General Fund, to meet state matching requirements and take full advantage of funding opportunities made available under the Infrastructure Investment and Jobs Act (P.L. 117-58), the Inflation Reduction Act (P.L. 117-169), and the CHIPS Act of 2022 (P.L. 117-167), and set a deadline of September 30, 2028, for expenditure of the funds. It is also the intent of the Legislature in enacting this section to more generally provide flexibility for budgetary adjustments to appropriations for applicable purposes, to expend unanticipated federal funds received by the state that are available for such purposes, and offer the use of state funds consistent with the purposes for which the unanticipated federal funds were made available, if applicable. (b) In the event that unanticipated formula or competitive fund opportunities are made available for a state department under the Infrastructure Investment and Jobs Act, the Inflation Reduction Act, or the CHIPS Act of 2022, the Director of Finance may provide the department a letter of commitment, if one is needed, for funds from an existing appropriation, including funds from the General Fund, if the department lacks an alternative viable funding source and provided the proposed use of the additional federal funds is consistent with general uses of the appropriated funds provided as match, to indicate the state’s commitment to meet the state match requirements mandated for the Infrastructure Investment and Jobs Act, the Inflation Reduction Act, or the CHIPS Act of 2022. (c) In the event that unanticipated formula or competitive fund opportunities under the Infrastructure Investment and Jobs Act, the Inflation Reduction Act, or the CHIPS Act of 2022 are awarded to a state department, the Department of Finance may adjust any item in Section 2.00 or create a new item to provide funds from an existing appropriation, including funds from the General Fund, if the department lacks an alternative viable funding source, to meet state match requirements mandated for the Infrastructure Investment and Jobs Act, the Inflation Reduction Act, or the CHIPS Act of 2022, provided the proposed use of the additional federal funds is consistent with general uses of the appropriated funds provided as match. (d) The Department of Finance may allocate unanticipated federal funds to effect or reduce, in whole or in part, any item of appropriation for purposes, including appropriations from state funds and from existing federal funding sources. Allocations shall be consistent with the purposes for which the unanticipated federal funds were made available. Reductions to appropriations made pursuant to this subdivision shall equal the amount of federal funds to be allocated. Any savings pursuant to this section shall revert to the fund from which the appropriation was made. (e) The Department of Finance may create a new budget item to accommodate unanticipated federal funds from the Infrastructure Investment and Jobs Act, the Inflation Reduction Act, or the CHIPS Act of 2022 intended for applicable purposes consistent with the purposes for which the unanticipated federal funds were made available, should an applicable item of appropriation not exist in the State Budget. (f) Any adjustment pursuant to this section shall not be made prior to 30 days after the Director of Finance notifies the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee in writing of the purposes of the planned adjustment, and justification for the adjustment amount. The Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, or the chairperson’s designee, may shorten or waive that 30-day period by written notification to the Director of Finance. SEC. 9.30. In the event that federal courts issue writs of execution for the levy of state funds and such writs are executed, the Controller shall so notify the Department of Finance. The Department of Finance shall then notify the Controller of the specific appropriation or fund to be charged. Federal writs of execution for the levy of state funds may only be charged against appropriations or funds having a direct programmatic link to the circumstances under which the federal writ was issued. If the appropriate department or agency no longer exists, or no linkage can be identified, the federal writ shall be charged to the unappropriated surplus of the General Fund. In the event that an appropriation in the act would have insufficient funding by such a charge, funding augmentations must follow the regular budget processes. SEC. 9.50. For minor capital outlay projects for which, pursuant to Section 10108 of the Public Contract Code, the services of the Department of General Services are not required and a state agency or department is authorized to carry out its own project, the amount of the unencumbered balance of the project shall be determined in accordance with this section. Upon receipt of bids for the project, an estimate of any amount necessary for the completion of the project, including supervision, engineering, and other items, if any, shall be deemed a valid encumbrance and shall be included with any other valid encumbrance in determining the amount of an unencumbered balance. SEC. 11.00. The Department of Finance shall report to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee when a reportable information technology project’s overall costs increase by $5,000,000 or 20 percent of the budgeted cost of the project, whichever is less. Each report shall include all of the following: (a) the total change in cost, scope, and schedule; (b) the reason for the change or changes; (c) a description of new, amended, or new and amended contracts required as a result of the change or changes; (d) a list of the risks and issues identified in the last two Independent Verification and Validation and Independent Project Oversight Reports and any risk and issue that has been identified since those reports; and (e) the department’s planned mitigation of these risks and issues. The report shall be made no less than 30 calendar days prior to any commitment to a new contract or contract amendment that is a result of the change or changes identified above, or a lesser period if requested by the department and approved by the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee or the chairperson’s designee. SEC. 11.10. (a) Before a department may enter into or amend a statewide software license agreement not previously approved by the Legislature that obligates state funds in the current year or future years, the Director of Finance shall notify the Legislature whether or not the obligation will result in a net expenditure or savings. A department shall prepare and submit to the Department of Finance a business proposal containing the following elements: installed base analysis, future use (including assumptions for future use), the reason for choosing a statewide license agreement rather than any other procurement method such as a volume purchase agreement, a cost-benefit analysis, a cost-allocation methodology, and a funding plan. A statewide software license agreement may not be entered into or amended unless the approval of the Director of Finance is first obtained and written notification of that approval is provided by the department to the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, and the chairpersons of the budget committees of each house of the Legislature, not less than 30 days prior to the effective date of the approval, or not less than whatever shorter period prior to the effective date of the approval the chairperson of the joint committee, or the chairperson’s designee, may in each instance determine. Each notification required by this section shall: (1) Explain the necessity and rationale for the proposed agreement. (2) Identify the cost savings, revenue increase, or other fiscal benefit of the proposed agreement. (3) Identify the funding source for the proposed agreement. (b) For purposes of this section, “statewide software license agreement” means a software license contract that can be used by multiple state agencies subject to Article 2 (commencing with Section 13320) of Chapter 3 of Part 3 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code except that this section shall not apply to the University of California, the California State University, the State Compensation Insurance Fund, the community college districts, agencies provided for by Article VI of the California Constitution, or the Legislature. (c) Subdivision (a) does not apply if the amount of the proposed contract or amendment is less than $1,000,000 in the aggregate. SEC. 11.11. To protect the privacy of state employees and ensure the security of the payment of public funds, all departments, boards, offices, and other agencies and entities of the state shall distribute pay warrants and direct deposit advices to employees in a manner that ensures that personal and confidential information contained on the warrants and direct deposit advices is protected from unauthorized access. The Department of Human Resources shall advise all departments, boards, offices, and other agencies and entities of state government of the requirements contained in this section. SEC. 11.94. (a) It is the intent of the Legislature in enacting this section to provide flexibility for administrative adjustments, to fully spend the $540,249,909 in federal funds appropriated in Item 8660-001-0890 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2021 (Chs. 21, 69, and 240, Stats. 2021) allocated from the Coronavirus Capital Projects Fund as authorized by the federal American Rescue Plan Act of 2021 (P.L. 117-2), that support last mile broadband infrastructure projects to address the state’s significant digital divide or are otherwise eligible expenditures pursuant to federal law or guidance. (b) Except as provided in this section, allocations of these funds shall be made in the annual Budget Act or another statute. Section 28.00 does not apply to the funds described in this section. (c) Notwithstanding any other provision of this act or any other law, any appropriation in Item 8660-001-0890 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2021 (Chs. 21, 69, and 240, Stats. 2021) shall be available for expenditure through December 31, 2026, unless a later deadline is authorized by the federal government. (d) The Director of Finance may reduce an amount appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of Technology to expand broadband infrastructure, appropriated in Item 7502-001-0001 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2021 (Chs. 21, 69, and 240, Stats. 2021), as amended by Section 11.96 of the Budget Act of 2022 (Chs. 43, 45, and 249, Stats. 2022) and Section 11.96 of the Budget Act of 2024 (Chs. 22, 35, and 994, Stats. 2024), and instead allocate that amount from Item 8660-001-0890 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2021 (Chs. 21, 69, and 240, Stats. 2021). If no item currently exists to allow for such an allocation, an item may be created for this purpose. The Controller shall shift any accounting transactions posted from the General Fund to Item 8660-001-0890 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2021 (Chs. 21, 69, and 240, Stats. 2021) as directed by the Director of Finance. The funds allocated pursuant to this subdivision shall be available for expenditure through December 31, 2026. The Director of Finance shall increase a Public Utilities Commission item for last-mile broadband infrastructure by an amount equal to the reduction under this section of Item 7502-001-0001 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2021 (Chs. 21, 69, and 240, Stats. 2021), with such funds being used exclusively for the purpose of last-mile broadband infrastructure. If no item currently exists to allow for such an allocation, an item may be created for this purpose. (e) The Director of Finance may reduce an amount appropriated from Item 8660-001-0890 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2021 (Chs. 21, 69, and 240, Stats. 2021) to the Public Utilities Commission for last mile broadband infrastructure and instead allocate that amount from the General Fund. If no item currently exists to allow for such an allocation, an item may be created for this purpose. The Controller shall shift any accounting transactions posted from Item 8660-001-0890 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2021 (Chs. 21, 69, and 240, Stats. 2021) to the General Fund as directed by the Director of Finance. The funds allocated pursuant to this subdivision shall be available for expenditure through December 31, 2030. (f) Adjustments authorized pursuant to this section shall not be made prior to 30 days after the Director of Finance notifies the Joint Legislative Budget Committee in writing of the purposes of the planned expenditure and the justification for the amount proposed for expenditure. The Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, or the chairperson’s designee, may shorten or waive that 30-day period by written notification to the Director of Finance. SEC. 11.96. (a) It is the intent of the Legislature in enacting this section to provide flexibility for administrative adjustments, to fully spend the $27,017,016,860 in federal funds allocated from the Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Fund as authorized by the federal American Rescue Plan Act of 2021 (P.L. 117-2), that support the state’s response to the COVID-19 public health emergency, address the negative economic impacts caused by COVID-19, support eligible infrastructure, or are otherwise eligible expenditures pursuant to federal law or guidance. These funds shall be deposited in the Coronavirus Fiscal Recovery Fund of 2021 and may earn interest. (b) Except as provided in this section, allocations of these funds shall be made in the annual Budget Act or another statute. Section 28.00 does not apply to the funds described in this section. (c) Beginning July 1, 2026, the Director of Finance may adjust any item of appropriation to reallocate funds, to ensure funds are either returned to the federal government pursuant to federal guidance and regulations or expended or encumbered by the federal deadline for other allowable activities, including, but not limited to, direct disaster response costs based upon actual expenditures, as determined by the Department of Finance, pursuant to this section, subject to notification to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee as specified in subdivision (h). If no item for a department currently exists to allow for the expenditure of funds, an item may be created for this purpose. The Controller shall shift any accounting transactions posted as directed by the Director of Finance. (d) Until all funds are expended or encumbered, the Director of Finance shall annually report in writing by March 1 the amount of unexpended or unencumbered funds by program to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee and the chairpersons of the committees in each house of the Legislature that consider appropriations. (e) All obligations from the Coronavirus Fiscal Recovery Fund of 2021 shall be liquidated by the end of the period of performance of December 31, 2026, unless the Director of Finance determines this deadline should be adjusted pursuant to any changes authorized by the federal government, including regulations or federal guidance. (f) The Director of Finance is authorized to initiate the reversion of unspent funds from an appropriation for a specific programmatic purpose from the Coronavirus Fiscal Recovery Fund of 2021. Any unspent funds made available pursuant to this subdivision shall be allocated to direct disaster response costs based upon actual expenditures or returned to the federal government, as determined by the Department of Finance, pursuant to this section, subject to notification to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee as specified in subdivision (h). (g) (1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the Director of Finance may authorize the transfer of interest earned from the Coronavirus Fiscal Recovery Fund of 2021 to the General Fund to be allocated for the following purposes: (A) To support administrative and operational costs incurred for the programmatic purposes appropriated from the Coronavirus Fiscal Recovery Fund of 2021 until December 31, 2026. (B) To conduct an audit or address audit findings to mitigate and ensure full compliance and use of the funds described in subdivision (a) for the intended purposes, consistent with federal requirements for any program, project, or function in the schedule of any item of appropriation in this act. (C) Any remaining interest, after the allocations pursuant to paragraphs (A) and (B), shall be allocated as determined by the Department of Finance. (2) If no item for a department currently exists to allow for a General Fund allocation, pursuant to paragraph (1), an item may be created for this purpose. The funds allocated pursuant to this subdivision shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until December 31, 2026. (3) Any actions taken by the Director of Finance pursuant to this subdivision is subject to notification to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee as specified in subdivision (h). (h) Adjustments, including reversions, authorized pursuant to this section shall not be expended or reverted prior to 30 days after the Director of Finance notifies the Joint Legislative Budget Committee in writing of the purposes of the planned expenditure or reversion and the justification for the amount proposed for expenditure or reversion. The Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, or the chairperson’s designee, may shorten or waive that 30-day period by written notification to the Director of Finance. SEC. 11.97. It is the intent of the Legislature that federal fund appropriations for capital outlay projects that may be excluded from the state appropriations limit, as provided in Article XIII B of the California Constitution, be funded with General Fund resources to the maximum extent possible in the 2026–27 fiscal year. The Department of Finance shall determine if any appropriation of federal funds meets the definition of qualified capital outlay projects pursuant to Section 7914 of the Government Code. If the Department of Finance determines that a capital outlay federal fund appropriation qualifies, except for federal funds specifically allocated for capital outlay projects, the Director of Finance may replace the identified appropriation with eligible noncapital outlay expenditures appropriated from the General Fund, but only to the extent necessary to remain below the state appropriations limit for the 2026–27 fiscal year. SEC. 12.00. For the purposes of Article XIII B of the California Constitution, there is hereby established a state “appropriations limit” of $182,011,000,000 $182,027,000,000 for the 2026–27 fiscal year. Any judicial action or proceeding to attack, review, set aside, void, or annul the “appropriations limit” for the 2026–27 fiscal year shall be commenced within 45 days of the effective date of this act. SEC. 12.30. There is hereby appropriated from the General Fund for transfer to the Special Fund for Economic Uncertainties by the Controller, upon order of the Director of Finance, an amount necessary to bring the balance of this special fund up to the amount stated in the 2026–27 Final Change Book for the 2026–27 fiscal year ending balance. The amount so transferred shall be reduced by the amount of excess revenues subject to Section 2 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution, as determined by the Director of Finance. SEC. 12.32. (a) It is the intent of the Legislature that appropriations that are subject to Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution be designated with the wording “Proposition 98.” In the event these appropriations are not so designated, they may be designated as such by the Department of Finance, where that designation is consistent with legislative intent, not less than 30 days after notification in writing of the proposed designation to the chairpersons of the committees in each house of the Legislature that consider appropriations and the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, or not less than a shorter period after notification that the chairperson of the joint committee, or the chairperson’s designee, determines. (b) Pursuant to the Proposition 98 funding requirements established in Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 41200) of Part 24 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Education Code, the total appropriations for Proposition 98 for the 2026–27 fiscal year are $92,757,498,000, $92,834,380,000 or 39.61 percent of total General Fund revenues, Education Protection Account revenues, and transfers subject to the state appropriations limit. General Fund and Education Protection Account revenues appropriated for school districts are $82,694,680,000, $82,763,159,000 or 35.32 percent of total General Fund revenues, Education Protection Account revenues, and transfers subject to the state appropriations limit. General Fund and Education Protection Account revenues appropriated to school districts and community college districts for adult education and K–12 Career Technical Education Strong Workforce Program are $866,536,000, or 0.37 percent of total General Fund revenues, Education Protection Account revenues, and transfers subject to the state appropriations limit. General Fund and Education Protection Account revenues appropriated for community college districts are $9,096,244,000, $9,104,647,000 or 3.88 percent of total General Fund revenues, Education Protection Account revenues, and transfers subject to the state appropriations limit. General Fund and Education Protection Account revenues appropriated for other state agencies that provide direct elementary and secondary level education, as defined in Section 41302.5 of the Education Code, are $100,038,000, or 0.04 percent of total General Fund revenues, Education Protection Account revenues, and transfers subject to the state appropriations limit. No General Fund and Education Protection Account revenues are scheduled to be transferred to the Public School System Stabilization Account for the 2026–27 fiscal year. (c) Notwithstanding any preexisting budgetary or accounting requirements to the contrary, the Department of Finance shall make the final determination of the proper budgeting and accounting of the revenues received by, and disbursements from, the Education Protection Account. SEC. 12.33.(a)(1)Pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 21 of Article XVI of the California Constitution, the following estimated amounts are identified for transfer to the Public School System Stabilization Account. The actual amounts transferred by the Controller shall be the amounts identified in a schedule provided by the Director of Finance.(2)(A)The amount of the transfer to the Public School System Stabilization Account in the 2026–27 fiscal year, as reflected in Section 12.32, is $0.(B)The first true-up of the transfer to the Public School System Stabilization Account for the 2025–26 fiscal year is $4,192,060,000.(C)The second true-up of the transfer to the Public School System Stabilization account for the 2024–25 fiscal year is $4,869,004,000.(b)The funds transferred to the Public School System Stabilization Account in subdivision (a) shall be deemed, for purposes of Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution, to be moneys applied by the state for the support of school districts and community college districts in the fiscal year for which the transfer is made, and not in the fiscal year in which funds are appropriated from the account. SEC. 12.35. Notwithstanding any other law, the Student Aid Commission shall not implement any change in policy or practice that would have a fiscal effect exceeding $5,000,000 in any year to the costs of the programs funded in Item 6980-101-0001 unless the change is first approved by the Director of Finance and notice is provided by the Director of Finance to the chairpersons of the fiscal committees of each house of the Legislature not less than 30 days prior to the effective date of the approval. Each notification shall (a) explain the necessity for the change in policy or practice and (b) identify the fiscal effect of the change in the current fiscal year and subsequent fiscal years. It is the intent of the Legislature not to affect the entitlements of the Cal Grant Program. SEC. 12.45. The Director of Finance shall, for all agencies and departments paid through the Uniform State Payroll System (including the California State University), adjust as necessary any items to recognize the change in the accounting method for the payment of state employee salaries, pursuant to Section 13302 of the Government Code, and all benefits, including, but not limited to, both salary-driven benefits, not otherwise deferred, and health care costs. SEC. 13.00. (a) Notwithstanding any other law, expenditures under Items 0160-001-0001 and 0160-001-9740 of Section 2.00 or any appropriation in augmentation of those items shall be exempt from Chapter 5.5 (commencing with Section 11531) of Part 1 of, and Article 2 (commencing with Section 13320) of Chapter 3 of Part 3 of, Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, Division 2 (commencing with Section 1100) of the Public Contract Code, or successor statutes, and subdivision (a) of Section 713 of Title 2 of the California Code of Regulations, and may be expended as set forth in the Governor’s Budget, or for other purposes, including expenditures for the number of positions in various classifications authorized by the Joint Rules Committee. (b) Notwithstanding any other law, the unencumbered balances as of June 30, 2027, of the appropriations made by Items 0160-001-0001 and 0160-001-9740 of Section 2.00 are reappropriated and shall be available for encumbrance until June 30, 2028, for the same programs and purposes for which appropriations for these items have been made by this act. (c) Notwithstanding any other law, all moneys that are received as payment for the sale of services or personal property by the agency that have not been taken into consideration in the schedule of Item 0160-001-0001 of Section 2.00, or are in excess of the amount so taken into consideration, are to be credited to that item and are hereby appropriated in augmentation of that item for the same programs and purposes for which appropriations for that item have been made by this act. SEC. 13.40. The Director of Finance shall collectively transfer from various special funds or any other state borrowable funds to the General Fund any amount necessary to ensure that the balance of the Special Fund for Economic Uncertainties is at least $0 at the conclusion of the 2026–27 fiscal year. The specific funds to borrow from will only be from idle resources not required for currently projected operational or programmatic purposes. These transfers shall be budgetary loans during the 2026–27 fiscal year and shall be repaid in the 2026–27 fiscal year or a future fiscal year when the fund or account from which the loan was made has a need for the money or there is no longer a need for the money in the General Fund. SEC. 14.00. (a) Notwithstanding any other law, if the Director of Consumer Affairs determines in writing that there is insufficient cash in a special fund under the authority of a board, commission, or bureau of the Department of Consumer Affairs to make one or more payments currently due and payable, the director may order the transfer of moneys to that special fund, in the amount necessary to make the payment or payments, as a loan from a special fund under the authority of another board, commission, or bureau of the department. That loan shall be subject to all of the following conditions: (1) No loan from a special fund shall be made that would interfere with the carrying out of the purpose for which the special fund was created. (2) The loan shall be repaid as soon as there are sufficient moneys in the recipient fund to repay the amount loaned, but no later than a date 24 months after the date of the loan. Interest on the loan shall be paid from the recipient fund at the rate accruing during the loan period to moneys in the Pooled Money Investment Account. (3) The amount loaned shall not exceed the amount that the appropriate board, commission, or bureau is statutorily authorized at the time of the loan to expend during the 2026–27 fiscal year from the recipient fund. (4) The terms and conditions of the loan are approved, prior to the transfer of funds, by the Department of Finance pursuant to appropriate fiscal standards. (b) (1) Notwithstanding any other law, the Department of Consumer Affairs, during the 2026–27 fiscal year, may order the release of moneys from the clearing account in the Consumer Affairs Fund in an amount exceeding the amount advanced to the clearing account from a special fund within the department, as a loan to make one or more payments on behalf of that special fund that are currently due and payable. To the extent that the amount of moneys currently in the clearing account is insufficient to make the payment or payments on behalf of that special fund, the department may transfer additional moneys to the clearing account from any other special fund under the authority of a board, commission, or bureau of the department to include in the loan. A loan made to a special fund under this subdivision shall be subject to all of the following conditions: (A) The loan shall not be made if it would reduce the amount advanced to the clearing account from another special fund, or the amount contained in that special fund, as applicable, to an extent that would interfere with the carrying out of the purpose for which that special fund was created. (B) The loan shall be repaid as soon as there are sufficient moneys in the recipient fund to repay the amount loaned, but no later than a date 60 days after the date of the loan. (C) The amount loaned shall not exceed the amount that the appropriate board, commission, or bureau is statutorily authorized at the time of the loan to expend during the 2026–27 fiscal year from the recipient fund. (2) For purposes of this subdivision, the “clearing account” in the Consumer Affairs Fund is the account established in that fund, consisting of moneys advanced from the various special funds within the department, from which the Department of Consumer Affairs pays operating and other expenses of each special fund in an amount ordinarily not exceeding the amount advanced from that special fund. (c) The Director of Consumer Affairs shall provide a report by April 1, 2027, on all loans initiated or repayments made pursuant to subdivision (a) or (b) within the preceding fiscal year to the chairperson of the budget committee, and the chairperson of the appropriate legislative oversight committee, of each house of the Legislature. (d) At least 10 days prior to initiating a loan to be made pursuant to subdivision (a) or (b), the Director of Consumer Affairs shall provide written notification to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee if either (1) any loan from any one fund exceeds $200,000 or (2) the aggregate amount of loans from any one fund exceeds $200,000. SEC. 15.02. $2,631,000,000 is appropriated from the Safe Drinking Water, Wildfire Prevention, Drought Preparedness, and Clean Air Bond Act of 2024. No amount of the funding appropriated in this section shall be encumbered or expended until it has been allocated for specific purposes in the appropriate budget items in a future budget bill. SEC. 15.04. (a) The Department of Finance may transfer any portion of any Safe Drinking Water, Wildfire Prevention, Drought Preparedness, and Clean Air Bond Act of 2024 (Proposition 4) appropriation from the state entity receiving the appropriation to another state entity, for the following purposes: (i) To collaboratively fund projects at a landscape or multijurisdictional scale to provide multiple benefits consistent with Section 90620 of the Public Resources Code. A single state entity may be designated as the primary state entity for the purposes of receiving transferred Proposition 4 funds and administering a landscape or multijurisdictional scale project that meets the purpose or purposes specified in Proposition 4. (ii) To avoid delays related to cashflow constraints resulting from reimbursements in arrears when a state entity awards or assigns funding pursuant to Proposition 4 to another state entity by instead providing the funding directly to the state entity receiving the award or assignment. (b) To receive consideration for approval of a transfer pursuant to paragraph (i) of subdivision (a) of this section, the primary state entity must notify the Department of Finance within 30 days of finalizing an agreement with each participating state entity. The notification shall include: the project name and description, total estimated cost of the project, the amount of funding to be contributed by the participating entity, the amount or amounts and the Proposition 4 section or sections authorizing the subject funding for each needed transfer, and the amounts by funding source of all other approved or pending state entity contributions to the project. (c) The Department of Finance may create new items as necessary to facilitate the transfer and expenditure of funds as authorized pursuant to this section. (d) Upon processing of any transfer authorized pursuant to this section, the state entity receiving the transfer shall notify the California Natural Resources Agency to assist with tracking of transferred funds. The notification shall include the project name, the amount of funding transferred, and a list of the item or items of appropriation impacted, including dollar amounts by item, and the associated Proposition 4 sections authorizing the funding. (a)Notwithstanding any other law, up to $5,838,000,000 is hereby appropriated from the Greenhouse Gas Reduction Fund in the following order of priority:(1)The sum of $1,000,000,000 for the priorities of the Legislature, as provided for in paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 39719.4 of the Health and Safety Code, and the sum of $3,000,000 for the Legislative Counsel Climate Bureau pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 39719.4 of the Health and Safety Code.(2)The sum of $1,980,000,000 for programs established pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) of Section 39719.4 of the Health and Safety Code.(3)The sum of $250,000,000 for the Zero-Emission Transit Capital Program and Transit and Intercity Rail Capital Program.(4)Up to $1,250,000,000 for the Department of Forestry and Fire Protection.(5)Up to $1,000,000,000 for the High-Speed Rail Authority pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 39719.4 of the Health and Safety Code.(6)Up to $355,000,000 for amounts pursuant to paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 39719.4 of the Health and Safety Code.(b)A state agency or department shall not encumber or otherwise commit any funds appropriated from the Greenhouse Gas Reduction Fund for the 2026–27 fiscal year pursuant to this section until either of the following occurs:(1)The Department of Finance makes a written determination that estimates at least $5,838,000,000 will be available for appropriation from the Greenhouse Gas Reduction Fund, inclusive of interest income and fund balance, in both the 2026–27 and 2027–28 fiscal years, and that no programs will receive reductions pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (c) of Section 39719.4 of the Health and Safety Code.(2)$1,000,000,000 is appropriated from the Greenhouse Gas Reduction Fund in the 2026–27 fiscal year for the priorities of the Legislature, as provided for in paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 39719.4 of the Health and Safety Code, $3,000,000 is appropriated from the fund for the Legislative Counsel Climate Bureau pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 39719.4 of the Health and Safety Code, and all programs specified in paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) of Section 39719.4 of the Health and Safety Code are projected to receive the full identified funding amounts and will not be subject to any proportional or other reductions in accordance with the Cap and Invest agreement of 2025, along with the enactment of a provision of this act that specifies that the requirement of this paragraph has been met.(c)No later than July 6, 2026, the Department of Finance shall provide the relevant fiscal and policy committees of the Legislature updated revenue estimates for the Greenhouse Gas Reduction Fund for the 2026–27 and 2027–28 fiscal years, incorporating as applicable the projected effects of any actions taken by the State Air Resources Board on the cap-and-invest regulation prior to that date. For purposes of implementing this subdivision, the Department of Finance shall assume that any amendments to regulations that are approved in any resolution of the State Air Resources Board before July 6, 2026, are adopted into law.(d)Notwithstanding any other law or regulation, the State Air Resources Board shall not create or distribute any Manufacturing Decarbonization Incentive allowances, or any compliance instrument above or outside of the emissions cap established by the regulation, unless all of the following conditions are met:(1)The State Air Resources Board makes a written determination, which is reviewed and accompanied by written comments from the Independent Emissions Market Advisory Committee created pursuant to Section 38591.2 of the Health and Safety Code, that the use of any such allowances or compliance instruments is consistent with the statewide emission reductions required by the latest climate change scoping plan and Division 25.5 (commencing with Section 38500) of the Health and Safety Code, including Sections 38562.2 and 38566.(2)The State Energy Resources Conservation and Development Commission makes a written determination that providing refiners with additional allowances will lower retail gasoline prices, based on an analysis of data collected pursuant to Section 25355 of the Public Resources Code.(3)The Department of Finance makes a written determination estimating that at least $5,838,000,000 will be available for appropriation from the Greenhouse Gas Reduction Fund, inclusive of interest income and fund balance, in both the 2026–27 and 2027–28 fiscal years, and that all programs specified in paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) of Section 39719.4 of the Health and Safety Code are projected to receive the full identified funding amounts and not be subject to any proportional or other reductions. SEC. 15.14. (a) Any appropriation from the Greenhouse Gas Reduction Fund shall be subject to the restrictions specified in subdivision (b). (b) A state agency or department shall not encumber or otherwise commit any funds appropriated from the Greenhouse Gas Reduction Fund for the 2026–27 fiscal year until a determination is made by the Department of Finance that Cap-and-Invest auction proceeds in the 2026–27 fiscal year are sufficient to fully fund amounts specified in subdivisions (a) and (b) and paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) of Section 39719.4 of the Health and Safety Code. (c) If there are not sufficient funds to fully fund appropriations pursuant to subdivision (b), the Department of Finance shall proportionally reduce appropriations based on the amount of funding available from auction proceeds after subdivisions (a) and (b) and paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) of Section 39719.4 of the Health and Safety Code are fully funded. (d) Upon determination of the final amount of auction proceeds after the fourth Cap-and-Invest auction in the 2026–27 fiscal year, the Department of Finance shall make a final determination for the expenditure of any remaining available auction proceeds pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 39719.4 of the Health and Safety Code, and shall notify the Joint Legislative Budget Committee no later than 30 days after its final determination if there are decreased auction proceeds that require a modification to the expenditure of funds. (e) The Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code) does not apply to guidelines or other standards adopted and used by a state agency in administering an allocation of moneys from the Greenhouse Gas Reduction Fund. SEC. 15.25. (a) Notwithstanding any other law, the Director of Finance may adjust amounts in any item of appropriation in Section 2.00 resulting from changes in rates for technology services in the 2025 or 2026 calendar year. (b) Within 30 days of making any adjustment pursuant to this section, the Department of Finance shall report the adjustment in writing to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee. SEC. 15.45. The Controller shall offset General Fund payments to the Trial Court Trust Fund in Section 2.00 with any funds received from county offices of education for reimbursement of trial court costs pursuant to Section 2578 of the Education Code. These offsets shall be recorded as a reduction of total expenditures and shall not be a reduction to any department or program budget item. SEC. 20.00. (a) It is the intent of the Legislature, in enacting this section, to provide flexibility for the administrative approval of reappropriations and reversions within individual items of appropriation in those instances where the actions are necessary for the efficient and cost-effective implementation of the programs, projects, and functions funded by this act or any prior appropriation. No adjustment shall be authorized under this section to either eliminate any program, project, or function, except when implementation is found to be no longer feasible in light of changing circumstances or new information, or establish any new program, project, or function. This process shall not be used for the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation. (b) The Director of Finance may extend the date of availability for encumbrance or expenditure, of any appropriation or reappropriation, or a portion thereof, from the funds specified in subdivision (f), to no later than three years following the last day the appropriation is currently available for encumbrance if the Director of Finance determines that the department, office, or other state entity requires additional time to complete the original purpose of the appropriation. (c) The Director of Finance may extend the period that an encumbrance of an appropriation from the funds specified in subdivision (f), or a portion thereof, is available for liquidation to no later than three years following the last day the appropriation is currently available for liquidation. (d) If the Director of Finance determines that it is necessary to revert all, or a portion, of a support or local assistance appropriation from the funds identified in subdivision (f), that portion shall, upon order of the Director of Finance, revert to and become a part of the fund from which the appropriation was made. (e) (1) Any reappropriation, extension, or reversion pursuant to subdivision (b), (c), or (d) may be authorized not sooner than 30 days after notification in writing of the necessity therefor is provided to the chairpersons of the committees in each house of the Legislature that consider appropriations, the chairpersons of the committees and the appropriate subcommittees in each house of the Legislature that consider the State Budget, and the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, or not sooner than whatever lesser time the chairperson of the joint committee, or the chairperson’s designee, may in each instance determine. No more than two such notifications shall be submitted per fiscal year, and shall be submitted on or before February 1 and May 1 and include the information in paragraph (2). (2) The notification shall include a report listing reappropriations, reversions, and extensions of liquidations. For each reappropriation, reversion, and extension, the report shall include all information that identifies each impacted department, if applicable, the appropriation type, the associated item of appropriation and enactment year, bond subsection, if applicable, new encumbrance and liquidation dates, if applicable, and a brief description of the rationale for each change. (f) This section shall apply to the following specified funds: (1) 0545-River Parkway Subaccount. (2) 0660/0668-Public Buildings Construction Fund. (3) 6001-Safe Drinking Water, Clean Water, Watershed Protection, and Flood Protection Bond Fund. (4) 6005-Flood Protection Corridor Subaccount. (5) 6007-Urban Stream Restoration Subaccount. (6) 6013-Watershed Protection Subaccount. (7) 6022-Coastal Nonpoint Source Control Subaccount. (8) 6026-Bay-Delta Multipurpose Water Management Subaccount. (9) 6027-Interim Water Supply and Water Quality Infrastructure and Management Subaccount. (10) 6029-California Clean Water, Coastal and Beach Protection Fund of 2002. (11) 6031-Water Security, Clean Drinking Water, Clean Air, Safe Neighborhood Parks, and Coastal Protection Fund. (12) 6041-Higher Education Capital Outlay Bond Fund of 2004. (13) 6049-2006 California Community College Capital Outlay Bond Fund. (14) 6051-Safe Drinking Water, Water Quality and Supply, Flood Control, River and Coastal Protection Fund of 2006. (15) 6083-Water Quality, Supply, and Infrastructure Improvement Fund of 2014. (16) 6087-2016 California Community College Capital Outlay Bond Fund. (17) 6088-California Drought, Water, Parks, Climate, Coastal Protection, and Outdoor Access For All Fund. SEC. 24.00. For each fiscal year, the donations and oil and mineral revenues from federal lands that are deposited in the State School Fund shall be divided between Sections A and B of the State School Fund, with 85 percent of these revenues to be credited to Section A of the fund exclusively for regular apportionments for school districts serving pupils in kindergarten or any of grades 1 to 12, inclusive, and 15 percent to Section B of the fund exclusively for community college district regular apportionments. The amounts accruing to the State School Fund under this section shall be disbursed fully before any General Fund transfers to Section A or B of the State School Fund are disbursed for regular apportionments. SEC. 24.30. Notwithstanding any other law, the Controller, upon the order of the Director of Finance, shall transfer sale and lease revenues received pursuant to Sections 17089 and 17089.2 of the Education Code, in an amount determined by the Department of Finance, from the State School Building Aid Fund to the General Fund. SEC. 24.60. Each state entity receiving lottery funds shall annually report to the Governor and the Legislature on or before May 15 the amount of lottery funds that the entity received and the purposes for which those funds were expended in the prior fiscal year, including administrative costs. The State Department of Education shall report on behalf of K–12 entities. If applicable, the entity shall also report the amount of lottery funds received on the basis of adult education average daily attendance (ADA) and the amount of lottery funds expended for adult education. SEC. 24.70. From the funds appropriated to the State Department of Education for local assistance, the department shall ensure that the expenditure of funds allocated to a local educational agency (LEA), through a contract between the department and the LEA or through a grant from the department to the LEA, shall be subject to the LEA’s fiscal accountability policies and procedures. If it is necessary for the LEA to establish a separate entity to complete the work scope of the contract or grant, the fiscal accountability policies and procedures for that entity shall be the same as those of the LEA, or amended only with the approval of both the superintendent of schools of the LEA and a fiscal representative of the department designated by the Superintendent of Public Instruction. Further, the department shall have the authority to provide for an audit of the expenditures under the contract or grant between the department and the LEA to verify conformance with appropriate fiscal accountability policies and procedures. The cost of the audit, if required, shall be charged to the audited contract or grant. SEC. 25.40. Notwithstanding any other law, the Department of Finance may adjust amounts in any appropriation item, or in any category thereof, to remove amounts budgeted from any state departments, that are used to reimburse the Department of General Services for Contracted Fiscal Services, budgeting and accounting services. SEC. 25.50. Notwithstanding any other law, an amount not to exceed $885,000 is hereby appropriated from various funds to the Controller, as specified below, for reimbursement of costs for the ongoing maintenance and support of the Apportionment Payment System: 0046 Public Transportation Account ........................ 19,000 0062 Highway Users Tax Account ........................ 305,000 0064 Motor Vehicle License Fee Account ........................ 17,000 0330 Local Revenue Fund ........................ 100,000 0877 DMV Local Agency Collection Fund ........................ 2,000 0932 Trial Court Trust Fund ........................ 174,000 0969 Public Safety Account ........................ 268,000 Total, All Funds ........................ 885,000 The Controller shall assess these funds for the costs of the Apportionment Payment System because apportionment payments in excess of $10,000,000 are made annually from these funds. Assessments in support of the expenditures for the Apportionment Payment System shall be made monthly, and the total amount assessed from these funds may not exceed the total expenditures incurred by the Controller for the Apportionment Payment System for the 2026–27 fiscal year. SEC. 26.00. (a) It is the intent of the Legislature, in enacting this section, to provide flexibility for the administrative approval of intraschedule transfers within individual items of appropriation in those instances where the transfers are necessary for the efficient and cost-effective implementation of the programs, projects, and functions funded by this act. No transfer shall be authorized under this section to either eliminate any program, project, or function, except when implementation is found to be no longer feasible in light of changing circumstances or new information, or establish any new program, project, or function. (b) The Director of Finance may, pursuant to a request by the officer, department, division, bureau, board, commission, or other agency to which an appropriation is made by this act, authorize the augmentation of the amount available for expenditure in any schedule set forth for that appropriation, by making a transfer from any of the other designated programs, projects, or functions within the same schedule. No intraschedule transfer may be made under this section to fund any capital outlay purpose, regardless of whether budgeted in a capital outlay or a local assistance appropriation. (c) Intraschedule transfers of the amounts available for expenditure for a program, project, or function designated in any line of any schedule set forth for that appropriation by transfer from any of the other designated programs, projects, or functions within the same schedule shall not exceed, during any fiscal year: (1) Twenty percent of the amount so scheduled on that line for those appropriations made by this act that are $2,000,000 or less. (2) $400,000 of the amount so scheduled on that line for those appropriations made by this act that are more than $2,000,000 but equal to or less than $4,000,000. (3) Ten percent of the amount so scheduled on that line for those appropriations made by this act that are more than $4,000,000. (4) The Department of Transportation Highway Program shall be limited to a schedule change of 10 percent. (d) Any transfer in excess of $200,000 may be authorized pursuant to this section not sooner than 30 days after notification in writing of the necessity therefor is provided to the chairpersons of the committees in each house of the Legislature that consider appropriations and the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, or not sooner than whatever lesser time after that notification the chairperson of the joint committee, or the chairperson’s designee, may in each instance determine. (e) Any transfer in excess of the limitations provided in subdivision (c) may be authorized not sooner than 30 days after notification in writing of the necessity to exceed the limitations is provided to the chairpersons of the committees in each house of the Legislature that consider appropriations and the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, or not sooner than whatever lesser time after that notification the chairperson of the joint committee, or the chairperson’s designee, may in each instance determine. SEC. 28.00. (a) It is the intent of the Legislature in enacting this section to provide flexibility for administrative approval of augmentations for the expenditure of unanticipated federal funds or other nonstate funds in cases that meet the criteria set forth in this section. However, this section does not provide an alternative budget process, and proposals for additional spending ordinarily should be considered in the annual State Budget or other state legislation. Specifically, augmentations for items which the administration had knowledge to include in its 2026–27 budget plan should not be submitted through the process provided by this section. Augmentations for items which can be deferred to the 2027–28 fiscal year should be included in the administration’s 2027–28 fiscal year budget proposals. (b) The Director of Finance may authorize the augmentation of the amount available for expenditure for any program, project, or function in the schedule of any appropriation in this act or any additional program, project, or function equal to the amount of any additional, unanticipated funds that the director estimates will be received by the state during the 2026–27 fiscal year from any agency of local government or the federal government, or from any other nonstate source, provided that the additional funding meets all of the following requirements: (1) The funds will be expended for a purpose that is consistent with state law. (2) The funds are made available to the state under conditions permitting their use only for a specified purpose, and the additional expenditure proposed under this section would apply to that specified funding purpose. (3) Acceptance of the additional funding does not impose on the state any requirement to commit or expend new state funds for any program or purpose. (4) The need exists to expend the additional funding during the 2026–27 fiscal year. (c) In order to receive consideration for an augmentation, an agency shall either (1) notify the director within 45 days of receiving official notice of the availability of additional, unanticipated funds, or (2) explain in writing to the director why that notification was infeasible or impractical. In either case, the recipient agency shall provide the director a copy of the official notice of fund availability. (d) The director also may reduce any program, project, or function whenever the director determines that funds to be received will be less than the amount taken into consideration in the schedule. (e) Any augmentation or reduction that exceeds either (1) $400,000 or (2) 10 percent of the amount available for expenditure in the affected program, project, or function may be authorized not sooner than 30 days after notification in writing of the necessity therefor is provided to the chairpersons of the committees in each house of the Legislature that consider appropriations, the chairpersons of the committees and the appropriate subcommittees in each house of the Legislature that consider the State Budget, and the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, or not sooner than whatever lesser time the chairperson of the joint committee, or the chairperson’s designee, may in each instance determine. With regard to any proposed augmentation, the notification shall state the basis for the determination by the director that the augmentation meets each of the requirements set forth in subdivisions (b) and (c). This notification shall include the date that the recipient department received official notice of the additional funds, and a copy of the agency’s written explanation if a 45-day notice was not provided to the director. This notification requirement does not apply to federal funds related to caseload increases in the Medi-Cal program, California Work Opportunity and Responsibility to Kids (CalWORKs), and the Supplemental Security Income/State Supplementary Payment (SSI/SSP) Program. (f) Any personnel action that is dependent on funds subject to this section shall not be effective until after the provisions of this section have been complied with. Any authorization made pursuant to this section shall remain in effect for the period the director may determine in each instance, but in no event after June 30, 2027. SEC. 28.30. (a) (1) It is the intent of the Legislature in enacting this section to provide flexibility for administrative approval of budgetary reductions to appropriations to address unanticipated reductions in the receipt of federal funds. Upon the enactment of federal legislation or an action by a cognizant federal agency to either terminate, rescind, or otherwise reduce the state’s receipt of federal funds already committed to the state by the cognizant federal agency, the Director of Finance is authorized to reduce, through executive order or budget revision, any item of appropriation, including appropriations from any state fund, for any program, project, or function to align with any reduction in the state’s receipt of federal funds. (2) Notwithstanding any other law, the Director of Finance, pursuant to paragraph (1), shall direct the state agency subject to the appropriation reduction. The state agency shall comply with the directions of the Director of Finance to align current services and operations to available funding levels until June 30, 2027. (3) This section does not authorize the Director of Finance to make programmatic changes, including, but not limited to, benefit determinations such as eligibility criteria and payment rates. (b) Any reductions authorized pursuant to subdivision (a) shall not be made prior to 30 days after the Director of Finance notifies the chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee in writing of the planned reduction and the justification for the amount of the planned reduction. The chairperson of the joint committee, or the chairperson’s designee, may shorten or waive the 30-day period by written notification to the Director of Finance. SEC. 28.31. (a) Notwithstanding any other law, the Director of Finance may authorize a short-term loan from the General Fund or any special fund to state departments or agencies experiencing delays in their receipt of federal funds in an amount to be determined by the Director of Finance, as specified, and based on terms and conditions for repayment as prescribed by the Director of Finance. A loan from the General Fund or a special fund to the affected state department or agency under this subdivision shall be subject to the following conditions: (1) The loan is intended only to meet cash needs resulting from a delay in the receipt of federal funds. (2) The loan is short-term and shall be repaid by June 30, 2027, or upon receipt of the federal funds, pursuant to terms and conditions and other determinations established by the Department of Finance. (3) For short-term loans from the General Fund, interest charges may be waived pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 16314 of the Government Code. (4) The Director of Finance may administratively establish or adjust items of appropriation to implement this subdivision. (b) For purposes of implementing this section, delay includes instances when federal funding is temporarily paused or the federal government requires additional review or additional or new submission requirements before reimbursement is received for a federal program. Delay does not include funding that the federal government has proposed for cancellation, reversion, or rescission, or that it has cancelled, reverted, or rescinded. (c) Any loan authorized pursuant to subdivision (a) shall not be made prior to 20 days after the Director of Finance notifies the chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee in writing of the planned loan and the justification for the amount of the planned loan. The chairperson of the joint committee, or the chairperson’s designee, may shorten or waive the 20-day period by written notification to the Director of Finance. SEC. 28.50. (a) Except as otherwise provided by law, an officer, department, division, bureau, or other agency of the state may expend for the 2026–27 fiscal year all moneys received as reimbursement from another officer, department, division, bureau, or other agency of the state that has not been taken into consideration by this act or any other statute, upon the prior written approval of the Director of Finance. The Department of Finance may also reduce any reimbursement amount and related program, project, or function amount if funds received from another officer, department, division, bureau, or other agency of the state will be less than the amount taken into consideration in the schedule. (b) For any expenditure of reimbursements or any transfer for the 2026–27 fiscal year that exceeds $200,000, the Director of Finance shall provide notification in writing of any approval granted under this section, not less than 30 days prior to the effective date of that approval, to the chairpersons of the committees in each house of the Legislature that consider appropriations, the chairpersons of the committees and the appropriate subcommittees in each house of the Legislature that consider the State Budget, and the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, or not later than whatever lesser amount of time prior to that effective date the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, or the chairperson’s designee, may in each instance determine. Increases to reimbursements are not reportable under this section if the funding for the other officer, department, division, bureau, or other agency of the state providing the reimbursement has already been approved by the Legislature. These adjustments are considered technical in nature and are authorized in Section 1.50. (c) (1) Upon written notification from the Senate Committee on Rules to the Controller and the Director of Finance, the Controller shall transfer, from Item 0110-001-0001 of Section 2.00 to an item specified by the committee, an amount specified by the committee for a purpose mutually agreed upon by the Senate and the entity receiving the additional funding under the latter item. (2) Upon written notification from the Assembly Committee on Rules to the Controller and the Director of Finance, the Controller shall transfer, from Item 0120-011-0001 of Section 2.00 to an item specified by the committee, an amount specified by the committee for a purpose mutually agreed upon by the Assembly and the entity receiving the additional funding under the latter item. SEC. 29.00. The Department of Finance shall calculate and publish a listing of total positions for each department and agency. These listings shall be published by the Department of Finance at the same time as the publication of (a) the Governor’s Budget, (b) the May Revision, and (c) the Final Change Book. (a) The listing provided at the time of the publication of the Governor’s Budget shall contain actual filled positions for the past year, an estimate of positions for the current year, and proposed positions for the budget year. (b) The listing provided at the time of publication of the May Revision shall contain estimates of positions proposed for the budget year. (c) The listing provided at the time of the publication of the Final Change Book shall contain estimates of positions for the fiscal year just enacted. SEC. 30.00. Section 13340 of the Government Code is amended to read: 13340. (a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), on and after July 1, 2027, no moneys in any fund that, by any statute other than a Budget Act, are continuously appropriated without regard to fiscal years may be encumbered unless the Legislature, by statute, specifies that the moneys in the fund are appropriated for encumbrance. (b) Subdivision (a) does not apply to any of the following: (1) The scheduled disbursement of any local sales and use tax proceeds to an entity of local government pursuant to Part 1.5 (commencing with Section 7200) of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code. (2) The scheduled disbursement of any transactions and use tax proceeds to an entity of local government pursuant to Part 1.6 (commencing with Section 7251) of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code. (3) The scheduled disbursement of any funds by a state or local agency or department that issues bonds and administers related programs for which funds are continuously appropriated as of June 30, 2027. (4) Moneys that are deposited in proprietary or fiduciary funds of the California State University and that are continuously appropriated without regard to fiscal years. (5) The scheduled disbursement of any motor vehicle license fee revenues to an entity of local government pursuant to the Vehicle License Fee Law (Part 5 (commencing with Section 10701) of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code). SEC. 31.00. (a) The appropriations made by this act shall be subject, unless otherwise provided by law, to Section 13320 and Article 2.5 (commencing with Section 13332) of Chapter 3 of Part 3 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, requiring expenditures to be made in accordance with the allotments and other provisions of departmental budgets approved by the Department of Finance. (b) The departmental budgets shall authorize, in the manner that the Department of Finance shall prescribe, all established positions whose continuance for the year is approved. Authorization by the Department of Finance is required for (1) the reclassification of any position to or from a monthly maximum salary of $13,842 or above, regardless of range, (which is equivalent to the monthly maximum salary of the Information Technology Manager II classification as of July 1, 2026) and (2) the establishment of any new position not (A) specifically identified in the Governor’s Budget and approved by the Legislature or (B) approved by the Legislature and specifically documented in the Final Change Book or enacted legislation. Additionally, authorization by the Department of Finance is required for (1) the reclassification of any non-Career Executive Assignment classification to a Career Executive Assignment classification or (2) the administrative establishment of any Career Executive Assignment classification. (c) The Department of Finance shall, for a period of not less than two years, keep and preserve documentation concerning position changes approved as specified in subdivision (b). The Department of Finance may use electronic means to keep and preserve this documentation. (d) It is the intent of the Legislature that all positions administratively established pursuant to this section that are intended by the administration to be ongoing be submitted to the Legislature for approval through the regular budget process as soon as possible. All positions administratively established pursuant to this section during the 2026–27 fiscal year shall terminate on June 30, 2027, except for those positions that have been (1) approved by the Legislature as part of the regular budget process for the 2027–28 fiscal year as new positions or (2) approved by the Department of Finance after the 2027–28 Governor’s Budget submission to the Legislature and subsequently reported to the Legislature prior to July 1, 2027. The positions identified in (2) above may be reestablished by the Department of Finance during the 2026–27 fiscal year, provided that these positions are shown in the Governor’s Budget for the 2028–29 fiscal year as submitted to the Legislature, and provided that these positions do not result in the reestablishment of positions deleted by the Legislature through the budget process for the 2027–28 fiscal year. The Department of Finance shall provide written notification to the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee within 30 days of the reestablishment of positions approved in the 2027–28 fiscal year pursuant to (2) above. (e) Moneys appropriated in the 2026–27 fiscal year may be expended for increases in salary ranges or any other employee compensation action only if appropriated for that purpose, or if the Department of Finance certifies to the salary and other compensation-setting authority, prior to the adoption of the action, that funds are available to pay the increased salary or employee compensation resulting from the action. Prior to certification, the Department of Finance shall determine whether the increase in salary range or employee compensation action will require supplemental funding in the 2027–28 fiscal year. If the Department of Finance determines that supplemental funding will be required, the department may certify only if it notifies in writing, at least 30 days before, the chairpersons of the committees in each house of the Legislature that consider appropriations and the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, or a lesser time which the chairperson of the joint committee, or the chairperson’s designee, determines. (f) A certification on a payroll claim that expenditures therein are in accordance with current budgetary provisions as approved by the Department of Finance shall be sufficient evidence to the Controller that these expenditures comply with this section. (g) Requests to continue administratively established positions as ongoing positions pursuant to subdivision (d) shall include information on the date the positions were administratively established. This information shall be included in the administration’s budget change proposals and finance letters. If the administration requests to establish new positions in the 2027–28 fiscal year, and subsequently decides to administratively establish the positions in the 2026–27 fiscal year, the Department of Finance shall provide written notification to the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee within 30 days of the administrative establishment of the positions. (h) This section applies to all state agencies, departments, boards, bureaus, and commissions. SEC. 32.00. (a) The officers of the various departments, boards, commissions, and institutions, for whose benefit and support appropriations are made in this act, are expressly forbidden to make any expenditures in excess of these appropriations. Any indebtedness attempted to be created against the state in violation of this section shall be null and void, and shall not be allowed by the Controller nor paid out of any state appropriation. (b) Any member of a department, board, commission, or institution who shall vote for any expenditure, or create any indebtedness against the state in excess of the respective appropriations made by this act shall be liable both personally and on the member’s official bond for the amount of the indebtedness, to be recovered in any court of competent jurisdiction by the person or persons, firm, or corporation to which the indebtedness is owing. Notwithstanding the foregoing or any other law, a person may not be held personally liable for the amount of any indebtedness created by an expenditure in excess of an appropriation made by this act if all of the following occur: (1) the expenditure is in response to increases in enrollment, population, or caseload by the State Department of Social Services, the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, the State Department of Developmental Services, the State Department of State Hospitals, the State Department of Health Care Services, or the State Department of Public Health; (2) that expenditure is incurred no sooner than 30 days after the Director of Finance provides written notification of its necessity to the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee; and (3) if the chairperson does not advise in response that the expenditure shall not occur. The director’s notification shall include a certification of any amounts required by enrollment, population, or caseload, rather than management decisions or policy changes. (c) Neither subdivision (a) nor (b) applies to the expenditure of moneys to fund continuous appropriations, including appropriations made in the California Constitution, and federal laws mandating the expenditure of funds. SEC. 33.00. If any item of appropriation in this act is vetoed, eliminated, or reduced by the Governor under Section 10 of Article IV of the California Constitution, while approving portions of this act, such veto, elimination, or reduction shall not affect the other portions of this act, and these other portions of this act, so approved, shall have the same effect in law as if any vetoed or eliminated items of appropriation had not been present in this act, and as if any reduced item of appropriation had not been reduced. SEC. 34.00. If any portion of this act is held unconstitutional, that decision shall not affect the validity of any other portion of this act. The Legislature hereby declares that it would have passed this act, and each portion thereof, irrespective of the fact that any other portion be declared unconstitutional. SEC. 35.21. Notwithstanding any other law, the Department of Finance shall not use the estimated net final payment accrual methodology for the accrual of revenues, except for tax revenues that are accrued pursuant to an initiative measure that is enacted on or after January 1, 2012. SEC. 35.35. (a) To ensure cash needs in appropriation are met, departments shall make every reasonable effort to promptly collect reimbursements or amounts payable from other funds or departments, or collect the amounts in advance. Payments between departments may be made by transferring funds pursuant to Section 11255 of the Government Code. (b) Notwithstanding any other law, if a department impacted by the implementation of FI$Cal demonstrates to the Department of Finance that it is unable to collect reimbursements or amounts payable from other funds or departments as specified in subdivision (a) and a temporary cash shortage arises for the department, the Director of Finance may authorize a short-term cash loan from the General Fund or from other funds administered or used by the requesting department. The cash loan shall be subject to the terms and conditions for repayment as may be prescribed by the Department of Finance. Interest charges may be waived pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 16314 of the Government Code. Within 10 days after approval, the Director of Finance shall notify the Joint Legislative Budget Committee of loans approved pursuant to this subdivision. (c) For purposes of the budgetary and legal bases of accounting and budgeting, the principal amount of any loans made pursuant to this section shall not be considered part of the balance of the fund that receives the loan, nor shall it be deducted from the balance of the fund from which the loan is made. These loans are considered cashflow loans for temporary cash shortages and shall not constitute budgetary loans, revenues, or expenditures. The Department of Finance shall make the final determination of the budgetary and accounting transactions and treatments to ensure proper implementation of the provisions of this section, pursuant to Section 13344 of the Government Code. SEC. 35.50. (a) For purposes of paragraph (1) of subdivision (f) of Section 10 of, and subdivision (g) of Section 12 of, Article IV of the California Constitution, “General Fund revenues” means the total resources available to the General Fund for a fiscal year before any transfer to or withdrawal from the Budget Stabilization Account. (b) For purposes of subdivision (g) of Section 12 of Article IV of the California Constitution, the estimate of General Fund revenues for the 2026–27 fiscal year pursuant to this act, as passed by the Legislature, is $287,508,000,000. $287,205,000,000. (c) For purposes of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 20 of Article XVI of the California Constitution, “General Fund revenues” shall be defined as revenues and transfers before any transfer to or withdrawal from the Budget Stabilization Account. (d) Pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 20 of Article XVI of the California Constitution, the following estimates are provided: (1) For purposes of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 20 of Article XVI of the California Constitution, the sum equal to 1.5 percent of General Fund revenues for the 2026–27 fiscal year is $3,532,000,000. $3,538,000,000. (2) For purposes of clause (ii) of subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 20 of Article XVI of the California Constitution, capital gains revenues that exceed 8 percent of General Fund proceeds of taxes for the 2026–27 fiscal year is $5,970,000,000. $5,954,000,000. (3) For purposes of clause (ii) of subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) of Section 20 of Article XVI of the California Constitution, the amount for debt payments in the 2026–27 fiscal year is $3,579,000,000. $3,577,000,000. (4) (A) For purposes of subparagraph (F) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 20 of Article XVI of the California Constitution, the amount of transfer to the Budget Stabilization Account in the 2026–27 fiscal year is $3,579,000,000. $3,577,000,000. (5) For purposes of clause (ii) of subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 20 of Article XVI of the California Constitution, the updated estimate of capital gains revenues that exceeds 8 percent of General Fund proceeds of taxes for the 2025–26 fiscal year is $10,894,000,000. (6) For purposes of subparagraph (G) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 20 of Article XVI of the California Constitution, the first true up of the transfer to the Budget Stabilization Account for the 2025–26 fiscal year is $0. (7) For purposes of clause (ii) of subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 20 of Article XVI of the California Constitution, the updated capital gains revenues that exceed 8 percent of General Fund proceeds of taxes for the 2024–25 fiscal year is $5,652,000,000. (8) For purposes of subparagraph (G) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 20 of Article XVI of the California Constitution, the second true up of the transfer to the Budget Stabilization Account for the 2024–25 fiscal year is $305,000,000. SEC. 35.55. (a) Upon order of the Department of Finance, the Controller shall transfer in one or more transactions a total amount of $9,235,500,000 $7,413,100,000 from the General Fund to the Projected Surplus Temporary Holding Account in the 2026–27 fiscal year. (b) Pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 16418.7 of the Government Code, a transfer to the Projected Surplus Temporary Holding Account is included in the annual Budget Act. (c) (1) Pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 16418.7 of the Government Code, funds transferred to the Projected Surplus Temporary Holding Account shall remain in that account for no more than one year from the date of deposit. (2) Upon order of the Department of Finance, the Controller shall transfer the amount transferred in subdivision (a) from the Projected Surplus Temporary Holding Account to the General Fund in the 2027–28 fiscal year to comply with subdivision (c) of Section 16418.7 of the Government Code. SEC. 38.00. This act is a Budget Bill within the meaning of subdivision (e) of Section 12 of Article IV of the California Constitution and shall take effect immediately. SEC. 39.00. The Legislature hereby finds and declares that the following bills are other bills providing for appropriations related to the Budget Bill within the meaning of subdivision (e) of Section 12 of Article IV of the California Constitution: Bills to be added later. INDEX BY BUDGET TITLE SEC. 99.00. The following provides an index to the appropriations and related provisions of this act, by organization in alphabetical order, with the code number of the affected organization. The organization code is the first four numbers of any item number in this act. For ease of reference, the appropriation items in this act are organized in numerical order, and all of the appropriation items for any one organization are adjacent to one another. Department Organization Code “A” ABLE Act Board, California ........................ 0981 Administrative Law, Office of ........................ 7910 Aging, California Commission on ........................ 4180 Aging, California Department of ........................ 4170 Agricultural Labor Relations Board ........................ 7300 Air Resources Board, State ........................ 3900 Alcoholic Beverage Control, Department of ........................ 2100 Alcoholic Beverage Control Appeals Board ........................ 2120 Alternative Energy and Advanced Transportation Financing Authority, California ........................ 0971 Arts Council, California ........................ 8260 Asian and Pacific Islander American Affairs, California Commission on ........................ 8825 Assembly ........................ 0120 Auditor’s Office, California State ........................ 8855 “B” Baldwin Hills and Urban Watersheds Conservancy ........................ 3835 Boards.See subject (e.g., Air Resources, etc.) Behavioral Health Services Oversight and Accountability Commission ........................ 4560 Business and Consumer Services Agency, Secretary of ........................ 0515 “C” Cannabis Control, Department of ........................ 1115 Cannabis Control Appeals Panel ........................ 1045 Cash Management and Budgetary Loans ........................ 9620 Child Support Services, Department of ........................ 5175 Citizens Compensation Commission, California ........................ 8385 Citizens Redistricting Commission ........................ 0911 Civil Rights Department ........................ 1700 Coachella Valley Mountains Conservancy ........................ 3850 Coastal Commission, California ........................ 3720 Coastal Conservancy, State ........................ 3760 College of Law, San Francisco ........................ 6600 Colorado River Board of California ........................ 3460 Community Colleges, Board of Governors of the California ........................ 6870 Community Services and Development, Department of ........................ 4700 Conservation, Department of ........................ 3480 Conservation Corps, California ........................ 3340 Consumer Affairs, Department of ........................ 1111 Contingencies or Emergencies, Augmentation for ........................ 9840 Contingencies or Emergencies (Loans), Augmentation for ........................ 9850 Contributions to.See subject (e.g., Judges’ Retirement, Teachers’ Retirement, etc.) Controller ........................ 0840 Corrections and Rehabilitation, Department of ........................ 5225 Councils.See subject (e.g., Arts, etc.) “D” Data and Innovation, Office of ........................ 7504 Debt and Investment Advisory Commission, California ........................ 0956 Debt Limit Allocation Committee, California ........................ 0959 Delta Protection Commission ........................ 3840 Delta Stewardship Council ........................ 3885 Department of.See subject (e.g., Corrections and Rehabilitation, Food and Agriculture, etc.) Developmental Disabilities, State Council on ........................ 4100 Developmental Services, State Department of ........................ 4300 “E” Education Audit Appeals Panel ........................ 6125 Education, State Department of ........................ 6100 Educational Facilities Authority, California ........................ 0989 Emergency Services, Office of ........................ 0690 Emergency Medical Services Authority ........................ 4120 Employee Compensation, Augmentation for ........................ 9800 Employment Development Department ........................ 7100 Energy Infrastructure Safety, Office of ........................ 3355 Energy Resources Conservation and Development Commission, State ........................ 3360 Enhanced Tobacco Settlement Asset-Backed Bonds ........................ 9612 Environmental Health Hazard Assessment, Office of ........................ 3980 Environmental Protection, Secretary for ........................ 0555 Equalization, State Board of ........................ 0860 Equity Claims and Settlements and Judgments ........................ 9670 Exposition Park ........................ 3100 “F” Fair Political Practices Commission ........................ 8620 Finance, Department of ........................ 8860 Financial Information System for California ........................ 8880 Financial Protection and Innovation, Department of ........................ 1701 Fish and Wildlife, Department of ........................ 3600 Food and Agriculture, Department of ........................ 8570 Forestry and Fire Protection, Department of ........................ 3540 Franchise Tax Board ........................ 7730 “G” Gambling Control Commission, California ........................ 0855 General Services, Department of ........................ 7760 Government Operations, Secretary of ........................ 0511 Governor Elect and Outgoing Governor ........................ 0730 Governor’s Office ........................ 0500 Governor’s Office of Business and Economic Development (GO-Biz) ........................ 0509 Governor’s Office of Land Use and Climate Innovation ........................ 0650 Governor’s Office of Service and Community Engagement ........................ 0680 Governor’s Portrait ........................ 0720 “H” Health Care Access and Information, Department of ........................ 4140 Health Facilities Financing Authority, California ........................ 0977 Health and Human Services, Secretary of California ........................ 0530 Health and Dental Benefits for Annuitants ........................ 9650 Health Benefit Exchange, California ........................ 4800 Health Care Services, State Department of ........................ 4260 High-Speed Rail Authority ........................ 2665 High-Speed Rail Authority Office of the Inspector General ........................ 2667 Highway Patrol, Department of the California ........................ 2720 Historic State Capitol Commission ........................ 8270 Hope, Opportunity, Perseverance, and Empowerment (HOPE) for Children Trust Account Program Board, California ........................ 0957 Horse Racing Board, California ........................ 1750 Housing and Community Development, Department of ........................ 2240 Housing and Homelessness Agency, Secretary of California ........................ 0516 Human Resources, Department of ........................ 7501 “I” Independent Living Council, State ........................ 5170 Industrial Relations, Department of ........................ 7350 Institutions (See Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, State Department of Health Care Services, etc.) Inspector General, Office of the ........................ 0552 Institute for Regenerative Medicine, California ........................ 6445 Insurance, Department of ........................ 0845 Interagency Council on Homelessness, California ........................ 2255 Interest Payments to the Federal Government ........................ 9625 “J” Joint Expenses (Legislature) ........................ 0130 Judges’ Retirement Fund ........................ 0390 Judicial Performance, Commission on ........................ 0280 Judicial Branch ........................ 0250 Justice, Department of ........................ 0820 “L” Lands Commission, State ........................ 3560 Labor and Workforce Development Agency, Secretary of ........................ 0559 Law Revision Commission, California ........................ 8830 Legislative Analyst’s Office ........................ 0130 Legislative Counsel Bureau ........................ 0160 Legislature (See Assembly, Senate, or Joint Expenses) Library, California State ........................ 6120 Lieutenant Governor, Office of the ........................ 0750 Local Government Financing ........................ 9210 “M” Managed Health Care, Department of ........................ 4150 Military Department ........................ 8940 Milton Marks “Little Hoover” Commission on California State Government Organization and Economy ........................ 8780 Motor Vehicles, Department of ........................ 2740 “N” Native American Heritage Commission ........................ 3780 Natural Resources Agency, Secretary of the ........................ 0540 “O” Office of.See subject (e.g., Emergency Services, Planning and Research, etc.) “P” Parks and Recreation, Department of ........................ 3790 Payment to Counties for Costs of Homicide Trials ........................ 9300 Peace Officer Standards and Training, Commission on ........................ 8120 Personnel Board, State ........................ 7503 Pesticide Regulation, Department of ........................ 3930 Pilot Commissioners for the Bays of San Francisco, San Pablo, and Suisun, Board of ........................ 2670 Political Reform Act of 1974 ........................ 8640 Privacy Protection Agency, California ........................ 8615 Public Defender, State ........................ 8140 Public Employees’ Retirement System, Board of Administration of the ........................ 7900 Public Employment Relations Board ........................ 7320 Public Health, State Department of ........................ 4265 Public Utilities Commission ........................ 8660 “R” Real Estate, Department of ........................ 2320 Resources Recycling and Recovery, Department of ........................ 3970 Rehabilitation, Department of ........................ 5160 “S” Sacramento-San Joaquin Delta Conservancy ........................ 3875 San Diego River Conservancy ........................ 3845 San Francisco Bay Conservation and Development Commission ........................ 3820 San Gabriel and Lower Los Angeles Rivers and Mountains Conservancy ........................ 3825 San Joaquin River Conservancy ........................ 3830 Santa Monica Mountains Conservancy ........................ 3810 ScholarShare Investment Board ........................ 0954 School Finance Authority, California ........................ 0985 Secretary of State ........................ 0890 Senate ........................ 0110 Senior Legislature, California ........................ 4185 Sierra Nevada Conservancy ........................ 3855 Social Services, State Department of ........................ 5180 Special Resources Program ........................ 3110 State.See subject (e.g., Controller, Treasurer, etc.) State and Community Corrections, Board of ........................ 5227 State Hospitals, State Department of ........................ 4440 State Mandates, Commission on ........................ 8885 Status of Women and Girls, Commission on the ........................ 8820 Student Aid Commission ........................ 6980 Summer School for the Arts, California State ........................ 6255 “T” Tahoe Conservancy, California ........................ 3125 Tax and Fee Administration, California Department of ........................ 7600 Tax Appeals, Office of ........................ 0870 Tax Credit Allocation Committee, California ........................ 0968 Tax Relief ........................ 9100 Teacher Credentialing, Commission on ........................ 6360 Teachers’ Retirement System, State ........................ 7920 Technology, Department of ........................ 7502 Toxic Substances Control, Department of ........................ 3960 Transportation, Department of ........................ 2660 Transportation, Secretary of ........................ 0521 Transportation Commission, California ........................ 2600 Treasurer ........................ 0950 Trial Court Security—​Court Construction ........................ 9285 Trial Court Security—​Judgeships ........................ 9286 “U” University, California State ........................ 6610 University, California State, Health Benefits for Annuitants ........................ 6645 University of California ........................ 6440 “V” Veterans Affairs, Department of ........................ 8955 Victim Compensation Board, California ........................ 7870 “W” Water Resources, Department of ........................ 3860 Water Resources Control Board, State ........................ 3940 Wildlife Conservation Board ........................ 3640 Workforce Development Board, California ........................ 7120 INDEX FOR CONTROL SECTIONS SEC. 99.50. The following is an index to the general sections of this act. These sections serve to define terms and identify restrictions concerning the appropriations contained in this act. 1.00 Budget Act Citation 1.50 Intent and Format 1.51 Citations to Prior Budget Acts 1.80 Availability of Appropriations 2.00 Items of Appropriation 3.00 Defines Purposes of Appropriations 3.10 Subschedule Transfers for Capital Projects 3.50 Benefit Charges Against Salaries and Wages 3.60 Contribution to Public Employees’ Retirement Benefits 3.61 Contribution to Prefund Other Postemployment Benefits 4.05 Budget Adjustment Authority 4.11 Position Vacancy Report 4.13 AB 85 Repayments to Counties 4.20 Contribution to Public Employees’ Contingency Reserve Fund 4.30 Lease-Revenue Payment Adjustments 4.72 Electric Vehicle Charging Infrastructure 4.75 Statewide Surcharge 4.80 State Public Works Board Interim Financing 4.90 Architectural Revolving Fund Transfer 4.95 Inmate and Ward Construction Revolving Account Transfer 5.25 Attorney’s Fees 5.27 Federal Accountability Litigation 6.00 Project Alterations Limits 6.40 Automated Cargo Handling Equipment 8.00 Antiterrorism Federal Reimbursements 8.50 Federal Funds Receipts 8.51 Federal Funds Accounts 8.52 Federal Reimbursements 8.53 Notice of Federal Audits 8.54 Enforce Recovery of Federal Funds for Statewide Indirect Costs 8.75 Infrastructure Investment and Jobs Act 9.30 Federal Levy of State Funds 9.50 Minor Capital Outlay Projects 11.00 Information Technology Reporting Requirements 11.10 Reporting of Statewide Software License Agreements 11.11 Privacy of Information in Pay Stubs 11.94 Coronavirus Capital Projects Fund 11.96 Coronavirus Fiscal Relief 11.97 State Appropriation Limit Excludable Federal Fund Appropriations for Capital Outlay 12.00 State Appropriations Limit (SAL) 12.30 Special Fund for Economic Uncertainties 12.32 Proposition 98-Funding Guarantee 12.33Public School System Stabilization Account Transfer 12.35 Financial Aid Policy Change Requirements 12.45 June to July Payroll Deferral 13.00 Legislative Counsel Bureau 14.00 Special Fund Loans Between Boards of the Department of Consumer Affairs 15.02 Appropriation of Climate Bond (Proposition 4) Funding for 2026–27 15.04 Climate Bond (Proposition 4) Operational Efficiencies 15.14 Allocation of Greenhouse Gas Reduction Fund 15.25 Data Center Rate Adjustment 15.45 Trial Court Funding Offsets 20.00 Reappropriations and Reversions 24.00 State School Fund Allocations 24.30 Transfer School Building Rental Income to the General Fund 24.60 Report of Lottery Funds Received 24.70 Local Educational Agency Fiscal Accountability 25.40 Contracted Fiscal Services Costs 25.50 SCO Apportionment Payment System Assessments 26.00 Intraschedule Transfers 28.00 Program Change Notification 28.30 Federal Funds Realignment 28.31 Short-Term Cash Loans Due to Delay in Federal Funds 28.50 Agency Reimbursement Payments 29.00 Position Estimates of Governor’s Budget, May Revision, and Final Change Book 30.00 Continuous Appropriations 31.00 Budget Act Administrative Procedures for Salaries and Wages 32.00 Prohibits Excess Expenditures 33.00 Item Veto Severability 34.00 Constitutional Severability 35.21 Application of Net Final Payment Accrual Methodology 35.35 FI$Cal—​Short-Term Cash Loans 35.50 Estimated General Fund Revenues and Various Estimates Related to the Budget Stabilization Account 35.55 Surplus Temporary Holding Account Transfer 38.00 Provides That This Bill Is a Budget Bill 39.00 Identification of Bills Related to the Budget Bill 99.00 Alphabetical Organization Index 99.50 Numerical Control Section Index